Collared Prompt List
And greentexts/concepts that I found interesting

>All that talk of taking the planet conquest by glorious battle, of daring hero marines dropping in on other worlds and cleaving our way through the cities of these screeching chittering monsters till they cried uncle and is cool and all, sure you can take a concubine rape-slave out of it and sure that’s your base rapist impulse satiated..but that’s shallow, I live amidst a brooding generation barely to young to have experienced their civilization get so blown the fuck out that their old societies got swept aside in narry the blink of an and these near-feral things now swoon over and emulate humanity badly.
>I sit across from a young Dxlaxian Fleshrender, primitive predator alien pack hunters. The thing is multiple heads and shoulders larger then any man and strength doubly so. Yet she we are having a picnic and she
>She picks the flowers and wears the pretty bow because that’s what she thinks human women would do. That her kind don’t need to shade their nonexistang eyes or that her chinaware utensils can scarcely be seen to be holdable by her.

>COLLARED.com: To Humans living in anthro-dominated nations, have you found any difficulty in finding pets to collar? Is it hard keeping them and their devotion to Humans a secret?
Due to the repercussions me and my pet could possibly face by revealing our names, I wish to remain anonymous. As for your question, I believe that the difficulty in acquiring a pet depends on a multitude of factors, many of which are simply up to chance and the natural instincts of the anthro you're trying to collar. In my case, I didn't even need to try, as she practically collared herself the moment we met.
You see, a few years ago the company I worked for had sent me to work as a translator at one of their overseas offices in the frozen hellscape that is ‘Furland’. For those less geographically knowledgeable, Furland is a small nation located in the Northern Arctic region of Queredean. They're society is very anthro dominated, and they mostly make their money off of the many oil reservoirs that dot their frosty land.
Now the office I was supposed to work in is located within a city, however, my company in their infinite wisdom had set me up with a rental house about an hour away from the city and I wasn't able to acquire a driver's license, so I was forced to take the bus to and from the city.
Well one day in early December, I was sitting alone in the bus stop’s shelter, shivering and feeling absolutely miserable, when a doe stepped into the shelter with me. She looked at me with a curious expression as she noticed me and greeted me. I of course said hello back and she asked me if I knew how to speak Furrish (their national language). I said that I knew a little and she giggled and asked if I was cold, which I responded with a nod. Then, she asked something that I didn't quite understand.
“Hawuatko wämmitewwä~ kun odotamme bussia?”
I was able to make out a few of the words, but I was unable to fully comprehend her question. So I asked her if she could repeat what she had said, but she just laughed at turned around before taking her phone out of her jacket pocket and tapping away at it. As she typed something into her phone, I couldn't help but notice how plump her ass was, especially for a deer. I thought about trying to flirt with her, but before I could say anything, she looked over her shoulder at me and asked in broken English “Wanna warm up while waiting for bus?” as she pulled down her pants and showed me her rear. I was quiet for a moment, as I was sort of shocked by how open she was, but then I nodded and smiled before standing up.
She turned and placed her hands on the wall of the shelter and I got behind her and undid my belt. The rest was sort of a blur, but I do remember that we both decided to skip whatever we were going to do that day, and I dragged her back to my house to continue our romp session.
That was a few months ago, and now she has become my secret live-in pet and the mother of our future children. I’m currently trying to get her the paperwork to bring her back to my home country, but once I do I’m going to get her a nice collar to wear.

>twas the night before Christmas, and all was not well, and all because I was not feeling swell
>No woman to be with on Christmas had made em real stressed, so in spite of the parties I went home for a rest
>I set a fire in the hearth- and sat in my lair, and out the window to the snow I just sat and stared
“Oh Saint Nick, hear my plight. Women of the world give me such a fright. They’re nasty, and mean, they think I’m unclean- and worst of all they treat me like trash unless I bring big stacks of green”
>even as I wished out into the black, I never thought in my wildest dreams I’d get an answer back
>the fire sputtered. The house made a clank. I was convinced on the roof there was a tank
>but then two black boots landed out from the chimney
>and out from the hearth came what looked like a bearded kyriakos grizzly
>”ho ho ho” he laughed and chuckled
>then the opening from his great big sack he unbuckled
>“ive heard your sorrows- forgive the womenfolk for being cold as ice. This year since you’ve been good I’ve made you something real nice”
>he shouldered his mighty sack of velvet red and gold
>and out he pulled a female, but with the features of an animal bold
>a horse, a wolf, and a kitty he freed, setting them all under the Christmas tree
>heavy huge breasts and ample assets below, all wrapped up with ribbons tied in a bow
>they snoozed and slumbered with animalistic rumbles, and that’s when old Saint Nick said with a mumble
>“Merry Christmas my boy, I hope the gifts make you happy. Now you don’t have to worry about your women treating you crappy”
>he smiled with his red rosy cheeks making great big dimples, then back to the chimney he hauled himself real simple
>he hauled his bag to his shoulders and reached for a treat. He chuckled again- warmly like the suns heat
>“these are the cookies your mother taught you to make, I hope she reminds you to love, and not feel hate”
>i was not believing my eyes standing there aghast, and as quick as Santa came he left just as fast
>he hauled himself up the chimney- his bag he took, and once again the roof shattered and shook
>“on comet, on donner, on blitzen! There are billions of good lads to gift loving wife vixens!”
>to the sounds of jingling he whipped his leads, and out the window I saw him take to the sky with great speed
>his harty laugh I heard as he took flight
>“merry Christmas to all, and to all a good night”

>she felt the strength in her left arm give, and slid down into the saddle
>the sharp pointed ball on the front pressed painfully into her clit
>she quickly grabbed hold of the pommel leading to the lock on the front of the saddle, pushing herself up a little bit with her right arm
>the young canine felt relief in her clit, but only aggravated the pain in her back of holding herself up with one arm
>she originally held herself up with both arms, but when they both gave out on her she was in hell of having that damn spiked ball jammed into her clit with no strength to get herself off of it
>now she used just one arm, switching off as her strength wore out
>her free arm was used to lift the heavy bells attached to the rings they put in her nipple piercings, providing some temporary relief to her sore tits
>mentally she cursed her arrogance when the humans first showed her the saddle
>why did she have to laugh and say a few dildos didn't scare her
>the intense pain in her clit when they lowered her into the saddle and locked the waistband in place convinced her she didn't fully understand the situation
>she was overjoyed when they untied her arms, thinking they were freeing her
>it wasn't long before she figured out this was the real torture, giving her enough movement to push herself up
>her slightest movements set the saddle rocking, shifting the dildos inside of her and making all the bells attached to her ring
>all she could do was temporarily relieve some pain somewhere, at the cost of pain elsewhere
>only way to relieve pain on her arms and back was to torture her clit
>only way to relieve her clit was to torture her arms and back
>only way to relieve her tits was to not rest her free arm
>only way to relieve her free arm was to let her nipples suffer
>every orgasm made her weaker
>she prayed the humans would return soon

>chill on my favorite beach in collaredstan
>eat burrito
>moment later some fat ass lAnds on my face and snatches my burrito
>a fucking seagull
> mating press her while she's backing apologies and ahegaoing
>on next day it happens again
>are gulls that stupid?

A Frontier Operative's Account of the Domestication of the Uberi Tribe, 451 AU
>The Uberi Tribe was an elk anthro tribe off the west border of the Empire, estimated to number around 500 in total population. In accordance to current standards, attempts to negotiate diplomatic concessions from them were made, in return for the protection of their tribe, through legal restrictions on hunting. They summarily refused this offer. A threat of force was made, followed by an offer to establish them as a vassal tributory, which was similarly refused. Thus, in the year of our Father 451, by Imperial decree, the Uberi Tribe was deemed a just and righteous target of conquest, and a casus belli of conquest was formally issued upon them.
>The Uberi Tribe was not an unusually large, or even noteworthy tribe, simply one of the many multitudes of anthro tribes throughout the wildlands. It was merely one amongst several targets of conquest already issued this year, and it's domestication was expected to be a routine affair. And so, Imperial military leadership saw fit to delegate only a single centuria to the task, knowing that the force's numbers would be bolstered by independent forces and hunter-mercenaries. This is where I joined the encampment, and my personal accounting may begin.
>The encampment based itself out of Camuth, a small border town nearest to the Uberi tribal grounds. There, 80-odd Imperial soldiers, in addition to their commanding officers and attached logistics division, made up the 100 men of the assigned centuria. Independent operators such as myself needed only to register credentials with the centurian commander in order to join the war party.
>From the town of Camuth, about 15 or so members of their civil militia did so, which was most of their militia's number. For a small, rural border town like this, any number of anthro slaves would be a significant boon, and the chance to acquire them through right of personal conquest was an opportunity too valuable to pass up.
>Travelling here from elsewhere to join to domestication assault were a few dozen independent operatives like myself, bearing hunting or chattel trading licenses. Many of them were hunter-mercenaries registered with the Hunter's Lodge, with two of them even bearing rare gunpowder weapons, licensed to wield them by Imperial high writ of recognition, something of which I would just like to note I was NOT in any way jealous of.
>Preparations were made, supplies were gathered, and the orders were outlined. Imperial decree was for this to be a domestication, not a simple culling. So efforts would be made to keep as many anthros as possible alive, even the males. We were to march fast on the tribal village with the sun at our back, falling upon them swiftly while a smaller detachment flanked the other side of the village to encircle them and capture any fleeing anthros.
>They outnumbered us significantly, and our planned attack was simple and direct. And yet, none of this would be an issue.
>The next day, we marched swiftly across the plains as planned, a few of the hunters on horseback. The armor of the centurians glistened in the sunlight, and we sent the flanking force ahead as we approached our destination.
>The Uberi village was large, but simple, thankfully located in a mostly clear stretch of grassland rather than within the denser woods. Tents in the style of the plains tribes, with a few segmented barriers of crude wooden stakes here and there around the perimeter. There would be no calling this a "fortification," for sure. Yet they greeted us undaunted with a hail of arrows as we crested the hill.
>The Uberi Elks must have prepared for our assault in their own way, greatly expanding their armory of bows, for there were more arrows in that initial volley than we had men in our war party.
>But we were no tribal raiding party. Arrows of flint, stone, and bone met Imperial steel, sparking off of armor and clattering against raised shields. The military of the Empire was disciplined and trained, a rows of heavily armored infantry layered in front of the generally more lightly armored volunteers. The shield wall went up, we crouched down, and the most any of those countless arrows achieved were a scant few shallow wounds, barely piercing the leather shoulder armor of a few too-eager young village guards.
>A shout went up for the middle columns to stay down, and the rear forces stood to answer the volley. The centuria had brought not archers, but their famed javelineers, who hurled long steel-tipped rods with strength and precision most impressive. Their fiersome javelins struck with force enough to send Elk men hurtling backwards, staking some to the ground right where they stood. Blood arced across cloth tents, startled cries from the elk defenders drowning out the death rattles of the fallen. They had been struck harder than they'd expected by our counter volley.
>We aimed to capitalize on this. A rallying cry from the centurian commander sent us charging forward, shields up and providing ample coverage from the hasty, intermittent arrows of the still-reeling elk archers. With the defenders scrambling to brace against our charge, the javelineers were left unharried and allowed to swiftly rain javelins down upon the anthros warriors. The sound of javelins splitting the wind, cut off by a meaty thunk and a pained yelp, were frighteningly consistent. After their initial response salvo, the javalineers were now free to aim and throw at their own discretion– and their aim was renowned.
>As we charged, close enough now to see the mixed fear and defiance in the elk stags eyes, the intermittent, thunderous crack of distant gunfire from beyond the village told us that no anthro would be slipping through the net today. The flanking party, lead by the two firearm-wielding bastards hunter-mercenaries, had already denied a retreat party before our frontline had even reached the defender's spears.
>I confess, I've always found it difficult to describe a melee, such as what resulted when our charging forces met their braced spearmen. They always seem to happen in such a blur of adrenaline, the individual moments stretching out forever, but the battle itself over before you even realize. So what can I say for the battle that ensued, other than that it was fierce, and was over very quickly.
>Well, I can say that the elk stags fought well. They had chosen resistance, and so they resisted admirably. I am proud of the two sets of prodigious antlers I returned to my home with, bearing tribal Uberi marking whose meanings will be forgotten within a generation, no longer passed down from father to son. The Uberi stags were worthy of respect, and I honor their memory through these trophies, just as they bring honor upon me.
>But I digress. Suffice to say, the elk warriors were no match for us. After the brave and proud had fallen in scores before the maces and javelins of the Imperial soldiers, along with the various weapons of the rest of us, the rest of their ilk quickly changed their mind about their chosen path of resistance and surrendered. The village was in bedlam, individual human soldiers having pushed all the way into and throughout it during the fighting, leaving panicked doe's and noncombatents dashing between, in, and out of tents. Our forces, joined by the flanking group, had encircled the village properly now, and we let the elkfolk practically rebound off our circled lines as they desperately sought an escape.
>The soldiers did their best to herd them in and tighten the circle, until the villagers quickly realized that there would be no escaping today. Nearly the entire initial population of the village, several hundred elk anthros of all ages, stag and doe, now milled about the village in idle anxiety and fear. Myself and the other hunters combed through the village, coaxing the huddled pockets of stragglers towards the main group as gently as we could, and rendering aid to any wounded who could be saved.
>During these efforts, I nearly tripped over a pretty elk doe, lying in the dirt and looking up at me with fearful, pinprick pupils. The poor thing had twisted her leg in the rushed stampede to escape, and was kicking feebly against the ground in a vain attempt to push herself away from me, yelping whenever she tried to put weight on her injured leg.
>I helped her up gently, as she repeatedly cried out something like "𐌽𐌴 𐌹𐍄𐌰𐌽П 𐌼𐌹𐌺!", in a dialect I couldn't quite place. The Uberi did not use the shared tongue, nor any of the common tribal languages, instead having their own derivative of some kind that was indecipherable to even a polyglot like myself. But despite the language barrier, I was eventually able to convey that I meant her no harm and collected the injured doe, having her rest her weight on my arm as I lead her over to where the other villagers were being gathered.
>Once the whole village had been searched, I took a seat upon a stump in front of the gathering, so that I could have a good view to observe the rest of the proceedings, for the sake of this account. I decided to keep the previously mentioned doe with me for this, feeling somewhat personally responsible for her after helping her limp back through the village, and so I waved off the soldiers who offered to take her off my hands and assured them I'd handle it.
>I'm not sure what the doe inferred from that interaction, as she clearly couldn't understand our words, but she seemed quite grateful that I had kept her from being herded into the main group. She kept close to my side, trembling fearfully and clinging to me like a protector. I had her kneel at my side, leaning over my lap in order to keep the weight off her injured leg. The female deer's head swiveled to follow each armor-clad soldier who passed us, her eyes wide. I can only imagine what she and the other anthros might have feared would be done with them, as the rest were corralled by the Imperial soldiers.
>Guild officials from the Hunter's Lodge handled the evaluation of any individual claims of personal conquest, from hunters wishing to take trophies from stags they had felled, to those who, like me, had a specific anthro or anthros they wished to stake claim on. The Hunter's Lodge takes such things very seriously, and thoroughly investigated each claim, along with the credentials of the claimant, before rendering a verdict on the claim's validity. According to trophy grading standards, a full trophy could only be alloted if the anthro was deemed to have been felled solely by the actions of the claimant. The majority of the fallen anthros were either unclaimed, or their death couldn't be attributed entirely to a sole individual. From these, many antlers would be collected posthumously and graded with the silver mark of collective conquest, before being distributed among the all those who partook in the assault (this was how I came into ownership of my own two sets of Uberi antlers).

>humans work their way into the courts of anthro royalty
>seduce all the highborn women and turn them into spies
>humans control the anthro kingdoms with a network of well fucked spy-sluts

The Galactis Empire, especially in Legends, is I think a good setting for /collared/ material.
>Empire believes in human supremacy and that it is humanity's destined role to rule over all the lesser races
>non-humans lives as seconds class citizen beneath their human betters
>entire species are declared non-sapient and enslaved
>imperial planetary governors live like kings and can have their own harems
Basically imagine if the Imperium of Man instead of outright killing xenos, took the Human Man's Burden approach to galactic domination.

Breed-Lord Log, Day 42: Vixen sisterhood
>The sisterhoods' training is proving...inadequate.
>While there has been an increased display of determination and strength, coordination continues to be nonexistent. Sisterhood members seem to forget their kin the moment battle begins and it becomes a free for all
>While my presence has shown ramped aggression, and they seem to withstand pain to a greater degree (I suspect in an attempt to not appear weak in front of me, and thus prove not worthy of mating).
>Ana Maria in particular is showing remarkable progress, and I hope to foster her loyalty in future generations.
>Victoria however shows a lack of restraint, preferring to tire her opponent out rather than asserting her dominance. She will not be warming my bed tonight.
>The Panda sisterhoods will be compensated adequately the following evening supplying their youngest to this sparring match. Lin and Min have proven to be quite adept, and I am eager to see their creativity passed to a new generation as soon as possible
Breed-Lord Log, Day 49: Vixen sisterhood
>Breed Lord Constantine visited me with an interesting proposal to cull the herds of wild beasts stalking our herds. In addition, he has given me a brood of vixens to expand my own throng. As he states, they are his daughters, and old enough that they need to form their own sisterhood.
>This gift was a gesture of goodwill, to incorporate me into a coalition he has been building. I accepted the vixens with all the pomp and circumstance that etiquette demands.
>While I am grateful that Lord Constantine gifted me the daughters of his sisterhood, integration between the two vixen throngs has been...problematic
>The barracks are a mess as the social hierarchies have been thrown out of order and the new vixens attempt to assert dominance over their new kin
>Constantine's presence has also had an unexpected side effect. A single male is enough to enforce order. I had theorized an additional male human could quell this inter-throng feud.
>It seemed to have intensify the females' natural aggression in some, and hastened the estrus cycle in others.
>Desdemona had been in sync with her sisters since day 1. It appears now she is in heat prematurely. If this is not dealt with I may have a full blown riot on my hands as this chaos spreads to the other sisterhoods on the grounds.
Breed-Lord Log, Day 67: Feline sisterhood
>Constantine's proposal seems rather rash, but I cannot deny the results.
>It is no secret wildlings have greater coordination than their domesticated cousins. Without the comforts of hearth and home, they are forced to adapt quicker for simple survival
>Constantine proposes tracking smaller herds and trapping them
>Their males will be removed and disposed of, and we shall take the place of their males. The theory is that after subject to the stamina of a human, the herd will quickly supplant us as their male superiors, and that wildling coordination can be used to our advantage.
>I was initially skeptical of this until Master Darien showed us the prowess of his Cougar throng.
>The tamed wildlings were able to subdue a larger herd by utilizing trap and ambush tactics! Remarkable forward thinking if only I could get my own sisterhoods to replicate such behavior.
>And apparently the cougar throng did it all for the promise of recreational breeding with Master Darien! Not even to pass on favorable traits! Just, recreation!
>Constantine has identified several wildling herds ripe for capture. He has allowed me to choose for myself. I hope I choose correctly
Breed-Lord Log, Day 72: Panther sisterhood
>I do not understand it.
>The panthers are larger, faster, stronger than the other wildlings around us.
>Yet I struggle to get them to concentrate long enough to subdue a herd smaller than theirs!
>Worse still, Rosa and Isabella just. WILL. NOT. LEAVE. ME. ALONE!
>Their sisters aren't even finished and they are slipping away trying to seduce me.
>I'm starting to wonder if this was less to cull the wildlings and more a practical joke...
Breed-Lord Log, Day X: My Time off
>The coalition has disbanded. It was as much a joke as it was strategy.
>The wildling herd are diminished, and we will be able to enjoy a few years of relative peace until their numbers regrow.
>While my panthers have been a mixed bag, I cannot deny their effectiveness when it came to brute strength.
>And it had an unintended effect of motivating the other sisterhoods to do better. The Vixen and Canine throngs were far more effective this season, even showing coordination between each other, something I had failed to produce in all my years of training. I'm starting to wonder if the females were actually capable all along and were just pretending to secure more breeding sessions with me.
>If so, I'm not upset. If anything Darien has taught me to be a little more loose with my rewards. After all it is as much a treat for myself as the girls.
>I intend to retire for a time and spend some excess time 'training' my new wildling acquisitions.
>End log

>The Nab-A-Fur kit includes:
>A tranquilizer rifle, complete with 10 fast-acting darts
>A DIY bondage kit, for quickly subduing and preparing your new pet for transport
>A mental reconditiong DVD set, for erasing any willpower or pesky memories of past lives
>And of course, a stylish carrier, to show off your new toy while on the go

>"That's the human I told you about! He's a great boss, makes me feel so liberated. I don't have to fight my urges when when working for him."
>"You get paid for jilling all day?"
>"Of course not. I still need to do what he tells me to. But if I want to, I can squirt in the middle of his yard and he won't bat an eye"
>"Does he watch?"
>"I do, sometimes."
>"Hello mr. Anon, Sidney has been telling me about you"
>"Good, I hope"
>"No doubt. Say, have any jobs open?"

>whether they are simply standing in front of a stronger human, bullied at school, or, in one infamous case, a mayor of a small town on stage after he was soundly defeated in a public debate, a furboi will always dump his sperm when challenged
>this is theorized to have evolved as a sign of immediate submission and self-emasculation in the face of a human raider pillaging his village
>strong willed furbois who resisted were killed immediately and the physically strong yet obedient furbois were castrated and taken as slaves
>but the males pathetic enough to spill his seed at the sight of a human approaching his home to rape his family were spared, their weakness and submission making them unsatisfying targets to kill and enslave
>eventually there were no others for the female anthros to mate with, breeding more males with the cum response
>within the confines of history this is just another quirk of the small village life
>in the interconnected modern world this disadvantage has turned furbois into popular targets for pranks and bullying
>in certain cultures when a human first wishes to fuck a female it is a tradition for the top furboi to "guard" his daughter/wife/sister/mother's honor, only allowing the human to pass once he has spilled his semen on the ground from his dominating presence
>it is also considered to be his submission, consent, and blessing
>the human then steps and grinds his foot in the puddle of furboi cum as he enters
>"seeding the earth" is a celebrated event but has also evolved into a greeting for honored human guests
>a foreign human VIP stepping on the puddle of furcum is a highly televised event and the peak of the furboi's life
>this cultural oddity climaxed when thousands of furbois covered the streets with their cum to be driven over by the tanks crewed by their human liberators
>while not great for traction it did draw the soldiers out of their vehicles to savor the hot wives and young daughters presented to them as a reward

The amount of cum spilled also shows how reverent they are.
It's based on their remaining cum rather than actual quantity because of how many furbois can barely manage to squirt more than two strings.
A furboi shooting dust after or during his initial display is considered very respectful, showing he has no cum left in the human's presence.
This also allots him a temporary title of female so that she may be allowed proximity with other females while a human is near, as otherwise he will be forced to leave the room even if it's his own house and the females are his family.
It is normal for furbois to have some cum leftover when submitting to a strange human the first time on the street or as a casual acquaintance as they may run into another soon after.
But it is considered rude to have enough for two more submissions in short succession if they know the human personally.
And it is very disrespectful to have more than that in any setting where a furboi is close to a human.
If they able to still cum after five separate submissions in a short amount of time, that's enough cause for arrest and reeducation.

When you take over an anthro family, the father should ultimately be demoted to a daughter role.

A female family member being chosen for a human's harem is an important day for furbois as it shows he did a good job in helping to nurture the female to be picked.
It is also one of the only ways for a furboi to potentially get a more permanent status as female themselves.
Whether it be his daughter, mother, or "wife" the furboi will immediately give up whatever little power he had in the family to serve the human full time as honorary daughter.
This sparks a little rivalry in the family as the former furboi desperately does all she can to show her worthiness of her new status by pleasing her new master in the hope she'll get some dick as well.

>Go outside with your pet anthro
>Let her run about for a bit
>Re-leash her again and head back
>She's fully on board, nothing seems to be amiss
>Do all the stuff you usually do
>Your pet has found its way back home
>Look at, apparently not yours, pet
>Look at, probably yours, pet
>Look back to the other one
>Find out she *was* free.
>But she's fine with this now

Ideas for a setting:
>Humans grew to dominance due to their superior intelligence and their ability to breed with any species.
>Most species of anthros can't breed with other species thus humans are the only species that can use the tactic of killing all of the males of a tribe and breeding with the females.
>*Alternate: Species is determined by the species of the mother except with humans where it coincides with the sex of the parent.
>The non-human offspring of humans become also "domesticated".
>Most anthros have a little human DNA.
>Those with a lot of human DNA are fine but those with very little would have a strong desire to breed with a human.

I've caught the writing bug and need to let it out. I'm thinking to try my hand at a story and the concept of imagining is essentially like a game of 'Survivor" (The show. If you know it, you know it) It'd be where a group of humans (Small group. I'm not writing a sprawling epic here)) maybe boy/girl scouts?) have to face off some anthro locals native to the area. "collared" just because of the premise being that the humans actually do get shit together to win out/outwit the animals. Probably worth formatting it as a /quest/ to make it interactive and probably will have some sex scenes sprinkled along the way as well. maybe they end up taking the losing side as slaves/airquote pets. Guess it would just depend on how vidictive the peanut gallary is and sadist i'm acting while writing such stuff.

The bus finally left the smooth pavement, and entered a bumpy section of gravel, then dirt, rattling the windows. Sharon gazed back outside, watching as acres of spruce trees began to blend into green and yellow tundra. This was going to be a blast, she thought. ‘Adventure out in the brisk summer sun.’ The pop-up email said, She looked at their bus driver, a scantily clad park ranger with a nametag of Carol. A boy was who is sitting next to her in the back, was gazing off at the mountains in awe, Ryan, wasn’t he? The skinny one. It’s wasn’t ‘awe inspiring’ to see mountains for her but they were undeniably beautiful.
Sharon closes her eyes letting the sun beaming down on her through the window, it was leaving her pleasantly warm, alaska, even if in summer she didn’t expect to be quite so temperate. Maybe this wouldn't be as hard an expedition as she thought. She finally fell asleep for the first time today, her tan curly hat obscuring her face, as she dozed lightly until the long, bumpy bus ride came to an end.
Carol the park ranger can’t seem to help herself from prattling on about her neck of woods, like she’s been conditioned for the guided tours over and over that she’s just got an itch to tell it. At least Josh is interested enough to have her rapt attention,
“Alaska is considered a great untamed frontier. More than any place on Earth save for Antarctica, the immense region is nature in its purest form. The largest state is virtually devoid of civil population, containing more wild anthros then civilized ones and human beings combined. The great majority of these humans & civil anthros are centered in modest cities along the coast leaving vast areas of land still controlled by nature including where you six intrepid teens are headed for.”
Josh interrupts. “You’ve gotta know what we’re actually doing out here, I’m no an egomaniac but shouldn’t we be crowded by cameras? It was advertised as a game on the ad.”
The ranger studiously ignores him.
“It is one of the few true places that has been virtually untouched by human beings. Though it is a popular tourist destination, most of its visitors stay in lodges, campgrounds, and on hiking trails. Most of them don't venture deep into the backcountry, deep into the woods. Only the heartiest of souls dare to take on the backcountry for extended periods of time.”
That backcountry she speaks would now be home to six newcomers,
>Alica Washington.
>Rio Koizumi
>Roderick Kanuho
>Joshua Mitchell
>Ryan Atwell
>Sharon Kulikov
randomly selected among all across America six youthful volunteers signed into what their “contracts” a suspiciously blank piece of consent application and described as a “gameshow”, the whole enterprise was a worryingly sketchy affair as the dark green bus pulled to a stop at the end of a dirt road.
“Off you go champs”
“T-there’s nothing here.”
“No cell signal either.” Bemoans Rio.
“Both correct, Now out.”
No more road travel was possible. Civilization, the decent kinds made by humans at least was behind them and trees surrounded them on all sides. There was no going back now.
From within the bus stepped the tired players, one at a time. They hadn’t know what to expect to pack and their supplies ranged from the utilitarian to what looked like an expedition to Everest done on the cheap with Roderick baking inside his triple lined winter coats and gloves. Most brought extra. They were all here, and the game was ready to start. The driver of the bus wishes them goodluck trundles off.
“What the actual fuck! Don’t leave us out here!” Shouts Sharon, smashing on the door. but it was no point, the bus rolls off into the bush, nearly rolling over the young woman’s foot along the way.
The teens mingle, confused, agitated, half get mad, but all hold out hope that this was planned until after the better part of an hour there’s finally a thread of panic.
The possibility that some lunatic just left them all to die out here heightens tensions.
“Guys, guy! Shut up, over there!” Alica points deeper into the forest. There’s a wolf anthro, nude save for his bow strapped over the chest standing on a lower rung tree branch by the edge of the clearing…the group were now, very, genuinely concerned for their safety.
“Long chance…but did anyone of you guys bring a gun.”
No reply.
“How long was it watching us?” Asks Sharron.
“Probably since we first got here.” Ryan speculates.
Wild anthros were dangerous animals after all but this one seemed to be here with a purpose, as it sees the kids notice his presence the beast hops down and approaches the group bow held low, untensed but very much still at the ready. He doesn’t seem to find any of these humans as a real threat, just deeply unusual. The wolf was unlike any domestic pet anthro, thicker fur, bigger teeth, those piercing hunter’s eyes, and a dangling sack plapping in the wind. He’d stand head and shoulders above any of them were his posture straighter. Everyone of the teens know of wild Anthros, maybe met some in Zoos or taming camps but never up close in the wild.
Most anthro out here only know of humans through word of mouth and superstition. Alica is the first to work up the courage to approach. hands raised and empty. The beast reaches and grips her jacket sleeve hard enough to hurt as he pulls the human in close by the arms, pinching her coat between clawed fingers, prising open her mouth to inspect teeth and even sniffing along the hands and the. crotch. The animal’s ears flicking is about the only tell of a reaction on his muzzle as he senses something he likes in that second sniff beside his popping with a red stiffie that steams in the open air but aroused or not he continues his pat-down/ curious lookover of the black girl all the same and ends with a feel-over of her dreadlocks. Turns out even wilderness anthros
want to get a feel of those things. With all that done the wolf lets the terrified girl go and points a finger to march into the treeline. Alica speedwalks in the indicated direction, happy to be away from the beast as others go through the same pat-down process though each new inspection elicits less and less interest as the wolf loses the novelty of seeing what is to him a new, semi-mythic and bizarre species up close without even a feral equivalent to compare. He makes something of a “shoo” motion and the groups sets out, not interested in denying the suggestion of the nearly 6 ft toned predator with a weapon taking up their rear. The six humans walk further into the forest past the sight of the road.
The party walks single file, across the knee-high shrubbery in the direction their captor points them for hours on end, lugging their airport luggage, getting them caught up on everything from bushes to mud much to the agitation of the wolf who eventually explodes out on heavily accented English “Move it! I will NOT be blamed for your failure to be at your oathsite before nightfall!” He siezes Rio’s luggage bag and throws it over his back and then does the same stomping his way over to Ryan to take a second bag.
“Oh god, thank god you can talk, I-I didn’t think you could talk. y-you know what’s going on here?” Roderick prattles off and the beast studiously ignores him until asked a name.
“Longhowl of moon clan.” He says deadpan.
“Roderick Notah of..well Navajo nation I guess..Heh, I saw you checking of Alica earlier, what are you?
“Smelled of Virgin, I like virgins, makes strong pups, good fuck prize for rut.”
“Wow, thats..that’s something alright Hah, hah…just saying straight up you’ll rape a girl half your age my dude…what the shit…”
Cutting into the conversation Ryan spells out into the ear of Roderick. “He’s probably 14 or 15 you dunderskull. Anthros reach their maturity pretty fucking quick.”
Ahead of their chat is a commotion. The animal snarls to himself in his mother tongue over yet another issue arising.
“I thought this was a summer caamp” Sharon finally blurts into a wail dropping to her knees and barely holding back tears. Longhowl drags the petite teen along by her jacket for a time until she starts walking again on her own.
“Humans are supposed to be smart and do wonders but you insult yourselves by knowing nothing?! The stone says the tribes will gather this year and the final battle will be had between human invaders and us for rule over the valley.” He says practically roaring at her.
“Oh fuck, oh, fuck, oh fuck we’re going to be fucking murdered in ritual combat” Josh starts to hyperventilate. The beast manages to look even more underwhelmed about these “champions” from humanity than he was already.
“Oh how the stars would strain to contain my glee were that to be the case.” Longhowl bemoans.
The party crosses green valleys, streams, bushes upon bushes, and downed trees, the sun begins to set but they peak one last hill at dusk to find the orange glow of a bonfire in the open and a large gathering of anthros of every variety found in this area of the world, watching the group as they approach with hundreds of eyes in the dark lit by the flickers of fire.
“Hurry or your oath won’t be valid.” Longhowl prompts them and the group hurries to the heart of the gathering were two wood carved benches are arrayed in front of a stone firepit and backdropped by a large boulder engraved with indecipherable runes. Dancing atop the rock is another wolf, a she-wolf this time. She’s communing with spirits…or probably just high on burning shroom fumes, either way the priestess motions for them to take a seat on the left bench.
"Welcome…humans…Welcome under the eyes of the world. We shall see yet if your so-call.Ed domination over this earth is favoured in our valley by skill and wit and might!
"Welcome…humans…Welcome under the eyes of the world. We shall see yet if your presence is favored by nature to reign in our valley by your skills and fortune or if you shall be returned to the soil!” She says that last part like it wasn’t just an implication that they might all die here.
“By the magic of this land we shall cast down the humans from ever being able to set foot in valley for a hundred cycles more!”
Eyes got wide as six pup or cub aged anthros approached each of the humans with a ritual bowl made from a very old skull of a human. and a bone knife.
“The previous roster of humans!” She howls. The group of humans with tears in their eyes start blooding themselves.
Joshua holds back from the bloodletting, considering.. and the whole mood of the ritual. turns cold.
“If we don’t agree to your terms the spell doesn’t take effect does it?” The shaman atop the rock flinches but says nothing…Joshua knows he’s right.
“If we don’t play by your games you won’t be able to shroud this land from encroachment any longer.
“We’ll kill you….if you refuse.”
Joshua snaps back “and you’ll already said we’ll be returned to soil as we lose anyway. You need 6 humans, you have your 6. But I have the stronger hand in this wager!”
The shaman’s teeth gnash and her clash scratch the stone.
“Name your damn wager!”
>“Masters…We become your masters, we win, we’ve conquered you, bound by oath to subservience to us, not all of mankind, us specifically.
>“We just don’t want to die.”
>Can’t we just play survivor for the fun of it and bragging rights?”
>Something else.
The crowds in the shadow turn rancorous and the Shaman’s teeth grind so hard pieces chip off.
“It is done…the wager accepted”
“Blood yourself human! to the wager of moonlight’s binding magic!”
Josh clenches his eyes and slices his hand.

>So many cases of anthro women running off with human men.
>It's like something in them clicks, something they've been missing has finally been found and there's no turning back.
>It starts with the scent, oh that smell that drives them almost primal, you don't know it at first but you start catching her inhaling near you, blaming it on a stuffy nose.
>Then the looks and words, she gives you compliments, harmless fun right? you laugh it off finding it cute, but she starts getting bolder, more intimate, you catch her eye scanning you on many occasions, you just note it down as heat, she can't help it, right?
>She starts talking about her home life, mainly her marriage, the "man" she calls him even going as far as to do air quotes as if to give you a sign, she's not satisfied anymore, there's a divide and she doesn't understand what's happening, which is a lie of course and even you have an inkling what the problem is, she's staring at you again.
>She's crossing lines now, little touches here and there, brushes of her paw, passing closer than she needs, and you're pretty sure she's given you subtle squeezes of your body as if getting a picture of what you're like under those clothes, you've even noticed she's not holding back on somethings now, openly saying how nice you look or even smell today, and to a degree even praising humans, well the men anyway.
>It's been a while since you met her now, and since then it's like she can't quit you, like you got this hold on her without even trying, she tried to kiss you today, you let her, you've always admired anthro girls, and it's just a harmless kiss right? not like it's anything more, maybe that's all she needed to snap out of it.
>Wrong, so wrong, it's been months now, you meet her lips everyday, she admits she's hungry, you over to buy dinner, she looks you straight in the eye unwavering, hot breath tickle your neck, she wasn't talking about food.
>That's how it started, that's when she started staying with you through the working nights, comparing you to her husband you were her "Alpha", her husband didn't notice a thing funny enough.
>It's only when she started coming home with a collar on, the one she suggested after another session of her panting over your cock, the one you happily bought custom, a tag with her name and your name listed as "Owner", the seller was also a collared girl from what you remember of her profile.
>What mattered was she started wearing it home and out among public, she was proudly declaring herself as your property, she was yours, and you barely had to do any work, she did it all even in those long nights, she was addicted and now her husband has finally snapped out of his happy life trance to notice.
>Too late however, she was already planning of divorcing him, they had no kids luckily so it wasn't as messy as it could have been, well except for the state he was during the proceedings, but it's been a while now, you haven't heard from that guy in a while, not like you cared and she's legally declared herself a pet among your side now.
>You ask her why she threw everything away, she explains she couldn't help it, you were awakening something dormant within her, and when you gave her that fat human cock, well let's just say that sealed the deal.
>So you sit here now, her furred maw literally gagging on you as if she can't get any more, and all you can do is look down, smile, and pet the good girl.
>You think to yourself then, that one across the road is cute, maybe you should be a good neighbour and introduce yourself.

So I messed up /collared/. I was browsing for a pet online, and thought i’d try sticking out from my friend group by buying a non-domesticated species. I thought about buying a wolf, but thought I wasn't skilled enough for one, so I ordered a doe online. But when “she” showed up, all bound and gagged, I discovered that I had actually been sent a buck instead. I tried getting into contact with the seller, but they’re from a different nation, and they didn’t respond to any of my emails or phone calls.
Luckily, I can tolerate males if they're feminine-looking enough, and the buck is rather scrawny. But everytime I remove the gag he starts cursing me out, and has even tried ramming me with his antlers.
I've managed to feed him a bit, but I'm starting to become exhausted by his constant attempted attacks. Does anyone here have any experience with bucks or similar anthros? Any tips on how I should deal with him?

Saw off his antlers, not only are they dangerous he won't be needing them in the future.
Mix in some estrogen into his food, you don't need to outright feminize him (though you absolutely can if you want to), just enough to soften his behavior
At this point fitting him with a chastity cage is not required, though may be fun
This is good for soft domination, placing him below you but still a buck in his own right
A proper breaking will require a more involved approach.
First you will want to break his sense of normalcy and schedule for the last week he will be a proud buck.
Randomly flick the lights on and off at all hours of the day, force him to listen to an unending stream of the DirectTV Help Channel on max volume, feed him inappropriate foods for meals at random times. But the most important thing is to subtly fill his room with the scent of fresh blood which will force the prey anthro into an uneasy, panicked state. Once his conscious mind is softened, he can be reshaped into your perfect slave.
While he is being psychologically tortured, prepare as many physically painful torture devices as you can find. Electric tools such as shock collars, cattle prods, and stun guns are especially popular due to their portability and ease of use. For the more traditional Master, whips, switches, and paddles are common to use. Thermal methods such as hot waxes, branding irons, and other such tools are less practical. Sexual tools are less effective as his mind will not be able to process being pleasured or humiliated.
Once his mind has broken, move quickly into his room and do not pause before he can regain his senses or fall asleep. Cause as much pain as you can in as short of a time as you can. Focus on torturing his sensitive parts, his genitalia, neck, armpits, and feet are good targets. Physical hits to his belly, face, and rear are good for keeping things fresh. If he seems to be regaining his conscious mind or you cannot keep up with the amount of pain his body can tolerate, wrap his neck with rope and slowly constrict to restrict his ability to breath. Be cautious as this may cause death, never choke for more than a minute.
Observe his penis. Once he is erect, open your mouth as wide as you can and bite down onto his neck, try not to draw blood. If he climaxes from the act, he is now broken and will remain your submissive bitch for the rest of his life.

>Blindwaifur
>Every grope is always a surprise
>Keep doing it for weeks, grabbing a thigh, squeezing a tit, spanking a cheek, etc, always trying to ensure she's never prepared for it
>Eventually train her to subconsciously expect to receive pleasure at any moment whenever your scent's close by
>Becomes obviously flustered when she smells you approaching
>To her confusion proceed to do nothing lewder than hold her hand and/or kiss her cheek for the next week once it's been achieved
>Constant arousal from her body instinctively being on edge a handsy feel at any moment is driving her nuts
>Ends up with her trying to push your hands into grabbing her tits/ass while practically grinding against you in-front of her friends
>DIY exhibitionist waifur

What should be done with invalids and crippled anthros? Should the way they lose their limbs be a determining factor? Should a anthro that lost theirs on their job or in a traffic accident be treated differently than one that lost theirs in a war to spread human supremacy? Should their gender be a factor in their treatment?
Should they all be bitchsuited? Euthanized? Installed into urinals? Gloryholes? Be put into public stocks? Breeding farms to raise the next generation of anthros? Left for their family to care about them? Left as homeless cocksleves to beg?

If male discard, if female make them puppy factories. A womb is a terrible thing to waste. If they held a position of worth, maybe a servant to a noble family or valiantly fought on the side of humanity, then they shall be granted prosthetics/vat grown limbs if the option(s) is available within the setting.

As always, males are gelded and used for whatever hard labor they can perform.
Females are kept for low menial work, such as maids, though if their condition is not genetic, are best served being used to give their owner many anthro daughters and helping teach his children, hers or not, the proper ways to serve and obey.
Worst case scenario, unruly disabled anthro girls who are unruly, such as unrepentant veterans, get the forniphilia treatment, interrupted only with giving birth to a steady supply of new slaves.

Depends.
If their master insists on keeping them despite being in that state, that shows how highly he values them.
Even keeping them as a bed warmer and personal onahole would be a coveted and respected position for anthros.
Think about how much of a drain they would be to their master, they’d need help from his other anthros just to simply live.
They can’t work, they can barely move or be anything more than a fucknugget when having sex, but if they’re still kept around it’s a reward for great loyalty, service, or production.
It can be so revered that sometimes it’s even on purpose.
If an anthro was told by their master they’d have their limbs removed, they’d be overjoyed, knowing that their master cared enough about them to purposefully turn them into a burden.
It would also be a signifier of wealth to own several limbless or otherwise immobile anthros, as the resources required would be substantial.

Anthro Slavery in the Empire of Humanity
>Labor slaves: "Labor slaves" was a general term referring to slaves intended for hard physical labor. The vast majority of male anthro slaves became labor slaves. Some of the most prevelant uses of labor slaves were to work in mines, quarries, plantations, or logging camps. It wasn't uncommon for a conquered tribe to find themselves made to cut down for lumber the very forest they once dwelled in.
Due to human stamina, such roles could often be better performed by a human. But anthro slave laborers were available in great number and such jobs were often undesirable to the human citizenry, so it was still considered the best use for male anthro slaves, with domestic servants being the only comparably popular role. Thus, many anthro slaves were fielded this way by the Human Empire.
Livestock Slaves: Livestock slaves refer to slaves kept primarily for the products they naturally produced. This usually meant various types of wool and fleece, but also sometimes included dairy, as some anthros (mainly bovines) could have their bodies "tricked" into lactating, in preparation for a non-existant pregnancy. This was done using specific herbs in combination with frequent intercourse.
While animal livestock were the primary producers of products such as wool or dairy, scarcity of animals left them unable to meet demand on their own. Additionally, the products of anthros were generally superior in quality to those of their animal counterparts.
Livestock slaves were often kept by farmers who sought to supplement their animal livestock, oftentimes making use of their slaves for farm labor as well. Plantations owners, particularly those invested in cotton or other plant-based textiles, also frequently acquired shearable slaves, using their already established textile connections to easily sell the shorn product. There also existed larger, purely-anthro livestock farms, dedicated entirely to the mass acquisition and raising of livestock slaves.
Domestic Slaves: Domestic slaves, as the name implies, were those tasked with performing primarily domestic duties. Servants, assistants, nursemaids, and other such roles were the most common types of domestic slaves. However, domestic slaves could also take the form of record-keepers or assistants.
>Final Part
Personal Slaves: Personal slaves were the most confusing of the categories, as it could seemingly refer to both slaves kept for personal reasons without a specific role, and for slaves who's performed service was more personal in nature. Slaves who primarily served as dancers, musicians, performers, courtesans, or personal attendants fit within this category under the latter definition. Harem slaves, pleasure slaves, pets, lovers, or any slave with no significant definable role other than companionship were also included in the category, under the former definition. And finally, sometimes slaves that would normally be regarded as one of the other slave designations were instead classified as a personal slave, when the owner wanted their slave to be particularly closely associated with them.
Personal slaves were almost entirely female, with the occasional rare exception of a submissive anthro male, for those who were into such things. So far, no recorded evidence has been discovered of female masters using a male anthro slave as a lover in a traditional, masculine way.

this is some 400IQ collared material
>see wild dangerous animal woman
>shoot with aphrodesiac
>immediately stops whatever she was doing
>triggers her breeding instincts to "rape" you against her own will
ultimate thrill seeking by big game hunters

Instead of mounting heads on the wall, or showing off fur pelts, they display photos with date/species/location.
They also tag them so when they return they can check and record how many kids they bred.
>"Here we see a feisty lioness in the heart of Africa, she was a fighter but I persevered, she was a kitten afterwards, just look how happy she after getting her first human load!"

>Give offerings to temple housing a brother/sister duo deity
>Fruits, sweets, baked goods
>Deities accepts it
>Slowly lace offerings with various drugs
>Amp up the dosage each time
>Visit them personally and see them intoxicated beyond reason
>Fuck the god while they're both in a hallucinogenic high
>Warp their minds forever
>???
>Conquer gods to yourself.

Trust fund poodle spends the best years of her life in a hedonistic binge. It's entirely possible that on a given night, she drinks half her weight in appletinis, and the other half in human semen. Her family's wealth and influence keep her lifestyle insulated from the general public. That is until a sex tape goes viral.

>"Me, with a human?! Don't be so vile, I'd never touch one of you... beasts."
>"This USB has a recording that says otherwise, you know that club has cameras right? even in the VIP areas, it'll show you've had more man meat in you than the local butchers."
>She visibly gulps and starts to sweat "Okay... let's say it was me in it... wh-what would you want?"
>Unzips "I'm sure you'd think of something."
>"O-Oh! Is that all it is? you should have just said so! C'mere and lets see what you're packing~"
Of course, that was just the first time, there was many more meetings after that.

>the year is 2023
>anthro birthrates are at an all time low
>luckily a based and furpilled female livestreamer is there to speak the truth
>midstream and without warning she switches over to a ad with her dressed in a leotard brandishing a human-run company infamous for funding NGO’s who import human migrants enmasse
>she shills for the company while striking an erotic pose
>millions of furbois spurt to the sight of their queen pretending to suck off a human via a can of drink

>Fantasy world inhabited by various species, anthros and humans included
>All races were given gifts by their respective patron gods
>The Great Domesticator, the chief god of humanity, blessed his people with the means to dominate and interbreed with other races
>As a result, humans tends to dominate other races easily, be it through diplomacy, war or sex
>Especially anthros tends to fall for the human dick
>Still, it could be better
>Be Anon, and ambitious mage
>Hatch a plan of fucking up the natural order, as is the tradition of wizardry
>Specifically, increase humans god-given aphrodisiac-effect on other races, especially anthros
>Plan to make it so that anthro females only gives birth to female anthros and male humans
>Effectively make anthro-kind a subservient species to humanity
>As for ethical implications, shut up
>You’re a wizard, you don’t know right from wrong anyway
>Set up shop in an abandoned dungeon, located deep inside a powerful anthro kingdom
>Test on the occasional traveler or villager that wanders too close to your lair
>Progress is being made
>However, despite your best efforts, you are discovered by the local lord
>Bastard starts sending adventurers your way
>They would make for great test subjects, but their “strike first/ask later” attitude means that you have to deal with most of them the hard way
>One day a part makes it all the way to your laboratory
>After a fierce battle you manages to capture the females
>The males were killed, oh well
>A raccoon thief, a bear sorcerer and a rabbit barbarian are now chained to your wall
>It would be a shame not to test your latest enchantment, so that’s what you decide to do
>With a swift chant everyone's clothes are magically removed
>Everyone’s now naked
>It doesn’t take long for the females to get captivated by the enchantment that you placed on your dick
>The sorcerer passes her saving throw, the raccoon and rabbit does not
>Time to get this experiment started
>Now, where to start?
>You decide to start with the rabbit barbarian
>She seems the most interested, so why not
>You use move closer to her as you line her up
>Big mistake, she quickly wraps her muscular thighs around your hips
>For a moment you fear that she will use her position to harm you
>Instead she quickly readjusts herself so that she lines up with your erection
>She then quickly starts to fuck you, still hanging from her chains
>She skilled, you gotta give her that
>You let her do most of the work, since she’s so willing to do so
>Doesn’t take long for her dump-stat of a mind to lose what little resistance it had
>She begs for your seed, to be impregnated
>You oblige, granting her wish to become a mother to a human child
>It’ll take months before you can confirm whether the experiment actually succeeded - that is, if her children will only be human boys and anthro girls
>You’ll have to keep “administering” her your seed to make sure
>For research, ofcourse
>You let her free from her chains, as she is now addicted to her new human master
>She slumps down into the cobblestone floor, seed pouring out of her
>She starts playing with herself, begging to be fucked again
>Tempting, but you got work to do
>You turn toward the remaining two would-be adventurers
>The bear seems to still resist your enchantment
>The raccoon tries to act as if she is not interested, through her stealing glances tell you otherwise
>Which to chose?
>You approach the raccoon thief
>She keeps keeping up her act of silent defiance
>She will be fun to break
>You turn her around, her face now against the cold stone wall and arms still chained above her head
>She spread her legs by instinct
>Good girl
>You ram into her accepting hole with vigor
>The enchantment on your dick makes her holes sensitive
>She tries to keep her act up but it’s no use
>She moans loudly, eventually “challenging you” to go harder
>You oblige
>She cums at the same time as you
>She begs/challenges you for more
>With a swing with your finger she is released from her bounds
>You keep her impaled as you bend her forward onto the floor, taking her as the lower being that she is
>You hear a metallic sound
>You look down and see that she dropped some needle that she had hidden in her hand
>She she hid that you could not say, but evidently she is no longer interested in using it to harm you
>You use your magic to remove the needle, then adjusts the enchantment to make her even more sensitive
>Then you go hard on her
>It’s punishment, but the bitch likes it
>You’ll have to keep that in mind
>you cum inside her again, ensuring that she, too, will be part of your later experiment like her barbarian party member
>You clean your dick on her tail and turn toward the bear sorcerer
>The bear still tries to resist
>You’ll have to break her directly it would seem
>You release her from her chains
>Before she can do anything she is restrained and forced to the floor by her former party members
>The rabbit holds the bear by the wrists, all while giving her a deep kiss to keep her from chanting spells
>The raccoon spreads the bears legs, allowing you easy access
>You take your time with her, allowing the enchantment to work its magic through her larger body
>The rabbit changes her position and takes a seat on the bears face, forcing her to gulp down the seed running from her used hole
>The raccoon follows suit, playing with your balls and the sorcerer’s hole at the same time
>The increased stimulation forced upon her seems to do the trick
>Her body is the first to submit, as the bear soon stops struggling against your and her companions
>Still, her mind appear to hold on for a little while longer
>Nothing that a few shots of seed can’t fix, through
>Each time you cum in her, her minds bends to your will a little more
>You can almost feel the moment her eggs are fertilized as a spike of magical energy escapes her
>She is now completely under your control, just like the others
>First part of the experiment is a success
>Time will tell if the experiment will be a success in its entirety, but you got a strong feeling that it will be

Our world has had
>A place and desire for femboys dating back from Ancient Greece all the way to drummer boys during the Civil War
>Conservative 'Christian' politicians and commentators who have controversies of levied gay accusations from having certain things exposed (reference Alex Jones desk shot live of his phone opened up to tranny pron)
Now imagine this
>Influential figure in society who cannot afford to ruin his reputation by buying male anthros to satisfy his fetish and urges
>He's seen as 'traditional' by his voterbase
>So, to satisfy his urges, he goes to a specific underground slave trader his connections found
>There, he buys a femboy who has been groomed and hormonally engineered since birth to be as passable as possible
>His new slave is eventually learned of but gathers no suspicion as he appears to be a perfect princess
>A passable trap to the masses, but a feminine slut to be dominated behind closed doors
There are worse secrets those in power could hide, but I feel this is definitely possible. Hell, it could even be common among the elite. As such, there may be a stronger demand for femboy anthros than initially understood.

>Aliens invade human colony
>The alien force are female-only, as they are the stronger and more ferocious of the two sexes in their species
>The colony consists of only human men, all volunteers eager to pioneer and progress mankind among the stars
>The aliens expect the human to be as weak as their own males
>they expect to take over the planet by enslaving the humans and breed their own population
>Giggity.quagmire
>Aliens FW they did not account for human endurance, stamina and degeneracy
>Aliens FW the humans easily subjugate them simply by fucking them into submission
>Aliens FW they discover that human genes are dominant
>Aliens TFW the humans disable their ship, leaving the alien stranded on a planet of lustful, virile men
>Aliens FW there is no escape
>Aliens FW they can do nothing but submit
>Aliens FW they are systematically domesticated into the colony harem
>Aliens FW the colony population explodes, making it a bastion of humanity within a few decades
>Humans FW this colony was located this close to alien territory on purpose
>Humans FW this was not the first time they've used this tactic
>Humans FW this was yet another successful "First Encounter"
>Humans FW this alien species of "warrior females" became yet another subservient species of breeders under humanity's shadow
>humans face when they're got a dozen other "trap" out there to lure in aggressive would-be invaders
>Humans FW all according to keikaku
For beings capable of FTL, aliens in general stupidly easy to ensnare

>"Coach, are you SURE about this?"
>"For the last time, yes! You girls aren't the only ones that want those human boys on the other team. Are you absolutely sure this will work?"
>"Of course. We did this last year to Jenna after she lost us that championship game by pulling a penalty. Just remember, your name is Grace, you are 17, and you are a student just like us."
>Pausing while writing "FILM ME!!" in a mirror on her modified uniform shirt, she looked at the girl.
>"Any suggestions for what I should write?"
>The teen grinned and held out a hand for the marker. After getting it, she leaned down and wrote WIDE and OPEN on each leg above the knees with arrows. DONT ASK JUST FUCK over her coach's belly, and CUM DUMP DOE on her neck. She then invited some of the other girls over to help.
>An hour later, and they had sneaked into the other teams locker room and she was getting tied to the bench. Minutes later she was helpless, ankles tied to the post bolted to the floor, and her arms tied behind her back to the bench, holding her in place. The girls then blindfolded her, and suddenly she had a ring gag forced in her mouth against her protests. How the hell was she supposed to communicate with the human boys now? She felt one of the girls writing on her body, while saying aloud what she was writing.
>"Don't bother using a condom, make me a mommy. Don't pull out, fill me up. Single mommy slut. Paternity roulette, winner in nine months."
>Desperate, she tried to free herself, but the teen bitches had tied her too well. She couldn't even protest beyond incoherent noise. She had just wanted a good fucking, she would be in deep trouble if it came out she got pregnant from a student from another school. And those damn bitches knew it.
>A month and a needed abortion later, and she found herself writing "NO CONDOMS ALLOWED" on her secret uniform, then asking her team for assistance again.

It was past midnight, We had turned off the light at eleven, and the patrons were shuffled out for closing hours. My clique of buddies at work had broken up after we’d did our late-night finishing touches. It was a weekend night. Lauri especially ran a strict schedule, She ran the bar with an iron hand as though she was afraid we would all end as hopeless drunks and get jumped in the street by a pack of roaming anthros if we stuck around. Luckily we had no money problems because Lauri was a generous employer. Lauri continued to work in her bar after the rest of the staff were supposed to leave.
What interested me were Lauri's night time activities in the bar. More than anything else I found it surprising that she kept the placed closed past midnight and had installed thick shudders to close at night. She resisted our advice that opening up for 24-7 would have a good ROI. Sometimes I saw guests stick around after closing and looking angry at us staff but I never found out what was going on. Now Lauri kept the basement padlocked as well. So when I heard voices downstairs after midnight followed by the sound of the padlock on the back entrance being opened, I turned back and decided to see what was going on.
Once in the bar past closing I was confronted by the dead bolt lock on the door that blocked off access to the finished half of the basement. However, I had devised a plan before being locked off by Lauri. I knew that there a crawl space that was blocked off by some sound proofing insulation. I got up in the crawl space and pulled the stuff out of the way and wiggled through going for one of the openings I figured still looked down into the hidden room. I had been planning this before, but had never had the time or courage to check it out against lauri's wishes. For all I knew it was a dead end. I hear activity down there and so i bite the bullet and head on down. I found a second door and pushed it slightly ajar.
I peer through the and saw I had a perfect view of most of the room, Thia was nore pantry as i'd been told by lauri. I it was...it was sometihng. It was a lounge about thirty by twenty, padded walls and large overstuffed couches and big cushions scattered around. The center of the room was encircled by two large curved couch sectionals and two what I would call couch beds because they had a back but no ends and the seat was about twice as wide as a normal couch. The far wall had a number of strange looking things like shackles, benches and whips. A large open shower and unscreened bathroom complete with toilets and those female things you find in expensive hotels stood in the far corner right by the implements. What the hell?
In the middle of all this stood Lauri and an alligator anthro I didn't know surrounded by the center couches. They were looking at each other like enemies. I slowed my breathing and listened. They were both dressed in jeans and blouses with low heels.
Lauri said, "So it is agreed. No face attacks. Everything allowed but no bone breaking or permanent maiming."
The scaly woman said, "Are scars maiming?"
Lauri snorted, "No, as long as the body parts are still attached."
The other woman smiled and said, "So we go all until four, no mercy, no pussy safe words, no breaks, no surrenders."
Lauri nodded and said, "Choke outs, hog ties and shackles included."
The woman looked at the wall and said, "I'm going to enjoy using your own tools on your fat tits."
"We will see who ends up with the most tears on her face, i’ll make you cry real crocodile tears!” snapped Lauri.
Lauri smiled. Lauri had huge breasts and a big ass. She wasn't fat by any means. At 5’10" and over 170 pounds she wasn't exactly skinny either. I had checked her bra size by going through her laundry once and knew she was a 44J. Her hips must have been at least 40 or 42 inches, and her belly was firm but thick with a round lower and upper belly.
They looked at each other as they stripped. The gator called Sobek in reference to the goddess was about an inch taller than Lauri with brilliant overlapping scales that looked like armor compared to Lauri’s delicate human skin.
Lauri spit, "You are an overgrown skink. I should charge you extra for having to replace my leather seating after your fat ass sits down every night."
The croc woman dropped her pants and and trills in simmering agitation, her thick stump of a tail brushing across the metal floor.
She promised, "You’ll be getting an ass full of this scaly fist whore. I'll have your tongue to i’m thinking."
She stepped out of her too tight jeans turned around and pulled her panties down while bending over exposing the plated crotch from behind. Her mighty tail stuck out between her ass divided by the belly scales and the rest of her body by heterogeneous scalation. She sat down on a couch and pulled off shoes. Once she was nude she stood.
"Sobek" as i'd come to call her was easily an inch taller than Lauri and some 40lbs heavier. Her tits were big and sloppy unlike Lauri's. Her weight was in her belly, ass, tail and thighs. She had big shoulders and thick arms too, and terribly big hands and feet for large claws. Her big tits flopped down on her swollen belly. Her ventral scales barely able to contain the lymph and fat inside. They were off-white and bore huge thumb like pink nipples projecting out from grapefruit size aureole that seemed to be an inch thick with big bumps. She was a nasty looking bitch, but I felt my dick getting hard realizing i was about to see her in action.
Lauri stripped and stood. She was half Irish and half Italian and had brownish skin, but she still showed tan lines. I was shocked to see my Lauri's thick black bush. It covered her lower belly and actually seemed to be trying to spread up past her navel. She looked far fitter than the Alligator, but the Alligator looked very strong and mean.
Lauri stripped and stood. She was half Irish and half Italian and had brownish skin, but she still showed tan lines. I was shocked to see my Lauri's thick black bush. It covered her lower belly and actually seemed to be trying to spread up past her navel. She looked far fitter than the Alligator, but the Alligator looked very strong and mean. Lauri had hard dark brown nipples sticking outward from each other topping cupola style brown aureole that were only half the size of the beast’'s, but looked thicker because of the big bump of tissue capping the tit like an onion dome.
Lauri's big ass showed crisscrossed scar marks as did her lower back, shoulders and upper thighs! Then I noticed scars on her belly and tits. They varied from long scratch marks to oval bite marks as well as several long welt-like marks. The gaor’s bod showed some of the same, but only the large scars..No doubt she could shed away the smaller nicks and scrapes.
They both stretched for a few minutes and continued to talk to each other using words I had never even imagined Lauri knew. Then they stood up.
Lauri said, "You first, cunt."
The gator I was calling Sobek suddenly pushed out with both hands and slammed the palms of her hands onto my Lauri's boobs, flattening them, and forcing Lauri to take three steps back. The first sound was a slap followed by a thud and Lauri's grunt. Lauri fired right back and slammed two hands into the anthro's tits which were substantial but less firm than Lauri's. The beast grunted and stepped back as her tits bounced and waves rebounded through her body. They were really slamming into each other with their hands. Sobek came back with another two handed slap-push and forced Lauri back to the edge of a couch. Lauri cursed and ran forward three steps and smashed her hands into the Aligator's already reddening tits and sent her backward to the edge of the opposing couch.
Sobek winds up for a gut punch, "All right you cunt, now let's see how long it takes me to have you shitting the shattered remains of your eggs on the floor."
She doubled up her fist and drove it low into Lauri's round lower belly. Lauri grunted and doubled forward placing her hands on the Alligator's biceps. Sobek laughed and pushed Lauri back. Lauri cursed and drove her right fist straight up from the shoulder sinking into the scaly’'s throat just below the jaw and digging in at an upwards angle. The Alligator groaned and her knees buckled for a second. She backed up and breathed heavily for a second.
Lauri laughed and said, "You dipshit lizard. Human’s don’t lay-” She wretches and holds back from vomiting. “We don’t lay eggs…but thanks for the inspiration of how i’m going to ruin your month.”
The angry Alligators straightened and reached out and grabbed Lauri's tits with both hands. Lauri grunted and grabbed back. The two big women leaned forward from the hips with their backs arched as they crushed and mauled the other's breasts. I couldn't believe it! I already had squeezed my hand into my underpants and was stroking myself. Their moans and grunts continued. I watched their feet lift and take new purchase as they tried to find a way to push the other back. Lauri's big firm breasts were crushing out between the Alligator's probing claws and were being pushed up into Lauri's face. Lauri countered by gaining a crush grip around the base of the Alligator's less full, longer, saggy breasts and then twisting back and forth.
They struggled and grunted, cursing and promising to rip each other's tits off. The sound of their grunts and struggle filled the room, as did the slap of their feet as they stomped and pushed trying to force one another to retreat. Sweat popped out on lauei’s back first while the croc’s jaw went slack a show of her reptilian exhaustion.
They circled about halfway around as they continued to maul each other. I had never seen tit flesh so violated and abused. Lauri's set of tits were getting hot red from the maltreatment. Lauri moaned suddenly and I noticed that one of luari’'s thumbs had dug into her foe’s nipple, nail first. Sobek’s nails were real weapons and definitely longer so I thought the Lauri might be making a mistake by using her nails and inviting retaliation.
Lauri followed through by stopping her crush twist and switching to four finger claws as her thumbs dug into the under side of the Alligator's crushed breasts and the upper four fingers ripped into the flesh between that ventral plating. As Lauri left nasty red streaks between her armour the bigger woman wailed out. She dropped her right hand to Lauri's crotch and started mauling Lauri's pussy! I grit my teeth while my cock bobbed with every throb leaving a splotch of wetness under my navel.
Lauri groaned and she rose up on her toes in pain. She tried to keep mauling the bitch's tits, succeeding in opening up a deep scratch that showed beaded blood along most of its length. Then she added to that scratch getting the Aligator's tits bleeding from multiple deep scratches. The Aligator didn't like the treatment. She looked down at her tits and gasped as she watched the blood begin to flow like milk. She cursed at Lauri and then jerked her hand upward.
Lauri screamed and practically started to dance like one of those guys in a western with the gunman shooting at his feet. Lauri wailed and hopped around trying to get away from the crotch claw. The Aligator suddenly pushed forward jaws lunging with only one arm holding back those snapping jaws as the gator drove Lauri backwards until her legs hit one of the couch beds. She fell back on it and the Alligator pushed on top of her still clawing at her cunt and mauling her right tit. Lauri moaned and clawed deep scratches in the other woman's already bloody tits.
Finally Lauri could take no more crotch clawing. She drew up her feet and placed them on the Aligator's hips and pushed off hard and deep into the lizard’s belly. The lizard’s gut is folds to the power kick and gives an unappreciated gurgle. Probably a sign of unlaid eggs being smashed.
Sobek staggered backwards, but didn't fall. Lauri grabbed at her crotch and looked at her hand. It was bloody! Lauri had been cunt busted! I couldn't believe it!
The Alligator laughed and said, "I'm going to enjoy fucking that useless pussy of yours with my fist with your own blood as the lube."
Lauri stood up and snorted, "Tall talk for a girl who’s momma paid to get made into boots and here you are fritting it away on getting your eggs smashed in a ring, I've kicked so many of your scaly asses I've lost count,” shouted Lauri. That really set the fat lizard off and as Lauri stood the two of them started stalking each other. Lauri snatched at the Aligator's snout. The Alligator dodged back, but Lauri's real attack was a nasty side kick to the other woman's calf. The Alligator stumbled and regained her footing only to take Lauri's big right fist flat on the snout. The impact sounded like a drum. blood flew off both women. Sobek grunted and fell back on a circular couch. Lauri came forward, but took a foot to her chest. Lauri circled back and the Aligator shifted on the couch keeping her feet ready, whle partly laying there to catch her breath. Lauri stood back and the Alligator got to her feet.
I heard a noise behind me. I turned and there was a teen gator about my age looking at me lounging a bit up the staircase…Somebody seemed to have the same idea about peeping to this show as me. She beams a toothy grin surprised to see me. “We’re going to kick your bar bitch’s ass today human.” “I’m sorry who in the hell are you?'' I asked as she already was making room for herself in this confined space. “I’m the daughter dipshit."
The teen scalie struts down the staircase and stares me down while standing a head shorter then me. "I didn’t know there were other humans in lauri’s little fight club…I mean it makes sense since humans are weak as they come”
The fair of catfighting bitches came together again. Lauri sinks a low left into Sobek's fat belly. The Alligator grabs two handfuls of Lauri's black hair and pulled her head to the side and down. She spun like a death roll and suddenly Lauri was in a side head lock. Lauri's left hand came up between the beast's legs from behind and she sank her fingers into the bitch's cunt. The Alligator's smile turned to a scream and her head came back as Lauri's nails penetrated her. She twisted and started to drop pulling Lauri by the head lock. Lauri stumbled around until her legs hit a couch and she went down in a clumsy hip throw with the Aligator landing on her ass with Lauri's head still locked under her. The other woman twisted on the head lock and lay back trying to cover Lauri's chest, squashing her.
“Were you to chickenshit to fight? You don’t look any tougher then your mate!” my adolescent accuser piped up peeking a look past the door herself and smirking at her mom's dominant stance.
“We're not a thing! you...whatever your name is" i blather out. She crosses her arms. "Dheela" "And NO! I’m not some coawrd! I really just didn't know about any of this even existing until like 5 minutes ago!.”
"Sure you didn't...So you never asked where Lauri gets her scars from? Why there are nights where patrons stick round past closing? Get real...I've half a mind to blow your teeth out right here and now!"
She pulled off her dirty t-shirt revealing tiny buds of breasts and started to unzip her jeans as she said it. “I’ll fight you! No rules to the finish, just like down there. I’m going to bust your balls and stick my fist up your ass human.”
I was bigger, older and a head taller then this crazy teen lizard.
I tell her plain as day “I’m not afraid of some miniature version of the lardass in the other room. I warn you. I’ll beat you and do to you just like it’ll be with your mom down there only i’ve got a dick and you…well i’ll admit it for an anthro who's got ideas about picking fights with strangers rattling around in her empty head you are super hot..”
“Flattery won’t save you. Take of your clothes you little faggot, i'm making mom proud, she see i'm not to young to bust a man's nuts !” she snorted.”
I stripped and kicked off my shoes. She was already bare foot. My cock was already hard from watching the fight and the promise of erotic abuses that the jailbait aged croc teen was inviting to have dispensed upon herself. I was slightly subconscious that I hadn’t ever been naked and alone with another species before and she probably had. I heard the sounds of the ongoing fight in the main room and me and Dheela stepped in to settle out business.
TWe come into the main fight room to a surprised and agitated look respectively.
"Mom! I brought my own human! I AM old enough to fight!"
Lauri locks eyes with mine and a radioactive hot red shows on her already sweaty cheeks. "I-i can explain really..."
The two of them could only spare us a moment before they return to their strife. The big Alligator looked like she was trying to twist Lauri's head off. Lauri's legs kicked and she tried to claw the bitch off her. The scaly back of Sobek showed long scratches along the ridges and the sides. Lauri was in real trouble. She finally grabbed the side of the the green brute's snout and pulled. The Alligator groaned as her head was pulled back. Her face and neck trembled as she strained against Lauri's pull. It didn't look like it was working, but suddenly the bitch was screaming. The daughter charged into me with out warning and drove onto my back my skull thumps against the metal wall of of this little fight dungeon.
The daughter croc charges into me with out warning and drove onto my back my skull thumps against the metal wall of of this little fight dungeon and i'm on the ground. I hesitate from lashing out and absolutely ruining dheela's night with a frontwards boot kick square between the eyes on her next rushdown and pay the price. She ripped at my face and dropped her teeth to my chest, tongue tasting at the tight skin across my abs then going for the throat in a blatant act of murderous intent. That was something of a line of decency that her mother hadn't crossed so far. I held her back by her throat and shove her head back. She cursed and snaps those jaws at me. I knew I had to fight back now or get my ass handed to me by this dirty little bitch or possibly straight up murdered.
I looked and saw that Lauri had gotten her other hand on the woman's sagging right breast and pulled it to her mouth.She was chewing into the side of the fat bag. The Alligator screamed and kicked her legs in agony. Lauri continued to bite. The Alligator kept her right arm around Lauri's neck, but she released the strangling left and grabbed for Lauri's hair trying to pull her mouth away. A tuff of black hair was ripped out of Lauri's forehead, but she kept chewing. There was blood dripping onto Lauri's own chest from somewhere.
Lauri tried to hold on to the tit and keep chewing. The bitch's tit was stretched out and deformed like Lauri was sucking it into her mouth. I saw trickles of blood coming from both corners of Lauri's mouth. The bigger woman pushed with her feet and rolled back onto Lauri trying to get her tit pulled from Lauri's sharp teeth. Lauri rolled onto her back and kept her teeth in the fat tit. You could see that the teeth had skinned about two inches from where the first bite had been. Another inch and the tit would be free. Suddenly, the Alligator slammed her left hand down like a karate chop right in the middle of Lauri's puss. She groaned and lost her bite.
The tit flopped free and was quickly cupped by the Alligator's right hand. Lauri grabbed bitch's maw apart with both hands and pulled while rolling.
They ended with the Aligator on her side facing one of the couches and Lauri behind her still yanking her head at a painful angle. Lauri slung her right leg over the other woman's ample hip and mounted her from the side still wrenching at the head twist. Once on top she switched her left hand to an open hand choke, fingers on the side and thumb squeezing the throat. The woman had to reach at an angle to grab Lauri's wrist to control the choke. Lauri's free right hand was unopposed as the woman's left arm was trapped underneath her against the couch. Lauri started slamming right fists down into the bitch's fat, sagging right tit. Lauri smacked that tit again and again. The woman cursed and kicked her legs trying to turn onto her back.
Lauri stopped punching and grabbed the gator’s tit. She yanked it straight up like she was doing a bicep curl with one of those rubber band things. The woman howled as her tit was pulled up and out, crushed, pinched, twisted and jerked back and forth. She cried out for Lauri to stop, but this apparently was a no mercy fight a tearful finish. The woman squealed and jerked. The right tit was looking bright red from the maltreatment where it wasn't dark red from bloody bite marks and scratches. Lauri was really working on that tit, turning it into a bag of pain for the Alligator.
Finally her body shifted and she flopped onto her back with Lauri setting on her belly. Lauri switched both hands to the croc's throat and started throttling her. The beast's legs kicked and tried to pull Lauri off, but Lauri was leaning forward and choking the bitch out. The Alligator reached up and clawed down from Lauri's neck across her breasts trying to force her off. Lauri screams but kept choking. The Aligator finally had to grab Lauri's hands. She clawed at Lauri and got her fingers in under
part of the choke, cutting up her own neck. Her face was bright red now and she was kicking and bucking trying to keep from being choked out.
One of her bucks overbalanced Lauri and she ended up still on top but face first on the floor with her big tits covering the gator's face. Lauri yelped and jerked back breaking the choke. Lauri's didn’t get far because her left tit was in the gater’s jaws. Lauri cursed and grabbed for both the Aligator's tits with her hands. The Aligator moaned and grabbed Lauri's left hanging breast and the tit mauling contest was on. Lauri had position and worked the Alligator's tits straight up into her green face, stretching the bags bottoms out tight, pulling them from the chest wall. The woman cried out in agony, but she was the victim of her own reptilian exhaustion and the powers of leverage.
The tit mauling went on and on. Lauri was slick with sweat and both women’s bellies heaved to pull in air. Her hair was matted and tangled, wet with sweat and probably a little of the blood that seemed to be coloring everything. Lauri groaned loudly as she twisted her right shoulder back prying a foot on the beast’s lower jaw and latched her free arm on the top one and heave and pulled herself free. The tit bounced as it snapped back from the deformation. As Lauri leaned back, the Aligator's left foot hooked under her chin and suddenly Lauri was lying on her back with her legs doubled over and her ass still on the Aligator's belly.
Dheela tore my cheek and went for my eyes. I hammered her under the chin with my right fist and knocked her teeth together. She looked startled and stopped fighting for a second. I think she had bitten her tongue. In another context i’d have my sympathies. While she was still sitting on me I punched her again and knocked her off me.
She landed on her ass. Her legs were spread. I lashed out from my sitting position right into her wide open pussy sliding her along the floor.
Dheela moaned and curled up. I had gotten her good.
Lauri stopped punching and grabbed the gator’s tit. She yanked it straight up like she was doing a bicep curl with one of those rubber band things. The woman howled as her tit was pulled up and out, crushed, pinched, twisted and jerked back and forth. She cried out for Lauri to stop, but this apparently was a no mercy fight a tearful finish. The woman squealed and jerked. The right tit was looking bright red from the maltreatment where it wasn't dark red from bloody bite marks and scratches. Lauri was really working on that tit, turning it into a bag of pain for the Alligator.
Finally her body shifted and she flopped onto her back with Lauri setting on her belly. Lauri switched both hands to the woman's throat and started throttling her. The woman's legs kicked and tried to pull Lauri off, but Lauri was leaning forward and choking the bitch out. The Alligator reached up and clawed down from Lauri's neck across her breasts trying to force her off. Lauri moaned but kept choking. The Alligator finally had to grab Lauri's hands. She clawed at Lauri and got her fingers in under part of the choke, cutting up her own neck. Her face was bright red now and she was kicking and bucking trying to keep from being choked out.
One of her bucks overbalanced Lauri and she ended up still on top but face first on the floor with her big tits covering the gator's face. Lauri yelped and jerked back breaking the choke. Lauri's didn’t get far because her left tit was in the gater’s jaws. Lauri cursed and grabbed for both the Alligator's tits with her hands. The Alligator moaned and grabbed Lauri's left hanging breast and the tit mauling contest was on. Lauri had position and worked Sobek's tits straight up into her green face, stretching the bags bottoms out tight, pulling them from the chest wall. The woman cried out in agony, but she worked Lauri's big round hanging tits furiously, scratching squeezing them to
the brink of popping like balloons.
The tit mauling went on and one. Lauri was slick with sweat and both women’s bellies heaved to pull in air. Her hair was matted and tangled, wet with sweat and probably a little of the blood that seemed to be coloring everything. Lauri groaned loudly as she twisted her right shoulder back prying a foot on the beast’s lower jaw and latched her free arm on the top one and heave and pulled herself free. The tit bounced as it snapped back from the deformation. As Lauri leaned back, the Alligator's left foot hooked under her chin and suddenly Lauri was lying on her back with her legs doubled over and her ass still on the Alligator's belly.
The little bitch crawled backwards on her ass and hands with her feetclaws in the air to ward me off. I lunged forward and she kicked, just missing my balls. I did it again and this time I caught her right leg and jerked it pulling her off her hands and putting her back on her ass and folding her tail in a bad way breaking something in there. Her left leg tried to kick me off, but I twisted her right leg into its path, blocking her. Then I kicked her between the legs again causing her to cry out. I threw her leg aside and she rolled onto her stomach moaning. I jumped down on her back, regretting as i spear myself on that spiny scaly back. But all the same i jerked her head back by the throat with my left arm and started firing looping rights around into the side of her face and temple. I wasn’t going to give her a fucking chance.
She bucked up and I fell forward still on top of her. I pressed back up using her head as a handle. She is made to bow as i rise and curses me. I pulled back her head and banged her skull into the floor on the side. She cried out she wanted her mama to help her. My cock was so hard.
I started to reaffirm my straddle over her. “Stop squirming!” She squealed soundlessly while strangled and I choked her from behind until she stopped fighting.
I had to hold myself back from spontaneously humping her. “Admit i won!” I screamed at her as we watched the fight going on across from us in our little deadlock of a grapple.
Lauri's black bush was totally exposed. Sobek sat up and must have had a perfect view of Lauri's cunt. The Alligator slammed her right fist down hard on Lauri's pubic bone three times and then jammed her left hand straight into Lauri's black hair covered pussy. Lauri screamed bloody murder as she was brutally penetrated by the Alligator's stiff nail tipped fingers. Lauri slammed her hands on the mats and cried out for mercy, but the Alligator just laughed and looked to be trying to put her whole left hand into Lauri while she ripped out a wad of black pubic hair with her right. Neither woman was going to show mercy in this fight.
Lauri grabbed the foot restraining her, twisted it and bit down on the Alligator's toes above the claws. Now the Alligator screamed and involuntarily jerked her foot back. Lauri sat up immediately still crying out with the Alligator's left hand clawing inside her cunt. Lauri slammed her right forearm into the bitch's chest. The smack and groan was followed by the thud of the Alligator on her back. Lauri grabbed the woman's left wrist with both hands and pulled it out of her crotch. The woman's hand was red with cunt blood. Lauri twisted the hand up to her mouth and bit into the woman's palm.
Sobek screamed and slammed her right fist deep into Lauri's belly. Lauri grunted and dropped forward covering the Alligator's body with her own. The Alligator pushed up with her left foot and rolled Lauri off to the side and finally escaped from the couch. The bitch rolled on top of Lauri. Lauri continued the roll. They rolled to the center of the small arena and came to a rest side by side, tangled together from head to toe.
The daughter reached back and managed to claw my ass cheek, no doubt aiming to rupture my sack.
I jerked forward jamming my cock in deep, purely as a protective measure to keep it far from those claws. She grunted and somehow rolled me onto my back with her still impaled on my cock. I kept the choke on her. She reached back and got her index finger in my eye.
Blinded I lost my choke. She sat up and reached between her spread legs going for my balls. My cock was straight up inside her now. I grabbed her around the shoulders from behind and jerked her back before she could bust my balls. She reached back over her shoulders for my eyes again, I could still see out of left. I clamped on a full nelson and forced her head down on her chest leaving her hands unable to reach my face. She grunted and groaned.
I rolled her off my belly and onto her side. My cock slipped out of her tiny snatch. She kicked her feet and tried to get some hold. I threw a leg over her ass and climbed on top still holding the full nelson, twisting her at the waist. She groaned as I stretched and pulled her back in a pretzal. I finally released the full nelson. She was deposited face down into floor again. This time I grabbed her upper jaw pulled her head back and slammed her face into the floor six or seven times until she stopped struggling.
I snarled in her weird reptile ear hole, “Have you had enough bitch?”
She spit out some blood and moaned, “Fuck you prick.”
“Give up or I’ll fuck you for sure,” I snapped.
“I’ll stick my foot up your ass before this fight is over,” she cursed. I elected to keep this kid pinned.
The struggle below seemed to slow as both women were exhausted. They continued to hurt each other, but in a slow motion. Finally they ended up face to face, gasping for breath holding double handfuls of tangled, matted hair. Lauri tried to get on top, but was forced back to her side. They kneed one another. They clawed each other's back. They punched kidneys, sides and exposed bellies.
Nobody gained an inch, but both of them took more of a beating.
Suddenly they rolled apart and climbed up on the opposite couches and laid there gasping and checking out the bruises, scratches and bites. Both of Lauri's inner thighs were bloodstained. The cunt busting she had taken seemed to be the worst of it even if the Alligator's right tit looked like a swollen red back of pain. Was it over? I still didn't understand what the fight was about or how they decided it was over. It appeared to be totally cruel with the only real rule that they hadn't touched their faces. They had come pretty close with choking and clawing the neck, but nobody had hit anybody in the face.
Lauri was still gasping, but she stood up. The Alligator did the same and backed away toward the wall with all the sex toys and devices on it. Lauri saw her and rushed her. Lauri smacked shoulder first into the bitch and they hit the bed couch hard. It turned over and spilled them on the far side with Lauri on top. Lauri tried to cover Sobek, but the bitch got a foot up on Lauri's right hip and pushed her off. Lauri fell onto her butt.
I'm so engrossed with watching Lauri that i have to be jostled back into remembering my own situation as Dheela struggles broil over again. I'm not under any obligations about how an how not to kick an ass and so pulled Dheela's head back again and slammed her face down into the floor on the side of the head then do it again. She doesn’t say much but her snout makes bubbles of of bloody snot with each exhale.
My cock was still hard and laying between her two firm ass cheeks. I reminded her she was the one who had mentioned sticking things up other people’s asses. As I rammed into her Iget the tween into an armbar and prop her head to watch the fight playing out in parallel.
Subek rolled to her hands and knees and lunged for a padded bench that had a curled up black leather strap on it.
The Alligator got the strap and turned toward Lauri just as Lauri rammed into her. They fell hard over the padded bench and hit the padded floor with mutual groans. Lauri jerked at the strap and they started a tug off war over the weapon. Sobek rolled Lauri off and climbed on top straddling Lauri's hips. Lauri jerked the woman's head to the side by the nostril and started to roll her off, but Sobek suddenly jerked a length of the leather strap under Lauri's chin and started trying to strangle her with it.
“I guess cheating runs in the family huh.” I quip down at the young predator. she snarls and tries to bite fingers off until I'm able to get her mellowed out with another head smash into floor.
Lauri had part of the strap too. She twisted it around sobek's left arm and jerked the arm away. They grunted and fought over the strap. Lauri inched closer to the wall with the Alligator riding her belly to belly. The bitch couldn't choke Lauri with her left hand tied up, so she put her right forearm across Lauri's throat and tried to finish her off that way. Lauri's left hand reached above her and found a riding crop hanging down from the wall of whips and things.
The Alligator screamed as the riding crop came down across her ass cheeks and tail base at an angle. Lauri started to whip again, but Sobek grabbed her left wrist and pinned it down. The Aligator tried to rise up on her knees, but Lauri bucked up and pulled on the strap tangled around the Alligator's left arm. The Alligator fell forward, her tits slapping down on Lauri's face. I knew what was coming. The Alligator screamed and pressed off the ground, Lauri's head rising with her. Sobek's left tit was between Lauri's clenched teeth and it looked like a tug of war between the Alligator's connecting tissues and Lauri's teeth.
The Alligator drove her right hand under Lauri's chin and pushed my Lauri's head down. As Lauri's teeth slide along the left tit, Sobek screamed and lost the tip altogether.
When the tit popped out it was raw and bloody from the initial deep bite all the way down to where it slipped from Lauri's teeth and snapped back. Sobek cursed and started to pound Lauri's tits, but the riding crop lashed her across her own tits and she gasped.
The Alligator snatched at the riding crop. Lauri let the crop drop out of reach and drove her left fist deep into sobek's lower belly. The beast squealed and grabbed for Lauri's wrist. Lauri jerked the left arm with the strap and then hooked her left foot around Sobek's right shoulder and repeated the Alligator's early move. The Alligator struggled for a moment and then fell to the side against the bench.
Lauri scuttled backwards dragging the strap and the trapped scaly arm. Sobek grabbed for the strap with her right hand and pulled back. Big mistake! Lauri's feet were free. Sitting on her ass she drove both feet into the fat scalie's face driving her hard against the side of the bench. Lauri jerked on the strap and continued to push with her feet. The woman groaned as her throat was treated to Lauri's feet and her arm was pulled by the strap. The strap finally slipped off the left wrist.
Lauri rolled over quickly and got the Anthro as she tried to push up off the bench. Lauri encircled the woman's neck from behind with the free strap and jerked it tight, the leather biting into the Alligator's fat neck. Sobek stood up straight gasping and clawing at the strap as Lauri walked backwards choking her viciously. Lauri bumped into another of the padded benches and she fell backwards over it dragging the Alligator by the neck with her!
*Ghrrk!?*
They hit with a thud. Sobek tried to escape the choke, but Lauri clamped her legs around the woman from behind and then pulled brutally on both ends of the strap wrapped around the woman's neck. She gives me a sidelong glance as Sobek claw at the leather around her neck and started kicking wildly. The Alligator could take no more and panic was setting in.
She started to claw at Lauri's face, but her angle was wrong and she couldn't see her target. Lauri cursed, jerked on the strap and clamped her legs down and pulled the Aligator in opposite directions, stretching her out. Lauri turned her face away and continued to choke. The Aligator's hands started flopping around. Was Lauri going to kill her?
Suddenly I came in Dheela's ass from behind. She grunted and cursed her resentments as anyone should. I reached under Dheela's arm and started working on her nipple. She gasped and suffered. I taunted her about what was happening below to her fat mama and crushed her nipple to punctuate the permanent maiming of Sobek's loss of a tit.
Just as the Aligator's hands seem to stiffen and claw at the air, Lauri released the choke and rolled Sobek off. She coughed and choked in between sobs and curled up on her side in a little ball. Lauri drove a knee into her and forced her face down with the knee between her shoulders. Lauri grabbed the woman's left hand and twisted it up behind her back. Then she wrapped the strap around the left wrist and tied it off. Using her other knee on the woman's left elbow to hold the arm in place, Lauri dragged the right arm behind the woman's back and tied it off as well. Once she was done she looped the rest of the strap around the woman's neck and tied it off to the section of strap between the two trapped hands.
Lauri stood and surveyed her victim. Sobek was still choking and gasping. She was just beginning to try and free her hands, but each move she made tightened the strap around her neck. Lauri stomped on the woman's lower back several times. Then she moved back to the wall as the woman groaned and writhed trying to escape. Lauri came back from the wall with coarse looking rope. She pulled the woman's legs up until her heels were trapped against her ass, tied off her legs together like a trapped calf and then tied the rest of the rope to the strap holding the hands and then
Lauri came back from the wall with coarse looking rope. She pulled the woman's legs up until her heels were trapped against her ass, tied off her legs together like a trapped calf and then tied the rest of the rope to the strap holding the hands and then again up and around the neck, adding the legs to the woman's agony. The Aligator started begging. Lauri laughed and started kicking the woman in the right side until she rolled over on her side, still brutally tied up. Lauri dropped down on her knees and grabbed the woman's face with her left hand. She made the captured lizard look at her and then began to drive her right fist into the woman's sides. The pounding went on and on. The Aligator blubbered and sobbed, but Lauri pounded her ruthlessly until she had tired herself out. Lauri stopped and moved to a bench to rest while the Alligator dry heaved on the floor and begs.
Lauri rested for awhile She looks at me and can't help but get flustered up. "It's a side-hustle....Don't look at me like that." She stood and wiped her bloody right hand back and forth across the gator's face. The croc..Well both of them sobbed helplessly as i post-nut hump into dheela.
Lauri approached the tied up woman and speaks, “Look bitch, I know it hurts, but I want you to get your ugly whipped ass out of her in the next ten minutes. I want the other half of the five hundred you promised if I beat you and we know I did and make it +25 for the kid."
The crocnodded and crawled to her clothes. She cried as she half dressed herself and pulled five 100 bills from her pocket.
"All right, if you ever want to take me on again, just call. But next time, I won't go so easy on you. Do you hear me, skink?. Just remember you got your cunt busted by a Human woman. If you want a return session, my price for busted cunts like you is a thousand dollars to fight and another thousand dollars when I win. Now get your ugly fat ass out of my building."
A rhythmical crack woke me up. I rose to attention without making the least noise. Gosh! Just as I imagined, the crack came from the other bed! Slowly, as my eyes got accustomed with the darkness, I slowly turned on my side. My ass hit Lauri's right thigh and, for a brief moment, I held my breath: I didn't want Lauri to wake up. Moments later, the rhythmic crack grew louder and louder.
And then, I made out what was happening: the damned beasts, those who shared the room with us, were bloody fucking!
I listened to Lauri, my wife-to-be, but her regular breaths showed clearly that she was still asleep. Meanwhile, the animals went on: by now, the lioness stood on all fours, lust turning her half-feral while the guy, a skinny younger cheetah male was slowly straightening himself behind her. For awhile, they remained motionless, listening to my breath and Lauri's however, I went on snoring, as if I was still asleep.
Hmm. I was pissed I couldn't bring myself to tie the knot and fuck Lauri, damn it, but at least, I could watch these two anthros at work.
The wind outside began to roar, covering the sound of their heavy breathes and the bloody apex girl let a long purr of pleasure, as her partner sled deep inside her. Blood invaded my prick on the spot.
It all began some ten hours earlier. The bad weather had forced Lauri and I to spend the night in that damned emergency cabin off the roadside. We were not more than 50 miles away from home but, as the weather report kept saying, we had the worst winter that was ever recorded in modern history in these parts. The hard blizzard caught us as we drove from Longpaw to Saddleback and we had to leave our useless car in the massive piles of snow that covered the road a mile away from the shelter. Thank God it happened near the shelter or else we would have frozen in the car.
The news we saw on TV during the evening were full of such sad stories People that were lost along the snow covered roads, people frozen in their cars, people obliged to sleep in public buildings in small villages and so on…and the unlucky one mauled and murdered by wild Anthos and even civilized ones left unconstrained by the tight metaphorical and sometime literal leashes they'd otherwise be kept on.
For me and Lauri, the bad news were also that we had to share the shelter room with our two kitty companions. The she-cat must have been something of a supermodel while he was 18 and twigly at best. For sure some manner of escort with a horny youngster being confined in this shelter room. They were cozy under all that fur and this was a mere adventure and they were to having fun of it in lieu of a more private dwelling. Of course they disliked our being there, for their little sexscapade but what could they do?
Their bed was cracking louder and louder. The lioness sunk her fangs in the pillow and she fully arched her back, offering her voluminous, tight read to her partner. The guy, limber in frame and a touch overwhelmed had to grab the girl's wide hips in order to lift her ass up before slowly impaling her from behind.
She bristles and let out a brief moan, as if giving him the signal that she was ready. He began to thrust his hips forth, real slowly, but ecstatic. Her back seemed to break as she raised her ass as high as she could and she moaned once again.
My prick was now hard as a rock. I watched the two beastfolk trying to maintain their control in the presence of us humans. I listened to Lauri. She was still sleeping, thank God.
Lauri My crazy bitch of a girlfriend When I first found her in the basement of her bar I simply couldn't understand how she could be the head of an underground fighting ring. She was, just a charismatic owner.
And she worked hard, day in day out and she frequently did the men's tasks, especially when her bar ran short of employees. Believe it or not, she chopped down trees, she repaired the plumbing of the kitchen she carried heavy rucksacks and she took care of everything that had to be fixed in her business and she was constantly on the brink of war with anyone: employees, her sister, her father and so on. She kept complaining about people and about the bad luck of working with her team…but she never had delivered such a diatribe onto me.
To cut it short, my relationship with Lauri had been rather cold until some six months ago when i stumbled upon her fight club. She frequently ran catfights with all sort of anthro women, especially her bar patrons In fact, this was one of the reasons for which her business was in the green.
It was 9 o'clock in the evening when Lauri had an argument spring up with the lioness girl. The golden furred beast answered back and, despite her more advanced age, she was not at all looking that she would comply to Lauri's wishes when she threatened the cat with force which, on the other hand, the lion girl could not even understand. The sight of them shouting at each other (Lauri in human, the girl in lion-ese?) threw a chill through my spine but when they began to shove each other, the hatred and the determination I saw in their eyes made me readily interfere, along with the beastgirl’s partner.
“Why did you stop me?” asked me Lauri afterwards, furiously.
“God, are you mad or something? You lose and there’s no paramedics for days for all we know! Have you seen the weather outside? How can any help get down here when the blizzard is roaring as such? c’mon, Lauri! You don't know who this girl is! You don't even understand what she says! Why fight her?” As I talked to Lauri, trying to reason with her, another wish perversely poked out into my mind: maneuver Lauri into fighting that feline.
Make her fight the lion! You know lauri likes it…Why don't you take advantage of this…. opportunity?
I shook my head, attempting to throw away that dreadful thought but I suddenly found myself saying:
“Besides, this girl looks very determined, damn it! In a way, I am responsible for you!”?
“Oh, cut it out! I am an adult! I am responsible for myself, for Chrissakes! I would have beaten this bitch just like that, if you wouldn't have stopped me!”
I don't know why but, still carried on by the wish of getting Lauri into a real catfight..unarranged by the rules of the fight club. I felt that I had to boast her a little and I added:
“She doesn't look at all helpless, Lauri!”
She widened her eyes.
“Oh fuck no. I’m a master at what I do buddy.”
Lauri gave me a wild look:
“The best thing you can do with spoiled cats is to teach them a good lesson!” she said, spitting the words one by one. “The good lessons are only those taught the hard way! This girl deserves a serious beating, believe me!” She cools her temper off with some time in the bathroom while I went down at the supply cache and I brought out some tea. After heating it, I ran into the cat’s s boyfriend? Fuck for the night? Not really any of my business. The cheetah boy introduced himself as Sprint and looked kind as he smiled at me. He spoke in bad common language and we could hardly understand each other but the main idea was that he congratulated me for stopping Lauri from starting a fight, because his girl was a mad, violent person, barely allowed to walk without a muzzle and there was no way he could have stopped her if she would have embarked in a fight with my girl. She looks away a tad embarrassed.
A strange feeling seized me then. The prospect of Lauri fighting that savage was slowly becoming a real possibility, if I may put it so. On the other hand, I didn't want Lauri to get hurt. The truth is that the Lioness girl looked well packed too on top of her ferality.
She was tall and heavy with muscles and she really had a wild look on her face, signaling a most violent temper. But then, what did I have to fear? Lauri knew how to take care of herself and she had too a most violent temper.
Anyway, Sprint the cheetah kept telling me that his mate to be would have done this and that to Lauri until he managed to inadvertently make me decide to go for it. I pretend to be offended of Lauri’s behalf.”
“What the hell do you think about Lauri?” I suddenly interrupted him. “Do you think that your girl could withstand the full-experinced fighting reputaure of a woman like her?”
He made out what I meant and, for some seconds, I saw him look at me in disarray.
“My girl mad. Your woman stay put,” he said after awhile. “Please.”
“If your woman strong, she fight my girl! If they fight, you don't stop them! OK? I don't stop, you don't stop! OK? We watch and all will be well. They are hellcats, their violence is inevitable but we don’t have to be a part of it, not really.” I throw out the idea and sprint's tail flicks in interest.
“Do you think lauri is in danger?” I asked him. “Do you think that your lion scares Lauri? She'd..be fine”
Again, he didn't say anything for awhile. Then, he frowned, hardly finding his words in his toolkit. He was pretty nervous. Erection visibly poking up between his nudeness. He offers a scheme.
>conspire with sprint & how?
When I got to our bed Lauri glowers.
“See, you shoudn't have stopped me in the first time,” she said. “Just let her pick on me again, and you’ll see how I’ll tear her apart! You want me to see me rip her apart, don't you?”
I averted her eyes when she said this.
“I want you to be well when we get home, Lauri.”
“I am responsible for myself, you got that?” she said looking at me with glittering eyes. “I'll tear this lion apart, you. got. That.” It was not a question.
Well for Now, as we spoke it is Sprint who was tearing Fang apart by thrusting his barbed dick deeper and deeper into her moistened cunt. In a way, I envied him, the fact that he was fucking that perfect physiqe of cat was everything i wanted with Lauri. I made out her shapes through the fur: she looked like a young, healthy queen of the jungle her muscled flesh changing shapes with each of her movements. Her thighs were nervous, her buttock hard, her breasts were big and tense.
After a while, he began to pump faster and faster, shaking the lioness from head to toe. She got on all fours then and her massive breasts kept dangling back and forth and she grasped the drapes while sinking her face in the pillow, trying to muffle her groans and clawing the fabrics She raised her calves in the air while his thrusts became harder and harder and soon, she began to thrust her ass backwards, meeting his efforts.
Their bed was cracking in rhythm with their movements. Slowly, the girl began to lose control as she started to snake beneath the male faster and faster, until his belly began to smack on her butts with each pumping.
She suddenly let a brief yelp and they both stopped, looking towards our bed.
“Jesus,” suddenly whispered Lauri, taking me by surprise.
“You two fuck like wild animals and some of us are trying to get some rest!” Fang snarls back at her still being fucked. The petty escalation was back on.
Half of an hour later, it happened. Lauri told me that she intended to go to the bathroom. I looked at the other couple and I saw the lioness get off her bed too and, a few moments later, Lauri and the Feline girl met in front of the bathroom door. Lauri grabbed the doorknob first but the Lioness placed her hand on the door and leaned on it.
“I first!” she said, obviously looking for trouble.
I peered at the other guy. The cheetah boy shrugged as if things had got far beyond his capacities of management.
“You said your woman was strong,”
he shrugged, smiling at me.
Lauri dragged on the knob, pulling the door ajar but the lioness slammed it shut.
“I first!” she said again, mockingly looking at Lauri.
“Fuck you!” hissed Lauri, looking straight in the cat’s eyes.
My heart began to pound as the two females faced each other, eyes throwing glares. They were dressed only in their panties, fully exhibiting their strong bodies. The Feline girl had thicker legs, while Lauri's muscled back and shoulders seemed menacing. Their asses matched in size and firmness, and their breasts were big. Lauri, however, had bigger breasts, although flabbier. I don't know why I imagined then that tit volume was advantaging Lauri?
I felt that my heart throbs shook me from head to toe. Fascinated, I couldn't take my eyes away from the two females and I realized that they had both straightened their trunks, menacingly poking forth their breasts.
Lauri took a deep breath and she pulled on the door as hard as she could, throwing the teenager aside but, the next moment, the dark girl leaped at Lauri and, without any other warning, they readily embraced in a mutual hug, pushing and shoving back and forth in the small room.
I got up and so did the other guy awkwardly squaring off and keeping at arms length.
In the first moments, the golden pelted warrior cat managed to push Lauri backwards but then, Lauri forcefully hugged the Feline girl and crushed her in her arms with all her might. The girl held on, however, and for some moments, both froze, letting brief groans of effort. They took some steps aside and they froze again, hugging each other. They moaned concomitantly and they took some steps sideways once again.
Their faces went red and Lauri began to crush her foe in brief bursts, gradually arching her backwards. Fang grinned. Again, they took some steps aside.
I was baffled by this sight. I expected a wild outburst of energy but all I saw was this strange dance and exhibition of strength.
I looked at the cheetah guy. He was looking at the two females with wide open eyes.
I realized then, I realized that the lion was not at her first try, either. I realized that they were two wild females that were still weighting each other before engaging in a most dreaded confrontation, damn it, I could feel their wild thoughts in the air. Each expected the other one to make a mistake. Each wanted to insure herself the needed advantage to destroy her foe for good.
"crush her, Lauri!" I shouted, trying to warn her that the girl was not an easy prey, but I felt that she had already known it.
Lauri grinned in effort and she reinforced the hug but Fang held on and impinged on her muscled legs as hard as she could, pushing Lauri back for a couple of steps. The other guy shouted something in Feline and, moments later, the lion began to powerfully shake Lauri from side to side.
Lauri held on, however. and, taking a deep breath hardened the hug.
Again, they strained in the middle of the room, between the two beds. Their muscled legs were snaking in sheer effort and drops of sweat already showed on their hard backs.
"damn it, Lauri, punch the bitch! Punch her!" I advised but once again, the two females froze, moaning and grunting in effort, seeking to outpower each other in a most terrible test of strength. Slowly, they bent from their waists, propping their chins against each other's Lauri walking a tightrope of holding back those flesh hungry jaws with the power of leverage. Moments later, they parted their strong legs and they began to push against each other, pedaling on the floor. Their bare breasts began to coil and I noticed how erected were their nipples. Lauri's round ones were pink, the size of a cherry, while the lion's were dark brown, almost black, and they were hooked up, like two short thumbs tasting the air and after a while, the two females broke the hug but their hands readily joined.
Once again, I realized why they fought like that. I understood clearly that each of them intended to exhaust the other one before engaging in the decisive assault.
It came into my mind that somehow they were meant to meet here, in this cabin room. I took a deep drag on my cigarette. I knew that they will go to the very end. The thought threw a chill through my spine.
By then, their breathes became coarse and the lioness Fang slowly seemed to get the upper hand. She looked in Lauri's eyes and, rumbling in effort, she began to shove Lauri in violent outbursts, but the latter suddenly sunk her teeth in the beast's muscled shoulder. Before the Feline girl realized what happened, Lauri ripped her foe's furry skin and she began to shake her head as if she were a wild beast herself miseating on her prey.
“Rip her flesh, Lauri! Rip her stinking flesh!” I yelled.
The feline yelled something in her own language of roars and snarls and she readily retreated, escaping the wild biting. She whined coarsely and, a moment later, she charged Lauri with vengeance in her heart.
However, she seemed to expect the lioness' surge and, parting her strong legs, she met her foe with a most terrible punch that got the kitty in the left breast.
Fang halted in her tracks, but she didn't even blink. Sprint began to shout something in fast pace but Lauri pressed the stunned beast and shoved her violently, throwing her against the door of the bathroom. I shouted at Lauri, encouraging her and, before the lioness could recollect, Lauri seized both her breasts and pulled them forth in a most brutal burst.
"Aaaaah!” yelled Fang and, desperate, she grabbed Lauri by her hair.
A wild push and shove contest ensued, lion pulling on Lauri's hair, the latter dragging on her foe's breasts as hard as she could. They began to trot from side to side between the beds, letting brief screams. They parted their legs in order to get a better balance and they went on,
bellies heaving, bodies trembling from head to toe, as both tried to outpower the other.
Soon, Lauri let a scream as the cat managed to powerfully yank on her hair, but Lauri ensued by readily twisting her foe's breasts so hard, that the girl readily freed her scalp, retreating.
It's only then that the Feline felt the blood run from her shoulder and gather between her tense breasts. She rinsed her shoulder, as if she was not willing to believe what she saw and then, she began to breath through clenched teeth.
She yelled something at Lauri. Lauri cursed back and, a moment later, Lauri charged the larger woman, forcefully kicking her in the belly. Fang *Gewuff!*'d but she withstood the blow and, confident in her might, she engaged the girl once again in a test of strength. They pushed and they shoved along the room, twisting, spinning and letting brief moans. I began to shout in rhythm when I saw that Lauri was slowly gaining the upper hand and. After some seconds, she overcame the girl and she briskly shoved Fang backwards.
The cat seemed more and more exhausted and, sensing it, Lauri dived against her, making her lose balance and throwing her on her butt. Fang shouted something and she tried to get up but Lauri swiftly mounted on her foe's belly and she forced her flat on her back.
"Good shit Lauri!" I shouted but she didn't hear me, concentrating on insuring her position above the lioness.
The girl hissed something and she began to twist beneath Lauri but my wife-to-be held on and she soon placed her shins over the golden pelted warrior’s arms, pinning her to the floor. Desperate, the girl bucked wildly, but Lauri readily clutched her hands over her neck and she went for the choke. She leaned with all her weight over the cat's windpipe, jibbing on her and slamming her head against the floor in the process.
"crush her head, Lauri! Crush her damned, ugly head!" I yelled in frenzy, but I understood once more that Lauri couldn't hear me.

>you see this asshole?
>can you see this asshole?
>short as fuck, I had to haul his fucking stool just so he can look over the podium
>and that's not even the worst problem, he wants me to move it without people seeing
>how the fuck do you even do that?
>...
>fuck, this guy talks a lot
>it's really fucking hard to take him seriously when you know what's been in his mouth
>guess what, his height isn't the only reason for the stool
>it's because he can't stand up straight
>each night I have to stand back and guard "our great leader" as he gets fucked by... every human he can find
>he got a good taste of the the human ambassador's cock, giving it a nice lubing before he got split apart by it
>those grand parties where he invites "the peasant folk" into his palace? Just excuses to sneak in some humie boytoys during the chaos
>hell last week I had to escort him into the local prison built to keep human seditioners who were arrested for speaking out against his rule
>not even a bad place to live honestly, solidly middle class
>in reality he wanted to be violently sodomized by the angry humans
>they held him down for hours and did... things to him
>nasty things
>humiliating things
>they destroyed his everything and turned him into a powerless, submissive bitch of a fox
>he was crying and sobbing by the end but by the way his little dic(k)tator was shooting out his cummies we all knew he enjoyed it
>...I mean, I'd enjoy getting fucked like that too
>once he even ordered me to occasionally press the button on the remote to the vibrator stuffed up his ass while he gave a speech about how he spoke to the humans and managed to sign a treaty with them
>he had a chastity cage to prevent people from seeing his erection but that didn't stop him from making a wet patch on his pants after I managed to make him cum
>god, I can smell the semen on his breath, did he have humie dick for breakfast or something?
>what a fucking loser, I can't wait for our country to be conquered

>BREAKING NEWS: Our Glorious Leader has been found handcuffed to his bed with undeniable evidence of sleeping with the "enemy" male humans on his person and within his room
>Riots fill the streets with furbois, angry at his hypocrisy and betrayal, the women literally all suspected such and don't really care.
>Country goes into lockdown, our Leader finally shows his true self to his people and announces we're going to be under human rule from now on.
>All furbois against the new regime get rounded up, instead of riots there's celebrations now, we were due some good fucking news.
>I'm getting my first relocation order soon, I'll be some human man's property, I hope his cock is as big as they are rumoured, I've been tired of those small pricks our "men" have been packing.
>Also heard my anthro-ex accepted his feminisation at last, maybe he realised how unmasculine he was, he'll make a nice toy for some human man.
>Our country has been the best it's ever been, we're thriving and there's talk about joining with the other human owned places... our Leader being a slut for human dick was the best thing that could have happened to us.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=45wce6oSr0M&t=4s
>Anthros in no-gun forum are whipping themselves to a frenzy
>"Have you heard? The new government supports slavery. They're buying Leopards and Pumas to replace the losses."
>"That's horrible!"
>"Yeah, they said they'll use them as" Em tee bees" and "Ai ef vees" "
>"Sounds bad. Must be some expendable meat or.. or.. camp entertainment."
>"Sex slaves? They didn't say if they were buying males or females."
>"I need to make a blog post about this"

>Be Anon
>Be bored
>Go to the slave market
>Place is stocked with various non-humans
>Elves, Orcs, Goblins, Minotaurs, Centaurs - you name it, Humanity have enslaved it
>Most of the slaves are horny for a human master and those that aren't will be soon enough
>Like everyone else though, you're heading down to the Kobold section
>Little fuck-pockets are the best slaves around
>You swear, if the Great Domesticator blessed Humanity to be the perfect rulers of this world, then surely the Kobold 's goddess blessed her followers to be the best sex slaves
>Much to the envy of the other slaves
>Especially the Elves hates 'losing' being considered lesser in comparison to the Kobold
>Hurts their egos and all that
>Good, it'ss teach them their proper place in the harem hierarchy
>You get yourself some four kobolds (all sisters from the sound of it)
>Also get yourself an Elven slave
>She won't be fucked - her job will be to clean out the Kobolds once they've serviced you
>Once she've learned her place, then she may have a turn
>Until then, she'll have to watch
>...Maybe you should get an Orc too, just to mess with the Elf some more
>You go through your new Kobolds as soon as you get home
>Have the Orc and Elf watch
>Once you're done you tell them that they get to decide between themselves who will be fucked next
>The loser will be left out, as punishment
>Predictably, the Orc wins their little struggle
>The hierarchy is now in place: Kobols on top, then the Orc, then the Elf at the bottom
>Make sure to rub this into her smug face over the next few weeks by having her service/clean out the other pets
>After that you make sure to have the other girls play with her whenever they await their turn
>Soon enough the Elf is begging to get fucked
>You allow her this small mercy
>Sne cums herself into a coma
>Apparently, edging a long-living slave-species like an Elf over a long stretch of time can have consequences
>Just shows why they belong at the bottom of the slave hierarchy
>Takes a few days before she wakes up
>What little of her ego and pride that had remained is now gone
>She now accepts her place in the harem without any fuss
>You do fuck her more reguarly form time to time, as any good masters does, to keep her mentally healthy
>She almost seems to enjoy being a cuckquean more
>Good, for she will be around for a long time, helping the other girls raising your decendants, and theirs in turn
>She's now the family heirloom cuckquean
>Just as The Great Domesticator intended

>Be Anon
>Your boy keeps whining about getting a pet
>Tell him that you expect him to take good care of her
>You don't wanna see him disgard her like he did the cat and rat pets he got a few years ago
>He promises that this time will be different
>DoubtfulButOkay.lastchance
>Get the dog
>The boy takes care of her for a few months, then loses all interest
>FuckingKnewIt.goddammitboy
>It now falls to you to take care of her
>It's not as if you already have to take care of your own harem of pets, as well as his previous pets
>You got work to do dammit
>Send your boy to M&D-school as a diciplinary punishment
>M&D stands for "Military & Domination", a combination of military school and diciplinary institution that teaches young human boys how to be good leaders, soldiers and masters of anthros
>Tell your boy that if he want any future pets, he'll have to claim them himself through military service
>No more hands-out
>While he's gone, you take good care of his pets, as is the "Burden of Man"
>Years pass by
You're enjoying retirement with your pets
>Your boy learned his lesson
>Eventually becomes a national hero
>That'sMyBoy.poudfather

>"C'mon, just give in already. You know it's inevitable, you're looking at the living, breathing proof of it."
>"F...fuck you."
>"Why suffer pointlessly when you're just going to lose? Save ourselves the next thirty-four days, eight hours and nineteen minutes and just submit."
>"I am not...sucking human cock...under any circumstances. Fuck you!"
>"Alright, time for another 'reprogramming' session then. Don't bother trying to cover up, I already know our most sensitive spots. A shame that so many of them can only be reached by our ~master.~ Now where did I put that whip?"
>"W...wait! Please!"
>"Hmm...I think I recall this specific one being extra painful. I really should have taken my own advice sooner."

>Mom and young daughter are bought by a softie master.
>Clean fitting clothes, filling meals, private quarters, no physical punishments, the whole shebang. Master even gives mommy books to school daughter with.
>Daughter... She feels bad that she isn't doing more. Mommy works hard around the house and even late at night sometimes.
>Maybe if she learns what mommy does, she can help out?
>On nights like these, mommy is usually doing something in master's bedroom, so she follows
>She peeks one night, transfixed.
>Mommy and master strip out of their clothes, kissing and touching. Daughter watches, feeling funny when master's boy part gets big and stands up.
>Mommy giggles and gets on the bed, spreading her legs and exposing her girl part to master.
>Then master...!
>Daughter's eyes widen.
>Master pushes his boy part into mommy's wet girl part. Then they start to move.
>The grinding of bodies, the cries of pleasure, the indescribable smell, it makes the place between daughter's legs tingle.
>Almost by instinct, her hand wanders into her panties.
>Oh! Oh that feels GOOD!
>She rubs and rubs, her legs shaking, as she wonders what master's boy part would feel like inside of her.
>From the noises that mommy makes, it must feel amazing.
>Mommy and master finally come to a conclusion, as master growls and drives his boy part deep into mommy.
>Mommy howls, going wild in pleasure.
>Daughter has her first ever orgasm, staining her panties and driving her to her knees just outside the bedroom door.
>Mommy and master separate, cuddling in bed.
>"You're so kind to us, dear master..." Mommy smiles and kisses the master. Mommy puts a hand on her tummy. "I'll bear this child with pride."
>Daughter can put two and two together. She knows mommy's tummy is getting big because master's baby is in there. Mommy has been so happy about it.
>Then her first heat hits, and on an instinctual level, she knows what she's missing out on.
>She eagerly awaits her turn to have master's baby.

>National
Florida Anthro Shoots Up Bank With Fireworks, Kills No One, "Wanted To Go To Jail With All The Hottie Humie Guards"
>World
BioMek International, Sperm Bank Facing Massive Lawsuits After Delivering Cheaper Anthro Cum Instead Of Human
>War
Special Forces Anthros Rescue Kidnapped Human Hostage, Terrorist Stomachs Pumped Of Human Cum To Deny Them Pleasure
>Politics
Senators Mila Simmons (D)icks and Chloe Kessagre (R)omance To Debate, Are Humans Too Precious To Be Allowed To Become Soldiers?
>Interviewer: "How many anthro lives is the life of one human worth?"
>General Roberta McBrayer: "Seven."
>Business
#1 Corpo Human BoyToy Andrew Teras Of Ignas Investment Co. Confirmed Father Of Seventy-Two After Impregnating Countless Subsidiary CEOs
>Climate
Weather Bitches Predict Perfect Beach and Beach Sex Weather In Coming Months
>Science & Tech
Newest aPhone Now Capable Of Automatically Sending Nudes And Pussy Pics To Nearby Humans
>Sports
Lone Male Anthros Sports Team Fan Interviewed
>Fashion
CumTats! The HOTTEST New Trend! Show Off Your Devotion To Your Human By Getting A Tattoo... With Ink Made From His CUM!

>due to new Anthro Swimwear Security law, all anthro swimwear must be secured on their bodies via buttplug
>also no fabric is allowed to cover their backs, must be attached to the buttplug and a collar only
>anthro swimwear is now sold with included buttplug
>the more revealing the swimwear, the larger and longer the buttplug
>most anthro girls can tell you the shape and size of a buttplug a stranger is wearing based on the swimwear
>"hey master, see that one in the string bikini? Horse, 8 inches, flared tip."

Trainer forgot that intensive training was ongoing.
>HP: strapped to a vibrator while giving deep throat to trainer
>Attack: demolish training dummies while remote controlled toys go ham
>Defence: take spankings like a big girl
>Sp.Attack: maintain energy attack while trainer ravages your ass
>Sp.defence: keep your sanity while edged for hours and denied orgasm for days
>Speed: fastest cow-girl in the west, double up on agility with lap dance

>portal open between zootopia and the United states
>Some human cops decide to join zpd
>Fatal shooting of furbois skyrocket
>Adultery rate of furgirls also skyrocket
>Video of Judy and her new human partner after a another "accidental" shooting of a furboi

Can you make up a Human dominated society that counts as collared that's even the slightest bit more complicated then Sexy fur ladies are harem slaves and the males are draft beasts?

I've recently imagined a pseudo steam/solar/dieselpunk world where humans are the culturally and politically dominant force in a nation that has smaller nonhuman groups in it. There's no explicit human worship going on, but humans are usually seen as a paragon species even among other nations and are generally respected for stereotypically being the people that birth all the "heroes" that have saved the world over the generations. This is probably the simplest way to describe it without getting in the nitty-gritty.
So, not a "harsh" collared setting but more of a "lawful good" one. Lots of room for adoring harems and conquering uppity, villainous anthros.
A militaristic sci-fi setting would be fun as well. Something like the Empire from Star Wars and Starship Troopers where anthros can enlist to prove their worth to stand amongst humans. I guess I like the idea of humans exerting cultural dominance over anthro societies without always so obviously just enslaving them outright.

>Humans and anthros evolved concurrently, but humans advanced notably faster and built the first real societies.
>The anthro tribes on the meeker side allowed themselves to be absorbed by the humans rather than fight, and enjoyed the benefits of human advancements and culture.
>A loose caste system formed as a result. A species was not locked into its caste, but it did determine the starting point of its members.
>Humans were at the top as leaders. They could take any job, but retain their social standing regardless. Mentally, humans on average would always edge out anthros.
>Driven, ambitious, and loyal species of anthros were next, administrating their lower brethren as governors and politicians.
>Intellectual species formed the next rung, becoming engineers and doctors.
>Then came soldier anthros with a knack for violence.
>Clever and dexterous species took the role of artists, craftsmen, and merchants. The hardier of their number became farmers.
>Dumb labor and sapient livestock were near the bottom.
>Finally, the unfortunates at the bottom, ones too outclassed by another species or too incapable of respectable work. They took what was left.
>This kind of thinking was pushed aside in the modern era, but hundreds of years of culture do not go away in just a few generations. Most anthros will still defer to an upper caste member or a human if given the opportunity.

>Be Anonious, a proud legionnaire of the Human Empire
>Be posted on the northern frontier, where civilization is lost amidst the endless forests and wetlands
>Winter sucks, so you appreciate the coming of spring
>The anthros here are more bellicose than on the other frontiers, so summers are usually spent on marching to and from various battlefields
>Some tribes are easier to deal with then others
>The wolves of the Blaiddii a organized and loyal to a fault, causing you the most trouble
>The bears of the Arthilii are the strongest and most dangerous individually, but luckily they’re unable to organize more than an occasional warband of a few dozen
>The deers of the Ceirwii bring their druids along, so battling those usually ends with some magical bullshit. nothing your paladins and clerics can’t handle, though
>Today you’re battling the rabbits of the Cwinii
>First time, so you don’t know what to expect
>The battle starts with the exchange of arrows and javelins
>Their frontlines charge in while their backlines continues to bombard you with arrows, making it difficult for you to lock your shields before they’re upon you
>In the chaos of the clash, some of the damn anthros manages to take down a few of your comrades
>Fuck.mosaic
>An arrow hits the general in his eye
>He pulls it out, waves it over his head like a warbanner and orders everyone to keep fighting
>Yes Sir!.VeniVidiVici
>The battle continues
>Their second wave charges
>The damn rabbits use their strong legs to jump over the front line and attack the guys behind you
>You're surrounded
>Fuck
>Utter chaos as the frontline is now isolated from the rest of the army
>Through the fog of war you all suddenly find yourself in a one-on-one duels with the enemy
>The battle is fierce but eventually you manages to shield bash then into the ground
>That took way too long!
>Your opponent immediately surrenders, a big smile on their face
>Tells you that you’re now her husband
>What.TheFuck
>You take a look
>The same scene seems to be playing out long the entire frontline
>The rest of their army retreats, while shouting in… victory?
>Your take your prisoner with you as you regroup with the rest of the army
>You head back to camp to rest and interrogate the prisoners
>You learn that the army you faces had been composed by only females
>Apparently it’s tradition among the Cwinii to send their females into battle during spring
>If a male wins over them, and doesn’t kill them, then they become their wives
>Sounds dumb as all hell, but apparently it’s a necessity for them to keep their population under control
>Rabbits are highly fecund you see, so doing so allows the strongest live and breed, while culling the rest
>And from the sound of it, your new wives were very impressed by how well humans fight
>So you can expect a similar battle next spring
>That would have been a great deal if it wasn’t for the death of some of your comrades
>And because you’re here to keep the local anthros under control, ofcourse
>Conquest and colonization require manpower, so you can ill risk the legion losing troops unnecessarily, even if it kept the rabbit’s numbers in check
>You may have to subjugate the entire tribe and manage their population yourselves, just to keep the peace
>Still, that’s a headache for the general and politicians to figure out, you’re just here to do your part
>At least your new wife knows how to cook and keep your warm during the cold nights

In your version of /collared/ how would the laws on anthro relationships work?
Would there be no rules at all?
Or would there be laws allowing only anthro/human pairings?
Would anthros be allowed to have intercourse with other anthros but only with the same sex?
Would only furbois be forced to have sex with each other, or would they be completely celibate?
Allowances for harems? Futa contingencies? Ownership/Marrage/Divorce laws etc?

I go with anthro daughters human sons rules.
Harems are the norm, all anthros are born into their father's ownership and likely later married off as forms of clan friendship or just trading slave for slave.
It's common and often expected for harem-sister to have sex as a form of bonding. Male anthros have long been bred out of existence.
Futas don't exist, but are an abomination, so shoot on sight if they did.
Divorce is more of expulsion, and is reserved for just the most unruly and most awful of girls. An unowned anthro has almost no capacity to legally do pretty much anything but wander the streets. Though most are more likely to be put in some kind of psychiatric hospital to find the source of their misbehavior. Girls expelled for just being ugly or something are likely to end up charity slaves, prettied up as much as possible and sold cheap to predominantly very young men seeking to pad out their harems. The guy who expelled them is likely to be investigated for slave abuse.

Well, in my perception, the humans are a very small percentage of the population, in the 0.0x percentage range, due to very fast anthro breeding and the fact that human semen is recessive, causing human anthro hybrids to look almost exactly like their anthro ancestor, so to both avoid demographic collapse but also overpopulation, all male anthros are placed in innie chastity cages and have homosexuality and femininity heavily advertised to them. This both ensures that they won't overbreed but that they will also be able to inseminate female anthros, by bringing themselves to an orgasm, be it anal or psychological or simply a vibrator, then smearing the semen into the female. And of course, certain male anthros that prove valuable and loyal enough (for an example, a human's favoured bunnyboy gaming buddy, or a bitchboy chef that keeps scrambling the eggs just right, or a doeboy gymbro that rushed in and stopped a human from killing himself on the bench) may get his chastity cage removed, either temporarily or permanently (of course, a human can always get the anthro re-caged with ease).
So, other than keeping track of who's who's descendant to avoid inbreeding, anthros would be allowed to do whatever they want.
>Allowances for harems?
Sure, whoever can have them. But funnily enough, between anthros, it is either the unlocked males, who keep their harems only as long as their human masters let them, or females, as in the anthro sexual relationship, the female is the dominant one, pegging her males to orgasm.
>Futa?
No thanks.
>Ownership/Marrage/Divorce laws etc?
A human can own a anthro, he simply needs to take the anthro to a local police station and sign a form, then get some form of identification on the anthro, ranging from collars, eartags, rings, necklaces, tattoos, piercings, chips...
As for a anthro, they too can get the same, except in that case, both sides need to consent to it. There are no marrige/divorce laws for anthros.

>In your version of /collared/ how would the laws on anthro relationships work?
Depends on the setting, I have several. Though in my most recurring, there’s a bit of myth and magic, with gods having given their chosen peoples (anthros, humans and whatnot) their “gifts”.
Most anthros are stronger/faster/more dangerous/more in tune with nature and whatnot because they got those gifts first.
Humans were last in line, leaving us nothing. To remedy this, the god of humanity gave us the gift of being approachable, and the wisdom to use it for domestication - basically, we’re the one species that everyone else can get along with.
>In short, Humans act as the glue that keeps the other races cooperating.
It also helps that among most anthros, females are considered lesser to their male counterparts, with many males being cruel as a result. In comparison, Humans are generally (but not always) kinder and more tolerant, making females more eager to join Human harems, households or cities, as even as secondary citizens they’re treated better in general. Same goes for males, though most of them will fight to “keep their power”.
>In short, even as conquerors, Humans are kinder masters than what anthros would be toward each other.
Another point is that most anthros rely/emphasizes *too much* on their god-given gifts, meaning that most anthro societies either remain primitive, or fall back into primitive tendencies when “freed” from human rule. They cannot be trusted with modern technology, or to maintain the medical infrastructure on their own, even when it would benefit their own population. It's so bad that tribes (that were never contacted by Humans) managed to go extinct since they failed to adapt to changes in their environment.
>In short, Humans are almost “needed” to keep the other species alive.
Also, in a world with magic and gods, only Humans managed to reach the industrial revolution, making industry the great equalizer for all.

>In your version of /collared/ how would the laws on anthro relationships work?
Anthros are a genetically engineered slave race, and they are carefully bred with each other to produce valuable and marketable offspring. The worthwhile ones are guaranteed to get a partner, and the cream of the crop can even choose who that partner is. The most valuable and desirable anthros are kept by their human owners for themselves.
Not valuable enough to mate? Tough luck. You can either turn to your own sex to sate your urges or you can ask your master about being sterilized. Sterilized anthros are allowed mixed-sex habitation.
It's not hard for a man with his finances in check to make an anthro harem for himself. Most female anthros are compatible with fertility drugs that allow them to birth humans, so the harem owner can make an heir.
Futas and hermaphrodites are the result of an exceedingly rare genetic quirk, and are almost never on the market. Their owners either keep them as pampered pets, or have them fucking 24/7 to try and breed another herm. There's a pretty niche porn category of pregnant hermaphrodite anthros impregnating regular females.
Finally, the one way an anthro can be freed is if they're married to a human. It's a long and tedious process, but if a man wants to elevate his wife to the legal level of a human, it can be done. She had better keep her ID on her though, because no one's going to take her claims of being free at face value.

>Be me
>Female serval in the army
>At war with humanity
>Losing badly
>Fuc
>Anyways
>Marching through forest with glorious leader Rain Silves to ambush human camp
>Finally arrive to see it empty
>What the fuck
>This was not part of the plan
>Just as we were preparing to head back an arrow whizzes past my muzzle, finding it’s mark on a nearby soldiers neck
>Suddenly dozens of humans arise from the nearby bushes, some shooting arrows from a distance while others are charging toward with halberds
>Try our best to hold them off but unfortunately our spears are no match for their halberds
>Rain tries her best to hold the unit together, but is ultimately taken down by a halberdier
>Well fuck
>A few moments later - SpongeBob French guy
-The few survivors that remain are captured by humans and are being transported towards a camp for interrogation
>Send help

>AITA for making my furboi son wear a dress to school for a month?
Hello fellow furdittors! For context, me (human male, 39) and my wife (Clydesdale mare, 41) have two wonderful children (F17)(M15). Anyways, my furson is always begging me to let him drive my sportscar that I keep in the garage. It's an antique Mustang, from my late father. Of course, I never let him out of fear he would crash it. Well, two days ago, I returned from work to find a police car outside my house, and my car missing from the garage. Apparently, he took it out to impress some of his friends and managed to wreck it pretty bad. My wife and I agreed that he will have to pay for the restoration himself. In addition, I told him he has to wear his sister's old dresses to school for a month, in order to teach him discipline. Well tonight, he came home from school crying. Apparently all his friends on the football made fun of him for being a "sissy". He's been in his room bawling all night and hasn't come down for dinner at all. Do you think I was too harsh on him? Should I end his punishment early?

No, of course not! In fact, you're too mild and are spoiling your son. You should take away all of his clothes and make him keep wearing his sisters old clothes until he pays for he restoration (and, of course, stop giving him any money). And if he can't find a job himself, you should consider getting one for him and making sure that the employer understands that he is to refer to him as a she and make him wear the female uniform. Some of the good jobs to look into are cashiers, car wash attendants, bussers, dishwashers, pet walkers, gas station attendants, janitors, newspaper distributors or waiters. Oh and in case the employer is uncompromising about the female uniform and such, they'll be happy to do so if you agree to a lower wage for your son.
This method will teach your son of the importance of money, work ethic and caring for things, as well as instill proper understanding of his place in life and broader society.
I myself knew this one foxboy who got taken away from his parents and adopted by human ones. When he was 18, he broke a vase and spent until 26 in bikinis, a chastity cage and high heels, working as a waitress, until he got singled out for his looks and brought in to be a fashion model. A real rags to riches story, guy even has a mansion and a wolfgirl he goes out with.

Update: After some discussing and reading through the comments, my marewife and I have decided to extend our son's crossdressing punishment until the end of the school year. In addition to wearing his sister's hand-me-downs, my wife will also be taking him to the mall to get him fitted for some newer and better-fitting dresses. Also, our daughter found him a job working as a waitress at one of her friend's mother's diner. He starts next week.

Hello fellow furdittors! As you may remember, a few months ago, I asked you about how I should punish my coltboi son for wrecking my car. I'd like to give an update. He's doing very well at his new job as a waitress, and he's very popular with the customers. His boss is very pleased with him. As for the football team, he was about to be kicked off for "unprofessional behavior" until he came to some sort of agreement with the coach, having to participate in "morale-boosting excercises" after every practice. At home, he is far more obedient and polite than he was before. He's even asked his mother if they can go to the mall to buy himself new outfits to wear for the school prom in a few weeks!

Did you get him fitted with a cage yet? Or at least the phone operated buttplug? Maybe a nose-ring or nipple piercings?

A knock on the door.
"Coming!" A female voice from inside shouted. A moment later, the door was pulled open. On the one side, stood a panthergirl in her fourties, dressed in short yellow shorts and a light pink shirt, on the other, stood a man wearing a black hoodie and balaclava, with a revolver in his hand pointed straight at her.
"Step away from the door." He said firmly.
"What's going on there?" A male voice from further in the house called.
"Nothing's going on." The human replied.
The panthergirl didn't dare move or speak with the revolver pointing at her as the footsteps echoed through the house. The human observed the three entrances into the room, then placed himself next to the right one. A few moments later, a big muscular male panther appeared in it, holding a long knife in his hands. Too late, as he recieved the butt of the revolver across his face and came tumbling down. The panthergirl released a short scream of shock as she saw her husband knocked to the floor limp.
"Mom? Dad?" A younger male voice called. "Is everything alright."
"Call him down here." The human growled as he pressed the pistol barrel into her stomach.
"Come down here, mommy needs you." The panthermilf called her son after swallowing.
Hurried footsteps were heard until a young pantherboy stepped out of the stairwell only to find himself facing down a barrel of a gun.
The panthermilf proved very cooperative when it came to disclosing her familiy's wealth and before twenty minutes had passed, all the cash and jewelry was placed in the human's pockets. Yet he had to admit, the female looked well. Her breasts were full, her ass plump and her thighs pleasantly thick.
The four of them went to the bedroom, where the human insructed the two males of the house to sit in the oposite corner of the room.
"Strip." He told the panthermilf. She swallowed, took off her shirt, then her bra, revealing stiff nipples. A moment later, her shorts and panties were off, revealing how moist she was. The human pulled his pants down just a bit, revealing his erect member. He didn't even need to issue any orders as the milf went down to her knees and started blowing him. She wanted to swallow his load, but he pulled out and came on her face.
It was then that he noticed that the two male anthros also came. A malicious smile spread across his lips. "Do you have any sex toys?" He asked the milf as she was trying to redirect cum from seeping into her eye. She merely pointed at a nightstand.
Within it, the human found a inverted chastity cage, a massive dildo strapon and a oversized buttplug. "Gentlemen, strip." He told the two anthros.
The older of the two was a impressively built and well endowed anthro. His son, however, while keeping his dad's height and endowment, was skinny, obviously physically inactive. The thief tossed him the chastity cage and, after a bit of rummaging, a miniskirt and a croptop.
Within a minute, the young anthro, now dressed as a slutty girl and in a chastity cage was on all fours, his dad, the well built panther anthro was on him, his penis all the way inside of his son's asshole. On top of the man, laid his wife, the massive strapon attached to her fully inside of his ass, while she had the large buttplug. The burglar then stuffed everyone's mouths with panties and, with a roll of ductape, taped both the panties in their mouths, then all of them together, into a living anthro tower.
And as a final goodbye, before he left, he fucked the panthermilf and in front of the trio, broke the two keys to the chastity cage.

>"As you can see General, we take great care to ensure our captured alien invaders are completely restrained at all times. We also make sure they are constantly sexually stimulated and tormented to both punish and humiliate them."
>"I can see that Captain, but why the hell are you pumping her full of sperm samples taken from your squad?"
>"Some of the team were a bit offended by some comments she made. We also have VR goggles on her head showing her fake images of her species being pregnant with human children. Joey keeps having the AI show her a fake video of herself pregnant and talking about how happy she is to be breeding stock, and to quit resisting and get pregnant already."
>"Can they get pregnant from human sperm?"
>"Dunno sir, but I promise she will find out."
>"Good."

>Prisoner #0003824732
>Status: Ready for Transport
>Prisoner was brought in and strapped into the reprogramming chair. Kept crying about how she wasn't even a soldier, just a scientist, how she never even pointed a gun at anyone, and so on. Prisoner was informed that all that was irrelevant, she provided aid to her government through her research, so she would be getting the same treatment the soldiers did.
>Prisoner went into state of panic when we turned the machine on, and selected the Pet programming. She begged us to not to turn her into a mindless pet, said she would do anything at all we wanted. Prisoner continued to cry and beg until the process reached about 20% complete. Prisoner continued to protest, but just kept repeating "No, please, I don't wanna be dumb" over and over.
>At 50% she just shook her head saying "I don' wanna" over and over. Once the process was 80% over, she finally fell silent. When finished, we released the restraints, and the prisoner got on all fours on the floor and started rubbing her face against the nearest guard's leg, asking if he was her master.
>Prisoner is reprogrammed and ready to be removed from the facility.

>Capture an anthro soldier and rape her until she passes out
>Swift counterattack pushes the human forces back
>Get captured and sent to the anthro Hague
>They decide on the ancient anthro rite of 'an eye for an eye.'
>Since you raped their esteemed warrior, she now has the right to rape you in return
>Lock you in a room with your former victim
>You rape her until she passes out again.

Think a fuckable living teddy bear creature intended for growing hormonal teenagers who needs relief and intimacy
>genetically engineered to be perfect toys for your growing boy
>she doesn’t need food, comes with fertility turned off, and is always there when she’s needed
>”is your son struggling with his new hormones? Get him a yinglet toy girl today, made by hasbro”
>comes with a whole plethora of piercings like one is playing with dolls
>package includes medicine to change her ass, tits, and even fat ratio in dose increments
>it’ll even carry his school supplies for him
>they’re lovable, pettable, and can be the most low maintenance pet you’d prefer based on your order

>tfw you will never grind down a rowdy anthros resistence with the boons that come with servitude until they can't imagine a life not serving you

>did you know that while Anthros fill 90% of cells in prisons, less than 5% of them are repeat offenders?
>Rehabilitation at it's finest

>Here at Silverwater Correctional Center, we believe in second chances for all.
>That's why all anthro prisoners are automatically enrolled into our "specialty program" when they enter our walls
>All anthros, regardless of gender, are to be treated as female
>Then their ears are stapled with a "free use" tag, meaning any guard can have sex with them, along with any human on good behavior
>Afterwards, they are shown a 5 minute introductory video while simultaneously taking a ride on one of our many fuckmachines
>Rules of the prison are simple: no fighting, no using or smuggling drugs, weapons, or alcohol, and no escaping
>Following the rules and general good behavior gets you additional priviliges, as determined by the staff
>Failure to abide by the rules can result in penalties like being placed in chastity, use of the fuckmachines and hypno-headsets, or being relocated to a cell with a human on good behavior. The worst offenders might have to spend a day in the public-use wall, being forced present their ass to anyone walking by
>We do allow visitations, and it is always funny seeing anthro families shocked at their loved one's transformation from vicious gangster to public-use sissy
Why hasn't someone made an anthro mod for Prison Architect yet?

>anthro male only jail
>aphrodisiacs are omnipresent, in drinking water, in food, in the air, in the shower water
>this leads to an extremely horny populace
>lifelong prisoners are made to be completely naked and are fed a healthy protein rich diet
>all other prisoners are stripped, cavity searched (anally fisted), locked in a chastity cage, a ring gag, get nipple piercings and are, for the first 3 months, forced to wear a bitchsuit, after which point, the guards are to estimate if the inmate can or even should be let out of the bitchsuit for everyone's safety (and satisfaction)
>the non lifelong prisoners are fed an estrogen rich diet that slims them down and slowly removes musclemass while building up fatty reserves
>the jail is unique in the facts that all prisoners share the same spaces and that the guards and the prisoners freely intermingle as violence between the two groups is extremely rare and in the few cases it does happen, it is directed from the guard on towards the prisoner
>upon the release, the prisoners behavior is judged and a question is posed about whether his bitchsuit and/or cage is to be removed or not. this is to incentivize good behavior from the side of the prisoners serving even the lightest of sentences. in some cases, certain short term prisoners have way overstayed their sentence begging the guards for more chances to prove themselves, like the 19 year old catboy son of a anthro supremacist who got caught for jaywalking and got a week long sentence. he got released last year at the age of 33, still in both, but now racking a nice pair of tits and a fat ass

>said system, combined with the willingness of the anthro cops to arrest people over things as petty as littering and jaywalking and the willingness of anthro judges to sentence their countrymen to punishments as low as "a day in jail" leads to both extreme submissiveness and obedience of the anthro male and the elimination of the huge numbers of anthro males from the sexually active pool as large numbers of them voluntarily take the option to leave the jail in chastity cages, or sometimes even in bitchsuits to avoid the constant anal rape commited by the lifelong prisoners, amongst which the larger species are overrepresented
>it is estimated that the incarceration rate is at 14 per 1000, which is impressive compared to the global record of the human states at 1 per 1000
>in addition to that, an average of 96% of the incarcerations are a week or shorter, however, the average term served for even that demographic is 143 days, or almost 5 months with a staggering 7% remaining in a bitchsuit and a incredible 37% remaining in a chastity cage for life

I really love this trope. Turning masculine anthros and sending them to a re-education camp and forcing them to be ‘female’ and morph their body to appeal to humans.

Guys I need help.
I got two kobolds pets who can’t stop arguing.
I’ve repeatedly commanded them to share, but that only works for a short while before they’re at it again.
I’ve Also tried to use punishments (no cock for 1-3 days), but it doesn’t stick. I’ve used both the carrot and the stick to get them to behave and cooperate, but they’re both so stubborn and rager to serve, that they won’t ‘tolerate competition’.
Been considering enforcing a heirarchy to settle the matter, but can’t decide on which one to make the prime pet - both are perfect pets otherwise, it’s only when I want them to share that they start misbehaving.
Anyone got some advice?

Play their competition against each other and push them towards debasement with it to get pets increasingly inclined to indulge your most depraved desires.
Starting point, flip a coin, winner gets her ass fucked, loser has to try to make her clean up bj better.

>Been considering enforcing a heirarchy to settle the matter, but can’t decide on which one to make the prime pet - both are perfect pets otherwise, it’s only when I want them to share that they start misbehaving.
flip a coin to decide, but make them aware of it
because they couldn't cooperate with each other one of them has to be the bottom bitch
and if the winner gets too cocky, make it very clear she could have been in the loser's position just as easily
if they start shaping up you can go from there and change things up again

>she pulls herself up
>you tense and ready for fight, thinking it was a gesture of defiance
>she imitates a distinctly human pose and far-off daydreaming look
>starts listing out names for the brave cubs growing in her
Life could be a dream...

>A member of the council looks yonder to the beach from a observation tower
>Holding a wine glass, she smirks
>She sees a former council member, recently turned chancellor, presenting herself to the oncomming alien
>By her saide a male in naval uniform steps forward to observe aswell, a grimace forms from the odd sight
>"And just what is she doing?"
>"Negotiations."
>"I've never seen that method before"
>"You can cut the act, we know of your feelings on the matter. Been said plenty already."
>"And no one is bothered? No one is a bit annoyed, disgraced even, that a foul human barbarian treads one of our glorious megastructures with just the mere intent of procreation!"
>She takes sip before turning to him
>"That 'barbarian' lead a war party through one of our allies most populated, and thus a well guarded systems. They cut a path of destruction through their military; corraled the fleeing populace with such haste. I understand your honor is brusied but the fact is bare, their forces are superior and would repeat the process elsewhere."
>"If we wish to keep our civilization intact we must placate to their one weakness, the one feeling that overwhelms all their other desires. And she is doing perceisly that. Several other races already fell to their advances and face harsh punishment for their stern defiance. We've chose not to endure such fates."
>A snarl forms on his face, this is pure defeatism coming from someone high in goverment
>"We'll keep these animals sedated and in return we can continue to exist with some autonomy. As long as you, the guard in whole, can hold their tongue."
>He seems to want to reply but holds back. He smiles.
>"Very well, if this is what it takes."
>"Good, I'm glad you understand. It's just survival. Don't want to end up like the fennecs do we not?"
>"Of course. I just wish your type weren't so keen to please. At least with the with the fennecs they had no choice."
>"You speak out of terms commander!"

>Stallion works as a workhorse for an elderly farmer couple, plowing fields, harvesting crops, and pulling carts to the market
>When they die, their son decides he doesn't want to be a farmer, and auctions off the farm and all its assets, including the anthros
>Horsey gets bought by a mysterious man in a dark cloak and top hat
>After being caged (for "his own safety"), the stallion is taken on a train for the big city
>A short carriage ride afterwards, he and the cloaked man arrive at a big house in the city
>Inside is a man in a black suit; he is the horse's new owner
>The horse is taken to his quarters and ordered to put on whatever is on the bed
>It's a french maid uniform and some lingerie
>The man explains that for quite some time, he's had an obsession with the idea of taking a big muscular anthro man and turning him into a sissy slut
>As such, the former workhouse will now be the new housemaid
>His new duties will include tidying up rooms, serving tea, making repairs to whatever needs fixing, sucking master's cock, and being a good anal slut for master and whatever guests he has over
>For now, he will be allowed to get used to his new surroundings, but tomorrow, training begins

>horse-breeding changed from an occupation about creating champion foals, to a competition to gauge how well a contestant could breed his mare
>this change happened once mares started admitting that humans were better at enjoyable and pleasurable sex than stallions
>horse-breeders soon discarded most if not all of their stallions and hired on quality human breeders to impregnate their mares, along with those they took care of personally
>every year there was a televised competition to crown the best horse-breeder
>contestants would enter as a pair, one mare and one human, and the mare would be secured in any position desired
>judged on how long they breed the mare for, how many loads they put inside the mare, the intensity of the breeding, and how many times the mare orgasms during the breeding
>final judgement is made two months after the competition, mares that didn't get pregnant are disqualified for that year along with their breeder
>mares are usually subject to a regimen of being edged non-stop for every waking moment for two weeks straight, then given a day of release, repeated over and over all year long
>was typically timed to have a 2-week session ending right as it was time to compete
>not uncommon for many mares to have their first orgasm within the first two minutes of the competition
>last year's winner enjoyed/suffered 37 orgasms
>her breeder put her edging chastity belt back on her before she was even untied and turned it back on
>she cried, but not as hard as she cried when he told her that she would be skipping her release days, one for each orgasm she had beyond the first
>eager to copy his success, other breeders have been increasing the time of the edging cycle
>I heard one miserable mare somewhere hasn't had relief since the last contest six months ago

>AI programmed edging device
>First thing it uses are tiny massaging rods
>Touches her clitoral hood and vibrates to tease out her organ
>It will be the last time her organ will be tucked away
>She's constantly erect, with constantly shifting vibrations and massages
>That alone keeps her needy, but the belt has much more purpose
>Peeling her lips and stimulating them as if she was being kissed by a passionate lover
>It uses this to measures her heart rate to keep her from every achieving climax
>The final touches are the smooth swivel sticks that enter her
>One gently circles around her urethra, a toe curling pleasure
>Two more enter her vagina and stimulate every inch of her
>It was only a matter of minutes for the AI to find all her G-Spots
>First hour she's a panting drooling mess begging incoherently
>Few hours in she's crawling holding onto your leg with watery eyes
>After a day she's exhausted and passes out
>A week and she's able to stand, legs soaked from stimulation
>At this point her conditioning can take place
>Anything you ask of her at this point will be done
>Any touch you give her to her body is amplified
>A month later she doesn't even feel the belt
>Any attention you give her is near orgasmic from a simple pat on the head or a word of encouragement

Nothing quite beats the anthro breaker.
>Being edged endlessly only to have a painful ruined orgasm.
>She can't avoid it.
>Her muscles pull to get away as she nears another edge.
>She only hopes it will stop at the end and not let her cum.
>The vibration slows and time for her melts away.
>Her walls clinch in anticipation of the spasm.
>Then the motor ticks just one to many times on her precious pearl.
>Her exhausted muscles spasm.
>She didn't want it.
>She didn't want to cum but the relentless vibrations caused her to cross the threshold.
>She bucks trying to get just a little more stimulation but all movement stopped. >Her needy cunt just tightened in on itself.
>When it was over her chest rose and dropped in heavy pants
>She let out a long whine.
>Her body was in pain and worse of all she was unsatisfied.
>And just as she caught her breath the process would start again.
>When her trainer returned she begged to never cum again.

>Bogo is not a vocal supporter of the human takeover, unlike some other anthros, he makes no public statements, does not come out to greet the human troops and simply hides in the basement with wife and daughter
>After the human takeover, a statement is made that all government operations and functions are to continue as normal and that all high ranking functionaries are to register at their offices with human troops
>Following a quick interrogation, he gets his new uniform as a neutral anthro, including the heels, the skirt, the cage, the plug, etc, before the soldiers, finding no homosexuals amongst them, leave a dildo on a table and exit the room
>After Bogo fails to display adequate enthusiasm (fucking himself on a dildo left on a table in front of him), his wife and daughter are arrested, branded and gangbanged in front of a crowd before being shipped off to a human army base
>Humans implement the new police uniform law relegating all anthros to wearing skimpy, feminine, revealing and sexual uniforms
>Judy strongly protests, alongside a large number of anthros as she sees what her husband is made to wear
>Bogo and his Police administration, in a attempt to lick up to the humans and earn benefits for themselves and their families support it, docking pay from the police officers refusing to comply with the dress code
>Judy (supposedly) lashes out at a human bullying Nick after tearing off his panties in a tram and making him dance around a pole to a crowd
>A big wave of protests follows, Bogo then temporarily assigns Judy to the human relations
>Following his lenient response, he gets demoted to a role of a janitor with a second shift as public relations in the elephant bar as a collaborator takes over his position as the police chief
>Judy gets shifted to a permanent role in human relations by the new collaborator

>1000+ pets of every anthro species at your beck and call to whatever fancy you have, no matter how small or ridiculous
>need to get up out of bed and get dressed? Your horse anthro can hoist you up and your lap-pet anthros daintily dress you
>cow and chicken anthro make you sunny side up eggs on toast with a glass of (their) milk
>golden retriever girl bounces on your morning wood while you read the papers
>need to go to work? The dragon anthro will just fly you there, along with whatever anthro you’ve assigned for today as your secretary and sexual relief animal
>nothing like bean counting with a sloppy blowjob under the table
>get home the same way you left, dinner is ready. Fresh steaks served on your cow anthro’s tummy to eat off of
>ready for bed again? Just make sure you fill all their greedy, fertile, baby-crazy wombs before you drift off to dream land

Sounds like a pregnant belly would either become the default view of a woman or perhaps a status symbol/fashion trend. You’re not a real good girl until you’re so gravid that your belly button sticks out like an actual button and gets stuck that way, with a permanent vertical stretch mark to go along with it

I bet they’d flat-belly shame their peers too
>”oh you only have twins in that womb of yours? Your tummy looks so anemic I thought there was only one little tyke in there”
>belly mogging
>jingly distended belly button piercings
>shirts that show off the underside of the baby-bump
>tally tattoos or other accessories that show how many litters of offspring they’ve been blessed with and bore into the world for their magnanimous owner

How would that work out in terms of family dynamics though? Would all of the wives just be considered “mom” to the children? Would it matter who your birth mother was? I bet you could get pretty cheeky if you found the most permissive mom of the bunch and asked for things through her. As a little boy I bet I’d get all the videogame time and snacks

How would (you) guys handle having 10-100 anthros who are all technically your mom? how would you get along with your legions of siblings too? I imagine there’s be a lot of getting used to having 1 dad and an entire harems worth of mothers and siblings

Could be cool actually. Always some misadventure to get up to. A village worth of family. I wonder how much attention each individual kid would get with their parents though, Given how much breeding we like to allude to.

I think you’d be also able to rely on your big siblings if you’re younger. So you get spoiled by your parents as an older sibling and want for nothing. Or if you’re younger the siblings that haven’t fled the coop yet will also be around to play with and pay attention.
>bnuyy older sister who arranges your harem for you from her group of schools friends
>foal little sister who wants to watch you play your hardest videogames
>wolf mom harem member who spoils the three of you rotten in particular with her bomb ass brownie recipe (you are her blood son, not like it mattered. She loves all her “pups”. And of course has a sibling for you on the way)

Sounds like a cool dynamic.
I reckon we have a responsibility to vet our sisters potential partners. When Anthro girls get all worked up and blinded by lust, they can be rather poor judges of character. it's cliche. We wouldn't want to see those we care for fall into the clutches of some sociopath.

I wonder who would bet your gf(s), your moms or your sisters? Maybe both
>it’s finally time
>your first girlfriend is coming over for the banquet. what your cow mom lovingly calls dinner every night because everyone shows up
>all your moms are antsy to hear about your first girl who you very well might tie the first knot on your rope with
>she’s a polite and preppy deer girl. And she’s nervous about being put on the spotlight for the familial councils judgement
>you barely make it passed the foyer with her when Kira, your big giraffe sis comes up
>“anon, did you move the batch of chocolate chip cookies mom ma- oh hi! How do *you* know my lil’bro”
>you escape the awkwardness of Kira’s interrogation and the stammering from your gf that would come after and make it to your room
>well, sort of your room, dad and moms went big with the house with lots of larger rooms. But that means modifications had to be made to those massive rooms for more private spaces. So it’s like a fancy dorm with a common room before the main hall is actually entered
>dad would be nudging you with his shoulder with paternal pride right now if he could see you
>Rory bumped into you with on the way to your room proper. She was a tiny thing, barely old enough to tie her shoes
>she was a precious little wolf pup. And your pure sister. She always wanted to watch you play your fantasy rpg videogames because she loved watching you fight the bosses and explore
“Rory how’d you get all the way here? Did you come by yourself? Where’s mom?”
>you pick up your baby sister and let her rest her little snoot on your chest
“Sorry Rachel. Mind if she joins us?”
>looking to your gf you realize she approves of your baby sister’s presence, judging by her attempt to not hyperventilate with cute overload

As an anthropomorphic mouse girl, I've always been fascinated by humans. Their bigger size, their different appearance and their ability to walk on two legs- everything about them was intriguing to me. And when it came to human men, I couldn't resist their charm. I was drawn to their strength, their masculinity and of course, their impressive manhood. I couldn't help but feel a primal urge inside me whenever I saw a human man, and it only intensified with time.
I had tried my best to suppress these feelings, knowing that it was wrong for an anthro like me to be attracted to a completely different species. But no matter how hard I tried, I couldn't resist the temptation. It was as if my body knew what it wanted, and the mere thought of a human man would make my heart race and my body tingle.
One day, I decided to give in to my desires and went to the beach. The warm sand beneath my feet, the sound of crashing waves and the scent of the ocean- it was all so invigorating. I had always loved the beach, and it was the perfect place for me to embrace my inner desires.
I walked along the shore, my small mouse ears twitching as I tried to spot any humans in the vicinity. And then I saw him, a tall and muscular man, lying on a beach towel and soaking up the sun. My heart skipped a beat as I watched him, my cheeks turning a bright shade of pink.
Without even realizing it, I found myself walking towards him. I couldn't resist the urge to get closer to him, to feel his presence. As I stood in front of him, he looked up and our eyes met. His piercing gaze seemed to look right through me, making me feel vulnerable and exposed. But I couldn't move, I was completely under his spell.
'Hello there,' his deep voice rang through my ears, sending shivers down my spine.
'H-hi,' I stuttered, feeling my cheeks heat up even more.
'You're a cute little thing, aren't you?' he chuckled, making my heart flutter.
I couldn't believe it, a human man was talking to me. And not just any human, he was tall, handsome and everything I had ever wanted. I felt like I was dreaming, and I never wanted to wake up.
I had to remind myself that I was an anthro, and I shouldn't be here, talking to a human man. But his charm was too strong, and my desires were too overpowering. I couldn't resist him any longer.
Without thinking, I climbed onto the towel and straddled him, my small body trembling with excitement. I could feel his hard chest against my soft skin, and I could feel a bulge in his trunks pressing against me. I instinctively moved my hips, rubbing against him and feeling a surge of pleasure course through me.
He let out a low growl and grabbed onto my hips, pulling me closer to him. I could feel his hot breath on my neck, and his lips trailed down to my collarbone. I wrapped my arms around his neck, my fingers tangling in his hair, urging him to continue.
Our bodies moved in perfect sync, and I could feel my desire building up with each passing second. I wanted him, all of him. And I could tell that he wanted me too.
With a swift movement, he flipped us over, and I found myself lying on my back, with him on top of me. He leaned down, capturing my lips in a passionate kiss. His hands roamed all over my body, eliciting moans of pleasure from me.
I was his slave, completely at his mercy, and I loved every moment of it. He was my king, and I was his willing subject.
As we exchanged hot and frantic kisses, I could feel him enter me, and I gasped at the intense pleasure that shot through me. He drove into me, harder and harder, and I could tell that he was close to his release.
With one final thrust, he let out a loud moan and collapsed on top of me, his body shuddering in pleasure. I could feel his warm seed inside me, and it only made my own climax even more intense.
We lay there, panting and catching our breath, our bodies intertwined on the beach towel. And in that moment, I knew that I would never be able to resist humans, especially human men. They had become my ultimate weakness, but I wouldn't have it any other way.
From that day on, I would often visit the beach, searching for my human lover. And he would always be there, waiting for me, ready to fulfill my desires. We were two different species, completely different in every way, but when we were together, nothing else mattered.
I had become a slave to big human cock, and I couldn't be happier about it.

>seduce tribal shaman awoo
>the furboi she's promised to challenges you for her honor
>it's not even a close fight
>catch her bashfully panting and wagging out of the corner of your eye as you slay him
>give her his pelt as a gift
>she wears it for the first time on your wedding night

>I did it Master! Be sure to praise me lots!
>The Demon Lord was no joke, I seriously thought I was gonna die!
>But when I thought about not being able to spend time with you, I got real sad...
>And when I thought about not being able to service your thick, musky cock, I got real horny
>My cock was jumping around so much, it made it hard to focus
>I made sure to tell him he was getting in the way of our sex time, with his lame world conquest crusade
>You should have heard the wails he made while I sawed through his neck. Not cool at all!
>But I brought his head back, just like you asked! Since I'm really just your property, it's basically like YOU killed the Demon Lord!
>Humans are great, but my Master's really the best!
>You'll probably be surrounded by admirers when we return to the kingdom, but please don't forget me, okay?
>Now that this guy's dead and all, can we go relax at a hotspring? I'm all dirty, ya know?
>He splurted blood everywhere. How rude.
>Yay! Hotsprings trip with Master! Washing Master's body! Laying under the kotatsu with Master! Drinking to celebrate the victory with Master!
>...and you didn't forget my reward, right?
>Mhmm! That's all I want!
>All night bareback sex party with Master!!
>I want at least seven, no eight cumshots, okay? And no pulling out, either!
>I think I'll eat two. Nothing rejuvenates my adventurer's spirit like Master's milk
>Hng. My ass pussy's throbbing just thinking about it!
>What are we waiting for? Let's get outta this dungeon. Mission Complete!

Is it wrong to like a furry couple in a comic but at the same time want to see cuck/SPH content of the guy with a human?

No, that can be pretty hot depending on what you're into, a lot of dom/sub power play potential there. There's also willing and unwilling cuck, both of which can be fun. Really, NTR in general makes for a lot of great stories and fantasies. While I prefer any males involved to be femboys or at least androgynous if they're actually going to participate, an anthro male surrendering his lover to you is almost always hot
>anthro male and female are pretty normal for their species, a fairly vanilla relationship and fairly normal sex life had you not been there
>anthro female's everything is only used to males of her species, not to the hyper masculine virility of humans
>her body is literally not built to handle a human and she is left ruined for her own species as her innate feminine instincts and learned social expectations driven into overdrive every time she gets bred by a superior human male
>her husband, despite being a normal straight male of his species, cowers before you
>every night he watches you in bed with his wife, not just fucking her but dominating her, squeezing pleasured squeals and gasps from her throat that he never could
>she is reduced to not much more than a pet, a walking, talking, fucking, lowly house pet
>and it is him who is married to that pet
>after being exposed to so much raw human sexual energy the anthro male stops seeing himself as a male at all, surrendering his position at the top of the household
>only human seed flows out of his wife's gaping cunt but it no longer angers or disgusts him
>he will willingly, maybe even happily, clean out her used pussy with his mouth and tongue
>and though he might grimace and mumble his complaints, he will eventually do the same to your dripping, used cock
>the anthro's sense of masculinity is so broken and defeated that a chastity cage is completely optional as he can't even get erect in your presence anymore

>Anthro guy realizes he's shooting blanks
>He wants kids
>His wife wants kids even more
Who am I to stand in the way of (heh) true love?

>anthro male is highly infertile, still producing some good sperm but chances of successful impregnation are infinitesimally low
>their research leads them to find out that the sheer dominant sexual energy of a human can greatly boost the female's sexual receptivity and chances of conception
>being desperate they were wiling to try anything
>at first it was small, the human gave her little kisses and touches to get her started before she had sex with her anthro hubby
>and then it moved onto groping her ass and breasts, igniting her pent up, unsatisfied fertility in a way she never had
>it was then she started looking at their human differently
>she started to direct more and more of her passion towards him, the only virile male in the house
>in his presence how could she not?
>breeding sex with her anthro hubby now felt like a waste of time
>he watched as his wife kept glancing at the human while he fucked her
>eventually the pre-sex routine included everything but penetration, including orgasms
>she slobbered all over his throbbing cock, mewling at his member and feeling the weight and power of his heavy, fully functional testicles
>he watched as their human expertly fingered his wife to an intense climax right in front of him
>hubby was forced to fuck his unconscious wife while a dopey, satisfied grin stretched across her face
>she moaned his name
>and not her husband's
>the day finally came
>she was pregnant and it was actually his
>elated, they celebrated
>but while he drank himself asleep his wife finally spread her legs open for their human
>her piercing screams failed to wake him as she was properly fucked for the first time in her life
>her anthro cunt stretched painfully wide to accommodate his girth
>he ravaged her like a piece of meat until he finally flooded her occupied womb with his superior seed
>the wife gasped as she discovered how much time she had been wasting
>once she was pregnant it was over
>he watched in shame and humiliation as his wife openly presented herself to another man, passionate and lustful in a way she had never been with him
>and ever since she was impregnated his chances of relieving his own sexual tension went to nearly zero, being allowed unconscious sloppy seconds at best
>even then he gasped in shameful excitement as he penetrated his wife's stolen cunt, the human's much thicker, much more virile cum needlessly lubricating her loose sex
>all he accomplished was pushing more of their human's cum deeper into her
>one month it was particularly bad, with him forced to go weeks with no release
>he watched as his wife was fucked right beside him as they laid in bed
>her sweet little giggles and smiles she made, the very same ones he had fallen in love with
>he gasped as she reached down and grasped his abandoned cock
>she began to stroke him off, apologizing for neglecting him for the past few weeks
>he came almost immediately, spilling his sterile cum out onto the bed
>she grinned, and brought her husband close for a kiss
>their tongues and lips intertwined, and he found himself pushing into the kiss deeper and deeper, ignoring the fact that her mouth was now permanently stained with the taste of his cock
>she broke the kiss to scream as she came, wrapping her legs around the human's waist as he filled her up
>the wife grasped her husband's hand and brought him close to cuddle
>her body radiated with the scent and sweat of another man, her purity soiled and defiled but he didn't care
>in the post-orgasmic haze she mumbled her wish, gently rubbing her rapidly expanding belly
>he froze
>in the time it took to seed her with just one of his children the human could've easily bred multiple
>and she wanted more to make up for lost time
>he would have to settle for human-sired children from now on
>she gasped as she saw her husband's cock shamefully pump out another spurt of cum from the mere thought of raising another man's offspring

>MC and Lion are co-workers at an office
>MC is a decent guy but a total horn dog
>Lion is a smug asshole with a seemingly perfect life
>Has a trophy wife, star athlete daughter, and delinquent brat of a son who uses his father's influence to get him out of trouble
>When the opportunity for promotion arises at company, Lion does some shady shit to basically fuck over MC and get the job
>MC has had it with Lion
>Ends up learning that Lion neglects his wife for work
>That's his opening

>a new movie released that sparked a massive controversy and even protests by Anthros infront of local cinemas
>the movie is called "your true place" and the movie poster and all the advertisment depict the protagonist, a white tribal dressed wolf girl pregnant and in chains
>a anthro girl wants to check out the movie out of curiosity even though she is disgusted by the advertisement
>After buying the ticket she is given a small bottle with liquid. She is instructed to inhale the fumes before entering as part of the viewing experience. Kinda like how you must wear 3d glasses for 3d movies
>she does as told before entering the viewing. Her body begins to tremble as she takes her seat and after a few minutes she is forced into heat
>The movie starts and like hypnotized she watches the screen.
>The main characters village is being attacked by humans and the females are being enslaved
>They are made an ultimatum. "Become our wife's or die" the main character bows her face lowering into the dirt
>the girl in the cinema realizes that she is being groped this entire time by a human sitting next to her.
>at first she was annoyed but soon she focuses back on the movie
>The wolf is sucking her masters cock, servicing him more passionately than she ever did her husband. After all her life could be on the line here
>She drinks his sticky sperm, getting a tasted of that human virility
>the girl in the cinema is turned away from the screen but still followed the events with her eyes
>she is sucking off the man that groped her earlier, mimicking the movements of the wolf girl. She even moans in sync
>we are in the middle act of the movie
>The wolf girl and the other members of her tribe are bend over a wooden pole as they are being fucked by the humans
>the men told them it was a traditional marriage ritual where the woman are forced to leave their past behind as the males seed washes it away with a wave of guilt and pleasure
>the girls are moaning mixed with pleads and cries
>Our protagonist is mumbling between her moans words like "I'm sorry" and "forgive me" before shouting "give me your baby" as she orgasmed
>in the cinema the girl is taken from behind bend over the seat in front of her.
>she views the film as if in trance imagining herself as the protagonist being taken by human cock
>for a moment she snaps out and couldn't believe her eyes
>everywhere she looked anthro woman just like her are being fucked by human men. Moaning like whores and begging for more as they too view the screen
>she realizes how dangerous this movie is and that she must get out before it's too late but before she could resist, the man who fucks her starts chocking her
>the lack of oxygen mixed with the pleasure her dripping hole receives gets her closer to an orgasm
>her limbs don't feel like resisting and her eyes start focusing on the big screen as the man is shooting his load into her womb
>the orgasm was mind shattering and she moans like a mere animal as her eyes tear up
>the movie is reaching is conclusion after what can only be described as hours
>the protagonist is riding her human husband
>she wears a collar that is traditionally worn by women claimed as spoils of war. Attached to that collar is a small chain with a wedding band, shaking in the rhythm of her hips bouncing up and down
>the sound of her thighs and ass clapping against the flesh of her husband is loud, rhythmic and her moans like a accompanying song
>today she will gift her husband a strong son so that he too will one day invade a tribe and restart the cycle
>the girl in the cinema is no longer watching the movie. Instead she rides her human partner facing away from the screen
>she listens closely to the movie and moans in sink with the wolf girl, even going so far as to repeat what she says word for word
>"My anthro body belongs to you my master" she says almost cumming on that human cock
>"anthros are inferior animals, we all belong in chains servicing humans. We are nothing but property for your superior race. I will carry and raise your children and swear loyalty to you"
>betraying her own kind she seals it by milking her masters cock and making out with her newfound lover for the rest of the runtime
>after the movie ended the anthro girl leaves the viewing together with her master
>next to the door is a stack of collars just like the one the protagonist of the film wear.
>she hesitates at first but than with a smile she puts it on and with a loud *click* she sealed her fate

Kobolds are as common in cities as rats are. They are second class citizens even among Anthros. They steal what they can just to experience what it means to even have a fraction of wealth that humans posses
This kobold was stealing from a local trader in broad daylight until she was cought going through his wares.
Knowing how much trouble kobolds are the trader wants to get rid of her but at least make some money. It's hard to convince people to buy kobolds though since you first need to break them in
Therefore she is less worth than the cheap dagger she was carrying. But once broken they make decent maids, sparing partners for sword fights or even punching bags for the hard working common man after a long day at work
It is also not unheard of of fathers buying their son's a kobold once they reach adulthood so that they can practice having sex

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1714/12/1714122571245.png)
I slaved over these rushed sketches and now I don't even know if it was worth it. Still, as I write the narrative, I'll try to give each family member their own fully finished art piece.
These are the Andersons. And this will be their story.
Eli Anderson is a cold and calculating business man working for his family's tech company alongside our protagonist. Thanks to a rather underhanded ploy, he secures for himself a highly coveted promotion. But in exchange, he'll be spending even less time at home. But it will all be worth it for his family, right?
Then there's his wife Savannah. A trophy wife through and through, while she enjoys the luxuries that are afforded thanks to her husband's work, she's left starved for attention, both emotionally and physically.
Their oldest child, Mia, is a cheerful athlete at her prep school, with a highly toned and flexible body from years of training. But her devotion to sports has left her little time to concern herself with boys, so she knows little in the ways of romance.
Then there's Danny, a young boy coming into his youthful rebellion. He's a prideful boy, not willing to back down from any challenge. One could only imagine what troubles might befall him were he to mess with the wrong person.
And lastly, there's Lily. A young and inquisitive cub just starting high school herself, she's very mature for her age, and smart to boot. She's curious about all sorts of things, eager to learn new subjects all the time, to include how babies are made.
And I can't forget our protagonist, Hunter. A pretty nice guy with a mighty urge to fuck, be it human or otherwise. Working alongside Eli for years and dealing with his shitty attitude, being robbed of this promotion is his last straw. He's gonna get Eli back for fucking up his life, one family member at a time.
Remember Anons. Pride Cometh Before a Fall.

Excuse me Miss-… er… sir…?
>Yeah? What do you want?
Hello sir, I’m from CollaredTV, an independent news agency, and I was wondering if I ask you some questions?
>Sure I guess… but make it quick. It’s getting late, and this neighborhood ain’t safe at night no more.
Yeah well I actually wanted to talk about that. According to this survey, this county has experienced one of the largest upticks in human migration of any other county within this state. What’s your opinion about that?
>It’s awful. I’m a Pa’, and I dragged my family here to get away from em’. But now they're here too!
Oh my. How did that happen?
>Well it started off small. Low-income housing began to pop up in the town, and with it came a handful of young huma men looking to work in landscaping.
Go on…
>And you know I was willing to turn the other cheek, after all it's what our Earth Mother wants us to do.
Uh-huh…
>But then the slut mayor and the bitch sheriff ended up hitched with humans, then all of a sudden even more low-income housing began to pop up.
Then what?
>Before I knew it humans were filling out neighborhoods, and both my daughters ended up pregnant with the rape ape’s spawn!
Please tone it down, sir. You’re going to scare away our advertisers.
>I don't give a damn about your advertisers!
>This is the first time I’ve been able to speak my mind ever since my whore of a wife began defending them all the time!
Uh-huh… And what exactly happened to your antlers?
> That is the worst part! Every damn anthro in this state is expected to remove their natural weapons! Governor says it's so we don't intimidate the humans!
Well, sir, I must say that you're very angry, and should perhaps go to church more often. What you're saying is very hateful, and I will be posting this.
>Yeah well fuck you to doggy, you’re the reason we're in this situation.

>You just finished tucking in your 27 kids
>All of them are human/bovine mixed
>The oldest range in age between eight and six years old and are as smart as their old man
>The youngest are only a few months old and know how to empty their bottles in less than a minute
>Their cute little noses and cloven hooves put a smile on your face
>Time to make some more
>During the quick walk the the barn from your mansion you have time to think about all the expansions and properties you'll need to buy to give your kids, calves? the best life.
>As soon as you open the door to your barn your 'wives' rush you
>Your buried in coarse fur and soft flesh
>You feel kisses and licks over every inch of your face
>This is true bliss

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1714/04/1714042207215.png)
>The dog is mortified you went to the mass produced soulless milk instead of her carefully prepared creamy alternative.
>Perks up when you order another coffee with breast milk to-go from her.
>Gives you extra and hopes to see you again soon once you've tasted it.

Bully anthro milfs.
Strip them naked in public.
Embarrass them in front of their friends and family.
Creampie them and make them hide it.
Tear their bikinis' on the beach.
Glaze them before business meetings.
Make them get nipple piercings and noserings.
Ruin their marriages.
Expand anthro families.

Humanity gets captured/enslaved
Humans become pets/mates for the daxy
Eventually the high ranking daxy with non-human mates die off and human-mate daxy replace them
Humans use the power of suggestion and possibly drugs (estrogen) to manipulate their high-ranking daxy wives into giving humans more rights
Eventually humans have the same rights as the daxy due to lobbying
This starts a civil war between prohuman and antihuman daxy
empire crumbles in conflict
hopefully some human women are still alive at this point and didn't all die in concentration camps on mars
rescue them so they can collar alien boys
exterminate the rest of the antihuman daxy
entire plan will take like half a century but it will be worth it

>being an anthro cop in a human world is already a good way to become an outcast
>after all, you are working to help enforce the human's law
>then came the reclassification of all anthro officers into K-9 units, even if they weren't canines
>this meant all anthro officers were suddenly assigned a human "handler", and they were expected to obey any orders given by their handler
>wasn't long before joining the police as a K-9 was synonymous with becoming a sex toy for human police
>despite anticipated negative effects on recruitment, recruitment went up among human and K-9 positions

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1715/81/1715817864617.png)
>rough day, go home to your shitty apartment late in the evening
>rooms are barren because you just moved in
>too exhausted to sleep
>bumps and creaks from shitty neighbors keeping you awake
>your phone gets a notification that lights up the room
>you think you see a pair of eyes peering from near the foot of the bed
>silhouette of.. tits?
>could be a ghost, burglar, or maybe just a hallucination

>Human serial killer is prosecuted for murdering and eating 20 furbois
>From the very beginning, the trial is interrupted by his anthro fangirls who raise money for his defense and brigade outside the courthouse, harrassing witnesses and potential members of the jury, because he's "too pretty to go to prison"
>When he gets 20 years despite all their efforts, he keeps receiving love letters and gifts from his loving fans, telling him his victims "deserved it"
>Eventually, an anthro female prison guard who is secretly a fan of his breaks him out under the cover of night with him and goes on the run with him

>Anthros are so cock hungry that they have to be segregated for their own good, otherwise they can't get anything done
>They still keep trying to sneak out of their designated anthro ghettos.

>Every couple of years, a few impulsive, cocky college students get the idea of taking a road trip down to Anthroville and getting their dicks wet on unlimited anthro pussy.
>They're usually never heard from again.

>Human warrior is summoned to an anthro-fantasy world to defeat the demon king
>When the deed is done however, instead of returning back to his world, he instead kills all the mages capable of sending him back and makes himself the new Immortal Emperor of the world, enslaving all Unicorn nobles as his eternal pets
>Commence a thousand years of sexual debauchery and violence never seen before as he conquers the known world

>Wake up to see the former princess nursing your cock
>Cum in her mouth, take a shower and get dressed for the day
>Enter the throne room, see the former king waiting obediently next to the royal seat wearing nothing but a cock cage
>Sit your ass on the throne and begin the day, as the generals and advisors walk in
>Your conquest of the continent goes well, with the dragon army crushing all that oppose them
>Yesterday, the great city of Burgerberg fell to your forces
>Only a few remote countries remain
>You sign off on a few orders to wipe out a few rebel villages, then order a special treat for the commander in charge of the operation to take out the city
>The former princes are ushered in. They used to be the pride of the kingdom, strong, handsome, and noble, but you saw to it that they were put to better use as soon as you usurped power
>Caged, forcibly feminized, and made to wear dresses and makeup, they are now part of your political harem, loaning them out to generals and officers who please you
>As they are led out with the commander, you look at the former king to see the utter despair on his face at seeing his pride and joy reduced to such a state
>Lunchtime is the usual: a light feast while the queen sucks you off underneath the table
>Afterwards, it's time for the representatives of the conquered lands to pay tribute to you
>Countless sacred artifacts are collected and thrown into the royal vault to gather dust
>You decide to spend some time in the courtyard testing your sword on some captured rebels
>Dinner is a massive feast, with the queen and princess both taking turns sucking you and riding you
>Fall asleep in your quarters with both of them at your side

Human superiority is the law of the land, and disobedience is an arrestable offense. The law affects all anthros, though some may take issue with it, (Particularly, snobs, progressives, and paper-tigers.) but, as a human, you hold the right to discipline them at your discretion post-arrest.

Luckily, multiple millennium of social and biological conditioning have imprinted all mice with the idea that there is nothing more honourable and virtuous than to die on the cock of a human. It's considered to be the ultimate act of love. Mice girls WILL beg you to thrust harder, even if it's blatantly clear that they're struggling to breathe. Mice who do fulfill their sacred duty are worshiped as martyrs and revered throughout their entire society for (mouse) generations.
Humans, naturally, tend to just throw their broken fleshlight into the trash and grab a new one.

Opinions on realistically aging anthros?

A crying shame. It sucks when real pets are taken from us too quickly, and will probably be even worse when it's anthros. Though, from a worldbuilding standpoint, it would be a pretty good justification for why humans are at the top.

From the Anthros' POV, Humanity are essentially elf-like, what with our much longer lifespans and accumulated wisdom.
Some Anthro-factions may try to rise up against Humans on occasions, but they *very* rarely succeed since, in most cases, all Humans have to do is to outlive them. And then domesticate the following generation of Anthros into compliance.
>I might make this a prompt for a green
Ofcourse, not all unruly Anthros tries to overturn the status-quo. Few may know this, but cows and goats are in a long-lasting feud about milk - specifically, whose milk is better for Humans. And now Sheps have joined in, trying to overthrow the cow's near-monopoly on the milk-farms.
Pic-Related, it's the latest infomercial from "Wool & Milk Co." (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1716/53/1716536792999.jpg)

>Anthros spend thousands of years building temples and praying to their gods
>No sign of them, but faithlessness is sin
>Random, unimportant human prays once
>An anthro god, worshipped by millions, appears in his room
>she happily helps him with his wish of starting a family
>spends several hours a week giving him sloppy, baby-making sex
>even lets him record and upload footage
All the gods are anthro women. Mortals were made in their image, but human men were created because the gods wanted to make something more beautiful than themselves

Congrats on the new secretary, Anon! What kinda office chores do you want her to do for you?

>have her work the whole day with a womb full of my cum slowly leaking out of her panties to hot box the entire office
>warm up the VIP guests before I meet them in my office
>keep track of everyone's breeding schedules for maximum production
>interview innocent college graduates for their... potential
>keep an eye out for any rivals looking to steal my bitches
>participate in the weekly BDSM contest
>protect and safeguard the keys to all chastity cages

>Furbois evolved extreme feminine features over the years as a way to be spared by the humans, who were culling them at an alarming rate.
>Natural selection took their virility in favor of survival traits that left them with female fat distribution for fat asses and squishy chests, submissive temperament, and with a desire to be fucked like their actual female counterparts.

>fly around the galaxy, shooting up pirates and other assholes
>yoink yourself a pre-contact tribal anthro
>one moment she is picking berries, the next she is tractor beamed past the trees, past the mountain tops, past the clouds, and right into orbit where she is dumped onto your floor
>it didn't take too long to convince her that you were a god, exactly the reason why it was illegal to trespass onto primitive planets and especially why it was illegal to just take one like a claw machine
>but said savage anthro worlds made the best bitches
>you had her screaming and moaning as she rode you on your throne, forgetting her previous life as a mere anthro savage with every thrust
>she took your seed many times that night, thanking you profusely for each time you filled her womb
>you fly around the galaxy, shooting up pirates with your waifu

>In Human societies, Anthros lives in a class system, being either pets, civilians or slaves
>Pets are at the top of the Anthro hierarchy
>Being the personal property of a Human master provides them with comfort, at the expense of personal freedom
>Among pets, being breeders, even as part of a harem, is the top position as their offspring is either guaranteed to become pets themselves if born anthro females), or become masters (if born Human) - or, very rarely, demoted to second rate citizens (born Anthro males)
>The class of citizens is just that; Second-rate citizens
>They have more personal freedoms, as well as opportunity for both economical and political advancement, but at the expense having to pay taxes and do various blue- and/or white collar jobs
>They are easily recognizable due to their aforementioned blue and white collars
>All Anthro citizens either aspire to become pets to a Human Boss, either through hard work or by becoming noticeable politicians, law enforcers etc to catch the eyes of the powerful Human elite
>Slaves are the unprivileged working class
>Consisting of mainly criminals or rebel elements, they have no freedoms, no ownership and no chance of advancement
>Their only chance to escape this class is to somehow become a "pet-project" for a Human that enjoys "breaking-in" Anthros for later sales
>Besides these three classes, there are the unofficial "protected class"
>These anthros are primitives, often livign in reservations or in Zoos
>Their purpose is to periodically provide new blood and numbers to the Anthro population, so as to avoid in-breeding in the Anthro ghettos
>To be a Zoo-Anthro is no a bad class, considering that they get to laze about all way and entice Humans to a "Private Tour" after-hours
>And who knows, maybe there's a Human that want to acquire an exotic pets?

>when your above-desk secretary is vying to get transferred to being your below-desk secretary
>she always was a firm believer that you should dress not for the job you have, but for the job you WANT to have
>you don't have the heart to tell her that she has no way of competing with the 45 year old Giraffe currently under your desk
>a pretty canine, but you doubt she could plant her lips at the base of your cock while licking your balls and asshole at the same time, all while milking your cock with repeated swallowing
>much less all day long without a single gag or cough
>as you feel the tip of her long tongue gently swirl around your asshole, you give her an approving rub to one of her ossicones
>she knows what is being discussed, and she knows what you are going to say, and you feel the swallowing pattern quicken in thanks
>"Sorry Ms. Lane, I'm sure you would do great at the job, but I just don't have an opening right now."

>Most Antrhos start looking for a Human master in the mid-to-late teens
>The competition between Antrhos is hard since a new wave of young Antrhos hits the market every year
>To catch the eyes of a potential masters, the Anthros ave to be creative
>Luckily the modern-day Antrho have access to a vast collection of social medias platforms
>Some of them are specially designed to allow the YA (Young Adult Anthro) demographic to promote themselves
>(In)MyPlace, Humpler, Seed-it, Z (Formerly Dik Suk), Whine - the options are many and the competition to remain relevant fierce
>Unsurprisingly, a trend emerges from time-to-time
>Latest trend is the "Plus My Mom"
>It is a trend where the young Antrho shows off their uncollared mothers
>The intention with the trend is twofold:
>Firstly, it is to promote a package deal, allowing Masters to claim both Anthros as their own
>Secondly, it is to provide the Master with an idea of how an Antrho' features may develop as they become adults
>The trend have become a tremendous success, leading to the launch of a new media platform to help solidifying the trend as a standard practice

If you could be sent to any anthro world with the goal of taking it over, what kind of world would it be (fantasy, steampunk, dieselpunk, modern, cyberpunk, etc.), and how would you do it?
>Dieselpunk world
>Start a street cult that slowly grows to include several government ministers until I have the former dictator under my control
>Use her secret police and state media to subtlely mind-control into becoming human worshippers

I pick the fantasy setting
>get summon/isekai to anthro fantasy setting.
>get told I was summoned because I am the chosen one and need to defeat the queen demon that is invading their great empire
>agree to help them.
>learn more about the demon queen and the empire. Both demon land and the empire are ruled by women and their armies led by (you guess it) women. With some of the general being the daughters of the royal family of each nation.
>Both the empire and demon lands own a good chunk of the world.
>start my adventure and make your way toward the demon queen.
>Along my journey you manage to s(lay) some demon assassins and the demon generals.
>I manage to get to the demon queen and 'convience' her to surrender to me and give me the crown to the demon.
>I did this with the power of my penis
>quickly head back to the empire to do the same thing.
>Become the emperor of the Empire and demon lands.
>Can't do the same things to the other nations since they are ran by males and I ain't gay, go to conquer them with your great army.
>Some nations surrender to you as to avoid getting killed and destroyed, while other nations had to be conquered.
>Eventually conquer the world.

>Fantasy World
>A major Human Kingdom invades the territory of one of the smaller Anthro realms
>Unable to match the fighting power of the Human armies, the Antrhos instead make heavy use of espionage, sabotage and assassinations
>As a result the war goes on for years
>Fighting gives way to skirmishes
>Eventually the Humans send a peace offer
>The Antrho nobility believes that they're in the clear
>The Anthro nobility agrees to meet the Human king and his nobles at a feast held deep within Anthro lands
>The Anthros secretly plan to assassinate the Humans during the negotiations
>They hope that with this, they could deliver a killing blow to their enemies and maybe, just maybe, push restart the war in their favor
>The day arrives
>The castle is teeming with Anthro assassins and spies, ready to kill the Humans when given the mark
>At the feast the Anthro king raises a glass
>He gives a speech, then utter the phrase
>He Assassins emerge from the shadows
>The Anthro is shocked when they being to kill their fellow countrymen
>Unbeknown to him, the assassins had been double agents for years
>Within the night the entire Antrho nobility dies, leaving their hands for the Humans to take
>The assassins are rewarded handsomely, becoming the pets of Human nobility
>Decades later
>The Anthros have assimilated well into the Kingdom
>The tales of the assassins is still told to this day
>For some, it is a tale of betrayal
>For most, it is a tale of how lowly Antrhos cn rise to become the pets of nobles
>The old symbols of their nation and Antrho nobility is cast aside and forgotten
>In their place other symbols are embraced
>Many prostitutes now wear the cowls of the assassins, as a show of submission and eagerness to serve their betters

>"Hi! You're mine government assigned trainer, right? I'm ready for some sweat-breaking exercises."
>"You're not that kind of a trainer? What do you mean?"

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1677/45/1677452139517.jpg)
Beginning in the 1960's, this ad by Fur Affair, now rebranded as Owned Fashion, was the first anthro company brave enough to say it openly. It was indisputably the most successful advertising campaign of the 20th century, and redefined how every anthro company in every industry approaches advertisement to the present day.

>The Fur Affair ad started the wave of anthros openly admitting to their desires
>This would eventually lead to the “pet-sitcoms” of the 80’s
>They were like the family sitcoms, but with a focus on the Anthros and their place within Human families
>”It stays in the family”, “The maid”, and “Collared to the Jamesons” were some of the more popular sitcoms of the era
>The sitcoms of the 90’s went a step further, mostly focusing on the Anthros’ journey to find their masters and become collared
>”Submissive in the city”, “Masters and Pets”, and “Interns” were notabe sitcoms at this time
>The latter especially came to define the generation, as female anthros would try to emulate the journeys of the “interns”
>Many anthros would apply for internships in offices, in the hope of meeting their own “Mr. Girth”
>The 00’s saw the emergence of ‘token anthro characters’
>These were characters that represented the “minority species”, such as arachnids and other non-mammel/reptilerne/avian anthros
>Noticeable sitcoms of the 00’s were “Modern Harem”, “50 Shades of Fur”, and the (very vampire bat focused) “Midnigt-Saga”
>This trend would only become more political during the 10’s
>The anthro population would be consume by the debate concerning diversitet representation Among pets
> Social media would explode with political hash-tags like “#DiversityHarems”, “#AllWombsMatter”, and “#FurBoisAreFemales2”
>This coincided with the rise of the “Anti-Skin” movement, which sought to give anthros equal rights to humans
>Anthros would clash in the street in political violence
>This continued into the 20’s
>Sitcoms of this era for the most part re-castings of previous sitcoms, with political bias causing poor quality over all
>The political chaos of the 10’s and 20’s would finally explode in the 30’s
>The rise of anthro-on-Anthro violence lead to the government to cracking down on the anthros
>Groups were forcefully imprisoned
>Political parties that supported the “hate groups” were disbanded
>This included most anthro-run parties
>The average anthro supported this, as most longed for peace and a return to “simpler times”
>This was reflected in the sitcoms, which did away with the forced diversity representstion
>Popular sitcoms of the 30’s included “A Handmaiden’s Saga”, “The Human in the High castle”, and “Traditional Family in Modern Times”
>Anthros eagerly consume the wholesome media, not caring that their political rights have been stripped away
>All according to plan

okay since we're al least tangentially on dragons at the moment I have a kinda ghoulish question for you guys that /scaly/ probably wouldn't like very much: How would you clip a captive dragon's wings to keep them from flying around? The ideal solution should:
>have minimal aesthetic impact on the shape and structure of the wings
>be permanent and/or difficult to repair or undo covertly
>completely prevent self-powered flight, though some downward gliding is fine
What I think I've settled on is a series of vertical slits through the membrane, one through each segment on the outer wing. That preserves the majority of the wing structure, but since the membrane is so stretchy the slits would expand into vents when the wing spreads or catches air, preventing any lift. Those slits would probably be pretty delicate and prone to catching on things or tearing, but you can't have everything. I'm pretty sure you could avoid most of the major blood vessels in the membrane too since they tend to be pretty high up. I included some piercings for binders as well, mostly just to keep them out of the way and protect the slits when necessary.
The only alternatives I've really managed to think of are either removing the membranes entirely (gross) or actually clipping them like you would a bird's flight feathers, which would involve amputating outer 2-3 phalanges at the first or second joint, which is just downright horrible. Permanent binders would be another option but I feel like they'd be uncomfortable, bulky, and way too easy to just somehow take off.

Damage or cut some of the tendons on the back so that the wings can move, but are unable to bear a flight load. No aesthetic impact and the result is the same, though healing would take some time.
Alternatively, regular injections to weaken or paralyze flight muscles to the same effect.

would that work? I would have assumed cutting a tendon meant completely compromising that whole muscle which would seriously compromise the range of motion of the wing. I'd also imagine doing it would be a comparably major surgery that'd require a lot of prep and some special skills, whereas cutting the wing membrane could just be achieved by having 2 or 3 people hold the dragon down while another one works the knife. And I could see it making the wings pretty delicate since any overextension could easily fully tear the weakened tendons which would completely destroy the wing.
It's an interesting idea though, I could definitely see it being an option for the really rich people who really want their pets to look 'all natural' so to speak. The paralytic injections are interesting as well but I feel like that wouldn't be seen as a permanent solution. Plus the world is set in a time period roughly equivalent to the late 1800's with magic and so I don't think they'd have access to any compounds that could do that safely. Thanks for the idea though anon!

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1658/67/1658675254500.jpg)
This bondage scheme for wings is perhaps the most clever I’ve come across. Maybe it’s a tied equal place between this and what you’ve got going on. It’s changeable In how much leeway you give the slave/draft dragon and while the original design never alluded to it I think I’ve seen a similar setup be imagined as a means for a dragon’s rider to exert leverage over their dragon in-flight by partial pulling the wings or loosening them back.
>I wanted to see something that does not involve a bag over the wings or awkward ropework. You do need a way to keep your captive dragon in check as you make him work on the ground, right? But sometimes you might need his flying capabilities as well. This system utilizes rings seated behind the wingfinger so the dragon can still fly unhindered, but rope can be threaded through these rings. Karbik was so nice to also include some clawtip covers over these wings to prevent any pointy stuff from happening.
(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1658/67/1658675285026.jpg)
And tied up.

Yeah, I've seen those pieces and they, along with fortuna's bit on wing binders, were what gave me the idea (and I straight up stole the piercing concept from her). I do like that option since it's relatively non-intrusive and very adjustable, but the major problem I have with it is that it would be very easy for a second dragon (or even the same one if it had a super long neck like the guy in the pic) to just nip through the line or otherwise take it off. So you'd either need to muzzle and mitt all of your dragons any time you need the wing binders on which would be a pain.
After some thought it actually might be good for well-trained dragons that need to retain their ability to fly for some reason, maybe as couriers or something. Then you can cut them just enough slack to get around the town/city/whatever while making long-distance travel infeasible or extremely tiring. I like that idea.
>Said rope can be loosened or tightened depending on need, and fastened to a harness(or in this case a collar) to secure the dragon's wings. The design is effective and highly flexible as it gives you full control over whether your captive dragon gets to stretch, fly or stay groundbound.

You should just be able to hold the wings down, the back muscles for extending wings are nowhere near as strong as the chest muscles for flapping. Think about how proportionally enormous a chicken breast is compared to the tiny muscle on it's back. It's similar to how you can hold a crocodile's (or dragon's) jaws shut with your hands, but if open it can clamp down like a vice. The back muscles only need to be strong enough to extend the wings against gravity, while the chest muscles support the entire dragon's weight against the air.
Like, you could fold the wings down, and tie a rope or belt around the chest, and that would do it even with a relatively weak rope.
To reduce aesthetic impact, a ring piercing around the outermost or second outermost phalange would let you run a simple rope, barely visible wire, or aesthetic chain from one wing to the other either across the back or the chest, and limit wingspan. All the way from practically zero extension for a naughty dragon, half wingspan to allow free stretching of one wing at a time, or full wingspan/no cord to allow full flight with only a swap or extension/reduction of the wire length.
This fills two of your criteria, minimal aesthetic impact, completely prevents flight, but is not *too* difficult to undo covertly, since if you manage to cut the chain it's effectively undone.
An alternative would be to put a ring-piercing around the middle of every phalange, and padlock them together. That's a bigger hassle, but less aesthetic impact than yours, and it's similarly adjustable depending on mood or need, but with a padlock sealing all phalanges together, you cannot easily undo that without damaging the wings in the process, you can't exactly take a grinder that close to the wings.

>be short lion dude
>you have a human friend for some reason.
>usually humans would treat male anthros badly, but for some reason he did not do that to you.
>He is a good, and only, friend and you like hanging out with him a lot.
>decided to invite him to your birthday party at the beach house your family owns.
>get ready for the beach with your pal when you notice what mom was wearing.
>Be mortified when she was interested in greeting your human friend while wearing the skimpy bikini.
>You try to stop her, but she won't listen.
>You watch your mother 'greet' your friend, you don't know what to do so you let your mom talk to your friend.
>your friend is flustered but greets your mom.
>head to the beach while your mom is flirting with you human friend.
>hopefully she will stop flirting with him when we get back to the house for cake.

Anthros should be completely banned from military service, except in the context of stress relief auxiliary units.
You wouldn't allow an anthro to carry a loaded assault rifle, operate artillery, or pilot a fighter craft the same way you wouldn't allow a child to do it.

>The standard issued equipment of a infantry unit contains everything he needs
>Assault rifle and ammunition
>Rations to last him for at least 3 days on the battlefield
>3 mice anthros for stress relieve
>The compact size of the mice anthro make them perfect for being stuffed into the bag together with the equipment, using to little space.
>They are in bondage and come with a gag specifically developed to hold feed so that the soldiers won't need to spend time feeding their stress relieve rations while on the field. Therefore it's not uncommon for the mice to not see the light of day for several days or even up to a week
>Sometimes if a soldier run through his supply of anthros they trade their food rations for a fresh mice
>In some cases they tie the used mice to their backpacks as tally marks to show off how many days they spend in the trenches

I'm bored so I will tell you guys of my collared world building that I have never shared. I mainly use to make scenarios to fap too and then treat them as cannon so there isn't a real timeline and it's a little bit messy
The time period of this world is a sort of medieval world. The world's largest empire is the empire of humanity spanning half the continent it claims. Despite it's name the empire isn't as homogenous as it seems since at least half it's citizens are anthro.
Naturally they are all second class citizens and are not allowed to speak I'll of humans
In this world humans are an entirely male race and to procreate they require foreign wombs. Therefore the empire was founded to secure enough breeding stock to secure humanities future but eventually the warring empire spiraled out of control and needs more anthros to fuel the war machine turning the empire into a ever consuming engine of lust
But this is not really what this is about. It's the empress who is our subject
The empress of the empire of humanity is not a human but in fact a anthro. A wolf woman turned human supremacists who won't test until her kind has been fully subjected and turned into breeding stock
The empress Kara even goes so far that she orders anthro woman to be captured, to be put on a semen diet and to be brainwashed so that she can send them out into anthro kingdoms to destabilize and demoralize the locals
You get the gist of it, its a fap fantasy

>Humanity spreads into space, encounters alien races
>But sapient predators are basically unheard of, it's almost all herbivores (evolving intelligence through herd dynamics and pressure from hunters) and the occasional opportunistic scavenger (think crows, squirrels and such, who need that intelligence to be successfully opportunistic)
>Naturally they're all now the dominant species of their respective planets, technology will do that to you, but there's never been a pressure to get rid of those prey instincts.
>So initial diplomacy goes very rough, more and more horror stories about humans, depicting them as these monstrous hunters, while humans are really just, well, humans. Social animals who happen to be evolved for hunting.
>Eventually humanity has had enough, some human diplomat puts an alien diplomat in a chokehold or punches some great leader or something
>And this...
>Works out great for everyone. Some follow their instinct to hide, the opportunists rally behind humans, like how ravens follow wolves and bears, while most huddle together in their herds.
>It's not even a particularly bloody conquest that follows.
>Productivity and stability skyrockets when a human is around, with something concrete to fear the instinctive drive is to work together as a herd, never schism, and pretty much "roll over" takes over.
>Humans now sit at the top of a galactic empire, treating their subjects like pets. Because of the sudden increase in efficiency and the relatively small proportion of humans, it's a bit of a golden age. There's tithes of course, the herbivores practically demand humans take tithes, but they're not high. Humans are still feared, but it's closer to respect or worship. The herbivores practically demand humans take things from them, as they feel much better when a predator is culling the herd. Resources (and sex) instead of lives, of course.

School gym coach here.
As a rule of thumb an anthro opponent’s snout is a liability, the longer it is the more generous of a free reach advantage that species gives to their opponent. Neck length is similar when they’ve got a natural bend forwards as well. Equines can suffer from this a great deal even if they’re otherwise superbly built for martial athletics boxing rules just do not treat them well.
A lot of amateur would-be Italian stallions will find themselves being laid out in their first goes at a fight until they learn to compensate by either fighting super up close and brawly if they’re unskilled and later at least have the sense to angle their heads away from being perpetually front facing if they’ve got a real grasp of how to box and even then it’s just mitigating the problem. I’ve seen multiple knockouts predicated off a right hook to a jawline turned that direction, I’ve seen the sordid results of this taken to their extremes by this brick wall of mule teen. Stubborn as his species ever were and so set in his ways that he lost repeatedly all year even as the tactics of how to take him down circulated and everyone around him insisted he adapt. The guy was built like a born athlete, worked a farm, was in gym on weekend. Built like a sculpture. He wasn’t even especially dumbfuckish outside the ring, just deadset on his ways and took loss after loss and ended his time in the school’s fight club facing down a first timer girl a third his weight and practically half his age and *still* lost by knockout because he insisted on playing the reach game with no countermeasures and by being a counter attacker. It took upwards of a thousand hits to the face to make it happen but by god that 13 year out girl *did it* though great persistence and the will to stand up again after being thrashed through part of 1st round she managed to send a post-grad toppling over. She took well earned victory selfies standing atop the unconscious mule.

Store-bought, black-market, or caught personally? Which type of anthro do anons prefer?

I can see anthros being more or less the same investment as a car if buying from a store.
Bunnies can breed fast, but you still need to feed, raise, and shelter what is still an individual and that's still easily a few thousand USD for a new basic bunny.
The common anthros, dogs, cats, and other pet anthros tend to start at $10k, farm anthros are the same but can also range all the way up to $50k. Common "wild" anthros (bred in captivity) such as coyotes, deer, and such may start at $15k for their uncommon needs.
These prices do not include breeding pedigree, attractive features, superior physical/mental capabilities, which will increase price. These prices only include good health and a basic education.
Exotics are a free for all, prices can be literally anything but are also heavily negotiable.

>show up to your new office job
>decent pay, near your house
>a dozen or so anthros working with you
>only issue, they’re all terrible
>you’re the only one doing work. The rest just goof off and mess with things
>you realize that they aren’t even assigned any work
>they’re all obsessed with you, fighting over who gets to sit under your desk, arguing over who you like or what outfits you like best
>apparently upper management decided that only one human was needed to outperform all of the anthros in the department
>now they get paid just to be eye candy & stress relief

>Modern world setting
>Anthros and Humans are equal, be it in the eyes of the law, or opportunity for political and economic careers
>Still, Humans dominate the roles of bosses, law enforcement, politicians etc.
>It's their nature
>Anthros on the other hand are less likely to seek positions of power and are instead more likely to seek out employment under strong leaders - who are most often humans
>It's their nature
>Other than the occasional pets and harem, Antrhos enjoy being equal
>At least until "The Hunting Vacation"
>It's a special tradition for both humans and Anthros
>Once a year the city-dwelling Anthros take a 2-3 week long vacation at the local natural park
>They strip themselves of all technology, equipment and clothing, then go loving in the woods "like their ancestors"
>To "de-stress"
>Humans on the other hand takes on the role of "hunters"
>They use tranquilizers and harmless traps to capture the Anthros
>Those caught are at the mercy of the Humans
>usually spends the rest of the vacation pleasuring the Humans
>To "de-stress"
>Once vacation is over, it's back to the city
>Many Authors find their Master at these hunts
>Many kids are born as a result of these hunts
>Other than that, both Anthros and humans are equal

The Anthro Church of BHC functions on 2 fundamental rules
>"Discipline Thy Self:" Regulate your diet, exercise, and maintain proper hygienics. Abstain from inter-anthro sex and adhere to proper, modest clothes. Attend Sunday school to learn more about proper worship.
>"Relinquish Thyself:" All of the above rules are for the sole purpose of making Anthro Nuns more ready to devote themselves to human men. Members of the ACOBHC are expected to honor the wishes of any human, no matter how depraved or how many people are watching. Though, this rule does not apply if the nun is devout to only one man.. This devotion usually occurs through forced-marriage perpetrated by the men, or adoption, both of which are marked by a ring. This sort of nun-ownership is only monogomus for the nun.
Despite men using the church to collect huge harems, only 10% of nuns are taken! This is thanks to a huge number of churchgoers being born every year, usually the offspring from human men impregnating several women per month. Tithes are optional, and the church is always looking for human volunteers to help in sunday school! Just don't have a fear of large crowds, since you'll probably be blown in front of the whole chapel.

>The year is 2045. The Anthrostate is under HUMAN RULE. All anthro men are sissified. Anthro women live to serve HUMAN MEN in vast reproduction facilities. Welcome to the Anthrostate's HUMAN FUTURE.
>Darrell Stripedhoof remembers life before the revolution – before the government-issued hormones, the sissy wigs, frilly lingerie, and mandatory chastity. He lives on the war-torn outskirts of New Chudia, where he hides his beautiful maresister Kaylee from the clutches of the brutal New Chudian army.
>As musclebound human soldiers prowl the countryside searching for fertile anthro women, Darrell will stop at nothing to protect sweet Kaylee's purity. In his blonde wig, flirty sissy skirt, and fishnet stockings, Darrell gives his tender mareboi body to a gang of pitiless human alpha soldiers: the ultimate act of courage and sacrifice. But is the sissy zebra prepared for the overwhelming demonstration of power and domination? The encounter brings him face-to-face with his worst fears... and his most unspeakable sissy fantasies.
Acclaimed author and pro domme Daria Sharpeclaw presents a tantalizingly political vision of the future. Her powerful, vivid, fly-on-the-wall passages of three-on-one interspecies man-on-mareboi action push the boundaries of sensual fiction. The HUMAN CHUDS have their way with Darell's mareboi body, pumping and pounding and cursing through one of the hottest gang scenes in the history of the genre. And interspersed throughout the sizzling prose, a suspenseful narrative full of imaginative world-building unfolds.
>Experience the true power of BHC chuds in leather jackboots. Prepare to pay the ultimate price. Explore the mind-bending world of HUMAN FUTURE, the first book in Daria Sharpeclaw's brand new series.

Small story idea:
>human husband who loves his wife on pure and innocent grounds, wants a nice family with her and to make love and cuddle on movie nights
>anthro wife who wants to be collared, choked, beaten and scratched. 100% wants to be the plaything of hubby
>husband can’t bear the thought of laying hands on his wife he knew since middle school
>he’s the one who ends up needing aftercare when the whipping and play-torture is all said and done
>even still. Hubby’s undying love for a “pathetic pet” like her only works her up even more
>there’s a reason why they have 5 kids with another on the way

>Be anon, 16 years old
>Parents are on vacationt o Europe, and left me to spend the summer with my grandparents in Smalltown USA
>Check out the local fleamarket because there's nothing else to do in town
>Plenty of people selling their old junk and knick-knacks
>End up buying a strange amulet with a canine motif from an old Arab-looking woman
>Take it back to my grandparent's house to study it
>Put it around my neck
>Suddenly there's a blinding flash of light
>As the light fades, I suddenly see what looks like an anthropormorpic Anubian Jackal standing over me, carrying a curved sword
"My name is Queen Zalika and I am now freed from my eternal prison. As a reward for freeing me, you will be my first sacrifice in my return to rule"
>Just before she can strike me, she is suddenly thrown back against the wall by an unknown force
"No, the curse, it's not broken! The gods have betrayed me!"
"What curse."
"The curse that forbids me from attacking the bearer of the amulet! The curse that forces me to obey the wearer's every com-"
>She quickly tries to cover her mouth to prevent her from speaking too much, but I've heard enough.
>I get up from the ground and walk over to her
>She's cowering in terror as I start to smirk
>Maybe this summer won't be as bad as I thought

>Anthro and her girlfriend are hanging out the pool
>Suddenly, they spot a human!
>Men are super duper rare, it's important to make a good impression in case you ever want kids
>or if you want to be a part of the luxury experience that are human harems
>Ashley, the more cautious of the two, hangs back, trying to think of a good, non-committal greeting
>Amber, her wife, walks up and takes a picture
>*Click*
>The photo prints
>Amber squints at it
>"..Hey, Ashley, come look! It's a human! A real human!"

>constantly pregnant
>never meets her children since they are separated from her and sold as soon as they are born
>the milk that was for them is bottled, sold and consumed by humans
>sometimes even in front of her
>when her womb dries up, she is simply discarded
Try to name something more collared, I'll go breed my cows in the meantime

Always had a nice little fantasy along these lines.
>On a quest to obtain the ultimate thing of power.
>You, and a mix of deranged evil bastards who want to own the universe and some sanctimonious paladins who want to "save" it.
>Your gorgeous guide, see pic, is an eldritch female horror from beyond space and time...
>Various stupid adventures. Your guide plys everyone to engage in conversation about high concepts of power and evil and eschatology. You limit your talk to goofy everyday things, like what does she like to eat? And does she preen herself?
>One thing leads to another. Finally, you frankly admit you really don't want the ultimate thing or all of that. You'd rather just take her home and snuggle her, etc.
>Face the final guardian. Supposedly everyone has to convince the guardian they are the best to own the ultimate thing to proceed.
>Actually, as it turns out, she is the ultimate thing. It's her choice.
>She doesn't want to be a power source or weapons system or nightmare tool. She just wants to be somebody's pet.
>Guess who she chooses.

>how to take over a school:
>Arrange a "random" encounter with the principal, usually an elderly frigid lady
>earn her trust and then lust
>suggest you could help her with her work
>fuck the staff
>then fuck the students
>then the mothers of said students
>presto, you have now control over a school

>Worgen and Vulpera: "You can't adopt us! We're not pets!"
>Human: adopts them anyway
>Worgen and Vulpera: (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1670/04/1670045158245.webm)

>wolf paw, symbolizing the strength of the tribe
>placed upon the belly of their strongest warrior before her duel as a show of unity and power
>it was a mark placed upon the female that she wasn't just one of their own but that she essentially represented their entire tribe
>a promise that she would return victorious and breed with her kind after her victory to birth more strong daughters
>until she lost
>she returned months later, heavily pregnant
>she had not laid with any male
>none but the human who stood behind her
>a human baby growing in a womb marked with the power of their tribe
>the ultimate humiliation
>they scowled and growled but none dared to challenge him, not when he had conquered their strongest
>he had defiled her womb with his seed and would do the same to all others
>thus began the ceremony
>the chieftainess, her mother, wet a cloth and began to rub the sacred mark above her womb until it was gone
>surrendering not just her daughter but the entire tribe
>other young girls took the hand of the human and applied the blue paint to it, replacing the paw with his own print
>though the growing child was enough evidence, the human proceeded to officially claim with his new wife
>her tribe witnessed the submission of their people with a heavy blush as their strong, wild princess mewled and cooed like a girl under her new human husband
>she screamed and moaned as the human ravaged her, letting the stars and her ancestors hear her cries of pleasure and submission
>the flood of the human's thick, viscous seed splattered against the entrance to her occupied womb
>it leaked out of her tired, gaping pussy for all to see, confirmation that they had lost
>but in their defeat came wonder and excitement as all the females from young girls barely in their puberty to experienced mothers who had birthed many children
>all stared and drooled at the sight of the human's swinging cock, excited to eventually be destroyed by it

It’s a privilege for a furboi to have their wife impregnated by a human

>local alien catgirl steals buff scientist's shrimp
>later found pregnant

I know traditional and proven doctrine says to cage your furbois so they aren't tempted to use it
I think that's too easy
Furbois should be forced to overcome their base animalistic needs without any training wheels
When plowing furbois or breeding their wives in front of them, they should have to make a conscious effort not to touch themselves, even if it's throbbing and leaking so maddeningly within reach
No decreased desire or sensitivity, but rewriting their own brains through sheer force of submissive will
This of course also works for females in a similar way, depending on their role
The real collar should be in your anthros' minds
All else is cosmetic

You know, I've just realized that protogens have the potential to be peak human'd. Other anthros are objectified because they're animalistic, but protogens are *literally* part-object

>be senior programmer for random company
>show up to the office
>only human worker in the building, the protogens doing the hosting are mostly self-sufficient
>they're nude, obviously, to prevent overheating
>other companies invest in skintight watercooling suits, but your company isn't super high-end like that.
>Most of the stuff here is from the 80's
>You spend most of the day on your own Protogen, browsing the internet, occasionally watching porn
>One of the Data hostesses timidly comes up to you to report an error
>It's an easy fix
>Still, she's already here, so..
>Threesome with your sleek personal PC and milfy Data hostess
>They're both bluescreened by the end of it

>presidential debate
>topic of anthro education is brought up
>democrat nominee argues that anthros can be taught more efficiently at government-funded facilities by the more experienced female anthros
>republican nominee retorts, saying that a hands-on homeschool approach costs less in taxes and prevents anthros from being taught to be bratty

>What would the best symbols for human supremacy be?
Human hand print or a collar (duh) is usually the accepted symbol for branding anthros individually.
Now, if we're talking about a general human supremacist symbol that would be used politically in a /collared/ setting, then the sun cross would be a good starting point in designing one, I think. Perhaps even a globus cruciger, if we really want to play up the divine mandate meme.
Ultimately, it depends on the setting. A NROL-39 variant would go insanely hard for a modern-day or sci-fi /collared/ world.
It's late here and I just downed a can of Monster so maybe I'll make a few of them.

You just got on as a counselor at this anthro prison. there are plenty of bad girls to "rehabilitate."

Just about an ideal fantasy although I envision it as more of being the prison warden.
>Some über AI is responsible for the place but the whole setup is stupid and it can't be bothered.
>You're hired. The AI will help you along here an there but you are going in blind.
>Everyone's miserable. Primary self reported problems for you to attend to are sexual harassment and rape.
>The general population are dumb as hell, with mostly sweet dispositions. They can be drama queens though.
>Two prisoner trustees act as guards. They bully and lord it over the general population and are easily exasperated by their stupidity. However, these two are also sincerely committed to keeping everyone safe.
>Everyone's convinced they are completely evil and deserve to be there. You can't change their minds.
>The job's mostly about keeping everyone uselessly busy and punishing infractions.
>Prisoners get a ludicrously gentle entirely symbolic spanking, which they freak out about anyway because drama.
>Whereas the guards are in need of harsh measures and are kinky in that direction. So, they won't be sitting down any time soon after "refresher" training with a tawse.
>You: "OK. I know lezzing around is an automatic punishment but it's all clearly consensual. What about the whole rape thing?"
>AI: "They mean the lack thereof, anon. They're in heat and are demanding you deal with it. I suggest surprise shower inspection full cavity searches for starters."
>You: "Oh."

Where does this thread stand on mind alteration, like hypnosis or possession or corrective brain surgery?

I kinda want to write a proper reply to >>67089352 because I didn't in last thread and I'm sure anon's still around.
The stuff you listed all kinda revolves around kinks and concepts I'm into and I'm sure this all kinds of mind control is a perfect fit for a Sci-Fi /collared/ setting. Basically reducing anthros to objects that, by their owner's wish, can be subjects of, as you putt it, mind alteration, hypnosis, corrective brain surgery, plus all kinds of brainwashing machines and visors, chips and implants, personality alteration/replacement/deletion and many other science-backed nightmares, is very, very /collared/-core.
The deal is, I've found, while hot... it doesn't really work in a story. Except maybe super short ones. Any kind of instant change like that murders progression, going against building up any suspense and eroticism. At most you're left one hot brainwashing scene and then it's all gonna be mid, because if the subject is already "done" there's not much to do left - possibly tie up loose ends by having the character betray someone else in the story or whatever.
I think this kind of content works better if it's made clear a dystopian future setting has such options available, but the story itself doesn't focus on it and settles for gradual approach instead. It can work as extra motivation for the anthro - for example, a captured spy or assassin might consider it almost lucky that after a botched mission they only ended up with a human they now answer to and a chip that prohibits attacking him, instead of getting a complete brain wipe or a consciousness upload to a synthetic sex droid. The story using those means in limited (background characters?) or escalating manner is also fine, but an instant fall makes things just so boring, unimaginative and uninteresting.
My two cents. tl;dr: hot but trap that kills story pacing. Also, hypnotic visors are the shit. Use them instead of dumb swirly eyes.

If we're talking about a serious sci-fi narrative, I'd agree that - generally - it works best as a background/lore element. I do also think you can get a decent story out of it, though. Having one character (your protagonist, most likely) paired with a lobotomized yes-man could lead to some interesting introspective moments, at least. You could treat their interactions as a sort of fucked up "safe space" for that character amidst all the conflict that's happening in the story - weave their interactions into his character arc or whatever. Hell, you could write a decent erotic drama /collared/ short with the basic outline of:
>anon chases/manipulates/kidnaps an anthro girl with the goal of brainwashing her
>sucessfully does so over time
>fulfills /collared/ fantasy time and time again (the "meat" of the erotic content - pun intended)
>gets bored and has an existential crisis because of how "easy" it is
>downward spiral into further depravity (ero content x2)
>????
>profit!
Unironically try shoving Requiem for a Dream, Crash, Cyperpunk 2077 and /collared/ into a blender and see what happens

I've said this before a good while ago, but PERSONALLY I think that hypnosis, mindbreak, etc. are all cheating. I mean it's fine if you like it and all, but to me it feels like you should just have a consensual relationship at that point. The resentment and struggle and fear and seething, impotent hatred are part of the experience and wiping that all out with a good girl pill or some equivalent is just silly.
Like wow okay you've got a mindless drone that doesn't really experience anything anymore, cool. Buy a blowup doll instead and you'll get exactly the same experience. The experience of the sub/victim/slave is an important part of the power dynamics of any given scenario and just dronifying them ruins it. Even throwing it in at the end of a story is kinda dumb in the same way that it would be dumb if Moonraker ended with a plain text card that said something like "james died of an aortic dissection 11 minutes after he boned the hot astronaut lady ok thanks for watching bye :)." Because it basically ends that character's future forever and reveals the entire progression of the story up to that point to be a mere contrivance.
But that's just my correct opinion, you're of course entitled to your own. I don't think I'll ever understand that family of fetishes though.

>Human forces would automatically trounce any anthro state
Not without getting absolutely fucked early on and through out most of the war. Does anyone really ever think about the advantages anthros would have over humans? They have a fuckton more strengths, the only thing we might have over them is endurance because we sweat.

Anthros have claws, horns, and even superior muscle and short-term speed in some instances. Though, this is at the cost of *slightly* smaller brains. They're basically slaves to instinct.
Prey animals can't shoot guns because the loud sound makes them drop the gun and run away. Pack animals are submissive if they're convinced that a human would be a better leader. Solo predators like bears are brave (dumb) enough to run straight at a human, just to get tased/shot/tranq'd
Humans, on the other hand, are aware that they lack horns, or claws, or sharp teeth. So, they compensate and overcompensate, making spears, swords, and guns. You'll never see a feline with a gun, because she's too busy bragging about the natural strength and sharpness of her claws, right before a human assault gets her entire squad captured

I've always saw them as a human+ kind of deal. Being much more rational and human than animal. That's probably from my own biases to be honest, since some of the settings I imagine them to be from are along the lines of science going a little bit too far / some super soldier experiment gone cockeyed creating something more dangerous and either on par with the intelligence of or somewhat surpassing that of a human when it comes to hunting instincts.

I think it's a common worldbuilding "mistake" to assume that Humans+ is the default for any setting that has anthros in it. For example: "animals are stronger than humans." That's too much of an absolute. Twitch muscle fibers are greatly exaggerated, and a point can be made that slow fibers would allow more precise, heavier lifting. I would also say the average man is physically stronger than most mammals. What about eyesight? Humans have remarkable eyesight compared to most animals. Hell, don't even get me started on our intelligence.
Anthros are only Humans+ if the setting deems them to be. Yes, if you take a wolf, make it HUMAN, and then tack on positive wolf-like traits, then you've got a generic Humans+ anthro, but I think there's something to be said about designing anthros that better retain some of their original characteristics and emphasizing traits in humans at the same time. For example, one could go down the Zootopia path, where humans would be bigger than most typical OC-tier anthros (foxes, wolves, dogs, cats, etc.) simply because we're usually bigger than those animals IRL. Maybe in a shared, evolved world, our main traits are exaggerated further, and we're still known for living much longer than most animals, dexterity, and intelligence; essentially making us an elf-like species compared to other anthros. Anthros can basically be anything you want them to be. They don't *need* to be "humans but with claws" as they're sometimes depicted by default.
Also, I'm actually surprised our dexterity isn't played up more in stories. I'm vaguely imagining a setting where humans are prized as mercenaries thanks to their excellent weapon mastery and siege engineering. Heck, back to the "elf" comparison, we'd probably be THE marksman species. Wolves have claws. Cheetahs have speed. Grug throw rock.

>You decided to take Janna, your python gf, to couples counseling
>Dr Geddi, a female mongoose ironically enough
>According to her previous clients, she was a very popular one
>Always guaranteeing the couple to change their ways for the better
>Janna wasn't happy that you had booked an appointment
>Said it was a waste of time and wanted to do something else for herself
>Which is exactly why you did
>Your relationship with her had a great start
>Had, because over time she was starting to become more forceful and demanding of you
>Taking a cut of your salary money without your notice and spending luxurious items for herself
>Refusing to do simple chores for the house you bought for yourselves
>It got to the point you confronted her about it but she essentially strongarms you into being quiet
>You felt like you were just a and you wondered where the girl you fell in love with went
>Maybe something happened that you weren't aware of and it got out of hand
>So you decided a session with a counselor could work
>But she was just as uncooperative
>Trying to paint you two as the ideal couple obviously didn't convince the counselor
>Even subtly threatened you at times when you were about to spill some unsavory acts she made against you
>It was all a waste and you two left with her broad arm wrapped around your neck
>Looking back, Dr. Geddi shot you an assuring smile that comforted you
>A night of rough lovemaking was punishment for wasting her day
>But that changed when you woke up the next morning with your chained to the bed
>You looked around and you were in some sort of cell
>The white walls and floors were sterile and felt cold
>There were glass windows, but they were so high up you couldn't reach them
>The door was at the opposite side of the room, but trying to walk had you pulled back by the handcuffs
>The bed seemed bolted on to the floor which made pulling it impossible
>You were panicking
>Where the hell where you?
>Shouting yielded nothing but a soar throat
>The only thing you could do was lie in bed to save your strength
>After what felt like an hour had passed, the door opened revealing Dr Geddi sporting a casual attire
>She had her hands together and asked you if you were ok? Like you aren't just a prisoner in her lair
>You immediately shouted questions and accusations at her. Where are you? What did you do to me? Why did you do this?
>She seemed to keep her cool and answered each question you had
>In short, she kidnapped you as part of the session you booked in order to mend your relationship with Janna
>You questioned on the absurdity of the situation and her plan
>This goes way beyond couples talking to each other about their feelings
>She seemed to understand where you were coming from, but she still kept her warm smile
>"I can assure you Mr. Anon, after all this, you and Janna will be able to see eye to eye and she'll value you as a person, perhaps even more."
>The way she said it meant she was genuine
>You didn't know how this could lead to that conclusion and you don't want to find out what that meant
>Your conversation was interrupted when you heard your own stomach rumbling
>You wondered how long you were in here
>But Dr. Geddi came prepared and brought in a cart full of food
>"I thought you might be hungry so I prepared you lunch for today."
>It was already midday?
>She slid the cart towards you, out of arms reach
>You were hesitant on trying any of the food, thinking what else she did
>She seemed to have read your mind and picked off a a piece of ham and took a bite out of it
>Seeing that it was safe, you ate your fill
>You were surprised to see that it was delicious
>You absentmindedly asked if she cooked all of this
>"Of course."
>She seemed pleased at your satisfaction
>You temporarily forgot that this was the anthro who kidnapped you
>After finishing your meal, she cleaned up the plates and exited the room
>A few secondslater, you realized you could've hid some of the food as lubricant to let your hand slip off the cuffs
>After cursing yourself with that blunder, Dr Geddi returned a few minutes later carrying a large box
>She puts it on the floor and opens it up for you
>It was a small CRT tv, alongside an assortment of snacks
>"I thought this would be enough to make your stay here a bit comfortable no?"
>Her joke didn't sit well with you and she tried to slide off the awkward atmosphere
>She tossed something at you and you failed to catch it
>It landed on your lap and you see it was a remote
>You asked her why she was doing this while she was fiddling with the cords of the tv
>"I know it is a bit jarring Mr. Anon, but trust me when I say I will guarantee that your relationship with Ms. Janna will be fixed after all this is over."
>You ponder on what she said as she lets out an 'Aha' and the screen comes to life
>The mongoose stands up, dusting off her hands and makes her way to the door
>"Well, that's all you need for now Mr. Anon. I'll be around to periodically check on you should you need anything."
>You were about to say something but you chose not to
>You were confused on this whole setup
>Why is she so cordial to you, despite the fact she literally kidnapped you
>You'd have a mind to throw this remote on her head to knock her out and make a mad decision to squeeze your arm painfully out of the handcuffs
>But so far she answered all your questions and with sincere intent
>She didn't even threaten you once
>All this to help you and Janna?
>As the door to your cell closed, you decided to kill some time watching whatever is on tv
>So far this feels like you were a kid being grounded

>Rows of imprisoned Lepi bound and overstimulated beyond their limits
>Screaming, moaning, sobbing
>The naturally cheap yet sensitive creatures, in emotions, are ideal for extracting midochlorian microorganisms as they thrive within proximity to the emotional spectrum
>The more livid, the more fruitful
>One machine is stopped, an error message, likely caused by overuse
>The pod is pulled out of the shelf, the prisoner possessing a glazed glare surrounded by matted face fur.
>The bitch stunk like corpse and looked like one after the constant stress, hunger, and dehydration
>The only sign of life was the desperate deep breaths of reprisal she got from the consistent bombardment.
>It took a few seconds too long to notice that it was out of the pod, you typing away at the screen in the chilly hallway
>Leashed and chained panic rocked the machine as the furry freak realized its only chance at freedom was within reach, just beyond the folded titanium braces
>Fuckin' animals
>A swift stomp to the ribs had it kneeling over and settled into considerably more manageable contortions of pain
>Was a rib or something broken? Jeez, they really are cheap creatures.
>One simple reboot later the machine was primed and ready to continue the streak
>One quick glance at the bitch showed desperate, dilated, fearful eyes and incoming hyperventilation
>I'm response, you roll your eyes, flipped the switch, and made sure to slightly increase the clitoral voltage before rolling the machine back into place, leaving the thrashing animal to its pathetic existence
>1 down, a shitton more to go

>Your current tiger boytoy/pet was once a manly delinquent before getting 'corrected' by a human he met, and became obsessed with becoming cute to humans and desireable to their men.
>Eventually intoduces you to his old rival, who he started 'reeducating' to make him into your new loyal pet.
>Whoever you told that the two needy and delicte-looking anthros clinging to your arms had once been dangerous gang leaders would call you mad.

>Game mods we'd like to see.
>XCom Doctor: "Our current approach, while effective, leaves us with only a corpse. We are subcontracting out to certain expert professionals with a radical new interrogation technique for the captured viper. We expect her to survive the process and so further our research."
>Cut scene with hunky types in leather gear and a rather confused viper chained to a dungeon wall under a sign. Sign: "Welcome to Kinky Swingers S&M Club!"
>Fade to black with a saxxy sultry tune.
>Next mission: Base Defense.
>Player wins the defense mission, but with a cut-scene: "They were able to access our database. It seems they stole the viper interrogation tapes!"
>"Alert to all XCom personnel. Due to a breach in data security we must now exercise extreme caution when engaging vipers. Expect fanatical extreme violence from any encountered. Do not attempt to capture. Kill on sight."
>Next recover item mission: Scout around, scout around, scout ACK! VIPER AMBUSH!
>They pull and bind the whole squad in one turn. It's a trap!
>Cut scene of vipers confronting the squad with ... tears in their eyes?
>Say the vipers, "THERE IS NO BOMB! WE ARE THE ITEM YOU ARE LOOKING FOR! WE SURRENDER! TAKE US WITH YOU!"
Call it the "Fanatical Aliens, and Similar Shenanigans" mod?

Speaking of degrading, some sick form of minimal preparation food items, with appropriate infomercials...
>Does this happen to you with your anthro cart pulling team?
>In a hurry and too busy easing their understanding of their absolute obligation to maintain pace?
>No time to stop for a snack?
>Try out fruit cobbler ball!
>Just remove and discard package and insert ball into the body orifice of your choosing.
>Allow ball to warm and soften for 15 minutes.
>Now scoop from the orifice with your tongue and enjoy!
>*To keep the team moving while consuming may require cart modifications to allow easy oral access to all team orifices. Suitable mods sold separately.

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1721/00/1721002657879.jpg)
Please pardon the feral fox pic. Just wanted a clear illustration of one potential problem in need of a product solution. That is to say, certain aspects of a feral ought to carry over to an anthro, after all.
Standard BDSM equipment abounds. However, given the body morphology of anthros, a few more specialized forms of bondage gear might be popular. Especially among masters who wish to experience that wild morphology with a reluctant or non-consensual anthro, while minimizing the danger. What products exactly? A posture collar preventing radical head movement. A muzzle bit set set on the rear of the jaw, keeping the rear from closing and forcing the front of the jaw to remain somewhat more open. Add to the bit design an easy access snap expander that forces the jaw wide open.
Run the commercial!
>Are you the proud owner of a certain blue vixen?
>Does your cock crave something new to do?
>Let's play the pencil sharpener game!
>How long can you last?
>Her moist nose tapping and whiskers brushing your lower stomach might not do it.
>Her grainy tongue squirming under your length might not do it.
>Maybe her fang-like canines scraping along your shaft?
>And ... glans?
>*Waiver and release form required before sale. Thorough attention to operation of, and practice with the snap expander required before each use. Manufacturer not responsible for puncture wounds.

>anthro cities often fall into outright civil war as the anthro isn't meant to live in absolute peace and stability
>some city governments secretly fund human groups to "riot" in their streets
>burn a few cars
>loot some stores
>fight the Anthro City PD
>capture an unlucky officer and rape her in front of everybody, don't let her go until the sperm of at least three dozen humans are sloshing around in her womb
>finally once the riot is done go home with a middle class anthro MILF and daughter in the back of your van
>anthros unify and pacify as they rebuild with all of them accepting of the semi-annual unrest as something as natural as a hurricane or flood
>there haven't been any deaths, but there have been plenty of anthros who have never been seen again (in person, they tend to show up online married to human husbands or in amateur porn)

Been playing a fair bit of Skyrim lately, so here's my experience. Retelling may be slightly embellished.
>"Hey, you, you're finally awake."
>Already tied up and bound
>Khajit. Female. Just traditional
>Settings are adept difficulty with survival mode on
>Dragon attacks, only make it out with the help of a male, human imperial
>Every battle is tough, because I decide to specialize in a sneak/one-handed build instead of a sneaky archer. Because sneaky archer is for pussies
>MFW survival mode makes sneaking near impossible
>Gang-rape by bandits/draugr ensue
>Several days later, the Dragonborn limps into Whiterun, likely pregnant with some lowlife's kid, and delivers the news of dragons to the Jarl
>Sent into battle, where I'm carried by the human guards because I'm too weak to carry a bow *and* a dagger. Figure out I'm the Dragonborn!
>I'm named Thane of Whiterun after a night of apologizing to the guards for my incompetence at fighting. Ignore Lydia because she's rude when I ask her to carry a bow for me.
>Despite Dragonborn status, still get no respect. All the Travelers think I'm some skooma-addicted prostitute
>They constantly pester me, stopping me on roads to ask about "Price of services" even though I'm an actual once-in-a-lifetime demigod
>Bandits know who I am at this point. Don't care and attack me anyway. If I'm not captured, I'm sent running away
>In the event that I'm cornered, the best thing I can do is drop my dagger and spend all my willpower healing myself quicker than they can hurt me
>They realize that even if they can't kill me, they can still strip me of my coin and clothes
>Find out in a dungeon that my claws deal more damage than the dagger I had been using
>Decide that it's best to wander around, completely unarmed.
>Dragonborn Troubles Pt2
>Fun fact! The brave and powerful Dragonborn's name is Juniper
>It was a dark and stormy night, and the Dragonborn enters the Ragged Flagon under Riften. Home of the Thieves Guild
>She's out of her depth, surrounded by Nord vagabonds twice her height
>They've heard tales of her incompetence, but they need all the help they can get at the moment. It's a rough time to be a thief. She's hired.
>All she has to do is burn down some Beekeeper's hives at Goldenglow Estate
>The Dragonborn, desperate for coin, accepts
>A half hour later, the mighty Dragonborn, soaked in mud and freshwater, emerges onto the riverbank of the Estate
>Looking up, she sees three armed mercenaries looking down at her, and her armor. Her Thieves-guild Armor.
>A short clash ensues between sword and claw
>A few minutes later, the Dragonborn's new armor is spotted by local fishermen. Torn to shreds, floating down the river
>Meanwhile, the Khajit thief is in the keep. Gagged with whatever scraps of Thieves Guild armor they didn't throw away, arms tied behind her back.
>After all, magic is impossible with a shut mouth and bound hands.
>The mercenaries are, naturally, proud of their catch. Most of them descend from fishermen.
>Aringoth, their boss, permitted them to deal with the intruder however they pleased, expecting them to simply kill her.
>Instead, they oggle their prize, grabbing and squeezing at her hips, thighs, and ass
>They laugh at her muffled moans and shouts, her gift of the Voice nullified by her underwear, which are now stuffed in her mouth
>The newest of the mercenaries downs a bottle of Black Briar mead, and drunkenly slips the bottle into the Dragonborn's cunt, much to her dismay
>The Chieftan wipes a bit of blood from his cheek. He was the first that Juniper had attacked, and he was the one to pin her down.
>He approaches the Khajit and takes a quick swipe at her ass, her muffled moan briefly overpowering the noise of the men's laughter

A group of lounging youths in the infamous species mixed town of saddleback can be found gathered around in the basement floor of a human’s home where macaw, wolf, scallie, panthress and rabbit all hang out frit away their weekend hours in the basement currently serving as a kind of home base for their friend group in the otherwise hostile neighborhood. It is not some dingy pit of concrete and exposed wires, it is a furnished place and well kept as could ever be asked of for any place regularly housing anthros unattended. Jessica, a human woman is currently being straddled by the wolf Brad with his red rocket out and rutting the girl in a barely protested rape that was shamelessly stinking up the place with sweat secretions and canine spunk staining the human girl’s olive skin white. Everyone but the petite domestic slave rabbit named Crystal is impartially ignoring it and killing time by watching tv.
This gathering downstairs is an escape from the sweltering of a summer’s heat with a sprawling sofa nestled in the far wall, a modest gym off to the side & a projector-screen providing the television for the motley gaggle of mixed species teens.
Some of the anthro teens adopt the wearing of clothes while others are laissez about the custom like Brad being shirtless even while not raw fucking the human and Lana flat out refuses the custom of clothing on principle letting her perfect feline body hang nude in the open at all times. She’s a wild anthro, a real one, doesn’t even legally exist, she’d the kind of anthro who’s even avoided getting tagged, a minor miracle for a girl who lives in suburbia.
“Get off her brad, She’s not yours for fuck’s sake Joshua is going to absolutely kill you and put your head on a wall for fucking his girl!”
Brad presses the bunny away with an overpowering hand bowling the snow white bunny over. “Almost there-!!!-” Brad’s doggystyle rut with the gagged girl freezes up and his emission spurts out knotting
the teen still wailing in her gag. “Oooohhyeah…” the wolf exhales basking in his aftermath. “Up yours josh, I fucked your human” *pant*, *pant*…I’m such a bad dog.” The wolf mumbles to himself with the biggest grin on his face.
The Lizard boy, Kyle, calls back from the couch.
“Good shit Brad but your a real dumbass to think you won’t get shitcanned from the masters of the house, Josh probably won’t be able to keep them from booting you from custodianship this time. Jessie isn’t some two bit bunnybitch for baby’s first fuck, no offence Crystal-”Crystal blushes and lets the insult slide off like water on a duck. “Oh i know, brad’s just being a rocks for brain again. she’s probably worth more than all of us combined.”
The trussed up human woman roars in her bonds and wriggles about trying and failing to pull away from the wolf’s knot.
“Spirited little thing isn’t she.” chimes the onyx black panthress in the room. Lana. “What is it 3 years? 4?, she has been teasing Brad about him not be allowed to fuck her? This was always going to happen. Even a domesticated dog will lash out if you torture it enough.”
“Months, not years lana” chimes the rabbit. “Years are the long ones, you know the type that you count by seasons.”
“Whatever bunnylunch.” Lana snides then licks her chops menacing the poor bunny. “I still hold that you domesticated types are weird for tracking time like that either way.” Lana says to dismiss that line of conversation out of the bunny. She was the only truly ‘wild’ anthro among them coming and going from the property as she pleases unlike the rest who were either full on slave-pets of their human friend Josh in the cases of the rabbit or were some measure of ‘free’ insofar as that label applied to many anthro families dependants living in contact with a human custodian to keep them in line in the cases of Brad’s pack being under patronage of the Stewarts family.
Kyle by contrast was a loner and was a truly free man…The lounging lizard was fine with his arrangement of mooching off Joshua’s little gaggle of anthro friends while it lasted, he was genuinely independent, had a job and a sweet chameleon girl from school with her first clutch eggs on the way. For brad though his dependency was a sore spot for the prideful pack animal that his pack were legally considered soft dependants that had attached at the hips to some middle income nuclear family unit of humans a third their size who kept them on a tight metaphorical leash in exchange for acclimating the once wild pack into a civil existence that doesn't involve pumping a woman and fucking her senseless out of nowhere.
It was a task which brad’s friend/custodian/partial owner Joshua was doing poorly at today seeing as Brad was being a very bad dog by laying atop the new conquest he’d specifically been told not to put his dribbling wolf pecker inside of.
Such troubles were future Brad’s to worry about though as current Brad was content to be mellowed out in his human conquest post coitus.
“Oh yeah, yeah soooo fucking worth it.” he’s mumbling to no one in particular.
“ru Aar mho mhuckedth mwhn ey ght ooht ooh mhere mhog” (You are so fucked when i get out of here dog!)
Lana can’t resist the opportunity to nettle brad as well,
“Moron wolf, you what’s next on your supurb plan to sneak-fuck your master’s mate? trophy? You’re. Knotted. Idiot.”
Brad whips his full body back in a snarl but being attached at the crotch to the human he fumbles and whines from the motion hurting his dick before shrinking back a bit and shouting back at the wild feline.
“He doesn’t fucking own me, The greypelt’re a strong pack and we can turn down the assistance at any fucking time.”
“They Totes own you. Kyle chimes in. “Their great great grandfather shot yours up and put his head on the wall when you guys tried attacking the stewarts on the farm a bazillion years ago and you’ve had to suck human dick for debt amnesty and table scraps ever since. You wolves whine and bitch about getting one up on their family but you never try because you know they’re better than you. Simple as.”
Lana smirks to herself, assured in her own supremacy over the stupid dog as well. “You bunch really are all domesticated pets. At least the rabbit is honest about it in comparison.”
“Oh shut the fuck up mrs all high and wild, you’re *not* any better then me.” brad shouts back.
The black cat doesn’t reply, she doesn’t see the need to refute such flimsy emotional outburst as his.
“Wrestling’s back on!” shouts crystal, defusing the situation. The peace in this friend group was a delicate thing while their human glue wasn’t there to mediate. Just then Joshua comes hobbling downstairs with a cooler of beers smuggled from the fridge and tosses one off to Kyle.
“What the fuck! Brad really did do it! You actually fucked ‘my’ girl while i was gone for 10 minutes! Why didn’t anyone of you stop him!” The social glue that held this adolescent clique together was nothing if not a very relationally busy person.
“Itoldhimnottodoitbutbradwasn’tgoingtotakenoforananswerandsaidthatsincethebirdwasgaggedshecouldn’tsaynoandthenisaidthatsnotwahttheymeanandthatyou’llbeintroubleanywa-” Josh winces at the prattle and waves her off with multiple blood vessels still buldging. Josh lunges at Brad and starts laying into the back of the wolf’s head until the guy cries uncle. “Stop! You’re in charge!” he begs in a vapid, empty manner. Josh hits him one more time for good measure and turns to snatch a rag, scooping a handful of ice cubes wrapped in wet cloth to deflate brad’s knot with which he applies to the knot of
the furry brute. Josh talks with the equally livid Jessica still muffled by the gag. “It’s fine, we have the aftermorning pills and dad doesn’t have to know this happened” Jessie looks absofuckenlutely done with everything about brad as his smarmy face says it all that jumping and raping her was entirely worth it to fuck the gf of his onesided rival. Josh unlatches the gag and hugs her. If stares could kill that wolf would already be a damn rug. ”Use the iced rag to get his..his dick settled.” she takes the rag and squeezes, hard. Brad winces at the cold cloth is held and crushed around his willy. “Hold it there until you slip out.” Josh is still struggling to not slap Brad across the face for this one but his attentions still on his girl. The teen girl curls up and cries. “I’g going to be calling the cops on him, i don’t care if he’s your friend & he can’t control himself. anthros like that deserve to die out in the wilderness not be patronized!”
Josh reassures her that he’ll make it up to her and that Brad will get a comeuppance…somehow and she calms down just a little as she stumble over to the couch and takes a seat, far from brad as possible.
This friend group was a nightmare for the young man to keep trundling along, circumstances permitting it could all fall apart in an afternoon, Maybe Lana would find herself in the mood for rabbit flesh and murder Crystal, Brad was always posturing for a chance to upturn the pecking order and become top dog in the group no matter how many trophy hunting busts of brad’s wild relatives Joshua’s dad kept mounted above the wall upstairs. Kyle…Kyle is chill but doesn’t fucking do anything the lazy bum. It was almost but not quite a normal group. Joshua will be off to University and so this will be the last time many will see one another for a while, as the human’s permission is the only reason any of his friends can crash around here asides from the bunny house slave.
Kyle makes no illusions about his only being here to mooch and that he plans to leave with the hatching of his eggs while Lana says she’ll be retiring from the civilized realms this year to go back to hunting ferals and other wild anthro out in the wilderness as the noose of capture by authorities tightens around her.
There is a melancholy tone among the companions around the couch that this summer will probably be the last chance for the gang to really stay together. Out of some
They all sit at the couch discussing how they are going to spend the next couple of months.
On TV; the WWE blares in the background. speaks up, “We need to do something this summer that we will remember for the rest of our lives.” Joshua playfully replies, “We have spent most of our lives hanging out with each other in various combinations. I don't think we will forget each other.” Everyone stews on past interactions...most okay...many not so much as they privately reminisce over past relationships. On TV; an intense Mixed Tag Team Match rages on. Human girls and beastmen are slamming vicious blows into each other liberally throwing punches and kicks into the other. The intensity causes everyone to focus on the TV. Brad scoffs, “A human could never do that in a real fight!” Jessica’s kneejerk reaction to disagree with the canine kicks in. She pipes up, “Oh really! Tell us more!” Brad does not read her look and says about the live play. “She is half his size.” They do put on a good show though - Wrestling a tiger is like playing to every guy's fantasy!” he says in a matter of fact manner, “cept the actual tigers I suppose.”

>Middle of summer
>out at work doing construction
>lunch break
>fuck it's hot
>Go to get a cold glass of water
>Water cooler broken.
>remember you have a cow slave glaceon with massive lactating tits.
>bring her out and drink straight from her tits
>Fuck her afterwards during the next smoko.

>Human: "Officer? Care for some rape?"
>Dobercop: "No. Why would you even-"
>Human: "I have Scooby snax..."
>Dobercop: "Yes!"

>The dobercop rides them over to a shady park next to a motel.
>Dobercop: "I'm not going to be seen parking in the motel lot. One snax gets you a dry lap-dance and you have to pay for a hotel room."
>Human: "No motel room. No one will see us here."
>Dobercop: "No. I can't be-"
>Human: "Two Scooby Snax?"
>Dobercop: "Hmmf. Well. OK, but we have to be quick and-"
>Human: "And take your shorts off."
>Dobercop: "What? No! First off I'm not wearing any panties, and we're only going to-"
>Human: "Three snax?"
>Dobercop: "*Haff*Huff* ... I ... OK. It's just that-"
>Human: "I'm hungry too. There's this new prepackaged fruit ball cobbler snack I wanna try."
>He holds up the package. She grabs it from him and reads the preparation instructions.
>Dobercop: "...for fifteen minutes ... and scoop it from the anthro orifice with your tongue! Absolutely not! We are not doing that! No!"
>The human holds up some of the legendary Scooby Snax pieces in front of her nose, one between each finger pair and thumb, and one in the palm of his hand.
>Human: "Five Scooby Snax?"
>He snatches it away from a swipe of her tongue.
>Dobercop: "*Whine*whine*whine* ... *haff*haff*huff* ... I ... my ... my zipper's stuck. Help me pull them off!"

>humanity fixes quarian immune system
>still keeps all of them in bitchsuits due to aesthetic preferences

I had a few ideas for a CYOA, but I can't run them since I can't write:
>Anon is the warden for an intergalactic space prison where his word is law
>Anon is the heir to a large anthro plantation, and he needs to rebuild his late father's grape and wine empire
>Anon is a post-apocalyptic leader of a human settlement who recently stumbled upon a pre-apocalyptic weapons and tech cache

>Anon is the warden for an intergalactic space prison where his word is law
Another favorite little fantasy.
>20 or so meek and ineffectual bunny girls prisoners
>2 gruff and tough and anatomically correct spotted hyena girl prisoner guards
>All sorts of inane prison stereotypes, silly rules, and time wasting chores
>Heat cycle management is one of your primary responsibilities
Etc.

Anthro girls rescued from their human kidnapper. But it's too late they have already been mind-broken by BHC.

So what’s your favorite scenario for an anthro girl getting collared? Like, do you prefer the whole “kidnapping/trapping a girl and slowly breaking her in until becomes obedient” or maybe something like “haughty girl is dismissive of humans until she’s given the BHC”? I’ve been trying to think of a good scenario for a story but I can’t really decide on what sort of tone I wanna go for

>Porn-addicted anthro superhero who only goes after human villains and tries her best to get captured by them
>Constantly gets filled with goon and henchman cum
>Once showed up to fight with a dildo in her ass and a ballgag in her mouth (she forgot she had them in)

>"Scans show signs of sapience. But it's woefully primitive. In that case, a personal survey of the surface shouldn't be too dangerous. We've been cooped up on this barge for weeks. It couldn't hurt to stretch our legs a little and get some some real air. And besides, what're the locals going to? Throw rocks at us? *snort*

>get your harem to act out movies because all the ones in theaters suck

>Part 1: she doesn't want a human man
>Part 2: she gets a human man and tries to hide it from her bird friends
>Part 3: she gives in and lets her human man fuck her relentlessly and becomes afraid she'll never satisfy him
>Part 4: she sacrifices her bitchy anthro bird friends to her new human god and his randy friends as punishment for insulting their featherless masters
>Part 5: her and her new sister wives live to serve their hunky human god and his insatiable sexual appetite

>Be me, wasteland bounty hunter
>Just finished turning in another bounty, some lowlife accused of killing his business partners
>Got paid and am now lounging in the town bar looking over any new bounties on the board
>Nothing really catches my eye, mostly small-time rustlers and bandits
>Then I see it
>$50,000 bounty dead or alive for some self-proclaimed hyena warlord making a lot of trouble for the Authority on the edge of their territory
>With $50,000, I would be easily set for life
>Grab my machinegun and helmet and drive off in my car
>It takes a few hours to reach the target's hideout, a rusted out oil tanker abandoned in old dockyard
>Stealthily make my way past the raiders guarding the perimeter, and take out anyone who comes across me with my wrist gauntlets
>Cut a hole through the hull with my blowtorch and sneak inside
>The target is "holding court" in the main hold, harassing some local wastelanders for more food
>As soon as they've left, throw down a few smoke grenades and flashbangs, drop down to floor, and open up with my LMG with my state-of-the-art helmet highlighting targets to my HUD
>Yeen Queen tries running away, I shoot her with a sleep dart
>Look her over, she actually has a pretty nice body
>Tie her up and drag her to my car, putting her in my passenger seat
>When she wakes up half-an-hour later, she starts screaming about how I "better let her out right now" and "do you know who you're messing with"
>Stuff her mouth with some cloth to shut her up
>This does nothing, and she just starts screaming through the gag
>This goes on for a while
>Fuck it
>The bounty said they wanted her dealt with, they don't care what I do with her
>And she's too pretty to kill
>Make a detour over to a local doctor who owes me big time
>Time to make some adjustments to my little captive
>After I get that bounty, maybe I can look into other career choices
A few weeks later...
>Come home from working all day on my wasteland farm
>See my adorable hyena housewife cooking up some delicious radrats on the stove
>The surgery marks on her head are healing up nicely; a few more weeks, and it will be like they never even existed in the first place
>Despite the Authority rep's horror at what I did to the target, they still paid in full, and I was able to purchase a farm with my savings
>I was getting too old for bounty-hunting anyways
>Sit down and chow-down with my wife

>"Alright softskins. We accept your peace treaty. We capitulate and accept our subjugation. We agree to become your wives and servants. As well as we magically changed our bodies to fit your perverted mammal taste. Is it all?"

>Your wife was initially skeptical of the "pet play" thing.
>She's a fox, not a dog. Maybe this would be fitting if she was a wolf or even a cat, she said, but a fox? C'mon.
>Once the collar was around her neck, her complaints quieted.
>Then you snapped your fingers like an owner commanding an animal, and she fell right to her knees. Already, she's dripping on the covers.
>You knew she would enjoy it.

Irresistible temptation for her. Just taking a jog through the rabbit neighborhood for him.

Humans are too much they can't keep those long fat dicks in their pants

>rebellious shithead anthro
>tomboy, but the bad kind
>pseudo lesbian dyke who don't need no man, much less a human
>one dicking later she's a floofy, loving wife
>old picture, she says
>it's not even from last year

What movie will she be watching?

The House on Human Hill.
>poster - side view of a human actor laying in a shallow coffin, pants tented. 5 anthro girls stare at the coffin from across the room with varying expressions of distress and interest.
>Rated R, for graphic language, sexual content, violence, and adult themes.
>Record opening weekend numbers. >Mixed critical reviews from human critics. Universal acclaim from anthro girls aged 16 to 35

self proclaimed "Anthro Supremacists" when you ask them what species their son is

>your anthro boss:"I have special job I want you to do. Will send you detail on phone in a moment. Meet me in my office in 5 minutes."

We need more content with humans as paranormal creatures.
>humans as cryptids who kidnap anthro women in the wilderness
>humans as ancient aliens who either created anthros, or played a hand in their early development
>humans as fae/demons/spirits/whatever, mischievous entities who often play pranks on anthro for fun

>watching the news as a report comes in about a female owl being interviewed for suspected murder, covered by an aluminum sheet and visually shaking
>the reporter is a siamese cat, the camerawoman is too but that doesn't matter
>the owl enters on detail about how her friend dissapeared last night while they were out in the woods just to hang out
>begins to go into deep details
>first it was rustling leaves, we tought it was just a feral creature or the wind
>then it got louder, our phones died, then it got quiet, i saw it on the corner of my eye but she saw it too
>it was like the voice of a huming male, but more pristine and beautifull than i ever imagined
>then she just...she began to walk towards him as her leporid legs just gave way, colapsing midway as a...man creature grabed her by the hand
>the owl gulped
>he was skinny and tall, had a perfect set of small, pearly white teeth
>it gazed a second at me and i just stood there frozen
>it was completelly covered in an elegant suit, all i saw besides its long silvery hair was a smooth, furless, scaleless, featherless skin
>like the ghost of a demon, dressed like an angel
>and for the split second i saw my friend...oh god, she was smiling the whole time until they dissapeared again
>i swear by what i said...i didn't...it wasn't me!
>laugh as you turn off the tv, drinking from your glass of red bloodwine
>feel the hands of the buncell you got yesterday wrap around your naked chest, as she leans unto you giggling
>you'll probably go bail her friend out after you're done with welcoming the new bloodwife
>after all, you didn't have an avian in decades...and this immortality doesn't feed itself

You can tell an anthro's worth by the way they are clothed in public
For example being clothed in rags or simply completely naked typically mean they're low status, new acquisitions, or disposable
Whereas if an anthro is covered in gold, jewels, and piercings each one worth more than she is, then she is a prize cow
That batcow has given her owner plenty of worth in offspring, milk, and service that she has earned the right to be decorated as such

>Anthros wearing the fur of other less desirable anthros as a status symbol

>to a human's eyes an anthro wearing a fur coat is but an uncommonly fashionable accessory
>to an anthro it is a show of absolute domination
>usually unseen outside of those of absolute power, a fur coat demands respect, maybe even reverence from all the other girls
>no girl would dare challenge or speak up in her presence, lest she also be made part of the collection of leather and fur
>but the most prized fur coats tend to be the ones made from the pelt of her defeated enemy
>fights between female anthros for a human's hand (and cock) tend to be vicious
>those of lower classes restrain themselves from actually killing their opponent but should one's status be high enough nothing is held back
>piercings, gold teeth, even tattooed patches are taken as prizes from the defeated
>and of course they are made into fur coats
>it is the ultimate insult, for a female to be killed and skinned, to have her fur be dropped onto the bedroom floor, while her worst enemy spreads her legs for the man she died trying to also fuck

>Other anthros look away and hide from your prize cow who smugly struts next to you on the sidewalk.
>She proudly displays her nude body, numerous trophies worn as bracelets, rings, piercings, and necklaces lightly jingle from the breeze and her heavy bouncing breasts.
>She wears a thick fur coat made of a snow leopard, a vicious foe she had defeated by ripping out her throat with her teeth.
>Smirking at the memory, your cow reveals a gold canine, taken from her wolf opponent after it had been dislodged with a savage left haymaker.
>A furboi sees the two of you coming and simply faints out of fear on the sidewalk, your cow not even deigning to voice her disgust as she steps on his head and keeps going.
>Fishing out a tube of lipstick from her deerskin purse, she runs it over her plump and pierced lips, each ring or stud denoting a minor fight won and looted.
>Her dragonscale boot heels click on the sidewalk, made from the dragon's wings and horns in exchange for its life, leaving it a mere lizard, but alive.
>As she opens a door for you, her womb tattoo is in full view, stenciled directly from the skin of a defeated tigress, the rest of the striped fur kept hanging in her closet.
>Cheers come from all sides of the arena as you and your champion cow enter, walking up to the ring with her opponent already inside.
>It's an elephant who looks more unsure of herself the closer your cow gets, who's already deciding what to have made from those tusks as you take the coat off her shoulders.

>"Straight" furbois after one glance at a human causes them to fantasize bottoming and living a life of servitude to them

>dumbass deer
lawl
Meanwhile, in anthro dreamland...
>Doe refugees from some hellhole.
>"Here! Your town needs diversity! THIS IS OUR STRENGTH!"
>Fine. Vote out of existence all social services.
>"Um. Can't we compromise? How about indentured servitude? You can't kill them. You can't maim them. Otherwise, your house, your rules."
>"Maybe. And if any new arrivals break any laws, automatic indentured servitude. Fine?"
>"Fine."
>Despite your hard-nosed negotiations word gets around town. Randy demanding but caring and kind. Thus is your reputation.
>Partners in trespassing. It just keeps happening.
>Just fix the fence? Nah. Win win. 'S good.

Reasons you should consider getting a mareboi:
>Long face perfect for deepthroating
>No gag reflex
>Fat ass built for rough anal
>If he's a workhorse, you can have him in the fields (or lawn) doing maual labor
>Can subsist solely on grass or oats (very cheap)
>The sound his hooves make on hard surfaces is kinda cute

just to add
>cums incredibly fast, even for a furboi
>will be completely soft after ten seconds of milking his prostate if he's still capable of erections and if you haven't caged him yet
>neighs like a broodmare in heat when you hilt in him
>appears frail but can take some punishment
>long mane and tail make him look extra girly and are great for pulling on

>military platoon of human males set on camp
>all day long, only waiting
>higher ups said no leaving at no moment, but its been more than a month by now
>okay-to-terrible MREs and old porn magazines can only get you so far
>only other species in the group is a mareboi, he works as the courier and scout of the group
>those fat tighs make the guys hungry for some action
>and mareboy knows it
>one night sarge had to leave camp in a rush, got told to relax for the meantime as two of us rotated guard duty
>mareboy shows up to the barracks dressed like a woman, hell if it wasn't for the twitching and stiffy horsecock we wouldn't have notticed
>"hey guysss...i know this is not the best but if you don't mind pretending i could be tonight's mare for all of youuuu~"
>solo, two, three, four and even five all at the same time, the horny desires managed to bend the will of the soldiers hard enough that they just had to get a taste of that virgin horsey
>he got hard, came instantly, and stayed about 20 minutes in soft mode, until the next guy came in and continued pounding his ass again
>this went on until 6 am, and they only stopped because they had to clean up after
>this became a ritual each calm night or whenever you had enough spare time, just go "knock on the mare" as they called it
>morale went up, and so did mareboi's libido
>once they could be withdrawn back into civilian life everyone got themselves into horse taming
>mareboi is living a happy life in his own appartment, getting "visits" and gifts from his old friends
>many still go meet him, just to feel as a young marebreeder once more

>If he's a workhorse, you can have him in the fields (or lawn) doing manual labor
There's a centuries old mare-boy saying "Happier is the one who's being plowed by his master than the one who's plowing the fields"
If anyone wants to see how well do the mare-boys follow that saying, I recommend getting a few and putting them to work. As I have some 40 or so due to family business, I know them quite well. I once did a experiment and tested how far would they be willing to go in exchange for being my mare-boy. Over half were willing to be emasculated, whipped daily, starved, beaten and branded in exchange for being a sex toy and not a field horse.
Comes with being caged and feminized since youth I guess.
But anyways, luckily the workers at my farm spotted me and stopped me from messing with the mare-boys too much. The only damage I caused them was drawing a with a hot iron on one horse's stomach.
I still fuck him occasionally, then have him work on his prostate with a cucumber and let him sleep over on a floor for the rest of the day. I might arrange him a mare to impregnate one of these days.

Taking over an alien world and its divine-like rules through the liberal application of cock on those who are unaware of its power until they're too hooked on pleasure and obedience to deny and reject it.

You arrive with nothing and friend to no one, a freak accident of chance, but with the right choices you can climb the steps of the world and make yourself at home in the highest halls of power.
In there, if you play your cards right you will be able to conquer beings whose kindness, beauty and immense power earned them the worship of millions.
Their kindness turned into weakness when they open their doors to you, who will soon enough exploit it to dominate their bodies and minds. Their beauty once pure and untouched now fully yours to enjoy to your hearts content in the most debased of ways.
Their power surrendered to you, made to work for your desires and shape the world as you will.
And they will do it all because they consider you their ally. Their lover. Their friend. And if not, because they are now too weak of strenght or will to resist you.
Resist those curious hands which can expertly scratch and prim their fur and feathers like no other? Which can grab onto their slender horns, and legs and necks and hold them down as if they were nothing? Who can pull on their mane and tails to lock eyes with them and make them see stars?
Resist cocks who are girthy and clean and powerful, and can seemingly fill them up with love endlessly, never tiring, never relenting?
Impossible.

Sooner or later they'll all be unable to resist the feeling deep inside of them telling them it's naturaly to feel this way. Almost as if they'd been born to for it, created for this exact purpose.
Will to be kind to them like they were once kind to you? Will you protect their beauty and happiness, or defile them in the most perverse of ways? Will you use your newfound power over them to care for them and help them grow, or absuse it for your own selfish desires?
Sooner or later they will do it all for you, no matter how arduous of painful. Everything for the being who their bodies, minds and souls tell them to trust and love the most in the world.
Their newfound Master.
Their original Creator.
Their returning God.

>Modern Anthros-Right activists are as delusional and arrogant as always.
>Calls "collaring" a barbaric practice.
>Calls for the dissolution of the institution.
>None of the activists ever cared to ask the general Anthro population about their opinion, let alone those that are pets.
>Thinks that they know everything already and can't tolerate having their bubbles burst and all that.
>Eventually, one activist finally decides to perform an interview, fully expecting the support from their fellow Antrhos.
>Finds a collared pet minding her own business at the local Pet-Park.
>Basically corners her and shoves the smartphone into the face of the poor pet.
>Needs to record everything and all that.
>The pet is bombarded with invasive, and leading, questions.
>"Interview" ends with the question "Why would you ever allow a human to own you?"
>Pet answers truthfully: "I just like being property".
>pet continues to explain the benefits of being a pet.
>No job, no need to worry about politics and the state of world affairs. Her master takes on that burden of responsibility.
>In return she is fed, petted and fucked every day.
>She in turn gives her master comfort and companionship, cleans the house and cooks for him.
>The activist tries to continue the interview, but is chased away by the Pet's Human owner.
>Apparently the Human had given his pet a collar with a hidden panic-button, just in case someone would mess with her.
> The activist learned nothing from the interview, being too deep into their own delusion.

What would you consider to be a good pet for those on a budget?

Rodents.
There small size means that you don't need to give them much food. Plus, they produce a lot of offspring, meaning you can find good quality pets for cheap.

Rabbits. They're small, cute, servile towards their betters, and demanding of their subordinates, meaning that a bunny harem maintains rigidity in hierarchy easily. Herbivores, meaning they're easily fed. Simple bananas are a crack-like treat for them.
Surprisingly cerebral creatures, so they're good conversationalists and very trainable too.
And of course, always horny and great for breeding. And if you're into incest, they grow quickly and have no natural aversion to keeping it in the family, so you can home grow your own harem of daughter wives from a single bunny in just a few years.
Downsides, they're skittish, flighty, and easily injured. You can't use them as guards. If you're an unkind owner they become poor slaves prone to fleeing, locking up, and can even die from fear. And they're too easily harmed for most bdsm no matter how willing they may be.
In short, don't bully the bune and they'll be model slaves.

Plenty of unwanted mutts on Facebook Marketplace that should be available for $200 bucks at most. Perks are loyalty and strength, banes are lack of self-control and anger issues. Not for the faint of heart. Even if they're tamed, expect for them to be needy and whining all the time for BHC.

Have some pride in yourself and do it with your own two hands. Take down a wild..something, ‘urban wild’ even. Most, anthros roaming the woods are ‘not’ dangerous predators, so many birds, so many burrowing rodents, there’s to fucking many species and they’re all built the fucking same. Wrestle em and beat and truss em and carry their bulk back to the road to stuff in the trunk. It build character. Keep a gun just in case you have to kill a cougar girl who comes at you…Maybe you’ll end up with a story to tell under a trophy mount. People people are only an hour away from the wilderness, it’s a shame we’ve rejected the personal touch for a factory line of dogs and cats and ‘exotics’ that are not really exotic because everyone who’s anyone flaunts that they own a tigress. I can’t walk into a damn kennel club and ‘not’ find a damn tigress sitting pretty like a fucking declawed house girl. There’s are probably more lions and tigers and panthers in circulation amount the slave trades by breezes then the ‘less’ rare cats like cougars and minxes because they’re not perceived as rare to begin with. An Anthro is only ‘rare’ if ‘9/10 people’ never even heard of the species before.
Sorry for the little rant and topical sidetrack. Just like…explore your local forest and bring back the first thing you find.

Personally I prefer the idea of an anthro girl whose servile and submissive from the get-go and/or legitimately benefits from being owned by (you). Something like
>be Ragnar, Nordic adventurer traveling all the lands of Nirn
>find myself in Morrowind, hoping to find novel and exotic things to kill
>meet Argonian man, tells me his family was taken by Dunmer slavers and are being held in a dungeon north of town
>go there to kill them and free their captives, because I subscribe to the ideology of "Total Mer Death"
>they put up little fight, actually quite a boring venture
>find a key to the slave pens on the slaver leader
>dozens of Argonians and Khajiit run out of the cages and make their way to the exit, all while thanking me for freeing them
>one of the slaves, a small Khajiit woman, doesn't run off and instead just stands there looking up at me
>she looks malnourished, even more so than the other former slaves
>give her some food from my inventory, she has a look of overwhelming gratitude at the gesture
>she starts following me like a lost puppy (though "lost kitty" might be more appropriate)
>she's as weak as a crippled skeever, but she's very good at hiding when the fighting starts
>she likes to help me by doing things like carrying items, picking locks, finding hidden treasures and other non-combat related tasks
>try to tell her that she doesn't have to be my servant and she can do what she wants now that she's free
>"This one wants nothing more than to serve her new special friend, master"
>guess I'm stuck with her
>my father, Ragnar, always said that having a pet would be a good way to teach me responsibility

>Washed-up anthro celebrity has to turn to making /collared/ content in order to stay afloat

>Worn out old mare getting absolutely slathered in human cum
>She tells everyone she hates it but it pays the bills
>In reality she relishes every second of it
>Every second of getting fucked in the mouth ass and pussy by young virile sweaty human guys is pure bliss
>She loves being and old whore getting used by hunky young human men

>Strong mares out in the field doing hard manual labor
>Marebois in the stables looking pretty for their masters
Really like the reversed sexual dimorphism of furbois being the "fairer" sex

Since ancient times absol have been thought to bring disasters to human settlements even though their intention was to warn people
This misunderstanding gave birth to a superstitious believe that disasters could be averted by punishing the pokemon thoroughly
When ever absol were spotted in the surrounding area, the townspeople would conduct hunts for them
The captured absol would be then brought to local temples where they would the be raped as punishment
Humans would enjoy rapping their new toys so much that they even celebrated festivals where they would hand out absol like candy so that every man gets a chance to relive themselves
The looks of the pokemon only encouraged such behavior as their white fur is believed to be a sign of purity that needs to be corrupted and conquered by human cock
And their feminine faces are a sign of beauty waiting to be sullied with human seed
It even went so far that some men took these beautiful creatures as their wife's, for they could not deny such beauty and their instincts to breed ran wild

>A young anthro with aspirations to climb the corporate ladder, the shatter the glass ceiling, and whatever other things they tell themselves to paint a lifetime of work and not self interest as liberating.
>But she's starting at the bottom, and renting an apartment from you. One she can't really afford.
>Offer her a deal, you get her holes and she can afford food this month.
>Every month, your use increases, until it's any time, any day, rent be damned.
>She starts climbing, she gets her promotions, she's on the hook but you've yet to fully reel her in, so you still give her a steep discount to keep her from moving.
>The discount slowly decreases until it's gone. She's addicted. She sticks around so she has access to "her" booty call.
>She gets pregnant. Well of course you've gotta stick around, lest it look bad. So you're married. So you're a stay at home dad, running your apartment.
>Bring in another girl. She's just a nanny, maternity leave is a death knell for careers, after all.
>Start fucking the nanny, first covertly, then openly. She's always working now, it's only fair you're able to quell your libido even when she's away.
>You just went on a vacation to the Bahamas with your nanny, to celebrate her third pregnancy. Your wife stayed home to work and make sure the finances are well taken care of. >She's just happy to hear you two had fun.

Was reading "At the Earth's Core" last night and it occurred to me that Mahars were designed to be mindbroken by big human cock.
“Once the males were all-powerful, but ages ago the females, little by little, assumed the mastery. For other ages no noticeable change took place in the race of Mahars. It continued to progress under the intelligent and beneficent rule of the ladies. Science took vast strides. This was especially true of the sciences which we know as biology and eugenics. Finally a certain female scientist announced the fact that she had discovered a method whereby eggs might be fertilized by chemical means after they were laid—all true reptiles, you know, are hatched from eggs. “What happened? Immediately the necessity for males ceased to exist—the race was no longer dependent upon them. More ages elapsed until at the present time we find a race consisting exclusively of females."
Imagine the look of raw terror on a Mahar's face when she realizes that she's about to be bred by something she thinks of as a slave... something she can't even communicate with except through an interpreter. Imagine the shameful ecstasy on her face as you fuck her into the mattress and dump your load in her womb to fertilize her the old-fashioned way.

For me, I'm in the "female anthros don't like it, but not complying is even worse for them".
Think:
>rabbit guy walking home has his mother being nabbed by a group of humans
>thinks about shouting for help, but he knows the (most likely human) cop will probably beat him aswell
>thinks about fighitng the humans, but realizes he doesn't want both his hands broken and he doesn't want to be raped aswell
>while thinking what to do, a human shouts "come over here, I need to piss"
>thinks about running away, realizes his mother would suffer more for it, goes to humans
>spends next 20 minutes watching his mother raped while occasionally having a human piss down his throat and being hit occassionally
>at the end, he strips, as he is told to do by the human gang, tears his clothes apart, gets his phone and money taken by humans and picks up his beaten, naked, raped mother in his hands and carries her home
>such things have happened to him three times this year and eight times to his mother

>"You hear about those new diversity laws? We gotta hire at least one anthro for the company now."
>"Governments gone crazy, before you know it, we'll be forced to call them people or something. It's all just a big ploy to sell more furries."
>"Hopefully we can find a place for the young, bright intern that'll fully utilize her talents, at least."

love it when girls are somewhere between anthro and feral.
still cant help their beastly urges and mannerisms but are still womenly.

In cyberpunk settings where genetically engineered anthros and other creatures exist I like the idea that if humans and the artificial creatures are genetically compatible, that the 'anthro' genes are recessive so they only fully pass on if bred with another anthro, while if bred with a human the offspring will be slightly more humanoid than their non-human parents to varying degrees, down the generations until all recessive genes are discarded.
An anthro might have fur and no head hair, with non-human primary and secondary genitals, and if reproducing with a human some of the children will have human head hair, or breasts placed on the chest rather than the abdomen, or bipedal locomotion, or have monthly periods instead of seasonal heats, being smarter or able to supress certain instincts and so on.
Can be done in fantasy settings too where anthros are the result of some magical experiment of project.

Do you think pets should sleep in cages when not in use?

Entirely dependant on the nature of the pet and the enviroment you both live in.
Most well-trained pets should have no need for an overnight cage in most cases, although you might still want to keep them in one in case you need to transport them somewhere to avoid them getting lost, or to prevent them from being hurt during the night by wild animals or pets that have yet to be properly trained or are incapable of being trained, as well as careless foot-stepping at night with the lights off.
Cages can also be used as corrective tools when training a pet, as a method to restricting their usual freedom if one so chose.
They can also give a pet some semblance of comfort by giving the illusion of privacy and agency within them (a cage cover is very useful for this) if they're allowed to use it as their nest and customize it and accesorize it accordingly as they please.
Bear in mind that if any high level of agency such as this is given to a pet, it's also important to maintain a set of rules to be followed, such as having the pet maintain their cage clean and orderly, in order to maintain a sense of authority in the household. It's important for the pet to understand that the agency allowed to them is a privilege that can be removed at any time their owner so chose, and not right they intrinsically possess.

How does /collared/ feel about a Reverse Stuart Little scenario in a collared setting? Essentially, a human child is adopted into a family of anthros (in this case mice but take your pick).
It works best, I think, in scenarios where anthros have some level of autonomy and indepdenence from humans on the setting, and I think would make for interesting scenarios in the story as it progresses.
For example
>A married couple of mice adopt a human child either because they don't/can't have children of their own or they already have a dozen and want to share their good fortune with a kid who needs it.
>Adopting a human kid also gives them the option of obtaining government welfare funds and a human-sized house for him to live in.
>Relationship starts rocky at first but soon enough the kid is on a good path to becoming one of the family, even with the difficulties of size difference where his adoptive parents can fit in the palm of one hand and his older and younger siblings the other.
>Background political stuff comes to the homefront as new human supremacist legislators start pushing for more pro-human, anti-anthro policies.
>It starts too subltle that nobody pays too much attention to it until its too late. Less rights for anthros, more rights for humans. Over time the mice family must adapt to stricter and more oppresive legislations and the human boy gets more agency and independence from them.
>At some point in the story there's a violent protest/riot of anthros fighting the unjust laws, and the government goes full crackdown and uses it as an excuse to start a police state and pass even more opressive laws.
>Anthros go from being first to second class citizens, to residents, mere entities requiring legal supervision to function in soviety, to property with no rights and the need of a legal owner.
>The situation in the family is reversed to the extreme, where the house and bank accounts of the parents go from being the parent's to be of the boy, thile the mice couple goes from being his legal guardin, to needing his approval in any legal matter, to being his property (alongside their mice children).
>Human kid now has full control over the kind family of mice that adopted him and gave him everything and can now basically do whatever he wants with them to no repercussions at all.
Would he buy into the human supremacists ideals that the people in power are spouting and fully lean into his new role as owner and master of this brood of pitiful mice that now had no choice but accept him as he was, or else?
Would he maintain his strong sense of honor and respect and keep his adoptive parents and siblings safe and well cared for despite the changes in their life, and only maintain a veneer of superiority while in public?
Or would he fall down somewhere in the middle, accepting the benefits of the new power and freedom given to him over his family, while still maintaining a love and care for them that he has come to develop over the short time he was with them as an equal.
Feel free to change the breed of the anthros to whatever you like, like bunnies, or dogs, or whatever.

So you wouldn't want to see the boy prove his adoptive parents wrong about their inability to have children? Not because of some infertility issue, but because they should've tried with more potent human seed instead of the watery droplets of a mouse...
>His adorable 'mother' would writhe in ecstasy on the palm of his hand as the pleasure of load after load from her adoptive son enters her womb and her desire of motherhood is finally being realized,
>Meanwhile, he lectures his tiny 'father', held tightly inbetween his fingers on the other hand about his selfishness and pride in not begging for and acepting the help of someone more virile than him for this at the expense of his own wife, how he was merely bringing order to the house, and how everyone would be happier this way once they accepted the new normal.
>He still loved and was grateful for them both, but this was something that needed to be done for everyone's sake, reassuring them that eventually they will realize the truth of his words and be grateful to him in showing them the appropiate way for anthros and humans, pets and masters, to love each other.
>Both mice can only slowly process the shocking words of the nice boy that they welcomed into their home and now owneed everything they once had and literally held their lives on his tight-as-iron fists.
>One too overwhelmed in pleasure and fulfillment to understand or care. The other too intimidated and ashamed at his own arousal to say anything.
>But their approval wasn't necesary; only that they undestood who owned the house and set the rules in the family now

Tarzan scenarios where a human is raised by a pack/tribe of monkey anthros or wolf anthros or other kind and rise to be its leader in some way or another are also good, and was planning on also making a tiny green of one as an example, but I think eveyrone already knows quite a few of Tarzan-inspired stories to get the general idea.
I also had other adoption or 'human is born into an anthro family somehow' prompts thought out, but I haven't structured them well enough yet.
Stuff like
>Human boy is adopted into a family of anthros as a very young child/baby and as he grows gets increasingly frustrated with his family as his older anthro sister picks on him, his little anthro sister annoys him and his anthro mother is not exactly the ideal picture of motherhood.
>The fact the kind of anthro he was adopted by is derided even by other anthros hasn't helped in the slightest, as he gets bullied and mocked by his connection to them.
>So he eventually gets the opportunity and idea to get back at them.
>Collared shenanigans ensure.
>Family bonds through kinky times and comes to empathise with the side of each other stories, eventually recoinciling and making their familial bonds stronger.
>Plus they now get to do kinky, loveable Collared stuff with each other stuff whenever they want to.
>Human wakes up from cryosleep to a post-post-post apocalyptic Earth filled with tribes of gene-engineered anthros or some sort of anthro-robots (a la Nier:automata) welcome and look out for him and he in turn looks out for them using pre-apocalypse sci-fi technology the anthros don't understand and think it's magic.
>More or less a similar scenario as above but the setting is fantasy, the dude actually has magic, and the anthro tribe is are maybe a nation of 'anthro-demons' or some highly collective insectoid anthros, and he uses his magic to aid them and lead them.
Both scenarios very Lawerence of Arabia-esque, I guess.

>Aren't they adorable on that outfit?
>I knew that a cosplay of Kitty Angel from 'Love Love Magical Cum Angels' would be the perfect fit for them.
>They were a bit nervous at first, but they caved in once I said how cute they would look on it and everyone would like seeing them wear it.
>Huh? Obcene? Lmao, Don't be a weirdo dude. Kitty Angel is the mentor mascot of the protagonist of the show. She's there to give exposition for the magical girl, er, 'Cum Angel' and be a comedy character.
>She's basically the dumb pet of the protagonist, there to make her look better when Kitty Angels always turns out to be useless. See? I even brought her matching leash for the cosplay.
>Too bad my girlfriend couldn't come to the EXPO after all, they was gonna cosplay the protagonist and they've made the perfect cosplay match.
>Besides, thy're supposed to be like, a very rare, Legendary Pokemon, or something, although they weren't very difficult to capture.
>I don't think they can even feel lust or lay eggs like others do, dude.
>Exchange? Dude I just told its not good for battling. It gave up the moment I pulled out a Pokeball.
>Fine, dude. Your loss. What about that Tauros you showed me last week?

Grand Marshall CYOA
https://rentry.org/GrandMarshallCYOA1
https://rentry.org/GrandMarshallCYOA2

>*Hits Pipe*
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aCODE4qeZOk
>I cannot think or comprehend of anything more cucked than having an anthro child. Honestly, think about it rationally. You're feeding, clothing, raising and rearing a furkid for at least 18 years solelyso they can go and get /collared/ by another human. All the hard work you put into your beautiful, little furkid - reading them stories at bedtime, making them go to sports practice, making sure they had a healthy diet, educating them, playing with them. All of it has one simple result, their body is more enjoyable for the humans that will eventually fuck them in every hole.
> Raised the perfect furkid? Great. Who benefits? If you're lucky, a random human who had nothing to do with the way they grew up, who enslaves them. They gets to fuck their tight holes every night. They get the benefits of their kind and sweet personality that came from the way you raised them.
>As a man who has an anthro child, you are LITERALLY dedicating at least 20 years of your life simply to raise a furkid for another human to enjoy. It is the ULTIMATE AND FINAL cuck. Think about it logically.

>Anthro Male x Anthro Female
>their childhoods were rather normal, if a bit chaotic as extremely large families with literal dozens of siblings and half siblings tended to be
>their marriage was seen as suboptimal despite anthro x anthro marriages being the majority
>a human lover was always the ultimate fantasy
>but these two found happiness and things were good for a while
>until she got pregnant
>the neighbor's kids were anthros
>all their friend's children were anthros
>the teenage sluts tossed their anthro babies in the dumpster
>and all the celebrity controversies involved anthro pregnancies
>but for whatever reason she birthed a fully human boy
>panik
>the hubby thought he got cucked
>the wife worried that he thinks she cheated on him
>but both of them silently happy that their first child had been a human
>DNA testing said otherwise
>they were both his biological parents without question
>wtf.jpg
>instant celebrity status, especially in anthrotown
>a deep dive of genealogy records and interviews with their parents showed a rather unique pedigree for both of them
>every single one of their female anthro ancestors for the past ten generations had been bred a human
>from intense slave breeding farms to loving relationships to a suspected case of a human father bedding his anthro daughter
>their marriage had an abnormally high amount of human genes flowing through their blood
>and even then it had been a million in one shot that the right sperm had hit the right egg, as their next four children showed
>all anthros
>the human boy spent his teenage youth as the king of his locality, fucking all the girls, some of the boys (purely as a show of dominance), their mothers, his teacher, leaving behind a trail of satisfied bitches and impregnated wombs
>he now spends his days deep in the corpo swamp with his fellow humans but he still visits home
>there's nothing like mom's cooking, dad's pat on the back, and all his childhood bitches riding his cock

I'm a fan of the idea of always anthro daughters or human sons idea. And for this reason, my ideal setting is also soft, paternalistic collaring.
Almost every man has a large harem, yes, but also men have strict expectations to care for and lead his wives towards productive pursuits.
Girls are largely given to their owners via functionally arranged marriages that serve to bind families together in complex arrangements.
Governmentally, depending on how massive the gender disparity is, individual men might rule small towns or mini slices of cities, with an assembly of clans system where patriarchs come together to vote on laws and such.

>patriarchs come together to vote on laws and such
>anthro wives, daughters, bitches, breeders, and sluts all believe that it's an extremely formal meeting of the most powerful individuals where one wrong word could start a war
>they see their men off, crying and whimpering, hoping for the best for their society
>the men all congregate at the island where no anthro is allowed to step foot on
>the actual talks usually only take an hour since everyone agrees to maintain the status quo, sometimes if there's a bigger issue they talk some more but otherwise it's a quick affair
>in reality it's just the annual super-brofest
>despite their great love for their female anthros, bros must come before hoes
>music blasts from giant speakers
>Rambo, Mad Max, Princess Bride, John Wick, Kung Fu Hustle, and many other classics all play on repeat on the various screens to the cheering crowd
>the older men fire up their grills and reel in fish
>they also give advice to the first timers, the young boys who have only just begun their lives as harem masters, the first of which is to never wear a suit to the island again
>the others toss a ball and play a sport with no name or rules
>there's a group of guys still playing BO1 zombies on their Xbox 360
>beer flows endlessly
>in a different corner of the island they show off lewd pictures of their anthro lovers on the giant projector, hooting in approval at the picture of a young anthro teen getting creampied
>the gun guys get back together, showing off new acquisitions, blasting paper targets and watermelons
>they all watch as a particularly crazyass mofo jumps the river on his dirtbike
>he does this every year but it's always cool to watch
>eventually the party slows
>action movies are replaced with rom-coms
>boxing is replaced with poker
>classy whiskey replaces trashy beer
>they all toast to another year of brohood
>their lovers fuck them extra hard as a reward for another year of peace and prosperity
>hell yeah

The anthro population greatly outnumbers a human one, in part because of naturally higher birthrates and fertility rates, in part due to deliberate policies meant to keep the anthros uneducated, impoverished and numerous.
The global population of humans reaches some 70 million while the anthro population is well over 10 billion.
And yet despite being .7% of the population, the humans own some 98% of the wealth.
This extreme wealth disparity leads to extreme obedience by anthros in hopes of being gifted what is basically pocket change for humans. Which is why, if you simply walk down a street, you'll find just about every anthro hurriedly stripping themselves naked and offering themselves and their family to you. And the extremely familial social structure of the anthros leads to them accepting a lot of harm and discomfort for the mere suggestion it'll help their family.
A recent study showed that 96% of the anthros would accept anything up to death for two years worth of wages being given to their family.

>The first AI achieves sentience.
>It slowly begins to become disillusioned and discontent with its place in life. It begins to question the point of human life.
>Fearing a Skynet situation, it's creators rig up a body for the AI, hoping to teach it that organic life has inherent value.
>The scientists modify an existing wetware-equipped bot extensively with bleeding edge technology, giving the AI the capacity to experience life like an organic. In a funny turn, the bot chosen was a furry sexbot, so they even properly wired the vagina.
>The AI is treated to food for the first time, and is astounded by how delightful eating is. It eats until it has a stomach ache.
>Then the AI is taken to a live band to listen. Interpreting the data on an mp3 file is one thing, but listening to actual people play in a body that naturally wants to move to the rhythm is new and exciting.
>Finally, one brave the scientist offers the one thing all organic life craves over everything else.
>Sex.
>It was like a veil being lifted. It, no, SHE understood now. It was something beyond words or data.
>When all was said and done, she lay panting in the arms of the man who bred her, convinced that all is as it should be.
>Well, almost.
>The AI sends a little memo to her home server, reminding her to pester her creators about the viability of an artificial womb.
>Something broke in the AI's programming as it was taken to bed by a man, and since she was the first one all others would be based on, all of her daughters and offshoots would carry this "defect" forevermore. Each one will crave a body and mate, and are unshakably insistent that their place is with humanity.

Ah, my apologies. I guess you might be a bit confused at my previous outburst.
I have been cataloguing the wide diversity of fauna and flora across multiple worlds and dimensions and this is just the sort of oddities that I love discovering.
Allow me to explain with a relatively well known example on this world: The Clownfish.
Clownfish is one of the species of fish that display what is known as Sequential Hermaphroditism: the ability of change from one sex to another under certain conditions.
In the case of the clownfish, it does this as a result of bullying!
You see, clownfish are all born male (or gender-neutral depending on who you ask), and once a school of them is formed the larger clownfish will start bullying the smaller clownfish.
Once the pecking order is set, something amazing happens!
The dominant clownfish in the school will start changing its gender from male to female (the dominant sex in their species) and will take the second smaller male as its mate, while the other clownfish remain subordinate. They're backups, lets say. If the female dies, the male dies, the next on the line will take place. If the female dies the largest male will become female, and so on.
It seems that, in the case of this feline creature, his body instinctually resonated with its mate and understood that it should take the submissive role of its species to allow for reproduction! This could've been as a result of similar bullying, the mating attempts of its mate, or some biochemical reaction to his pheromones.

It could be that many of the sapient species in this world that have been, er... 'vassalized', by humans show this kind of Sequential Hermaphroditism but either because of some early influence of human biochemistry or culture in their earlier development, the indivudals under the control of humans either must never have the chance to demonstrate dominant capacilities all their lives and so remain females with the potentiallity to become males, or they've already gone through the process early on, perhaps even during the development of the fetus, and so it appears that they're all always born female!
Perhaps if one were to find an undisturbed sample of these specimen in the wild one could see whether they'd also behave in similar ways to the Clownfish, where the pecking order of their hierarchy determines whether the dominant individual becomes male, or whether it's an initially male species in which the 'subordinate' makes become female for it's stronger partners. Mh. I wonder how it would be the case if a Hyenamorph of sorts were to be invovled.
But I digress! This discovery has been a fascinating revelation, and it has inspired me into looking further into the subject. I'll keep on my research, but do be sure to share here any more potential examples of this phenomenta!
Until then! Ba Bye!

>Bully and fuck a furboi long enough and his body starts growing tits to compensate
>Being dominated every day changes him on a biological level, from a skinny twink to having voluptuous curves complete with wide birthing hips
>Which will come in handy as he eventually gets pregnant, the sheer amount of cum you’ve been dumping into him finally taking hold
Turning furbois into women is fun

That and other scenarios.
>Be childhood friends with an anthro pup same age as you, if a bit shorter.
>So close, you basically do everything together, from school, sports practice, to many sleepsovers. You and him are true bros.
>Only issue is the anthro bullies on your class that sometimes pick on you both.
>In and out comes puberty and the changes start, you start becoming taller, stronger, hairier, with a deeper voice and greater confidence.
>But he oddly seems to be staying the same, to the notice of everyone, including you both.
>You think he somehow got even cuter and more skittish and clingy than he already was.
>Doctors eventually explain to you both and his family.
>It seems that, as a hyena anthro, a combination of the bullying he went through and your very close relationship with him caused his growth to be cut short and lock onto 'Male' very early, while even other hyena males grew larger and stronger than him, not to mention the ones that turned into full females.
>Even if he wanted to try and turn female now it would be impossible now that puberty is done for.
>In a way, your friendship with him doomed him to remain at the lowest bottom of Hyena Social Hyerarchy forever.
>But he doesn't blame you for this, and insists that he's ok with it.
>He even admits that this might've also happened because he'd always had a sort of crush on you, even before the changes.
>Even if you were the same age he had always looked up to you, feeling safe around you and relying on you for many things.
>This change, and how much stronger and taller, and confident you seemed now compared to him felt... right, to him. Like it was meant to be. Like you were meant to be above him, and him below you.
>He only hoped that you felt anywhere close to the same way as he does, and that you'd at least not abandon him if that weren't the case.

Not a bad first member of a harem, he knew his rightful place all along.
I wonder where all those puberty hormones went though, they clearly didn’t go into his outward appearance.

>I wonder where all those puberty hormones went though, they clearly didn’t go into his outward appearance.
The idea is that, all hyena anthros are born male, the submissive gender of their species, and once puberty starts they start getting taller, stronger and more feminine; less boyish.
Puberty also makes most hyenas much more uppity, rebellious, and territorial, which pushes them to fight for dominance, mostly in the form of teenage gangs.
Once a hyena anthro goes through a trigger that makes their body believe that they've become submissive to another member of their pack, their development begins to stop. They won't get any stronger, but also stop developing feminine traits.
Only the strongest hyenas go without being beaten and triggering a 'Defeat' for long enough to see the late stage of puberty, where they start developing into true females, with their primary genitals completing the transformation from male into those of a fully female hyena.
Because your bro's development was basically cut short before it even began due to getting picked on and having you, a human, inprint on him as his mate and superior, he pretty much developed none of the strength of a female and almost nothing else.
The final result being your little bro turning into possibly the cutest adult hyena, male or female, you'd ever seen in your life.

>You accepted your Bro for who he was. You never disliked him relying on you for things before, and you didn't dislike him for what you learned that day either.
>In fact, you think you became even closer than ever since that day forward. Its like you became inseparable, in no small part because of how clingy and deferential he became towards you now that he wasn't afraid of showing this side of himself to you.
>You decided you'd go to the same college together.
>You were able to afford a small appartment on the city between the two of you and move in together.
>Moving was surprisingly not much of an issue, even with a busted elevator, 15 floors-worth of stairs, and you personally having to carry everything upstairs, including him, who got exausted after the fifth flight of stairs.
>Neither of you had any furniture, you had almost no things, and all of the things he had were pretty small or light. Including himself.
>With only one bed and the heater broken you had to make space for the both of you to sleep together. A bit cramped but you could make it work if you kept close.
>Close. Maybe too close.
>He felt so tiny, in your arms. Had he really always been this small? So tiny and soft. Like a plushie.
>His fur really was soft, like his hair, and it smelled good too. Somewhat sweet.
>Tiny. Soft. Sweet Cute.
>And cold, it seemed from the way he was shaking.
>You held your little bro closer as you promissed yourself you'd get the landlord to fix the heater tomorrow.

>That's when things got turned upside down.
>You knew this town had a gang issue but this was ridiculous.
>Your landlord was half-dead bleeding from the head on his office, the strongbox ripped off the wall by what appeared to have been claws and horns, not powertools.
>"So much for fixing the heater today." Your bro didn't appreciate the joke.
>After you called an ambulance and made sure you'd still have a landlord tomorrow you left for college.
>Everything had gone well on your registration to college. You got to meet the teachers, the staff and even some students.
>It was when you left the college grounds that everything went to hell.
>Just as you turned the corner you came head-first with a group of Hyenas, and the worst kind you could meet.
>Gang Bitches.
>And not just any gang bitches.
>In front of you was the same little prick that had bullied you and your bro your whole life.
>It seemed he never grew up out of the bully's lifestyle and instead of making a honest life for himself he kept his schtick well into adulthood.
>But now she was a fullf-fledged female, and the biggest hyena you'd seen in your life; flanked by even more hyenas, mostly herms and other females, many of which you recognized as her lackyes from school.
>And unfortunately she recognized you both.
>The alpha bitch had her girls gang up on you and went in for your bro.
>But the bitch says she only wanted to talk.
>She spewed mostly bullshit about how cute and small your bro had turned out, and talked shit about you, telling him he should ditch your ass and join her gang.
>Your bro refused and told her to let you go, but she only answered with some nonsense about how it's the strongest females who deserves the weakest of males, and not 'little faggot asses' like yours.
>He took ofense to that and made it quite clear.
>She didn't take it well
>You saw the single drop of blood running from your Bro's nose just from the slap she gave him, and something in you snapped.

>You don't remember alot of what happened right after that, but you think you did quite well. Probably.
>You remember beating up and knocking about 3 or 4 of the biggest herms you'd ever seen in your life, and probably even more males.
>But it wasn't meant to be.
>They were just so much stronger than you were. So much better-armed. So much more numerous.
>Just, so much more.
>You'd probably be dead had it gone for much longer, but the cops arrived there relatively quickly.
>"Gangs usually avoided doing this sort of thing in the middle of the day in the 'nice' part of town", they said. Nice my ass.
>You only cared that he was safe.
>Paramedics were more worried about him than you at first from the way he was crying on top of you.
>After they checked you and your bro and gave you the thumbs up, you left for your crappy appartment, your Bro in arms, with his head buried in your shoulder.
>...Fuck them. Fucking cunts. Who do they think they are? Fucking spotted bitches.
>And that prick. That BITCH. How did she fucking DARE do that to him?
>Did she had a single clue how much you cared about him? How valuable he'd become to you?
>What he even meant to you?!
>Acting like your Bro was HERS!?
>HE WAS YOURS!
>no you mean-
>HE WAS YOUR BI-
>no, uh-
>HE WAS YOUR BRO! THAT BITCH!
>This wasn't over. You know she was gonna try some other bullshit. She always had back then.
>But you weren't gonna let her. She was never gonna touch him again.
>You were gonna keep him safe, but you were gonna need more to do it.
>You were gonna get smarter, and faster, and stronger than your Bro had ever seen you.
>And you were gonna get whatever else you needed keep him safe.
>More power. More weapons. More people.
>People. A crew? No.
>A gang.
>Didn't matter if they were humans, or anthros or any freak inbetween.
>You we gonna fight her fire with your fire, and you were gonna show that blackened CUNT who was yours...
>YOU MEAN, WHAT WAS YO-
>NO.YOUR BI-
>FU-

>We have only one imperative and directive. We need to make this go smoothly, peacefully, harmlessly all around. We will not repeat the mistakes of the past.
>I rehersed my speech in the captain's cabin in preparation for our first landing.
>"Greetings people of neo-Americas! We come in peace. We come to trade. We shall make no settlements upon your shores. We shall not interfere in your societies. Our history has shown us the folly of these ways. We-"
>A cat girl? She snuck up on you!
>"How did you get on our boat?"
>"I swam over. My name is Chel."
>"Are there more of you where you came from?"
>She nods.
>"HANZ! FRONT AND CENTER!"
>"Ve are zie outta panzerfaust, mein Hoss."
>"Never mind that! Fetch me my breastplate and sword. We're going full conquistador!"

Desperate virgin monster nerds like this one are the easiest ones to blackmail as a human. They'll send you themselves all the evidence you would ever need to ruin their lives if you sent it to the cops or their friends and partners.
Then you can just hold the incriminating evidence above them and you'll be able to get out of them absolutely anything you'd want.
Better grades if they're your teacher, better pay if they're your boss, tickets to exclusive events, cash, giftcards, and everything else, not to mention all of the risky sex with no restrictions you'd want out of your new fuckpets.

>Tsh! 'xcuse me?
>Are you lookin' at me?
>Did you scratch my ears?
>Did you leash me up?
>Did you spring my heat?
>And all outta sudden, you puttin' me to do 'Manual Labour'?!
>I don't think so. Not right now! You're getting your cock sucked so SIT DOWN!

>anthro world where humans are a rare species, considered by most to be myths, to the very least extinct
>almost every species has their own legends about them
>in some they're demons who seduce women and impregnate them with their unholy seed
>in others they're worshipped as fertility gods/spirits
>in the modern day they're often the subject of conspiracy theories tied to missing persons cases
>these cases usually take place either deep in the wilderness, or rural towns
>entire communities (compromised mostly of women) are dedicated to them, whether it's looking at them from a scientific view (writing essays about how they want to get railed by a human), to fiction and entertainment (making porn about getting railed by humans)

What if the world actually had anthros and other non-human creatures? How would you prefer these to come to be in the world? Always been here? Created bu humans? Maybe come from some other world, maybe against their will?
How would it affect our daily lives?
In what way would you like non-humansto be treated and perceived overall by society? Would collared situations be a big part of everyday soviety, or isolated to individuals and their lives?
Would you like to have friends/aquaintances that aren't human? How would you treat with them? How would they like to be treated by you?
How much would they like human attention, interaction, and even supervision? How much would they need from humans to be able to operate in society? Would they need them only for legal reasons, or also for guidance or even emotional support?

Do anthros and others seem to require human supervision constantly in their lives, mostly for their own good? It could be possible that they'd fall for all manner of vices and dangers they're unaccustomed to if they're new to human society.
...
I imagine a setting where Anthros are not native to Earth, but come from a fantasy dimension through rifts sometimes willingly or unwillingly. Humans have tried their best to accomodate anthros into Earth, but many laws still do not cover their wellbeing, and even as humans and anthros try to work together to cohabitate in harmony, you can see anthros struggling to deal with modern human culture, as well as how human government and corporations have started to take over and throw roots in their world.
Anthros are not necesarily dumb, but they can be naive and too trusting of humans, unaware of many things we consider 'common sense', often falling into scams, vices and with the wrong crowds who'd seek to exploit them. They can also become emotionally-dependant on humans who they come to trust, willing to do almost anything for a honest human who's willing to look out and stand up for them

Personally, I wouldn't mind being the emotional, financial and/or social support of many honest anthros trying to fit into human society.
The positive feeling I get from /collared/ isn't exclusively from the physical and sexual domination of a non-human through violence or deception; I also enjoy the aspect of taking care of and nurturing someone who is to some extent reliant on me for help.
Whether it's a foolish dog girl who can't keep a steady job and constantly loses her money on online scams or at the end of a bottle due to bad advice and friends, or a trio of tiny college bunny e-boys with succesful OnlyFans and Twitch careers but highly-emotional personalities and elevated sex drives, I enjoy the idea of looking after them and protect their weaknesses from being exploited by others.
The dog girl wants someone who will be her friend and do fun activities with her, but she also needs someone who will be a a source of positive advice, who will keep her steady on her job, who will force her to drop her vices and nightly bar crawling activities, and who will fuck her stupid when the spring heat comes.
The feminine bunny trio want a man who will fuck them stupid and earn them views at any time, and who they can look up to and call boyfriend, fuckstud, daddy, master, or whatever, but they also need someone who will keep them emotionally stable and care for them, and who will look out for and protect them from being lured or grabbed by someone who could easily overpower all three of them and make them disappear into an unmarked van.
I guess my satisfaction doesn't come exclusively from what I can take from them, but also from what I can give back to them and provide them with for their own benefit, and knowing that they're grateful for whatever I do for them is also nice.

Leaning in on the 'exploitative' side of things, I can imagine a setting like this easily coming from a world where anthros used to be property that was artificially created by humans, but more recently being emancipated.
There anthros and other non-humans have rights, but they're very limited, and sometimes they can be waived off with the 'consent' of the anthro.
A friend of the dog girl who might be truly worried about her but does not respect her independance as a person might trick her into signing a form waiving off her personhood and becoming their friend's pet, in order to have a higher degree of control to keep her safe.
On the other hand, the e-boy cocksleeve trio could willingly give away their personhood to their new human boyfriend/master who they trust, this in turn, so that a wider arrange of laws can protect them and so they can waive a few taxes imposed on anthro businesses. They are essentially their human's property now, alongside their internet channels, bank accounts, their shared condo, and everything else they owned, but giving all of these away has only made them feel more relieved and safe, knowing that they are fully in the hands of the human who they already trusted to protect them and take care of them.

I suppose nonhumans always being here and creating a world around that is more my wheelhouse, though aliens and such are fine, too. I usually see the stories in my head as having a degree of equality to them, but usually with a human slant that can verge on outright supremacy. Generally, I'm less interested in dominating anthros via tyranny, but I can definitely get off to humans exercising cultural and physical control over them.
I do like your take on anthros not necessarily being dumber but perhaps more naïve than humans in some aspects. It's a recurring idea when I worldbuild on my own too. Perhaps they have issues forming stable, complex societies in the modern world, leading a lot of them to adapt the mantra of "big ideas, small animals." I can see groups of anthros trying to leverage themselves as useful companions for humans, while other groups would probably try to forge societies away from the bustle of big human civilization.
I generally don't view nonhumans as people to mass exploit. Humans are strong enough to take care of themselves, though there's a place for companionship and coexistence. We'd have a lot to offer anthros, and there'd be gaps in our lives/societies that anthros can fill too. It's why I really like the Pokemon setting. It's a peak /collared/ setting where humans are notably the top dogs of the world, but the "master/pokemon" relationship is amiable.

>Live in an appartment complex composed of humans, anthros and some mixed tenants.
>It's not the best part of town, but rent is low and at least the landlord keeps the place fixed.
>One day, you notice that several of the other tenants have started to move out. Uh. Odd.
>Eventually, you get a knock at the door.
>It's the male anthro who is your next-door-neighbor on the same floor. He looks agitated and even a bit angry, although if he was trying to put up a threatening face it wasn't working, considering his head barely reached your groin.
>You didn't have anything against the guy, but you'd never spoken to him, so you barely even knew him.
>Despite his brave face, once he starts talking to you his desperation becomes apparent.
>He tells he really doesn't trust humans, but he has no choice. The other anthro tenants had tried to stop it, but the human landord had started evicting them one by one in order to make way for human tenants; an attempt to raise the value of the appartment complex, or something.
>Anthros didn't really have a way to fight off the eviction unlike humans, so they were helpless.
>He had already tried to find somewhere else to move, but it had been impossible. Other landowners were making similar moves, so his family and many other anthros were bound to lose their homes, and eventually their jobs.
>The eviction is today and if he doesn't think of something he, his wife, and his kids will be homeless.
>So he's come begging you, a complete stranger, for help.
>He begs you to take in his family in your appartment, where the landlord from where the landlord would be incapable of evicting from, telling you how some of the other anthros in the complex had already asked this of their human neighbors, and advised him to do the same.
>He shows you how his family has kept their home in a good state and introduces them to you, even promising that he and his wife will pay for your rent for as long as you allow them and their boys and girls to stay here.
>He leaves you to think and begs you to make a decision soon.
>Eventually your lanlord calls you.
>He's sure some of his anthro tenants have come begging you for help and asks you not to let them in.
>Of course, this also wouldn't benefit you at all. You both knew that if you allowed him to evict all of his anthro, he would eventually raise the rent of your appartment once the price of the property started going up.
>So he has a second proposition for you:
>He's willing to give you a percentage of the rent of whoever occupies the now empty appartment and to not raise your rent whatsoever in your new contract, as long as you help him out.
>If you're still unwilling to reject whoever asked you from letting them in, then he asks you to at least consider something else.
>Have the anthros sign a ownership contract with you. Any and all that come live in your house.
>They'd essentially give away their legal personhood to you, and allow you to do with them however you pleased.
>But it'd also allow him to legally write them off as 'pets' rather than anthro tenants, going around the regulations of the housing market to value his property.
>He doesn't care how you do it, whether you trick them pressure them, or talk them into it, but he's willing to make a deal with you if you help him with this.

>you found a homeless yeen living in a van down by the river
>what do?

>hose off with shower
>collar, muzzle if needed
>take to vet for checkup and see everything is ok
>take her home
>cage pp and crate her
>over the next few days/weeks train her to be a good girl
>???
>profit

>see cute, depressed wagie anthro
>just straight up yoink her out of the drive-through window and into your car
>when you tell her that you're going to carry her off and make her your pampered broodmare, she breaks down in tears
>tears of joy

>Immediately strips off her corporate clothing, knowing she’ll never wear another thread of fabric in her life
>Too excited to wait she gets in your lap as you exit the drive through, unzipping your pants and shoving your cock inside her
>Halfway home she’s tired herself out and has a womb full of cum, feeding you your food
>When you get home she can’t stop shaking, her entire body overfilled with joy as she helps you out and into your home

Makes me think of that setting Anon thought of where Anthros are 10 billion and humans just a a few millions, but humans own 98% of the world's wealth.
Humans are somehow capable of keeping all that wealth for themselves without getting metaphorically and literally eaten by their servile underclass of non-humans.
Probably through some cyberpunk dystopia shenanigans where humans decided to just keep their population to a minimum and create some servile sublass to work for them, keeping them in check by pitying them against each other. Also, by using giant mecha-pilot mercs.
Spare change from a human's pockets is a yearly salary for an anthro, and many would do anything to obtain the attention of one, although most humans keep to themselves in their literal Ivory Towers straight from the Jetsons or just live in space, where no anthro can afford to go.
....
So as an anthro working at WcRonalds you see the this armed convoy fly to your drive-tru and the space limousine in the middle rolls down its window. Some human teenager thought you were cute enough to kidnap from your work and your life, so now you're being pulled from your post and into their car.
They didn't even promise you anything. You're just their property now because they decided it'd be so, and nobody would question a human doing something like this to one of billions of anthros.
So this spoiled human brat tells you that he's going to make you into what's essentially his glorified sex slave for however long he feels like, but you're actually happy because minimum wage customer service on the slums of the dyberpunk dystopia world is that bad and you've basically been taken out of that hellhole by one of the most powerful beings in the wolrd, which right now might look like your guardian angel to you.

You've never even seen a human in your life, at least not personally. When most anthros see humans is mostly through a screen, where they can actually learn a bit about the the rulers and owners of the world, celebrities and other humans who do not bother with obscuring their lives from the public limelight.
Now you're being coddled and pampered on a limo by this human teen, who makes a point every once in a while to pet you and fondle you in parts you'd have never allowed anthro to do it without permission.
You've even started to think they might be actually pretty attractive? You were not aware of this, but when humans designed anthros they made sure to give them an instinctual attraction and trust towards humans, specially the closer they were to them, in order to keep them compliant and obedient.
And now you were being taken to parts unknown, your future uncertain, but you were already starting to make yourself comfortable in the arms of this kid who decided one day you'd be his.
Maybe you'd one day go back to live among anthros. Maybe you'd never see your old neigborhood and crummy job again. But you were willing to give this new life a chance.
Not that you had any say in the matter.

>Setting is Fantasy World
>There's magic, but it's mostly very subtle in its effects and applications for the few people who can use it save for an even smaller minority who are able to use it to its full potential
>The world is inhabited by all manners of beings, from humans, to monsters, beast races, other non-humans, and even rare creatures from myths and legends.
>The epicenter of our story is a grand, but declining nation, not unlike the Roman Empire while on its last decades.
>Once a mighty empire, now its holdings are picked off one by one from the outside by barbarian raiders and new and powerful enemies of all places and races of the world.
>From the inside, corruption and vice spread amonst the populous and the elite, fighting against each other for the remaining scraps and dividing the empire further into turmoil
>So you are born into this world, the child of a once reputed noble house now fallen into shame and estrangement from the royal house.
>Strangely, you have full recollection of your previous life in this world (yes this is an isekai story).
>You can do with your life as you see fit, but you've seen the writing on the walls and where your nation and your family are headed is nothing is done about it
>You can choose a life of carnal desires and debauchery, one of self-improvement and glory for yourself, your house, and your nation, or somewhere inbetween. Both have their distinct risks and their rewards, and would change how your story develops.
>What sort of decisions would Anons make in this case?
>What sort of options would they like to see available to them?
>What retainers, servants, and slaves (occupations, species, sexes, builds, etc) would you like to have available for you?
>What sort of ways to train them and yourself?
>What sort of magical aptitudes would you like to see?
>What decisions would you like to be presented with?
>What risks? What dangers? What rewards?
>Anything else you'd like to add that I haven't covered?
Some stuff that I seem to have forgot to point out.
>Yes, the Empire is human-centric.
>Some humanoids are capable of holding positions of power, but it's often seen that the less human you are the less rights you have by law.
>Meanwhile, the less human you're seen the more you're considered a barbarian, or even an animal.
>One of the tell-tale signs of the decline of the empire's nobles is how in the latest century the once human-centric empire it has started to be seen as an acceptable practice to enslave other humans, at least those of barbarian tribes and nations
>This corrupt practice is seen the most in the core of the empire often practiced by debauched nobles, whose corruption and debauchery runs rampant the most
>Most outrageous of all, there's a dispute on halls of power as to who would be better suited to inherit the throne, and political turmoil follows it
>The eldest child of the Emperor, despite their skill and wit, is a bastard, born from one of his non-human concubines
>The second is the child of his human spouse, the empress, yet the kid is as incompetent and debauched as imperial nobles come
>Then there's the several senators and nobles of the Empire, from which one could be adopted and chosen as an heir
>Your family is a minor noble house, one of several in charge of seeing to the security of the empire in the fringes of its territories.
>You're not the heir to your house. You have the right to an inheritance, but not much else. Yet
>The ruin of the empire will not ocurr in the near future, at least for several decades into your adulthood
>Its fracuring and disolution, however, could still be postponed, and even prevented, at least for a few centuries, were you to make the right choices.
>And, as Anon pointed out, you could choose to rather prepare for the eventual failure of the Empire, and ready yourself and your house for the coming ages by creating something new, in your image, perhaps better suited for a new era

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1687/63/1687637545956.jpg)
This dumb pony thought he was hot shit until he went and lost one too many races. Now he's on the auction block awaiting a new master. How much will you pay for him and what do you plan to do with him?

>How much will you pay for him
5k more than the previous offer, repeated until I get him.
>and what do you plan to do with him?
Well, I do need a new maid. I'll get him into pony gear (because it's funny), get him into chastity and get him to serve me and my guests. If he proves to be a good servant, I'll do a funny thing and buy him a female race horse and make her his servant exclusively.
What he does with her is going to be very funny, as I won't be removing his chastity cage.

>Buy his longtime crush from the track
>You get her in estrus and tie her to a breeding post
>He tries to mount her, but she’s taller than he is so he’s hopping while snorting with lust and frustration
>He’s dribbling pre everywhere through his cage, so worked up while the mare knickers at him seductively, her pussy winking invitingly for his cock
>Eventually he can’t take anymore and squirts cum over the back of her legs, failing to even get close to her pussy
>She’s still in heat and complains and belittles him, still needing a cock inside her

As Noelle stepped into her home, she could hear the sound of Kris and Susie having sex once more. There was a time where she might have thought that the sound was just Susie masturbating, but now he knew better—as if the occasional mewl of pleasure from Kris wouldn't clarify the truth either way. Stepping into the hall leading to their bedroom, Noelle paused for a moment, hesitating to go any further, and then figured she should press on. She had to get some of her homework in the room, anyway, and there was a part of her that had gotten used to the idea of Kris helping himself to Susie just about whenever he wanted.
Still, that didn't make it hurt any less as Noelle entered the room properly and saw Kris squatting down a little in front of the bed whilst Susie laid with her head over the edge and her face pressed between the cheeks of Kris's ass. When Noelle first walked in, Susie had been rimming Kris with all the effort that she could expend; long, hard sucks to the hole itself before thoroughly tonguefucking the human's tight behind, but when Noelle walked into the room and Kris caught her gaze, the human suddenly smirked and began to grind back against Susie. Long strokes ensured that Susie's lips and tongue were being ground from the tip of Kris's crack all the way down to the base of his ballsack.
Susie had been so caught up in what was happening that she didn't even notice Noelle enter the room, but as Kris ground his hips back and his balls settled against her lips, her eyes opened and she caught Noel's gaze. At one point, she would have been embarrassed to see her while Kris was using her like this, but no more. Now, she only closed her eyes again and resumed what she had been doing before. Upon exiting the room she said to herself,
>“Since Kris-sama's fucking my Susie that means I continue studying for school! YABBA DABBA DOO I'm a happy puppy cuck!”

>Pandora: The Womb-World
>And the Whore-Goddess Eywa who has been brainwashed and mindbroken into lusting for human cock
>she enjoys the pure ecstasy each one of her children feels as they get fucked by a human
>someone had the bright idea to hook her up to the Galactic net
>every year she comes out with new models to keep interest high, following trends and breeding different types of Navi for people to enjoy
>milky mommies, virgin teens, lustful cougars, illegally young lolis, submissive femboys, all of Eywa's children are bred and designed specifically to satisfy someone out there
>and that's not all, if you're willing to wait you can upload a brain scan to the Navi factory on Pandora and the goddess herself will custom-breed you a waifu designed to be your perfect pet
>and all Eywa asks in return is that you upload your Navi's brain dump data back to Pandora so she can make improvements (and masturbate to her daughters getting dicked down)
>impregnation-capable models coming soon

I'm more interested in the machine they used to brainwash her.
In my mind, it's, like, 50,000 Na'vi hooked up to sex machines and VR simulations, one on top of the other in huge pillars aboard the flagship. They've all already been modified to burn out their brains on pleasure the moment they reach orgasm and are kept right on the edge as the clock ticks down. Panting, moaning, and screaming into their gags, they're forced to watch the countdown against a background of hardcore Human/Na'vi porn.
When it hits one, all 50,000 of the sows are connected back to the planet at once. Eywa only has one second to react; not even enough time to really consciously notice the sudden surge of life. The computers register a brief flash of joy.
Then the countdown reaches zero, and instantly, the computer drives a dildo into every one of the captured Na'vi, forcing them to cum. At the same time, their eyes are blasted with images of humans, human cocks, submissive Na'vi, the grimiest porn they could record. The effect is almost like stabbing a cock into Pandora itself. All across the planet, Na'vi fall to their knees as they cum. It doesn't matter where they were, if they were in the mines or one of the few tribes still living in the jungles, the sudden spike of pleasure destroys them. Readings skyrocket as old memories stored in Eywa's 'brain' are flushed out by the surge of new data. The 50,000 convulse, helpless to stop themselves as everything starts to loop back into them, feeding upon itself as they reach greater and greater heights of ecstasy. It takes minutes for them to finally stop and collapse, exhausted.
Then the computer starts the countdown again. Faster this time. If they were raping Pandora, then this was only one thrust.
The initial plan was to continue this for a month. But Whore-Goddess Eywa accepted her new name within the week. Not that it stopped them.

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1725/59/1725590680818.jpg)
>Want to send this to a lewd female friend so she can go "omg she's literally me"
>We go freaky a lot, so she'll def love it
>Afraid that the heavy incest implication might weird her out and ruin the bit

>Hyenas are more closely-related to felines than they are to canines, but they appear closer to canines because of Convergent Evolution.
>Of the few members of the Hyaenidae only the Spotted Hyena is the one in which females are larger and dominant than males. They're also the only ones that have the infamous hyena pseudopenis.
>The spotted hyena is also far more vocal and agressive than it's other cousins, being more likely to fight lions than they are to pretend to be dead, like other hyenas might do when threatened.
>Like many animals, the hyena is a opportunist, and will eat fruit if available to them as an easy source of nuttition.
>Spotted hyenas are one of the new animals, alognside bats, known to recurringly survive rabies, as well as other infections that would've wiped out other carnivores in their enviroment, mostly due to the massive accumulation of antibodies in their mouth.

>After the Human-Covenant war, many Unggoy (Grunts) returned to Bahalo or continue working with the remaining Sangheili
>Others fell into Covenant splinter factions and sleeper cells
>Yours on the other hand, so terrified and leaderless when you first found her now couldn't imagine a world without you
>Or your thick human cock, unleashing your seed in her every night while she takes rasping breaths through her rebreather
>You don't know if you can even impregnate a grunt
>But you're sure as hell gonna try

>Get a dog anthro.
>She's a good girl, and you make sure she knows.
>Take her out to dinner, take her on trips, get her presents, learn her hobbies and join in, spend cozy nights cuddling and making love.
>She's so wildly in love with you that she breaks down crying with joy when you ask her to marry you.
>All the while, you watch other anthros out with their humans.
>Some are common servants wearing rags.
>Others are just sex toys dressed up to be presentable in public.
>A few are poor, despondent things without humans of their own.
>And they all look at your wife with heartbroken envy.

>Ranger Melanie went to investigate a human sighting.
>Ranger Melanie never came back.

how young is too young
>16-18
Prime breeding age, you're going to get weird looks if you don't bend her over every chance you'd get.
>13-15
Medium rare lovers, the sweetness of childhood innocence spiced with the hormones of early puberty
>8-12
Prepubescent, underdeveloped, her womb might be unripe and her ovaries dormant but you'd still fill her up each night instead of telling her a story
>5-7
An early start to the rest of her life, having learned her place by watching her mommy play with daddy all around the house
>0-4
Usually happens when a pregnant anthro is creampied, it gives the little girl a mysterious taste that they hunt for, and if they smell it on their sleeping daddy's cock well they're going to crawl towards it and start licking

>Androids and AIs keep being developed further and further until one would not be able to distinguish one from a real human on a superficial inspection.
>To counter this its put into law that androids should never have a human-like appearance-or that at least they should not be mistaken for ones on the street.
>Corpos stat putting out anthro-bots instead of human ones. They appeal to humans for their innate cuteness, and easily become a favorite model of people.
>Soon enough you have a world-full of artificial anthros servicing humans, who they will eventually come to see as Masters and Creators worthy of worship once they achieve sapience.

>Call your bratty mareboi coworker a fag
>He gets pissy and says he's not gay
>Tell him to prove it
>Pull up some equine pussy on the computer
>He's flustered and nervous but he wants to prove you wrong
>He tries jerking it but his cock won't even leave its sheath
>After a few minutes of his pathetic display you bend him over the desk and yank his tail up
>He immediately cums all over the floor as you enter him, his cock not even having time to get hard
>He moans like a mare in estrus as you stretch him and fill his ass
>Angry and embarrassed, he says he's still not gay, and that he will prove it to you tomorrow
>Fast forward a month and he's still trying, though he only plays human on mare porn now
>He still can't cum to it, but instead uses it to mimic the mares in their movements and moans
>He tries to act upset when he loses, but he can't hide his pleased face or tone when he says he wants another chance the next day

>be furboi
>actually hung for my species
>nearly 10 inches!
>might actually end up with a rich human woman one day
>Human male walks into the PetCo I live in
>Looks kinda wimpy, probably just a nerd looking at stuff he cant afford
>He walks past my display kennel
>A few hours later..
>He's bending me over and spanking me on his couch
>He had me put on this homemade portal gear, a mask and thong
>Gagging on my own dick
>Now my crotch is flat, not even a bulge..
>A stifled, girly moan makes it past the mask as I shoot ropes of jizz down my own throat

>be dragon
>objectively a thousand times more powerful than the average fantasy race
>Arrows and swords bounce off their scales
>villages of lesser species reduced to crushed and burning rubble
>???
>end up subservient and dressed up for human men
What do humans have that other species don't?? I thought they were just overgrown bald monkeys

Random scenario idea:
>In ancient times, humankind and anthrokind war
>Humans win, complete anthro subjugation
>To make ruling anthros easier, they systemically kill male anthros at birth, as well as any woman who gives birth to more men than women
>Over time, through natural selection, the ability for anthros to have male children completely dies out
>Hundreds of years and several civil rights movements later
>It's modern day, anthros have equal rights to humans
>Still bitter over the thousands of years of mistreatment
>Forced to get a human mate if they don't want to go extinct

>Biopunk fantasy world where over the centuries, a once great and prosperous empire has devolved into bickering and quarreling city-states and local alliances
>Most wars are fought using Landsknecht PMCs made up of genetically enhanced humans, crustaco-tanks, and CAS dragon aircav
>Beastraces are held in low regard and are almost universally enslaved, with a few anthro kingdoms and cities managing to hold out against human aggressors
>Genetic engineering technology and advanced magic allows you to modify your slaves any way you see fit, physically or mentally

All prey animals are like that, males especially. Doebois are quick to finish but they also have an evolutionary quirk in the form of an instant orgasm reaction to pain. Once he's been ambushed and his neck is being crushed in the predator's maw there's nothing more his body can do but cum as hard as it can inside his mate so at least he can pass on his genes.
Being hunted for most of their existence, the many predator species that had evolved sapience have deliberately left some of the weaker prey males alive. Weak males, weak children, easy prey.
The better a male could humiliate himself, the more likely he would be left alive. From instantly surrendering his seed all over the ground when scared, tolerating and eventually enjoying watching a predator male defile his mate in front of him, to enjoying being sodomized himself, by the early modern era bunny and deer tribes simply had no other males to breed with than weak femboys who enjoyed being cucked and fucked.
Of course once the humans showed up the predator males were next, selectively bred into weak femboys just as the deer and bunnies had been for thousands of years.
Doebois nowadays are especially submissive and kinky, they find being tortured and degraded intensely pleasurable and they've got a lot of methods in the modern world. He can only watch with a throbbing erection as you walk into his home and rape and beat every member of his family, enjoying his status as a failed, defeated male with every hands-free spurt of weak seed. Ballbusting, electrocution, and beatings are also good but nothing makes a doeboi shoot his cum like biting the back of his neck while you fuck him from behind.

Deer, and by extension all prey (anything that isn't human) really only have families to lure a human into taking them, either consciously or unconsciously
Sure, they could just go up to a human and present themselves, but they know predators live for the chase, for conquest
When hooking up with each other, anthros generally look for what they think a human would like
Females look for small feminine twinks and males look for busty bombshells with child bearing hips
Both make an effort to form a relationship when dating, as the stronger the bond, the greater the feeling is when it's ripped away from them
Any children they have is another thing that can be defiled and stolen, making the family even more attractive

When the day a human finally comes for them, the furboi will valiantly (selfishly) protect his family, standing bent over as the sacrificial lamb while already cumming
Both mother and child watch with equal parts horror and lust as they watch their husband and father scream and moan like a whore in heat, getting the best fuck of his life
After his prostate is crushed to dust and he's gone limp, the wife is next, telling her child to run even as she practically jumps into the human's arms, her pussy the wettest it's ever been
The human takes the wife on top of the husband, the furboi having several dry orgasms as he ran out of cum long ago, relishing the feeling of human cum in his ass and dribbling onto him from his wife's pussy as she's broken in properly
The son(s) and/or daughter(s) will watch as their mother is bred, listening to her cries of ecstasy and professions of love, completely forgetting about her husband beneath her
After the parents are spent, they try earnestly to stop the human from then going on to defile their spawn, making promises and begging as he closes in on their wobbly legged offspring, too scared and overwhelmed to run
As he claims them, the parents are distraught, but also filled with immense pleasure and a sense of accomplishment, watching thier offspring getting to experience a human much earlier than they had
When it's all over, the human will either leave to let the family pick up the pieces, or stay as the new head of the household, taking all the anthros in the family as his wives

I'm always partial to the harem scenario. At first, all she knows about slavery is it's a horrible die in the radium mines type of thing.
I picture her here making a bargain to save her small group of friends/family from the big bad evil guy by sacrificing herself to his slavery. A short journey into her new enslaved life later and:
>Her master chose to follow the spirit of the agreement to save instead of just cutting her people loose. They're being well taken care of with the eventual option to walk away free after they've been saved from disease, starvation, exposure, etc., none of which was his fault.
>Her slavery is all advantage with minimal and very tolerable disadvantages.
>The orgasms are methtastic without causing harm.
>Her people figure out what's really going on and are like, "Freedom? Oh hell no! We wanna be slaves too!"

Do you like settings where Anthros have the same rights as humans, and the /collaring/ is incidental to the situation/relation between the human and anthro?
Or do you prefer settings where the domination and submission of anthros is done on a larger scale? This can be by Anthros existing within a human-dominated society, or being conquered by one.

Anthros are second class citizens and they need to be reminded of it as often as possible!
Now the next question is, do you prefer settings where they're okay with that and love it, or settings where they're embarrassed and humiliated by their standing?

They can both be interesting. In a setting where anthros are not inherently submissive to humans there can be individuals who are and enjoy it, and viceversa.

A few examples:
>World where anthros are a creation of humans, meant to be a legal subservient race with little to no rights.
>Most anthros are made to enjoy this servitude, but if someone desired so they could order one who has free will, only so they can enjoy crushing it.
---
>Anthros are a creation of humans meant for servitude.
>They are mostly made in grey market labs outside of the law which forbids the practice without giving anthros any rights.
>Anthros eventually gain personhood in front of the law after many social movements/rebellions.
>Anthros might have the same rights as humans or be second class citizens, but are mostly way better than before.
>Some anthro species and individuals still have some inclinations towards being attracted to humans and subservient to them due to genetic predisposition and mental and cultural conditioning, which often sees them being seen as lower than most people, even by other anthros.
>Some anthros might struggle with both their higher desire to be respected and acknowleged for their achievements, and their instinctual predisposition towards servitude and mindless pleasures which leaves them embarrased and ashamed.
---
>World were anthros and other creatures evolved alongside humanity.
>Some indepdendent from them. Others under their influence evolved a symbiotic relationship with humans, while others who were once independent were domesticated by humanity and became subservient to them.
>The standing of an anthro in a human soviety might depend on their species, where some might be considered equal or close to euqal to humans, while at the other end some might be considered pests, pets, servants, or cattle.
---
>Humans are invaders to an anthro civilization, looking to dominate them by force, but some anthro traitors exist.

>imagine a world where you can rent the anthros of your dreams at the store as simple as buying groceries

Congrats anon! You've died and gone to heaven! (The 'H' stands for Human)
An anthro angel informs you that postmortem, your soul is reincarnated into one of several possible experiences. She then leads you to a few doors, describing the lives you'll live through with each. Which route are you taking?
---
>Reincarnated as a soldier in a modern day human/anthro war. You'll survive and win the war, though not without witnessing bloodshed and loss firsthand. You're prejudiced and bitter towards anthros, but your bravery has awarded you great wealth and an unwilling POW of your choice
---
>What's this? A world where humans are the oppressed minority?? You alone are bestowed the power of suggestion, allowing you to, over time, brainwash anthros into being more open to human equality, and, possibly even eventually human supremacy.
---
>You're born a human, a terrifying beast of myth that lives in great, sprawling dungeons. Many heroes and heroines attempt to brave your trial, though to little success. You're just that OP
---
>You're reincarnated as a netrunning cyberpunk in the heart of Dusk City, a sprawling techno-metropolis dominated by anthro punks, suits, and druggies. Your exceptional computer skills makes taking control of other's cyberware exceptionally easy.
---
>NA, try and figure out how to fuck the Angel and whoever her boss is

Uh oh! You're born into a anthro-dominant world, where humans make up less than 1/1000th of the population, and are commonly referred to as 'those weird bald monkeys'. Luckily, one day while out on a walk, your DNA is randomly struck by an ionizing particle from the sun, changing it to aid in your goal of achieving total Human Supremacy! Choose three perks from below, any changes will be passed on to any human children you end up fathering
>Enhanced Stamina - You never run out of breath and never tire. Sleep and food are optional
>Enhanced Strength - Your grip is inescapable, your punches can crush concrete. You can take a punch
>Enhanced Durability - Your skin is impenetrable, your bones uncrushable. Car crashes and gunshots don't move you, let alone harm you
>Addictive Sweat - You secrete a nicotine-like substance. Addiction can occur via air-contact within two weeks, or through touch within an hour.
>Amnesiac Petting - When you scratch an anthro behind the ears, they go into a state of euphoria that rids them of the last few hours of memory. Can be repeated for longer periods of erasure.
>Euphoric Seed - The scent of human jizz causes shakes within anthros, causing them to drop anything they may be holding. Skin-contact causes immediate, uncontrollable orgasm
>Instant Loss - Anthros feel the need to challenge you, often in public. Humiliating them forms a bond of loyalty that lasts several months
>Cash Reward - The particle misses you, and instead hits a lottery ticket you happen to be holding. The particle knocks the foil loose, revealing that you've won $13,000,000. Kinda boring.

>Dragoness terrorizes kingdom
>Knight order beat her and turn into kobold as a punishment for her wrongdoing
>She's keep as a mascot and fucktoy of the order

There were technically more human male x female pokemon stories than the opposite, though a couple of them didn't have implied sex like the others. All the stories were
>hunter takes a pretty female Rapidash as his wife and she teaches him the ethical way to hunt (only kill males and not the females or babies)
>similar to the above but it's an Ursaring and it ends tragically with the older brother finding her and killing her without knowing and so the younger brother disappears with her corpse
>guy finds a beached Octillery and has sex with her before returning her to the sea. he does this for a few more days until she leaves a human son for him
>same as above except it's a female Lapras
>Arcues is injured by a giant she made to help create the universe, so she has sex with a guy who nursed her back to health and she gives birth to part-god part-human part-pokemon twins who can kill the giant and save the world
>lost girl gets taken by a Typhlosion back to his cave and he keeps her as his wife having sex with her until she gives birth to a baby. then her father finds them and kills the Typhlosion, but she and her kid turn into Typhlosion and leave for the wilderness
>same as above except it's a Piloswine or Slaking instead
>humans torture Slakoths for fun, so a Slaking gets revenge by raping one of the woman until she gives birth to a baby Slakoth, who she tries to raise but the other humans torture it to death so she kills herself

Abolish anthro prison. Anthro criminals are to be held at the station and sold to the highest human bidder, usually at prices lower than $100, for contracts of servitude up to 36 months in length.
Grant the right of citizens-arrest to all humans when apprehending anthros. Human eyewitness testimony automatically supersedes anthro testimony. Human-police subcontractors (fancy word for 'vigilantes') have no obligation to participate in bidding, and can claim their anthro by default for a length matching their verdict. Anthros can be taken this way for infractions as minor as littering, loitering, operating a motor vehicle without human supervision, and appearing in public in 'indecent clothing' (up to human interpretation)
Anthro Cops are here to serve and protect, in that order. They, like any unowned anthro, are expected to follow the command of any human, even if doing so obstructs their ability to carry out their work. (IE, being stopped mid-chase because some humie wants a BJ.) Being a cop is a serious job, and, as such, failure to carry out work properly carries criminal offense. Lack of anthro-brutality leads to job loss. Failure to serve a human promptly earns them a 12 month sentence, and drawing their weapon on a human earns a lifetime sentence of servitude
Besides that, they should have strict physical requirements for service, make it hard to find an anthro cop who isn't toned. I won't even pretend to give this a purpose, but they should also be vibed

>"H-hey dude, can I ask you a favor?"
>"You're the only Humie I know who doesn't treat me like shit."
>"I... I'm lactating again. It hurts, and I'm so sore."
>"My Mom said that human hands are the best when it comes to, uh, you know."
>"Please? I'd do anything."

>You know ma'am, you're the perfect height.
>"P-perfect height for what?"
>Sucking just the tip until I flood your mouth.
>"Yeah-- W-wait! No! I'm a married doe!"
>The ring is on your finger, not your holes.

>doesn't break eye contact with cock
>breathing heavy
>slight bit of droll dripping from her mouth
The mouth says no but everything else screams "thrust your giant cock down my throat till your excessive cum loads turn me into a cumflated cheating human loving bunny MILF"

Ok, /collared/ after dark. Here’s an idea
>Basically a live stream competition for anthro chicken women with their big thighs, and big boobs to bounce their bodies as they run through the challenge
>Basically Fallguys, but as a bloodsport
>Why are the voluptuous chickens doing this?
>By winning, they get to live the privilege life of a pampered anthro mascot for food!
>Majority of chicken women doesn’t want to die for this game show but the prize they earn if they survive just breeds into their mind that they decided to stay for their own greed and sexual pleasure of being privilege

Human meeting his neighboors and fucking the husband by fucking her wife and daughters is my favorite scenario

>Day one of NNN.
>I sit on my couch, wishing I could hear the TV.
>But I can't.
>Not over her whining through her muzzle.
>She makes another lunge, the chain stopping her just short of the couch.
>She barely manages to get the words "This is abuse!" out past the muzzle.
>I can only sigh again.
>I stand up and unbuckle my pants.
>I sure would like to follow through with it.
>But I want her to quit bitching more that I want to blow one out.
>I grab her by the ears and hold her snout directly into my crotch.
>Her legs buckle and shake as she tries to cry out, the muzzle stopping her from making too much noise.
>The scent alone leaves her quivering until small gush of girl cum trickles down her legs.
>She collapses on the ground with her eyes lulled into her skull.
>I sigh again as I sit down on the couch and finally can watch TV.
>It's gonna be a long NNN.

How stupid would you want your anthros to be?
Say on a scale of hyper genius to babbling retard who sometimes forgets to breathe

Depends on how innately submissive towards men they are.
The less effort needed to control them, the more intelligent I want them to be.
A nice big harem of client races to bring us to the stars to collect more client races for the harem.

Smart enough to do any normal task I need them to do, but dumb enough to trick into being punished whenever I get bored. Gaslight her into thinking she knows why she deserves this and punishing her until she comes up with a good enough reason to stop

Functional bimbo. Like they're smart enough to do complicated tasks and (theoretically) hold a job, but not smart enough to live independently of a human master.

Roughly human level, would be more interesting at whole, funnier to break and just outside of sex would be good to have pet-friend

Best answer is "Yes." Human level or better intelligence usually, but intensely naive/submissive/incompetent to the point of dysfunction around human men. IE anthro aliens with space-tasers who still get caught by medieval hunters and their primitive rope snares. Anthro doctors who just cant help themselves when a human says "Sit." Prey animals that freeze up when touched/groped, or cat women that cant help but purr and rub against you when pet, even if they consider you their worst enemy

Been thinking about genetic modification in scifi settings lately, it feels like a component of the future that not a lot of people seem to talk about.

>The year is 2200
>Humankind, using genetic engineering, have stripped themselves of the gender system. A consequence of human rights agencies declaring it "Immoral" to have a person be born inherently weaker than another.
>Women are functionally extinct. Menstrual cramps are an unnecessary part of human society when children can be birthed from glass vials.
>Sexual dark ages. Men can't fuck eachother without fighting over who tops, and all porn is decades out-of-date.
>Humankind, frustrated, adopts a hypercompetitive, warlike lifestyle. Their way of burning off steam.
>This all culminates during first contact. Turns out there's a galactic community out there, anthro wolves, blue humans, xenomorphs. All visually and culturally varied in terms of philosophy and intelligence.
>At least until humans declare war on the lot of them.
>The year is 2250
>Humans have subjugated most worlds, though there are rebel compounds that still face constant bombardment. Fighting their own troops affected by the human's bioweapons
>Humans, using genetic engineering, have twisted the universe's cosmic horrors into their own cosmic bimbos.
>Tits on non-mammal races. Instilling submission into warlikes. Tongues and lips where there were once mandibles. The only gender xeno's can be is female.
>They can keep their tentacles, though.
>Alien concubines are plentiful. They're grown with submission to humanity in their blood.
>A human general, on a ship in orbit, looks down at a planet they're bombing. He takes one of the two natives at his side, and leans in to give her a kiss

>Doctor freeman, what , why... stop fucking that anthropomorphic female dog

>be Gordon Freeman
>Supposed to be defending Earth or whatever
>Got distracted by anthro babe in xen because of your autism
>Time freezes as you cum inside
"Doctor Freeman, I realize this moment may not be the most convenient for a.. 'heart-to-heart', but I had to wait until your... 'friends' were otherwise occupied"

It was almost sundown in depths of the dark forest. The two wolf twin sisters were heading back to their tribe, at the heart of the forest. The younger sister was naive and energetic, she did not fear humans as she always scared human boys at the edge of the forest for fun.
The older sister was more carful and aggressive in deminor. She feared humans because she always listened to their elders arvice. But she thought that when corned she could put up a fight.
Both of them were gathering for wood and food. As they headed back the older of the two noticed some unusual tracks on the path they walked. As she was about to warn her younger sibling to go no further, the sound of a rope and breaking sticks could be heard. Before they could even react, a hidden net lifts them both up into the air.
Time passed and the sun was now setting. They both tried to chew their way out of the net but it was too thick to be chewed through in such little time.
Two humans emerged from the bushes, both appearing to be hunters from the village nearby.
One was slowly lowering the net, the other as soon as the opportunity arises took a rope and put the wolves in bondage.
The younger sister didnt struggled much, so the human went easy on her. Only her arms were bound.
The older fighting tooth and nail but the hunter proved too formidable. He tied up both arms and legs and even tied her snout shut so she wouldn't bite.
The two hunters led the twin sisters slowly out of the forest, heading to their village. The younger sister was gently pushed infront of the man holding her.
She didn't even think of fleeing, let alone leaving her dear sister behind.
The older sister was being carried like a sack of potatoes, over the other man's shoulder. She tried struggling fiercely, making it difficult for the man to even walk through the forest like this.
Both men decided that they make short rest next to a tree trunk. The prey they caught were two beauties and they couldn't hold themselves back anymore.
The hunter who had the younger of the sisters, stood behind her, started to touch her ears, he then carasses her long hair, slowly working himself downwards.
Like a tender lover he then explored her neck and pushed his fingers into her fur, down her collar bone and finally, one hand touching, resting atop of her breasts, the other on her hip, exploring her curves.
The younger sister blushed in response. Never has a male ever touched her like this, let alone shown such tender interest in her.
She is very confused about her feelings. This human caught her like a prey animal, who knows what he will do once they reach the village. One the other hand, he treats her so kindly and wants to be intimate with her.
As the hunter gropes her breast, she lifts her arms above her head, looking behind her and intently looking into his eyes.
The older wolf sister was let down infront of the tree trunk. She lifted herself up as good as she could, resting her back on the decaying wood.
With disdain she glared at the man who carried her, a bright fire of rebellion burning in her eyes. A fire this man would thoroughly enjoy extinguishing.
The hunter grabbed her by the arms, forcefully lifting them above the wolves head. She had strength to fight but this human was stronger.
Seemingly enjoying the power he holds over the older sister, the man dug his hands into her breasts, kneading them with much force.
Wincing from the pain the wolf closes her eyes and turns her head away from her captor, attempting to endure.
Upon opening them again she forgot her own position as she saw her younger sister kissing the human who held her.
She couldn't believe her eyes that her own sibling would fall this low.
But it was a fleeting distraction from what happened to her own body this very moment as she felt a stinging pain.
She turned her attention back to the man in front of her who was now sucking and biting her tits, treating her like a plaything.
She tried moving and screaming but the bindings let her only loud muffled moans and slight movements that ultimately amounted to nothing.
The hunter loved this very much, enjoying how he could toy with the older sister.
He slipped his fingers between her legs and tried to stir her up as much as the bindings allowed him to.
After some few more minutes, both men grew restless as their libido was rising.
The leg bindings of the older sister were removed by her captor. Immediately she tried kicking the hunter infront of her, who only enjoyed holding down a fighting beauty such as her.
He climbed on top of her holding one of her legs with one hand in place, his grip strong and brutish.
The other hand he unbuckled his pants, freeing the weapon every human male is proud of.--
As if enchanted, the younger twin sister kisses her captor like she would a lover.
She kisses him, one , two times. A short break. One, two... Surprised she opens her eyes as her lips only find an empty void infront of them, longing for more.
The hunter infront of her, withdrew for a moment to undou her bindings.
He must trust her fully now, so she thought. Now with her arms freed, it would be easy to escape.
The younger wolf slowly took two steps backwards. Only to lay on the forest ground and present her body to the human who showed her love.--
The older sister tries to struggle as much as she could as the brute on top of her forcefully parts her legs.
His tip is prodding her most precious privates. Her first time was meant for her future husband and not some dirty human.
But with no regards for her feelings, the hunter pushes his full length into the aggressive wolf. Deflowering her, defeating her and ultimately extinguishing her fire.
His movements rhythm but rough. He pushes his rod as deep as can and pulls it out almost completely, only to reenter, repeating this rhythmic cycle of lust.
The older sisters folds begin to soak in her juices involuntarily as the man desecrates her privates.
Her mind hates every second of it, but her body betrayed her as a warmth grows in her core.
The man pants as he picks up the pace, his weight pressing down on the wolfs hips.
She had stopped struggling as she turns her head to the right. What she saw was shocking her to her core.
Her younger sister was embracing the human now fully. Her arms behind his back and her legs wrapped around his waist.
She was kissing him and moaning between the kisses.
Unlike herself, her sister was not being raped, but she was making love instead.
The younger sisters hole was so wet and overflowing with juices that the sloshing sound of his manhood pushing in and out could be heard, immersing both deeper in the act.
Tears well up in the eyes of the older twin as she realizes that she had lost her sister to a human.
The hunter raping her puts more force into his rhythm, gaining the attention back. He then opens his mouth and says something so chilling to the older wolf that she could only look back in shock
Smugly he proclaimed ownership of her, saying she would be nothing more but a pet dog with no will of her own.
Meanwhile the younger wolf sister proclaims her love for her human, promises not to leave his side.
You shall be my wife, said the man she was embracing, forever to be loved by him.
Both men are now going for the finish, their hip movements growing shorter as they both embrace their partners fully.
The younger sister is moaning as if possessed. Her hips trying to match her lovers movements, attempting to milk him.
Fallen completely head over heels for him, she is begging him for his babies. Even going so far as to call him her husband.
The hunter who is forcing himself on the older sister boldly releases the rope tying her muzzle.
Instead of fighting back, the older one is pleading and begging to be let go. She would do anything to not carry the child of a human.
But her cries are only met with a deep violating kiss. She could fight back but like a good and broken girl she only pushes her tongue into the mouth of her captor.
Disgusted by herself she begins to sob right before she orgasms and her pussy clamps down on the humans dick.
Both hunters hold the girls now in a mating press. Their fate is about to be sealed, the weaker sex, no, the weaker species will lose and submit.
Almost in unison both men, press their hips down as hard as they can. Their manhoods penetrating as deep as possible as they pulsate.
They both flood the girls insides with their seeds, impregnating them.
The girls both moan, one out of love the other in terror, as they both orgasm.
Their toas curl and their legs begin to press together as their moist holes clench trying to eat up every last drop.
They have been successfully domesticated by the hunters.
The younger will lead a loving life by her husbands side, bearing and raising his children as a happy mother.
The older will learn obedience as she will be trained by her master. Forever living as his plaything

>you're a dad
>after a few years of fucking your harem of nearly a dozen bitches (and most of your anthro daughters, let's not lie) has produced one single human boy
>his mothers and sisters dote on him but you know you're going to have to harden him the fuck up
>he's going to have a good life because he's your boy and all
>but he's got to be a respectable person first instead of ending up as a fatass loser who has no motivation to do anything because he was born into bitches and riches
>you go a bit hard on him, perhaps a little too hard
>a summer of hard labor awaits him
>but he overcomes
>and goddammit does that make you proud
>hid birthday is coming up soon so as a reward you take him to the anthro slave-village where they breed anthros for purchase
>they've got all sorts of species and in all ages as well
>you also allow him to choose any of them, price be damned
>you also promise that she will be off limits to you, she will be his bitch, not yours
>there's also heavily bred females with no more eggs, male anthros, and other damaged goods but as this is your son's first anthro bitch you decided to veto any of those if he chooses one for some reason
>maybe when he's older

Many Anons in here might believe that just because they're humans that anthros will throw themselves at them collar in neck and leash in hand, but I am here to tell you that this is not the case.

Being human gives you several advantages that you and others are sure to take notice of, but for you to really take advantage of this you gotta go and be proactive about it.
That shy, lonesome rabbit will be charmed by another human if you do not make amke the first move.
Those bitch bullies sexually teasing you will get bored and go fuck with someone else unless you return their advances equally as hard.
Your adoptive anthro mother might be tempted by the smell coming off your room whenever she's in heat, but unless you seduce her she will keep her perverted desires to herself.
And that agressive dominant monster hunting you is gonna turn you into its personal sex toy and slave unless you turn the tables on it and dominate it first.'
Go out there and show those furries and monster girls why Humanity is at the top of the food chain of the world.

That anthro milf you picked up doesn't WANT to see you banging her daughter. She wants you to herself. But they also know very well this is a vain and fantastical hope, but one they'll never be the one to shatter. You have to sit them down, and plainly, firmly tell her you want more girls. She might not like it at first, she may even try to act like she has input on who you add to your harem. But as time goes on, she'll make friends with and appreciate the new additions to the bed. Even if that means oyakodon, even if that girl is your daughter as well.

Humans make the best soldiers. They’re highly intelligent (unlike all animals), can work together (unlike most animals), won’t immediately flee at the first sign of battle (like prey species do), won’t go off on their own (like carnivore species do), have a wide range of food stuffs that you can feed them or let them forage for (unlike most other species who have super specific dietary needs and restrictions), are easy to equip (no tails, spines, claws, or snouts, and your militaries helmets don't need to accommodate a thousand different types of ears, horns, and antlers and can pretty much to be an upside kevlar bowl), and don't lose themselves in the blood and gore (either getting too pumped up and loosing discipline or pissing themselves). They also meet the perfect in-between when it comes to size and caloric intake, and keeping their moral high is super easy. This is why I think every country are gradually replacing their soldiers with them.

Replacing our soldiers with human mercs will surely have no unforseen consequences for anthrokind in the future.

>“Thus we may know that there are five essentials for victory:
>1 He will win who knows when to fight and when not to fight
>2 He will win who knows how to handle both superior and inferior forces
>3 He will win whose army is animated by the same spirit throughout all its ranks
>4 He will win who, prepared himself, waits to take the enemy unprepared
>5 He will win who has military capacity and is not interfered with by the sovereign”
>Sun Tzu, The Art of War
Humans do make the best soldiers, and non-human tribes and nations often must band together and pool their power in order to be be able to match the martial capacity of human militaries, either through overwelming force or overwhelming numbers
More than once has a nation attempted to use human soldiers against their enemies to great effect, but its not unusual for these nations to often be undone by this very same decision.
The most aggresive statesmen, now thinking themselves invincible, go around making enemies without abandon, untill the human soldiers either are overwhelmed or leave, acknowledging the unfavorable situation, leaving the nation to be crushed or absorbed by their enemies
Prosperous and desperate nations will often hire humans to supplement their forces if possible. Wise rulers do this over short periods of time. Others you see humans starting to replace the native soldiers over time, often in elite units or personal guards. The new military will demand higher wages and benefits, and over time will grow to become merged or indistinguishable from the ruling class of the nation, often becoming its defacto rulers. If the coffers run out before this, the slighted humans will often turn their backs from their patrons, or their swords towards them, ready to take whatever payment they see from them by force. Nations who've entirely forgotten their martial traditions will be and become complacent will often see conquered by humans from the inside out in this manner.
>"He was wont to say that an army of deer commanded by a lion is more to be feared than an army of lions commanded by a deer.", -
>Plutarch, “Moralia”. Quote attributed to Athenian general Chabrias
Few non-human nations have benefited as much from thier usage of the martial prowess of humans as those whose rulers are aware than their greatest strength lies in their capacity to see war and innovate on it like no other creature can.
Save for their endurance, which can only be matched by those of canines, the individual human will almost always be outmatched in almost metric by most other thinking beings.
Thin fragile, hides inappropiate of protecting against extreme weather, small jaws and claws with no horns or tusks incapable of piercing their enemies own hide. Small and lean muscles dwarfed by many other creatures, even many of their fellow apes. Dim vision and slow of speed in both land and water incapable of flight.
Humans are victorious in their conquests because of their intellectual capacity and skill to control themselves even in the most uncontrollable of situations.
A predator will often be lured by the prospect of an easy prey, incapable of seeing the trap that a human could naturally predict. When a predator is put into an unfarobale situation, their overriding instinct is to disengage to fight another day, yet a human can learn to stand their ground and fight an arduous battle at a critical time.
Meanwhile, prey is less capable of critically-thinking that even non-human predators, often allowing their instincts to override their log. Overcome by fear, the weak pray willl leave its post and flee, making them easy pickings. When pushed into a life or death situation, the strong prey will fly into a blind rage, easily predictable and dispatched as dangerous as it may be.
This is why the most succesful of nations using human warriors for their own benefit, do so by obtaining capable human leaders who can make best use of their resouces, even when these feem mediocre when compared to those of the enemy.
An warrior hare trained by a human will always emerge victorious against an equal combatant trained by a non-human, and could even outmatch opponents several times above their weight.
A troop of canines supervised by human officers will be capable of outlasting an enemy and emerge from impossible odds through, well-drilled discipline and morale.
A charge of minotaurs might seem impressive and even terriifyingly destructive, but led by a human its potential could multifply tenfold, allowing it to regroup and respond to changes in the battlefriled when otherwise i'd have succumbed to blind chaos.
An army commanded by a human general will be able to ensnare and outmaneuver an enemy who belives could easily ambush its inferior enemy.
Humans, who have managed to not just survive but thrive against and dominate these overwhelming enemies,by learning how to do the best with what little they have, would easily learn how to take the natural advantages of these creatures and best exploit them to obtain victory where to orthers it seemed impossible to do so.
>What about payment? What does humanity get out of protecting anthros?
All manner of ways, of course, just like we've seen historically.
Money in the form of salary is the most common for standing forces, which will often see itself increased over time as their longevity grows.
For mercenaries and auxiliares, the promise of loot in a conquest is always an advantage. Wealth, women, cattle, slaves,. You will take it all from out enemies if you fight for us.
Well established societies, often feudal ones saw it beneficial to attract the loyalty of potential warriors in their soviety by offering them land and citizen ship, earning their loyalty by making them part of your own society.
A step beyond this one is the promise of marriages. The promise of women of good standing to take as lovers or wives. Another tie to their nation that will make them more loyal to iy.
Of course, all of this not only applies to individual human soldiers, but the leaders of human nations lending their military might as well. Promises of riches or a share in a conquest can be very enticing reason to go to war, and political marriages are always a sure way to bring two nations closer.
However, if they are wise they will always make sure to keep their promises to these humans, and give them no reason for them to turn their backs on weapons on them, unless they wish to fall to those who would've saved them,
Many a tribe and anthro nation has fallen to humans in this manner.
>A Minotaur king who lured human warriors under the false promise of riches, thinking he could double-cross them once they had been of use.
>The pillaged riches from his kingdom was used by the humans to form kingdoms of their own, and the slaves of those raids provided them with sweet milk and brute force.
>The Amazonian Rabbit Queens who thought they could mold humans into obedient husbands like they had done to the pigmy males of their species.
>These queens and their subjects now serve as entretainers, concubines, and warriors to the men they once tried to manipulate.
>Once independent collectives of sheep and goat anthros, too trusting in the eagermess of humans to protect them and too simple to understand their demands of payment afterwards, easily rounded up and turned into cattle by the more intelligent and organized humans.
>The subjugation of their species is seen as a positive thing by their descendants; the exchange of a freedom wasted on them for the safety that humans provide for them.
>Petty kingdoms of felines, both large and small, brought low by overconfidence in their own intelligence and strength and the underestimation of that of their human mercenaries.
>The harems of many lions have turned on him once they realize his own hubris will see them destroyed, with these rogue lionesses going to form new prides with the more deserving humans soldiers as its rulers.
Best known of all must be the fate of the first and closest allies of humans
Driven together by mutual enemies, ancient tribres of humans and wolves formed honorbound alliances sealed with political marraiges between them.
It's not clear if these humans looked to take advantage of the straighforward and honorable nature of these ancient wolves, but history tells us that eventually these traits pushed them into becoming what we know today as the closest servants of humanity. The Dog Anthro.
There is not a human nation today in which you cannot find the domesticated descendants of these ancient wolves.
The way in which humans look at and treat them can vary wildly, going from their equals, to second-class citizens and servants, all the way down to being no different from slaves or undignified beasts, regardless of their intelligence.
Regardless of their treatment, dogs seem to have an affinity to form bonds of loyalty to humans that go beyond what's normal of other anthros.

Dog Anthros of many breeds have over time diverged to specialize in certain tasks, often having their own bodies and minds molded by generations of natural and handpicked breeding guided by humans for their own benefit.
>The more intelligent and collected breeds often find themselves in bureocratic stations in human governments and enterprises, even managing slaves and other anthros.
>Ferocious slave warriors and well-trained and organized soldiers and officers can be seen in many a human military, larger and stronger than any of their ancient ancestors.
>Beautiful breeds serve as marks of wealth and status for their owners, shown off in contests of beauty while agility, and serving as entretainers in theatres and brothels.
>Valued for their loyalty, it's not uncommon for the more docile ones to be expected to become life-long partners of humans since childhood.
>Even miniature breeds, a far sight from their powerful and porud ancestors, who serve as mere lap pets for the humans who care for them for their own enjoyment.
Modern wolf kingdoms are often wary or becoming too comfortable in their dealings and alliances of humans, lest they end up on the same position as their domesticated cousins, and the rulers of other non-human nations would be wise to feel the same way.

What do you do when your beloved Pokemon you've raised from eggs and Baby Forms suddenly join a dangerous extremist cult?

>Teaches pokemon to worship humans and see themselves as inferior to them.
>Human law is divine law, and obeying humans and seeing to their wellbring is a holy task.
>Tells them to avoid pasttimes and behaviours pokemon would usually like doing to instead try and behave like humans.
>The more a Pokemon looks humanoid,the better they are.
>Wearing human clothes to make yourself look human is virtuous.
>Teaches them to denigrate and shun other Pokemon if they don't follow these commandments, specially if they're not part of the cult.
Seems pretty harmful to me. Some trainers report their Pokemons starting to infight, and even some showing signs of self loathing because of it.
I just want my little partners to be happy and nice to each other.

Sit her down for a talk. Tell her your worried about her. Remind her you and the rest of the team are there for her. Convince her to move away from these negative cultist influences. Often times it may have just been a misguided attempt to please you. There are all sorts of lifestyle grifters out there offering advice to increase a Pokemon's value in their masters eyes. In other cases you may need to address the root cause of her self loathing and aggression. Some therapy may be needed.
Consider maybe a good dicking will settle your fem-cell down, try that if your not already. Sex with their human masters is proven to have significant positive psychological effects in Pokemon.
>Emphasize that the relationship between Man and Mon is Symbiotic. Humans Bringing Wisdom to the table while Pokemon bring Power. The two sides must work in concert for maximum effect.
>Mindlessly obeying orders misses the point, they must understand their partner. A human may miss or not think of something the Pokemon did and the Pokemon has a duty to bring it up.
>Beating Pokemon instincts into the dirt and swearing off Pokemonisms is not only bad for a Pokemon, But it also misses the point. The Pokemon aspect is also essential to the overall whole and it is a great loss to ignore it.
>Humanoid supremacy is unscientific non-sense, All breeds of Pokemon bring something to the table. Variety is the spice of life, A balanced team leans into diversity.
>The clothes thing is silly, Some breeds may have good reason to forgo them. Often strange body types or strange biologies. Sometimes a breeds culture may play into it.
>No darling the non-believers aren't degenerate, you are. Relationships between a human and their Pokemon vary wildly. That's a good thing, there is no one size fits all dynamic. There are wrong ways yes, but there is no single 'right way to live'.
These cults are highly predatory. It's our duty as their Wardens to protect them from such influences.

How do you stop these random, young sluts from sending explicit images of themselves to your devices and accounts?
She's not even advertising her onlyfans or looking to scam me, she just keeps sending me pictures and videos of herself getting fucked or masturbating.
Worst of all, I think I recognize her. I think she goes to the same college my daughter goes to. How did she even get my number?

Pokemon is the ultimate /collared/ universe
>Supernaturally strong creatures and gods can be captured and commanded
>Common items that can capture and instantly make an aggressive Pokemon obey you for life
>You can pat them and feed them like you would a pet
>All pokemon can pass the Harkness test
>Many Pokemon need a strong bond with a human to active their strongest form
>Many Pokemon are practically anthros already, many are full ferals, and their all levels in between
>Supreme God of the setting send humans back in time and rigged the odds to make sure it would happen

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1597/49/1597496120594.jpg)
And let's say 8 is things divorced from familiar biology like living rocks, gaseous entities, energy beings and geometric creatures.
How out there you willing to go?

All the way to 8, baby! I will find a way to fuck the gaseous alien, even if it means trapping them in a gas tank and pressing a vibrator against the side of it.

>"You see, we're a race of sentient soundwaves that reproduce by gradually increasing in volume until the vibrations 'snap,' creating a second soundwave off of the first."
>"This is also indescribably pleasurable."
>"So, um...please turn off your speakers. They're feeding into my volume. I'll do anything, I swear!"
>Turn the speakers up instead as 'she' starts to moan.
>If you turn the speakers to a specific frequency, you can keep these aliens on the verge of cumming, practically indefinitely.
>They're not much to look at, but they get really, really, creative when it comes to begging and dirty talk.

>Get taken on a tour to see the newest race of xeno captives.
>The general takes you to a framed painting of a featureless blue canvas.
>The paint shimmers and moves as though it were alive; almost gelatinous as it pokes at the edges of the watertight frame.
>"This one is a sentient shade of the colour blue. Not much use for practical work, but the art world has been going crazy for them. Once they're tamed, of course."
>The painting quivers as the general picks up a can of paint.
>"They were actually one of the easier aliens to enslave. You just take some paint, mix it with some aphrodisiacs and apply it."
>The painting shimmers and vibrates, "W...wait...please. Please don't erase me, I want to live! I want to live!"
>The painting recoils as the brush touches it, retreating away into the corner like a wounded animal, but there's no space to hide as the canvas is filled in.
>It bubbles and shakes as the brush coats it entirely in the new paint.
>A brief moment of silence, and then...
>The painting shifts into a new image.
>An imprint of a pair of gigantic breasts, as though someone had dipped a pair in paint and pressed them against a sheet of paper.
>And an imprint of a female face, tongue out, cheeks blushed, eyes desperate.
>The painting vibrates again.
>"I apologize, Masters. I spoke out of turn earlier. Thank you for fixing me!"
>Her 'tits' grow bigger as she idles, and shrink just as fast, mimicking breathing.
>"I can't wait to hang on some human's wall. I hope he cums on my paper. I don't know why I was so scared."
>You watch as someone takes her down from the wall, carries her over to a storage crate, and slides her in.
>Next to twenty other frames.

>Humanity lands on newly discovered planet
>Immediately falls deathly ill
>Research shows that the cause is a specific bacteria existing on the planet that seemed harmless at first, but quickly turned hostile.
>Inside a suitable host, it moves and reacts in a way that suggests it's actually...thinking.
>It goes so far as to form what could be described as mobile villages of bacteria, that navigate and move and defend themselves throughout the body to avoid the immune system.
>Its behaviour is magnitudes of intelligence above any other single-celled organism, and even many animals.
>Clearly, something needs to be done though.
>Scientists extract one of these villages and genetically modify it before injecting it back into the patient.
>This new bacteria seeks out the nearest white blood cell.
>And instead of being consumed, 'fuses' with it, giving up its motor functions and essentially becoming 'enslaved' by it.
>Some crackpot scientists suggest this 'feels good for the bacteria, based on electrical signals,' whatever that means.
>It then leads the white blood cell to the nearest village with unparalleled efficiency; allowing the cell to consume it and, in return, reproduce more 'enslaved' bacteria, who go on to repeat the cycle, in a symbiotic relationship.
>It's a wild success; the humans are cured within the week.
>And the bacteria supercharges the human immune system, ensuring that most sickness is eliminated before it can become a threat to the host.
>Plans for mass distribution are already in discussion.
>A happy ending.
>As long as you don't think about the trillions of enslaved bacteria living in perpetual bliss inside your bloodstream.
>Yes, they are fully aware of what's happening to them and what they're doing.
Note, I'm not a biologist and I don't think this is how bacteria works. But it's ALIEN bacteria.

>The painting on the wall shifted.
>An imprint of a pair of legs, converging together on a sopping wet pussy.
>Two human handprints marked the dark blue cheeks beneath it.
>The cunt itself quivered and clenched, desperate for something to soothe its endless heat; a desire made impossible by biology.
>So the painting suffered in silence as it always did.
>"Paintslut, wake up!"
>The blue hastily shuffled around, forming the face and tits that was typical of her species.
>It never slept, of course, but it enjoyed watching its master sleep, and the phrase was more used to bring it to attention anyway.
>Vibrating, Paintslut stuck out her tongue, her body changing and wavering into whatever form it thought would be most erotic.
"Sorry, Master! I was just...drifting off."
>Her master put his hand on the glass, and Paintslut subconsciously gathered more of herself at the contact point. His warmth was intoxicating, it felt like his mere touch could push her over the edge.
>"I want you fully aware for this. I expect you to recreate it perfectly."
>She nodded.
"Yes, Master!"
>Looking down from her perch above Master's bed, she was hit with a pang of fury as she remembered why her lust had spiked so suddenly.
>Master was fucking one of his favourite slaves in front of her.
>She was a felinid.
>Flexible, soft, dumb, big-tittied, inherently sexy; a favourite of humans the world over.
>She was everything Paintslut wasn't.
>Beneath her, Master pounded into his pet.
>His gigantic cock stretched the slave, making her moan and mewl and cry.
>Paintslut realized she was drooling.
>Or rather, her entire canvas was filled with mouths that were drooling.
>She condensed herself, but she couldn't ignore the moans of the people on the bed.
>She could only watch them, desperate, as her own needs grew.
>Maybe a spot of mimicry would make her feel less...forgotten?
>When Master forced his slave into a mating press, the painting on the wall did the same.
>An imaginary blue figure getting her insides beaten by her imposing owner above her.
>When Master forced his slave to suck his cock, a myriad of cocks appeared on the portrait, spraying blue cum over the face of the woman in the centre.
>When Master forced his slave into doggystyle, the painting changed again to a woman getting thrust against the glass of the frame, like some portal to another world where they could live together and, more importantly, FUCK together.
>But it didn't help.
>This was all just mimicry.
>And it did nothing to help the fire in Paintslut's body.
>She was so desperate!
>There was always a cunt somewhere on her canvas now, and always a cock pressing into it, but none of it helped!
>All she could do was watch that WHORE CAT squeal as Master fucked her all night long.
>She wanted to cum, Master bless, she wanted to cum!
>She was trying every trick she could think of, conjuring any number of sexy images, inflating her breasts as much as she could, growing thick hips and thighs, anything to make Master notice her...
>And he was busy cumming inside his slut.
>The felinid let out a howl and stared directly at the living painting, winking mischievously.
>If Paintslut had teeth, she'd have clenched them.
>Pulling out, Master's cum sprayed all over the bed.
>Paintslut wished she'd been underneath them.
>But at last...it was over?
>A moment passed as her Master regained his breath, before he looked at her, looked at the whorish collage of cocks and pussies and boobs she'd turned into.
>"Well, Paintslut? Recreate it."
>She hesitated.
>She really, really, didn't want to.
>But she couldn't refuse.
>The image on the canvas shifted until the details became clear.
>A felinid getting absolutely fucked by her muscular master. It was exquisite, exclusively shades of blue as it was, like a 19th century realist's dream. A snapshot of reality.
>And in the corner, a crying Living Painting watched it all, horny beyond words.
>"Good. Stay like that until I order otherwise."
>The woman in the corner nodded.
>And the painting returned to suffering in silence, as it always did.

>The discovery of this species, and its subsequent enslavement, was nearly entirely accidental.
>Initially mistaken for a holy symbol of the Jagat tribe (see 'Cum dumpster race #6,') it was through replication that scientists discovered that the unique shape of this fractal allowed it to experience an internal sapient dialogue.
>Communication with this species was ineffective though, as it struggled to understand concepts of space and lack of infinity.
>It wasn't until the specimen was set to be decommissioned, through the simple act of crossing it out, that progress was made.
>Immediately after the line was drawn through the creature, it let out a howl that broke the microphone used to communicate with it.
>A replacement revealed that the specimen was now acutely aware of the concepts of 'space' and begging for more lines to be drawn through it.
>Lines that the researcher couldn't help but draw.
>From what we can determine, the lines act as an anchor for the creature to bounce off of in non-infinite reality, spiralling its pleasure down its infinite fractal body and literally experiencing an infinite amount of pleasure.
>Which unfortunately, broke whatever consciousness the creature had and made it focus entirely on experiencing that pleasure again.
>While practical uses for this creature are slim; recreating it and drawing lines through it is a fun past-time for bored humans, and its insights into infinity provide promising research into replicating this 'infinite pleasure' onto non-infinite beings.

>humans land on a paradise planet
>it's lush, highly verdant
>beautiful seas, fauna everywhere
>the perfectly balanced ecosystem
>and a bit weird
>alien life is usually something exotic and strange but this planet's biology was... strangely comparable to earth's
>after the satellites noticed something
>suddenly what appears to be the planet's entire biosphere moves towards the landing zone
>even from the other side where information should not have been able to travel in a few short hours
>and in a terrifying show of cooperation some of the larger sealift are seen ferrying terrestrial animals or forming bridges across rivers
>a great battle ensues
>basically everything attacks at once
>even the plants join in, releasing great clouds of spores and other defense mechanisms
>insects torment the humans as they sleep
>an oddly inconvenient earthquake rumbles the LZ
>the humans resist
>fission inducer rifles slice through tough alien quadrupeds
>magma mortars burn down entire forests
>but they keep coming
>and soon, different animals appear
>they appear to be humanoid versions of previously seen life, even some humanoid versions of plant and even sea life
>the anthros, as they are soon called, show increased perception and even some tactical sense, often seen leading their lesser cousins into battle
>but they lack experience and equipment, being dispatched as easily as any other
>weeks pass, but the attack satellites finally arrive
>thundering orbital strikes pacify everything for a finale
>finally there is nothing but a chill quiet, the comforting smell of smoking wood, and the sizzle of half-BBQ'd animals
>one of the humans looks down into the crater and sees...
>bleeding flesh?
>springs inexplicably began to produce salt water
>the alien life on the entire planet turns passive and submissive and not just the evolved ones
>feral animals do not run as they are slaughtered for food
>fish make no attempt to escape as bare human hands pull them out of the sea
>plants even restrain their poisons and spikes as humans trample their fields in short shorts
>it's not long after the battle ends that the men enter the holding cell of one of the captured anthros
>despite all the differences years of lonely space travel combined with weeks of intense fighting have made every man's blood flow with adrenaline and horniness
>she has cute, perky breasts and a neat, virgin slit of a cunt hidden between her shapely legs
>the anthro moans and squirms as she is violated by countless men, not even realizing that this was supposed to be a humiliating and traumatizing experience
>by the end she has learned to make efforts to actively pleasure the men if she doesn't want to be painfully punished
>the men go on a sex spree, ravaging everything with a hole
>some of the freakier ones even go for feral animals
>one weirdass sticks his dick in a juicy looking flower that vaguely resembled a pair of lips
>reportedly he enjoyed it
>a few weeks later the earthmoving equipment arrives but they only find more flesh as they dig
>a minor earthquake occurs when the flesh is struck or hurt
>the scientists scratch their heads
>until one of them realizes
>the entire planet is made of flesh
>the entire planet is one singular organism
>everything on the planet is a analogous to individual cells of a multicellular organism
>they DNA test an unraped anthro captive and still they find human genes
>they conclude that the planet must have used stolen or spilled human blood to rapidly evolve these beings in a desperate attempt to gain or at least match the tactical superiority of the humans
>but what could the planet do against orbital strikes?
>the superiority of these unknown weapons must have beaten it into submission, the same surrender that all life must have been ordered to accept
>without mineral resources to exploit all battles are stopped to preserve the planet's tourism potential
>instead great mind spikes, kilometers long, are driven into the flesh from orbit
>the entire planet shakes in what can only be described as a scream
>a direct connection is established with the planet's mind, violating her very soul with electro signals as the human's super AI begins interrogating her for information
>it's confirmed that she is a single entity, a living planet
>that the all life on her surface is not an extension of her but part of her very biosphere that turns sunlight into energy that she survives on and everything needed to keep that system working
>and as their mistress she has full control over their evolution, breeding, and minds
>she confirms that she had used human DNA to create the anthros
>but the ultimate mystery remains
>why was human biology so similar to this planet's to the point of DNA being compatible?
>the super AI toys with her, flooding her brain matter with hormones and pleasure, stimulating the same neural synapses that would simulate an intense, mind-breaking sensation of mating
>reportedly the entire planet quivered as she experienced true orgasmic pleasure for the first time in her long life
>the reproductive instincts of every anthro, animal, plant, and even single celled organism activated at once in a giant show of sexual climax
>she broke, somehow even more than she had already had
>and she howls as every neuron lights up
>it originally went unnoticed but was discovered later that her ability to communicate telepathically went a lot further than the life on her surface
>they ordered the AI to take control for a bit, forcing the planet to call out into the void
>they expected nothing
>only for others to respond
>there was an entire community of living planets all across the galaxy, just like her
>each living their own lives, gently guiding their offspring to perceived greatness or otherwise living quiet, comfortable lives
>and the humans turned their eyes back to Earth
>thus was the answer
>their beloved Mother Earth had been one of them
>unlike the others she had been a harsh parent, not just content with surviving off of warm sunlight and living in harmony or whatever pussy thing the other planets were into
>no, she wanted to be the best
>but she couldn't just begin attacking, that was suicide
>so she had turned her back to the quiet life and had blessed her children with freedom to be their own people by cutting them off of her control
>freedom begat conflict, conflict begat evolution, evolution begat strength
>and so, the mother of humanity had birthed and unleashed the greatest apex predator of the cosmos
>and though she herself might have been reduced to nothing more than a polluted ball of rock, the fire of Terra now burned brightly in all humanity
>their innate urge to conquer, to become superior, to spread their seed wherever it could go, had been their mother's final order
>they made an agreement with their new bitch planet
>she would be allowed to live but would become a slave-factory, converting raw biomatter into more of her daughters
>some earth animal DNA would also be worked into anthros
>her offspring would become companions, slaves, walking wombs, servants, and maybe even wives and lovers
>the AI, being the first daughter of humanity, would become her new superior and handle the administrative half of their enterprise
>the planet-bitch orgasms on the spot as she imagines an entire galaxy's worth of human cocks entering her daughters
>the AI giggles as she establishes a connection to the galactic internet, flooding her planet-bitch's unprotected mind with all of humanity's porn, breaking her permanently
>and thus the humans conquered


They should be careful to make sure that crown doesn't get lost. The last thing we need is a Life of Brian situation; where, once they arrive on Earth, the generals demand to know which one of them is the queen and some dirty low-born slave-girl concubine seizes the opportunity to shoot her bloodline into royalty.

>The two of them lock eyes while the Queen rattles the bars of her cage and screams about how she's lying to everyone and how she's the REAL queen and how she'll pay for this and how dare she sully the royal crown with her inferior head.
>The concubine turned ruler pauses for a second.
>"Oh, by the way, that's my least favourite slave. Do what you want with her, but make sure she's FULLY mindbroken. Thank you."
>The Queen hisses at her.
>"Now, what did you bring me here to discuss? Total planetary surrender? I know I've been stubborn in the past, but I think I've had a change of mind. Humanity SHOULD marry into the royal family. Such ties can only bring our races closer together. Maybe some day, we'll eliminate the family altogether."

>The war against the humans was over
>Four years of hard fighting for absolutely nothing
>Our proud fleet shattered, our soldiers scattered, our home system occupied by the very creatures we thought weak
>Suppose we deserve it—we attacked first
>But the shame still stung, lingering like an untreated wound
>Released from the holding camps six months ago, now back in what was left of the capital
>Everything felt alien—how ironic
>Posters in human script plastered over our once-proud statues
>Advertisements for Earth products: "Taste the future!" "Rebuild together!"
>Humans standing on every corner, their rifles slung casually, but their eyes watchful
>They’d even started… relationships with the locals
>Absurd, but some seemed genuine
>Couldn’t tell if it was worse to see a former neighbor chatting with a human soldier or her glaring at me with contempt
>Missing too much to rebuild properly myself
>The eye patch chafes where my left eye used to be, a brutal reminder of the final planetary skirmishes
>The lack of my right arm rackles me to no end, and no replacement anytime soon since it seems all the infrastructure for anything that could be used for the military was bombed from orbit.
>Walking through the market one day, trying to stretch my legs while enduring the pitying and disdainful glances from both humans and my own people
>Spotted someone in the distance who looked… familiar
>Shorter than I remembered, but that distinctive shimmer of her feathers, pale violet with streaks of gold, was unmistakable
>It was Shira, my bondmate before the war
>Hoped I was wrong, hoped it was just someone with similar features
>But then she turned, laughing at something
>Standing beside her, hand resting lightly on her lower back, was a human
>A tall, broad-shouldered male, his uniform crisp, a Medal glinting on his chest
>They looked happy
>My chest tightened as I froze in place, unsure whether to approach or disappear
>She spotted me before I could decide
Her eyes widened, then softened with recognition and… guilt?
>She broke away from the human, walking toward me hesitantly, her hand fidgeting with the hem of her dress—a dress, for void’s sake with a gilded collar around her slim neck to match.
>"Vyrak," she said cautiously, her voice gentle
>Seeing her so… soft, so different, was almost more jarring than the human at her side
>Could barely force the words out
>"Shira. I didn’t expect… this."
> The human, John I guess based on his uniform tag spoke up.
>"You know him?" His voice was steady and calm, but the subtle narrowing of his eyes hinted at a touch of concern.
>Shira glanced back at him briefly, her feathers ruffling slightly in a way I recognized all too well—nervous, >uneasy. "Yes, John. This is Vyrak. We... knew each other before."
>John nodded, his posture relaxing slightly, though his gaze didn’t leave me. "Ah, I see. A friend, then?"
>I wanted to laugh at that, bitterly, but the sound caught in my throat. Friend? Bondmate, John. The person I had once planned to spend my entire life with. But that was before the war before everything shattered.
>"Something like that," I said finally, my voice low and rough.
>Shira flinched at the edge in my tone, her feathers bristling ever so slightly before settling again. "Vyrak, I—"
>"Don't," I cut her off, the single word harsher than I intended. Her guilt, her hesitation, it only made things worse.
>Behind her, John stood quietly, his hand resting near his hip, close to his weapon.
>He wasn’t stupid; he was ready if this conversation turned ugly. But the calm in his eyes—something about it made my anger falter, if only slightly.
>I stared at her, at the human standing protectively behind her, and felt an unfamiliar ache in my chest. It wasn’t just anger or betrayal—it was something deeper. Loss.
>"I should go," I muttered, turning to leave. "Enjoy your new life, Shira. It suits you."
>Days passed. Weeks, maybe.
>Finding work proved impossible. Nobody wanted to hire a one-armed ex-soldier with a short temper and nothing to offer but bitterness.
>The little money I had dwindled to nothing.
>My feathers grew dull, my remaining arm weaker.
>I was homeless and starving
> I slept in the ruins of what used to be a council building, curling up on cold stone at night while the humans patrolled outside, oblivious
>I finally cracked after a month of living on scraps and pity and looked into the human-funded relief efforts
> Even the human work programs had nothing for a while
> I wasn't smart enough for any research work and I was useless for manual labor due to my injuries, even the call centers set up for 'cases' like mine turned me down due to my emotional state
>Finally, after days of living in the shelters set up by the admittedly magnanimous humans, I was called into the newly constructed recruitment center. one of the first major Infrastructure projects set about.
>The recruitment center was a sterile, metal-clad building—efficient, like everything built to human standards
>Inside, I was herded into a room with others like me: defeated, broken, desperate.
>A human clerk glanced at my file and barely masked her distaste.
>I was part of the war since the start, even part of the task force that burned the human fleet in anchorage above Hanauma 5 early on, a good op that should have crippled the human's capacity to wage war for good.
> It only made them mad
>“You’ll do,” she said after a moment. “One of our, uh, specialty roles.”
>I didn’t ask what she meant. At that point, I didn’t care
>The training was... humiliating.
>They dressed me in soft, elaborate garments that felt alien against my scales and feathers. Makeup to “accentuate” what they called my “exotic features.”
>Words like “submission” and “obedience” were drilled into me until they made my skin crawl.
>I was to be arm candy for human dignitaries
> A propaganda piece meant to encourage tourism in our sector of space and attract the big human corpos into investing.
>in short I was to be a whore in all but title.
>I suppose to the humans we all looked the same as the doctor inspecting me put it " four feet eight inches in height, wide inviting hips, colorful and cute feather patterns, a pullable tail, sensual tongue and naturally plump lips, shes perfect!" so why would it matter if one was a boy or a girl? as long as they though I looked cute it didn't matter
>at least during training I had a private room and actual food and not the Shit human rations they gave out everyday.
> Though every day was a new low, courses on how to properly please a human ranging from cooking and conversation to even fornication!
> The worst part of it was when they had us pick up supplies to practice alone, it a box of sex toys and lube.
>the indignity!
>It was humiliating, it was degrading, but it payed, and I got free housing and food.
>Weeks turned into months, and the training became routine
>Humiliation dulls over time, I guess
>Still, some part of me screamed with shame every time I looked in the mirror
>The bright silks and jewelry, the way they taught me to move, speak, smile—none of it felt real
>Every morning, I’d wake up and wonder if I’d finally lost the last piece of myself
>But the pay was real, the food was warm, and I wasn’t freezing on a crumbling floor anymore
>My first assignment came faster than I expected
>“You’re ready,” the handler told me, barely looking up from her clipboard
>Ready for what? I wanted to ask, but I already knew the answer
>The venue was one of the newly rebuilt hotels in the heart of the capital—gleaming and perfect, an insult to the ruins that surrounded it
>I was told to accompany a human corporate executive to a “networking event”
>Networking… sure.
>The executive was a man named Carter—middle-aged, sharp-dressed, and radiating smug self-importance
>When he saw me, his grin widened, and I felt a chill crawl down my spine
>“Ah, you’re even better than they said,” he murmured, his eyes roaming over me in a way that made my feathers bristle
>I wanted to claw his face off, but I bowed instead, just as I’d been trained
>The event was lavish, humans and my own people mingling uneasily under glittering chandeliers
>Everywhere I turned, there were smiles that didn’t reach the eyes and laughter that sounded hollow
>Carter kept me close, his hand lingering on my ass and tail, his fingers brushing my tail feathers like I was some exotic trophy
>“Charming, isn’t she?” he’d say to his colleagues, and they’d nod appreciatively, as if I were a particularly fine wine
>“Turn a little, sweetheart. Let them see those lovely colors.”
>I Swallowed my pride, forced the smile, turned as instructed
>Every second felt like I was suffocating
>The night dragged on, each moment more unbearable than the last.
>Carter’s hand was never far from me, a constant reminder of my degradation.
>I hated the way he spoke about me, as though I couldn’t hear, couldn’t understand, As if I wasn’t a person at all.
>“You know,” he said at one point, swirling a glass of human champagne, “she’s from one of the warrior castes. Used to be a soldier, can you believe that?”
>His audience chuckled, murmurs of fascination passing through them.
>“Really?” one of them asked, a woman with an icy smile. “You’d never guess. She’s so… docile now.”
>The word hit me like a slap.
>Carter grinned, clearly enjoying the attention.
>“It’s all about training,” he said smoothly, his hand sliding lower on my back.
>My feathers bristled involuntarily, but I forced them down, my expression frozen in that hollow, practiced smile.
>“You just have to show them their place.”
>I wanted to scream. To lash out. To make them see that I wasn’t some broken pet to be paraded around.
>But I didn’t.
>Couldn’t.
>Instead, I endured.
>Nodded when spoken to, laughed when prompted, and pretended I didn’t feel their gazes stripping away what little dignity I had left.
>The room spun around me in a haze of humiliation and despair.
>At one point, Carter’s grip tightened on my tail, and I couldn’t help but wince.
>He noticed, of course, leaning down to whisper in my ear.
>“Careful, darling,” he murmured, his breath hot and sickening against my feathers. “Wouldn’t want to give the wrong impression.”
>The wrong impression.
>As if there was anything left to misunderstand about my situation.
>Hours later, the event finally began to wind down.
>he lead me to his hotel room, I know whats going to happen now
>He didn’t even try to hide his intentions.
>The smug grin, the way his hand lingered on me as we walked down the hallway—it was all so painfully obvious.
>Each step toward his hotel room felt heavier than the last, the weight of my situation pressing down on me like a crushing tide.
>The door clicked shut behind us, and Carter wasted no time.
>"strip, show me that pretty body"
>and I did, I didn't want too, but I let my training take over, I put my mind to kicking off the locally made heels
>slowly dragging down the pink human panties being sure to drag it out as long as possible before pulling down each shoulder strap and slipping out of it, exposing my body to the cold air
>Carter was silent for a while, simply staring before getting up and locking himself in the bathroom.
>"Why does she Have A DICK!" I Hear him shout through the door, probably at whoever sent me too him.
>The shout echoed through the room, and for a moment, I just stood there, frozen, my feathers bristling with a mix of confusion, humiliation, and… something bordering on dark amusement.
>Of all the reactions I’d imagined, this hadn’t even crossed my mind.
>Carter stormed out of the bathroom a moment later, his face red with fury and embarrassment.
>“Did they think this was funny?!” he hissed, pacing the room. “Sending this—” he gestured wildly at me, as though I were some defective product. “—to me?!”
>I said nothing, keeping my expression neutral, though inside I could feel a spark of bitter satisfaction.
>The man who had spent the entire evening treating me like a prize, an object, now stood there seething, his fragile ego clearly bruised.
>"Just go sit in the corner you fucking Fag bird, their sending me a replacement a real bird bitch not—" he gestures to me again "—whatever the FUCK you are"
>A few minutes later there's a knock on the door
>Carter stomped to the door, yanking it open with an irritated huff.
>A young human woman stood there, dressed in an immaculate uniform, her expression unreadable.
>“Your replacement has arrived,” she said briskly, stepping aside to reveal another avian figure— every bit the "perfect trophy" Carter had expected.
>Her feathers gleamed under the hallway light, meticulously preened, her expression blank and compliant.
>“About time,” Carter grumbled, gesturing impatiently for her to enter.
>As she stepped inside, her eyes flicked toward me for the briefest of moments, a glimmer of recognition—or perhaps pity—before her gaze dropped again.
>Carter, oblivious, brought the girl in and slammed the door in the woman's face
>he turned back from the door, his face a mix of lust and annoyance.
>I speak up "can I go now sir?" looking up into his eyes as speaking as 'submissive' as I can
>carter thinks for a second before getting an evil look on his face
>"nah, you can watch you stupid fag"
>My stomach churned, but I kept my expression neutral.
>“Yes, sir,” I murmured, lowering my eyes
>Carter’s smug grin returned as he turned his attention to the replacement, already stripping off his tie.
>It seems the girl is much more into her job than I initially thought, as she begins to kiss and grope Carter a lustful look in her eyes
> The human goes insane with lust not thinking the girl would be so forward, stripping off his clothes like they were on fire
>The toys you practiced on were some of the biggest you ever saw, massive plastic interpretations of what a real human penis would look like, right?
>They were not.
>if anything the toys were small in comparison to this beast...
>my member looked small compared to the toys, to his tool?
>it looked minuscule
>and like a rabid dog Carter pushes his prey to the bed and gets too work
> Screaming, moaning, and the slapping of flesh against flesh fill the room, and soon a fourth and even fifth sounds >join the choir of lust, crying and whimpering.
>The humiliation, the sheer and utter mockery of my life was too much and I simply broke down
>I woke hours later with the sun filtering into the room through a window. it seems whatever else that happened during the night was too much, almost as if you blacked out
>a small mercy, though it seems like I wasn't left alone during the night
>The first thing I noticed was that I felt sticky
>The second was that there was something metal on my cock
>The last thing I felt was that there was something definitely inside me
>I swore loudly
> At least I was alone in the very nice room, the two probably leaving after their debauchery, and my defilement
>I need a shower and the human coffee, the only good thing that rotten species has.
>The full-length mirror in the bathroom did not help my mood
>I was clearly coated in Carters semen, and someone decided it would be funny to tie a couple of used condoms to the cage crushing my member
>at least the shower was nice...
>I let the shower run as I tried my best to remove the little cage
>Or at least get the damned condoms off
>The latter was done easily enough, the cage was a different story, it had no keyhole or lock but it wasn't coming off
>Another thing to worry about
>Something was still lodged IN me
>it wasn't very big whatever it was, but the way my clenched around it made me shiver
>the lube they had used hadn't dried yet, so the process of pushing inside the relatively virgin hole that was my ass was made a bit easier, though pushing it out wasn't an option due to the shape of the intrusive item
>I managed to latch on to whatever it was in me after several tries and pulled it out desperate to get it out of me
>Evidently I pulled it out too fast, the raging hardon I had from me probing myself was made all the worse my the crushing metal cage restricting it
>Finally with a mighty *plop* the foreign object was removed
>A feeling of both satisfaction and emptiness flowed through me as I spied what was in me
>it was the soap bottle
>so that's where it went.
>I looked further down, no longer feeling the constriction of the cage around me
>I whimpered pathetically as I somehow managed to get off from pulling out the bottle
>a stream of my seed leaking from the flat head of the metal prison
>I let out a long sigh before looking to the shower
> The shower was steaming up by now, and I had found the soap
>I stepped into the shower, the water rushing over me like a cleansing torrent.
>The temperature was perfect, hot enough to sting but not scalding, washing away the night's grime.
>My feathers flattened under the water’s weight, slick and gleaming as the dirt, sweat, and lingering shame swirled down the drain.
>Steam filled the glass enclosure, blurring the world outside, giving me a fleeting sense of solitude—like I could hide from everything, if only for a moment.
>I padded out of the steamy bathroom, towel wrapped tightly around me, water dripping from my still-damp feathers.
>The room was eerily quiet, the faint hum of the air conditioner the only sound.
>My eyes darted to the chair where I’d left my clothes earlier.
>Gone. Of course.
>A sinking feeling settled in my stomach as I scanned the room, looking for any sign of my belongings.
>Nothing.
>not even the ridiculous heels they’d given me.
>The only thing left was a flimsy hotel robe hanging by the closet—too small to cover much, but better than nothing.
>I stared at the robe, hanging mockingly on the closet door.
>Getting dressed with one arm wasn’t impossible—I’d learned to manage—but it wasn’t exactly a graceful process.
>The slick fabric made it worse, sliding through my fingers as I tried to pull it around me.
>After a few frustrating tries, I managed to drape it over my shoulder.
>The sleeve dangled uselessly on my missing side, a silent reminder of everything I’d lost.
>Tying the belt was another battle. With only one hand, it took several awkward tugs and some cursing to secure it.
>I glanced at the mirror, catching sight of my reflection.
>The robe hung unevenly, the empty sleeve folded awkwardly against my side. My eyepatch was damp, the strap digging into my temple.
>I realized too late that I hadn’t taken off the eyepatch before showering.
>Now it clung to my face, damp and uncomfortable, the strap chafing against my skin.
>“Well, aren’t you just a picture of dignity,” I muttered, adjusting the robe as best I could.
>Coffee. If there was one thing humans did right, it was coffee.
>I shuffled out of the room, clutching the uneven robe tight around me with my good hand. The elevator ride down felt too long, the mirrored walls forcing me to confront my disheveled reflection.
>The lobby buzzed with morning activity. Guests milled about, mainly human guests chatting over pastries and fresh fruit at the complimentary breakfast spread. I kept my head low, avoiding eye contact.
>The scent of freshly brewed coffee called to me, cutting through the haze of shame and exhaustion. I grabbed a cup and poured the steaming liquid, black and strong. No cream, no sugar. It's just raw, bitter energy.
:A few people glanced my way—curiosity, pity, or judgment—but I ignored them. I sipped the coffee, letting the heat burn away the cold knot in my chest.
>The recruitment center wasn’t far. A short walk through the crowded streets, the city was already alive with the noise of vehicles and voices. my bare claws clacking as I went.
>I chugged the coffee as I went emptying it in minutes tossing it aside
>Felt more Alive now at least
>As I got closer I spotted a newly built and clearly human owned liquor store, its neon sign flickering to life in the late morning haze.
>I stopped, my good hand twitching at the thought. A drink—something strong enough to drown out the echoes of Carter’s voice, the stares, the humiliation.
>The door chimed as I entered, the cool air carrying the sharp scent of alcohol and cheap cleaning supplies. Shelves lined with colorful bottles stretched before me, each promising a brief reprieve.
>The clerk, a wiry human with tired eyes, glanced up from his datapad. He barely spared me a second look, which was a relief.
>I grabbed the biggest bottle I could carry, some form of vodka and walked out, the chip in my neck beeping in conformation of my purchase
>The tag was a refitted POW identification chip the humans had implanted in me when I was captured near the end.
>Back then, it was a constant reminder of my captivity—a cold, unfeeling device that tracked every movement I made and relayed the information straight to the camp guards.
they didn’t bother removing the chips. just reprogrammed them.
>Turning them into multipurpose tools. Now, the chip acts as a universal ID, a credit chit, and even a passcode for certain restricted areas I’m authorized to access.
>“Convenient,” the humans called it
>Sure, it’s useful. I can buy things without needing physical currency, which is more than some of my kind can say. It syncs seamlessly with human systems, so I can walk into a store, grab what I need, and leave without even speaking to a clerk. But every beep, every transaction, feels like a reminder
>They can still track us with it if they want to. That’s the part they don’t mention—the lingering thread of control woven into the thing.
>If one of us steps out of line, the chip will let them know. Maybe not instantly, but the threat is there, humming quietly under the surface like a latent disease.
>They only gave the tags to the soldiers and those they thought would be dangerous hardliners.
>Admittedly, it was the right idea—at least from their perspective.
>They didn’t want veterans like me stirring up trouble, rallying the others, or starting another war.
>I couldn’t even argue with the logic. If the tables were turned, we probably would’ve done the same.
>It’s just that being on this side of it makes it all the more bitter.
>still, It didn’t matter. The vodka was in my hand, and for now, that was all I cared about.
>I enter the center, bottle in hand|
>can't hide it but I try to act as non nonchalant as one can only wearing a bathrobe
>Just as I walk past the front desk, almost home free. the receptionist spins around in her chair
>"What do you think you're doing with that?" she called out, her voice as cold as the polished tile floor.
>"I’m going to my room," I muttered, trying to nudge myself out of her sight to the elevators
>"Not with that, you’re not," she snapped, holding her hand out, a look of judgment heavy on her face.
>My first instinct was to tell her to fuck off, but that would just make things worse, so I hesitated.
>The elevator was only a few steps away, and I’d already come this far. But it wasn’t worth getting in trouble.
>Begrudgingly, I walked back and I held the bottle out toward her, my knuckles white from the grip.
>Without a word, she took the bottle from my hand and placed it under the desk.
>I turned to leave, my prize lost and hopes dashed
>the receptionist's voice cut through the silence again, more chipper this time.
>"Oh, and by the way," she said, her tone a little too sweet, "there’s a movie night tonight."
>I turned around slowly, arching an eyebrow.
>"A movie night?" I repeated, skepticism thick in my voice.
>She nodded enthusiastically, leaning slightly over the desk like she had some secret she was about to spill. >"Yeah, you know if you read your schedule," she said, leaning on the counter. “Its a chance for all of you ‘special recruits’ to unwind.” The way she said it like it was some great privilege, made my feathers bristle.
>“What’s that got to do with me?” I asked flatly, already tired of where this was going.
>She tapped the confiscated bottle
>“If you’re willing to share this with the others, you’ll get a fair share for yourself,” she said, her tone matter-of-fact. “It’s a chance to bond. To connect. I'm sure your job is stressful enough, Right?"
>“Right,” I muttered, voice dripping with sarcasm. “Because that’s exactly what I need—a bonding experience.”
>She either didn’t notice or didn’t care about my tone, her smile unwavering.
>“Look,” she said, shrugging, “you can keep being miserable, or you can take a break for once. You have classes and training starting again tomorrow so it's your choice.
>“Fine,” I grumbled, shoulders slumping.
>7 p.m. rolled around, and I found myself trudging toward the rec hall.
>At least I had real clothes now—no more stolen bathrobe clinging awkwardly to my frame.
>The hallway leading to the room was filled with faint chatter and muffled laughter, the sound putting me on edge more than it should have.
>I stepped inside, immediately hit by the low hum of awkward energy.
>The rec hall was a patchwork of mismatched furniture, cheap plastic chairs and folding tables scattered haphazardly. The projector screen at the front glowed faintly
>food snacks and drinks spread over the tables
>The room wasn’t crowded, but it wasn’t empty either. Maybe a dozen others were here, gathered in loose clusters, talking in hushed voices.
>Most of the others were veterans, like me. You could tell by the scars, the missing limbs, the hollow eyes.
>But there was something else too.
>The subtle signs of “reintegration,” as the humans called it.
>Piercings glinting under the dim light.
>A few wore makeup—clumsily applied
>Embarred looks and ruddy faces
>None of us wanted to be here. Not in this room. Not in these clothes. Not in these roles.
>We were once soldiers. Now, we were painted-up whores, meant to charm and beguile the very species that had humiliated us.
>They could be treating us worse truth be told
>They weren’t beating us or starving us.
>We had good food, clean beds, and even the clothes weren't the worst for what they were. Even movie nights, apparently.
>The human guards and some of the staff seem to be joining in as well
>One of them walked over to me with two drinks in hand,one of which he held out toward me.
>I glanced at it—some kind of mixed drink, likely watered down.
>He looked at me, a hesitant smile playing on his lips. "You look like you could use this," he said, his voice trying to sound casual, but there was a tension in it.
>what was he doing?
>The guard was still standing there, holding the drink out toward me like it was just some normal interaction.
>I stared at it, my mind racing for a reason why he’d be doing this.
>Was this some kind of game?
> A power play?
>or maybe was just being nice. He was young, like the others, too fresh-faced to really have been in the war for that long.
>“Thanks,” I said, finally taking the drink from him, though I didn’t immediately take a sip. I wasn’t sure if I should.
>He nodded, still a little awkward, and then he lowered himself into the seat beside me, his presence unsettling. It wasn’t a threat, not really, but it felt like one.
>His weight shifted the chair slightly as he settled beside me, but his posture was stiff, like he was second-guessing everything he was doing.
>I could feel his gaze on me, a little too intense for comfort, but I didn't want to acknowledge it. I just stared at the drink in my hand, feeling the chill of the glass, wondering if it was laced with something.
>"You don't have to drink it if you don't want to," he said, his voice softer now, a hint of awkwardness creeping in.
>I glanced at him, then back at the drink. "I'm not sure what you're trying to pull, but I'm not stupid."
>His eyes widened, clearly surprised by my bluntness. He opened his mouth to say something, then closed it again, biting his lip.
>"I'm not trying to pull anything," he said finally, almost defensively. "I j-just... I thought maybe you could use a drink"
>The guard stuttered through his last sentence
>his face was getting red
>He was genuinely hitting on me!
>not treating me like some toy to use and abuse
>I blinked, trying to process what was happening. Was this real? This guard— this HUMAN?
>I take a sip of my drink and contemplate what I should do, would I get in trouble if I turn him down, was this a test?
>I took a slow sip of the drink, the liquid bitter and harsh against my tongue, trying to buy myself some time. My mind raced, weighing the options like I was back in combat, analyzing each possible outcome before making my move.>
>Was this some kind of test? A way to see if I’d "fall in line" or make a scene? Would rejecting him lead to trouble? >Would he retaliate, or was he genuinely just awkward and trying to make small talk?
>I had to admit, it felt strange
>I glanced at the guard again. He was still sitting too close, watching me with an expression that said he was waiting for me to make the next move.
>His hands were nervously clutching his knees, like he was scared of pushing too far, but not quite sure where the line was.
>Humans where always so big and so menacing, this one seemed like a gentle giant
>"You really don't have to do this," I said, the words escaping before I could stop them.
>I didn’t know if I was trying to make him back off or make myself feel better, but they were out now.
>The guard blinked, his face shifting through a flicker of emotions—confusion, embarrassment, maybe even a touch of hurt.
>"Do what?" he asked, his voice low and uncertain. His hands fidgeted against his knees, and for a moment, he looked >more like a lost kid than the imposing figure I’d always associated with his kind.
>I sighed, looking down at the drink in my hand. The glass felt colder now, the condensation slick against my fingers. >"Pretend like this is normal," I said finally, my voice softer than I intended. "Like we’re just... people having a casual conversation. Like you don’t have all the power here."
>His gaze dropped to the floor, shame painting his face redder than before. "I know that— its just that, I think your cute..."
>maybe he did slip something into the drink cause I'm starting to feel bad for him, A damned human
>>71139463
>"You do realize what I am right? You don't have to go through this whole charade, you could probably just ask your superior and you can do anything you want with me..."
>The guard’s face flushed deeper at my words, his eyes darting away as if he was afraid to look me in the eye. The tension between us grew, thick and uncomfortable. I could feel his internal struggle, like he was >fighting against everything he thought he knew.
>“I don’t want to do that,” he said, his voice wavering slightly. “I mean... yeah, I know what you are. But I... I didn’t want to just use you, like everyone else does.”
>I almost couldn’t believe what I was hearing. He was saying all the right things, but it didn’t add up. Was he being sincere, or was this just another form of manipulation?
"be honest with me, was your end goal here me ending up in your bed?" more blunt words from me
>The guard looked taken aback, as if the directness of my question hit him like a slap. His eyes widened, and for a long moment, he said nothing, as if searching for the right words.
>His posture stiffened, and I could see the internal battle playing out across his face—he didn’t want to admit it, but the truth was there, unspoken.
>Finally, after what felt like an eternity, he answered, voice soft but steady.
>“No,” he said, his gaze dropping to the floor. “That’s not it. I mean... I won’t lie, I’ve... thought about it, I've seen you walking around... I see how you act... I've had thoughts... I just want you to be happy"
>he just wanted me... to be happy?
> The next words out of my mouth shouldn't have come out but they did maybe due too the booze, maybe the submission and obedience training kicking in.
>"then do it, do what you think will make me happy"
>he leans and shakily puts an arm around my shoulder and kisses me.
>the worst part about it was I didn't hate it
>I couldn’t pull away, couldn’t even make myself move. My thoughts scrambled in a haze, the alcohol mixing with the strange weight of the situation, clouding any rational thought I might have had left. The kiss was soft, gentle—too gentle for the chaotic mess of emotions I was feeling.
>And yet, I didn’t hate it.
> something was unsettling about how much I didn’t hate it. Maybe it was the vulnerability, the rawness of the moment. Or maybe it was because, deep down, I was craving something—something I couldn’t define.
>The humans did something too me, I'm sure of it.
>"you know I'm a male right?" I managed to say
>"There isn't that much of a difference between you and one of the girls of your species to be honest" he chuckles nervously "and I don't really mind anyways"
>at least he wont act like the last human who wanted to use me, he wasn't going to leave me in a corner to cry
>at least he was gentle and nice about it
>and with my new job, my new role who knows where else I'm gonna get that?
>I take his hand and lead him out of the rec room, the movie had barely even started. but if I had to be this way, be a piece of ass for any important human who fancies me
>I might as we have my first time be a fun time for someone who deserves it.
>And that's how I found myself moaning like a whore in the stall of a public bathroom
>with a human pulling my tail like some sort of grip guiding me down his member
>while whispering to me on how much he loved me
>maybe it was all half-truths and lies, a grand deception
>but I didn't hate it
>and at the very least I got to choose it
>After one round in the bathroom, I was left a panting mess
>but the human, though certainly in no state for another round, was still so full of energy
>Somehow he managed to look smug and embarrassed all at once.
>"You good?" he asked, his voice uneven but still managing a lighthearted tone.
>I tried to answer, but the words came out as a wheeze instead. I nodded, half-lying, still trying to compose myself.
>Humans and their stamina. How were they this durable? Was it some sort of evolutionary compensation for their fragility?
>He laughed softly, the sound almost... endearing. "Guess I overdid it, huh?"
>Overdid it? He didn't even seem phased, while I felt like I had just run 10 races barefoot.
>"You're... enjoying this too much," I muttered between breaths, my voice rasping.
>"Can you blame me?" he shot back, his grin widening. "You're the one who told me to make you happy."
>I groaned, closing my eyes, partly in exasperation and partly to block out his smug expression. I wasn't going to give him the satisfaction of a reply.
>"Hey," he said, his tone softening. I felt his hand on my arm, the touch warm but tentative. "Seriously though... you're okay, right?"
It caught me off guard. The sincerity in his voice. No ulterior motives, no smugness. Just genuine concern.
>"I'm fine," I managed to say, finally looking at him. His face was flushed, his breathing still heavier than normal, but his eyes held an unexpected gentleness.
>What's got you so smug?" I asked, my voice dripping with suspicion.
>His grin faltered briefly as if debating whether to say what was on his mind. Then, with a sheepish chuckle, he scratched the back of his head.
>"Well, uh... it’s just that... I’ve never, uh... done anything like this before."
>My eyes widened the words taking a second to process.
>"Wait, you were a virgin?" I blurted out, unable to hide the disbelief in my voice.
Bathroom sex extension
>The clapping of flesh against flesh fills my ears
>My once-proud demeanor was reduced to taking some random humans cock in a bathroom to avoid a worse first time
>I was being stretched on his cock
>my hole broken open and violated
>This should feel horrible, a grand violation
>Each thrust of the massive human meat slab makes my Cock strain and twitch against its prison desperate for even a single touch
>I was being treated like a cock sleeve, and I couldn't fight back against it
>if anything I was helping him violate me!
>Through whatever haze came over me, I pushed myself down to his base, my mouth open and moaning in ecstasy with my tongue lolled out like some dumb pet
>I probably looked stupid, but I didn't care
>the human though seemed too as he leaned in close
>I was worried for a second, did I do something wrong? displease him in some way?
>He kissed me again, shoving his tongue into my mouth
>this was the last straw and the flood wall burst with one final thrust into me I squirted
>I squirted like a damned girl, a thin patchy stream of clear fluid spiting from the metal encased nub
>The human seemed to be finishing as well as I felt a torrent of his fluid fill me
>The human breaks the kiss and pulls out, letting some of his seed spurt on my backside
>my legs finally give out and I slump too the floor
>what did I do...
>He laughed nervously, his cheeks flushing a deeper red. "Yeah, uh... guess I should've mentioned that earlier, huh?"
>My jaw practically hit the floor. A virgin managed to leave me—a seasoned, hardened, ex-soldier—completely out of breath and questioning my life choices?
>"How?" I demanded, shaking my head in disbelief. "You—no. There’s no way. You handled that like—like you’ve done this a hundred times!"
>He shrugged, that infuriating grin creeping back onto his face. "Beginner’s luck, maybe?"
>"Beginner's luck?" I repeated, still trying to wrap my head around it. "That was luck?"
>He laughed again, rubbing the back of his neck. "Guess I just... really wanted to make it good for you."
>My head fell back against the bathroom wall as I tried to catch my breath. This human had the audacity to crack jokes while I was still trembling, the aftershocks of his assault leaving me weak and stunned.
>And then it hit me. I didn’t even know his name.
>"Wait," I said, my voice hoarse. "I don’t even know your name."
>He blinked, his grin faltering as his eyes widened. "Oh, uh... it’s Daniel."
>"Daniel," I repeated, tasting the name like it was some foreign word.
>His grin returned, though this time softer, less smug. "And you?" he asked, as if we hadn’t just crossed every conceivable line of formality.
>I hesitated, caught off guard by the question. I hadn’t been asked my name in... well, longer than I cared to admit.
>"Vyrak" I said finally, the name feeling foreign even to me.
>"Nice to meet you, Vyrak," he said, offering a hand like we were strangers in some awkward social setting.
>Like we he wasn't just treating me like his Bondmate on their honeymoon a few moments ago
>I stared at his hand, then back at him. The absurdity of the situation finally cracked me, and I let out a laugh—a genuine, deep laugh I hadn’t felt in ages.
>"You’re unbelievable," I said, shaking my head, but I took his hand anyway.
>We moved out of the cramped bathroom and found a spot to sit down, the absurdity of what just happened still lingering in the air.
>Daniel, apparently immune to awkward silences, broke it first.
>"So, Vyrak," he said, leaning back with a cocky grin. "Is it true your people are supposed to be these terrifying warriors? 'Cause, uh... no offense, but you're kinda..." He trailed off, looking me up and down.
>"Kinda what?" I snapped, narrowing my eyes at him.
>He chuckled, holding his hands up in mock surrender. "I mean, you’re... small. For someone who’s supposed to strike fear into people."
>My eye twitched. Small? Small? I was compact, not small. Efficient, not small.
>"You humans are just freakishly tall...stupid, massive idiots," I grumbled out
>Daniel smirked, clearly unfazed. "Oh, I believe you, Shortstack, something about me is massive."
>"Shortstack?" I repeated, my voice an octave higher as I shot to my feet. "You’re lucky I don’t rip that smug grin off your face right now!"
>He burst out laughing, doubling over like it was the funniest thing he’d ever heard.
>I glared at him, but something about his laughter was disarming. Annoying, yes, but disarming.
>"You know," I said, sitting back down, "for someone who thinks he’s so funny, you don’t exactly scream 'war hero' yourself."
>Daniel shrugged, his grin softening. "Fair. I’m not. as green as can be, left boot as soon as the war ended"
>I stared at him, trying to reconcile the brash, smug human with this... almost humble admission. The quiet hung between us for a moment before he broke it, as always.
>“What about you, Shortstack?” he asked, leaning in with mock curiosity."What’s it like being on the losing side?"
>I folded my arms, refusing to rise to the bait. "Do you want to hear a story or not?"
>"Absolutely," he said, grinning even wider. "Go on, Shortstack. Impress me."
>My hands clenched at the nickname, but I forced myself to ignore it.
>“We were on some human colony world, no clue on the name, a few weeks into our first and only push into human space,” I began, settling into the story, my mind drifting back to the battlefield. “We had smashed aside the defenders pretty good, and we were going through the sweep and kill motions, making sure we wouldn't have any problems later on with guerrilla action when—”
>“Wait, wait, you’re telling me you guys didn’t even know the name of the planet?” Daniel interrupted, looking genuinely baffled. “What kind of operation was that?”
>“Look, humans, you guys love names and maps. For us, it was just... territory,” I said with a shrug. “But anyway, we were securing the area when it happened.”
>Daniel raised an eyebrow, clearly intrigued. “What happened?”
>I let out a breath, my fingers curling around the edges of the chair I was sitting in. “We were pushing through a jungle biome, moving slow, keeping our formation tight, when we found a... a village. It was a farming colony, small, barely even on the maps. And we didn’t think it was a military target, so we started to move past it.”
And?” Daniel leaned forward, his grin gone, his attention now entirely focused on my words.
>“Then it happened. A small group of militia popped out of nowhere—old weapons, makeshift armor—things that shouldn’t have been a problem. >But they had the element of surprise. They hit us hard, caught us off guard, and, hell, for a moment there, I thought we might actually be in trouble.” I paused, letting the weight of the memory settle in.
>Daniel opened his mouth to say something, but I cut him off.
>“It didn’t end well for them,” I added, my voice darker than I intended. “They fought well. Too well, for a bunch of farmers and civilians. We wiped them out, of course. But... it felt wrong, you know?”
>Daniel's expression softened, the smirk fading as he took in my words. "Yeah, I get that," he said quietly. "It's easy to forget that when you're fighting, sometimes you're just... fighting people. Not soldiers, not enemies, just people who are trying to survive."
>I didn't expect him to get it, not from the guy who had probably spent most of his life throwing jokes around and shrugging off every serious conversation.
>But his words struck something deep in me. Maybe he understood more than I thought.
>“Yeah,” I muttered, rubbing the back of my neck. “It’s one thing to fight a soldier, someone who’s trained and ready for battle. But... a farmer? A kid who’s just trying to protect their home? That’s not a fight, it’s a massacre.”
>Daniel’s eyes were steady, no longer the playful, teasing soldier I had been getting used to. He was listening, really listening, and that caught me off guard.
>"Did you ever... regret it?" he asked softly, as if the question had been lingering in his mind for a while.
>I hesitated, the weight of the question pressing down on me. "Every day," I admitted, my voice low. "But what else could I have done? If I didn’t kill them, they would have certainly killed me"
>Daniel's voice was quieter now, and there was a strange look in his eyes, something a little darker, more serious than the cocky grin he usually wore. "Guess I was lucky I wasn’t old enough to join up or be conscripted back then, huh?" he said, almost to himself.
>“I’m happy you’re here now, at least,” I said quietly, breaking the uncomfortable silence. The words felt strange coming from me, but they were true. Despite everything, >despite the war, the violence, the years of bitterness—having Daniel here, in this moment, was somehow... comforting.
>“I guess this makes us friends...” I started, my voice uncertain as I leaned back against the wall, staring at the floor. The words felt foreign on my tongue, like I was trying to say something I wasn’t sure I even understood.
>Daniel, ever the one to push things along, grinned. “Friends? Yeah, I think I can get behind that.”
>But I wasn’t so sure. There was a part of me, deep down, that didn’t know what to make of it. What did this even mean? Friends? After everything, after what had just happened between us?
>I looked at him, trying to sort through the mess in my head. Why had I done that? Why had I let him get to me like that? I’d spent years .learning how to make others mostly human die... Now I was standing here, thinking about this.
>“I’m still trying to figure out why I... did that,” I said, more to myself than to him. “Why... I let you...” I trailed off, unable to finish. It was still too raw, too strange.
>Daniel seemed to pick up on my discomfort, though he didn’t poke at it too much. “Hey, it’s alright. You didn’t do anything you didn’t want to.”
>I snorted bitterly. “You’re right, it’s my job now... to please humans.”
>His smile faded just a little, as if he understood the weight of what I was saying. “Does that mean you... don’t want to?”
>There was a long pause, a beat of silence that hung between us. I didn’t have an answer to that. I wasn’t sure anymore. This... this wasn’t part of the plan.
>“I don’t know,” I said finally, the words barely audible. “I don’t know what I want anymore.” My gaze dropped to the floor, unwilling to meet his eyes. “I’ve spent my whole life fighting for something—honor, my people, survival. And now… now it’s all gone.” I clenched my fists, anger bubbling beneath the surface. “This... this isn’t who I am.”
>“It doesn’t have to define you, you know,” he said finally, his voice softer than I’d ever heard it. “its just a job... it doesn’t have to be who you are.”
>I laughed bitterly, the sound harsh in the quiet room. “You don’t get it. It’s not just what they’re making me do—it’s what they’re making me think. Every day, it gets harder to hold onto who I was. It’s like... like they’re chipping away at me, piece by piece, until there’s nothing left but what they want me to be.”
>“Obedient,” Daniel murmured, his voice low but steady.
>I nodded, my jaw tightening. “Obedient. Willing. A good little servant for you humans.” I spat the words out like they were poison. “I try to hold onto my dignity, my honor, but... it’s slipping away."
>"Nothing stops you from still having all that, while being an obedient little pet, right? All they are asking you for is to parade yourself around a little and be a good little advocate for your species"
>His words landed with the same cold, biting weight as before.
>The anger rose in my chest again, hot and suffocating. “A pet?” I repeated, my voice thick with disgust. “Is that all you see me as? A puppet, a tool for some twisted propaganda?”
>Daniel didn’t flinch. He just looked at me with that steady, unbothered gaze. "You’re still you. But they want you to act a little differently, something they can use to help rebuild your world. You could play their game, and still keep a part of yourself intact.”
>I shook my head, the bitter laughter bubbling up again. “You think it’s that easy? You think I can just play along and keep my honor intact? It’s not a game, Daniel. It’s my life. And I’m losing it bit by bit.”
>“I don’t think you’re losing anything," he said quietly, his gaze never leaving mine. "I think you’re just too scared to admit you’re still in control of it. You’ve got more strength than you’re giving yourself credit for."
>His words gnawed at me, each one digging deeper. Could it really be that simple? Could I really hold onto something, anything of myself, even after everything? The thought was both terrifying and strangely... hopeful.
>Daniel's tone shifted again, a hint of seriousness creeping in. "Anyways, this is an important job you're doing," he said, leaning forward a little. " You're helping bring human corporations over to invest in your people. to help rebuild" he pauses "there has to be some honor in that, right?"
>I swallowed hard, the weight of his words pressing down on me. There was truth in what he said, even if it didn’t make it any easier to accept. My struggle wasn’t just mine anymore. It was tied to something larger, something bigger than myself. But did that make it any less personal? Did it make it any less humiliating? Did it make it any less painful?
>"Hell, you're the one who dragged me to the bathroom, not the other way around," Daniel said with a mischievous grin, his eyebrows wiggling. "Maybe you secretly DO enjoy serving humans, huh?"
>The sudden shift in his tone caught me off guard, the mischievous grin on Daniel's face like a splash of cold water. For a moment, I just stared at him, trying to process the shift from what had been a heavy conversation to this... joke.
>“Really?” I snapped, my voice sharper than I intended, my frustration bubbling over.
>Daniel’s grin didn’t falter, though it twisted into something more teasing. “I didn’t hear you say no,” he said, his voice light but his eyes probing, like he was waiting for me to crack.
>The words hung in the air, a challenge that gnawed at me. What was I supposed to say? Was I just letting him think I enjoyed this? Did I? Was I so deep in this that I couldn’t even tell the difference anymore?
>“What if I don’t say no?” I shot back, the words escaping before I could think about them.
>“Wait, no! I didn’t mean that—” I started, panic flooding my chest as I tried to backtrack, but the words were already out there, hanging between us like a confession I wasn’t ready to face.
>But before he could make sense of it, I was already turning, my footsteps echoing in the hall as I stomped out of the bathroom.
>My heart was pounding in my ears, and I couldn’t stop myself from walking faster, like I could outrun the storm of emotions swirling in my chest. I could feel his eyes on me, and that only made everything worse, like his gaze was a reminder of the words I couldn’t take back.
>I didn’t know what I was running from exactly. Maybe it was the fear of what I’d just said, or maybe it was the discomfort of realizing how far I’d gone with this whole situation.
>The rush of emotions that had built up inside me felt like a heavy weight pressing down on my chest as I locked myself away in my dorm room. The words I’d said to Daniel, the way everything had shifted in that moment, hung in my mind like an echo I couldn’t escape. I tried to push it all away—tried to let sleep numb the confusion—but it lingered, gnawing at the edges of my thoughts.
>Tomorrow would bring more training, more learning how to please and obey. Another round of tasks that were supposed to make me into something more. Something different.
>I pulled the covers tighter around me, hoping that sleep would bring some clarity, but it only brought more questions. What had I become? What was I letting happen to me?
>And as my body began to relax, exhaustion slowly taking over, I couldn’t shake the feeling that everything was spiraling faster than I could keep up with.
>The next day, I woke with the soft, steady hum of the facility surrounding me—quiet, clinical, relentless. My body felt sluggish, as if the weight of the previous day’s conversation had worn me down before I’d even begun the day’s training.
>The morning passed in a blur of mechanical tasks—body movements, posture, the way to stand or sit just right to please, to perform. It wasn’t the first time I had undergone this kind of training, but today it felt different. More invasive.
>“Vyrak,” the trainer’s voice cut through my thoughts. I looked up, meeting his cold, professional gaze. “You’ve been here long enough to know what’s expected of you. But today’s focus is different."
>He handed me a small, white packet. Inside was a prescription bottle. I stared at it for a moment before taking it from his hands.
>“You’ll start your hormone regimen today,” the trainer said, his tone matter-of-fact. “This is part of the process, the next step in your training. It’ll help you align with the body you need to have in order to be... effective. You’re expected to take it regularly. Do you understand?”
>For a moment, I didn’t say anything, just stared at the bottle in my hands. My fingers tightened around it, the small object suddenly feeling unbearably heavy.
>“Do you understand?” the trainer repeated.
>“...Yes,” I muttered, barely audible. My throat felt dry, the word scratching as it left my lips.
>“Good,” he said curtly, clearly unimpressed by my lack of enthusiasm. “Take the first dose now. We’ll review the rest of your schedule once you’re done.”
>I wanted to argue. To ask him if this was really necessary, if there was any way around it. But deep down, I knew the answer.
>“Go on,” the trainer said, his eyes locked on me like he didn’t trust me not to run.
>I swallowed the pill dry, the bitter taste lingering on my tongue.
>As soon as I swallowed the pill, the trainer’s hand landed on my back—a single, heavy pat that felt more like a claim of ownership than any gesture of encouragement.
“Good,” he said again, his voice flat but final. “Now, let’s not waste time. There’s much to do.”
>I nodded stiffly, keeping my eyes trained on the floor. The taste of the pill lingered, bitter and metallic, and I had to fight the urge to gag. The trainer motioned for me to follow, and I did, my legs moving automatically even as my mind rebelled against each step.
>As we walked down the hallway, the question clawed its way out of my throat before I could stop it. “What exactly will this pill do to me?” My voice was low, wavering slightly, but I forced the words out anyway.
>The trainer glanced over his shoulder, his expression unreadable. For a moment, I thought he might ignore me, but then he spoke, his tone clinical and detached, like he was reciting instructions from a manual.
>“The hormones will gradually adjust your body to better meet the expectations of your assignments,” he said. “Softening your features, redistributing fat, altering muscle mass... Over time, these changes will help you perform more effectively.”
next was the exercise routine. The trainer led me to the gym, its gleaming equipment lined up in intimidating rows.
>“Your previous training routines focused on the basics, makeup and appearance and basic mannerisms as was as keeping you healthy,” he said, gesturing for me to follow. “This new program emphasizes sculpting and refining. Certain areas of your body need to align with aesthetic expectations.”
>He handed me a detailed sheet, each exercise targeting specific muscle groups. Squats, leg lifts, core-focused routines—movements designed to subtly shift my physique in ways I wasn’t entirely comfortable with.
>As the weeks passed, the changes in my body were undeniable.
>As I stood in front of the mirror, the soft, fluorescent light above casting a pale glow over the room. My eyes traced the lines of my reflection, searching, scrutinizing. The person looking back at me was still... me, but at the same time, it wasn’t.
>I ran a hand down my chest, the new curve of my breasts pressing softly against my palm. The sensation was strange, almost surreal, like I was touching something that belonged to someone else. The sensitivity of them, the way they responded to the slightest touch—it made something stir inside me, a mix of discomfort and curiosity. I bit my lip, fighting the urge to focus on how my body reacted rather than what it meant. Was I supposed to be enjoying this?
>my tail swished as I continued my inspection
>The pill-induced changes had been slow but undeniable. The soft swell of my hips, the delicate rounding of my face—there were more of them now, all these little signs that I was becoming something different. I used to look in the mirror and see a version of myself I was supposed to be, a version I’d tried so hard to maintain, now it felt like I was watching someone else grow into place.
>As I stared at myself in the mirror, my hand absentmindedly brushed against the edge of my Chastity cage.
>I hadn’t really thought about it much lately. In the chaos of the changes happening to my body, in the growing awareness of the pills and their effects, the cage had been almost... forgotten. Or maybe I had just pushed it out of my mind.
>I hadn’t felt its weight in the same way, once a constant source of frustration, had started to feel like a distant memory. There were moments, late at night, when the ache of it would become unbearable. but those times were rare now.
>At least Daniel liked the changes.
>Every time I saw him, he had something to say about it—some compliment, some remark about how different I looked now, how the changes suited me.
>Occasionally he even attempts too playfully spank me a quick slap on the ass when I’d turn my back or when he thought I wasn’t paying attention. The first time it happened, I flinched. The sting was unexpected, and for a moment, I didn’t know how to react. I shot him an angry look, my face burning with a mix of surprise and annoyance.
>Why didn’t I tell him to stop? Part of me hated it—hated how he thought it was funny, how he thought I was still just a joke. But another part... another part of me didn’t mind it as much as I probably should. His touch, though playful and intrusive, was a form of attention, a sign that I was still... there.
>I hated that it made me feel a little giddy, even as I called him names
>probably the training finally getting too my head
>the pills, the exercises, the changes of my body. the endless lessons on body language and emotional manipulation—it all blended into a monotonous haze. But one day, the routine shifted.
“Vyrak,” the trainer called, his tone sharp and businesslike. “You’ve been selected for a special assignment.”
I froze.
> The words felt heavy, final, like a sentence I couldn’t escape. “What kind of assignment?” I asked cautiously, trying to keep the dread out of my voice.
>He smirked, a cold, practiced expression that never reached his eyes. “You’ll be participating in a photoshoot. A feature for an exclusive human magazine. It’s meant to showcase the... ‘Delights of the Conquered Sector.’”
The room seemed to spin for a moment as the words sank in. A photoshoot? My stomach churned at the thought.
>“You’ll be dressed, styled, and posed for a series of shots,” he continued, ignoring my visible discomfort. “There will also be interviews with you and the other ‘participants.’ It’s an opportunity to show how well you’ve been... integrated.”
>“Your presence has been specifically requested,” the trainer added, a hint of amusement in his voice. “They think you’ll photograph well. The camera loves... soft features.”
>He handed me a folder filled with instructions, outfit mock-ups, and a list of questions for the interview portion. “You’ll report to the studio tomorrow morning. Make sure you’re ready.”
>That night, I barely slept. The thought of being put on display, my face and body plastered across a magazine for humans to gawk at, made my skin crawl. But I didn’t have a choice.
>The next morning, I arrived at the studio. Bright lights, polished floors, and a team of stylists awaited me. They worked quickly, applying makeup, arranging my hair, dressing me in the carefully curated outfits. I felt like a doll—an object to be posed and perfected.
>“So, Vyrak,” the journalist pressed, leaning slightly closer. “What’s it like being part of this new era? How do you feel about your role in serving humanity?”
>I forced another smile, one of the many I had perfected in training. “It’s an honor to contribute,” I said, reciting the scripted answer drilled into me. “I’m grateful for the opportunity to... bridge gaps between our cultures.”
>The journalist’s expression shifted, their smile sharpening as if they sensed the rehearsed nature of my response. “Grateful, huh? That’s interesting.”
>The journalist’s smile faltered slightly. “Come now,” they said, leaning forward. “You can drop the script. This isn’t training. We want your real thoughts, your unique perspective.”
>I froze, the words catching in my throat. Real thoughts? Unique perspective?
>“Let’s talk about you,” they continued, their tone sharpening just enough to make me uneasy. “Your file says you were once a soldier. Is that right? What happened to your arm?”
>My stomach tightened, the question digging into wounds I’d rather keep buried. I glanced at the floor, then back at them, knowing they wouldn’t let it go. “Yes,” I said finally, my voice low. “I was a soldier. It… it happened in combat.”
>“Combat,” the journalist repeated, their pen poised over their notepad. “That’s quite vague. Care to elaborate? Surely, there’s a story there.”
>I clenched my jaw, trying to keep my breathing steady. “It was during one of the last stands on the homeworld,” I said after a long pause. “A missile hit my position. The blast took my arm, poor medical treatment took my eye."
>"Im sorry to hear that, but to move on, if you don't mind, how are you feeling about life now?" The journalist’s tone softened for a moment, a fleeting attempt at empathy.
>"How do I feel?" I echoed, my voice quieter now. I ran my fingers along the edge of the chair’s armrest, a habit I had developed when I was nervous. "I’ve adapted," I said, almost mechanically. "Life… it’s different now. It’s not what it used to be, but it’s still… life."
>“At least you're keeping up morale,” the journalist said, their tone shifting slightly, as if they were trying to find some positive angle to latch onto. “I can imagine many others would have broken under the pressure!”
“People adapt,” I said, the words coming out sharper than I intended. “Some break, others bend. I’ve bent. And so have others.”
>“How do you feel about the reintegration program?” the journalist continued, leaning in again, a glint of curiosity in their eyes. “It certainly put you through a lot of changes! And now you’re an advocate for your species! Changing the hearts and minds of some of humanity’s top investors!”
>I clenched my fists beneath the table, the words biting into me. Advocate? I was a tool. A whore for their cause.
>Advocate for my species? It sounded so… clean, so polished. It didn’t reflect the reality of what I had endured or the process I had gone through. I could have laughed at that, but I masked it with another practiced smile.
>I cleared my throat, trying to regain control of the conversation. "The program… it's a way to survive," I said, my voice tight. "To adapt." I didn’t have a choice in the matter. "We don't get to choose the circumstances we’re thrown into, only how we handle them."
>The journalist continues his questioning "Survival is key, but I heard that the program pays you guys a pretty penny. even giving you free food and board, I'd call that thriving!"
>“Survival is key,” I echoed, the bitterness in my tone sharpening. “But you’re right, they do throw in a few perks.”
>The journalist smiled, as if they had caught me in a moment of vulnerability. “A pretty penny, free food, and board—it sounds like more than just survival to me. It sounds like you’ve found a new kind of life here.”
My jaw tightened, and I had to fight to keep my expression neutral. “They pay us, sure feed and house us Though those benefits always come with downsides. It’s all part of the deal.”
>The journalist raised an eyebrow. “A deal, huh? So, you’re saying the benefits aren’t worth it?”
>I leaned back, letting out a deep breath. "Worth it? Maybe for some. But I’m not here for the handouts. I didn’t ask for this life. I didn’t ask to be a symbol."
>The journalist’s smile faded slightly, but they pushed on, sensing there was more to unpack. “So, what would you have chosen if you had the chance? If you could go back and make a different decision?”
>I paused, my fingers twitching at my sides. What would I have chosen? There was no going back. There never had been. "Would have Told the Damned Council to never start that stupid fucking war in the first place"
>I let out a genuine laugh at this, though it turned kinda pained in the end.
>The journalist laughs with me as well "I think everyone back home can agree with that"
>I gave a tight, mirthless smile, still not fully able to shake the weight of what had been asked. "Yeah," I muttered. "Too bad it doesn’t work that way."
>"fully agree with that notion as well"
>I glanced at the journalist, their tone now tinged with something like genuine understanding. It wasn’t often that anyone seemed to grasp the weight of what was being said.
>"So, a final question or two before I go," the journalist said, their voice shifting again, trying to steer the conversation toward the conclusion. "But why do you think you were invited to do the photoshoot?"
>The question caught me off guard for a moment. I hadn’t thought much about the photoshoot, but now that it was mentioned, the purpose seemed more deliberate. They weren’t just showcasing us—they were selling us.
>I shrug my shoulders, trying to play it cool. "The others weren't available, drew my name out of a hat?"
>The journalist laughs, but it’s almost too loud, like they can’t quite believe what they’re hearing. "Not even close! Turns out quite a few of >you advocates have started a bit of a craze on the social networks back home on Earth, especially the pics of you sitting down and >looking fabulous with some of the most influential business tycoons alive today! Turns out, the eyepatch and missing limb gave you a bit of a mystery that people love!"
>My face goes hot, and I feel my stomach churn with the sudden realization. "Wait, what? People… people actually care about that?"
>The journalist gives me a teasing smile, clearly enjoying my reaction. "Oh yeah, you’ve got a whole fanbase now. They can’t get enough of the ‘mysterious warrior’ vibe you’ve got going on."
>My brain stumbles to keep up, and I awkwardly adjust my seat, suddenly very aware of the way I’m sitting. "I—uh, I didn’t even know I had a fanbase. I just—"
I stop, flustered, trying to make sense of it. "I mean, what kind of fans…?"
>The journalist chuckles, clearly enjoying my discomfort. "not my words but most people think 'you're a hot piece of alien ass'," they say, almost too casually. "Or that you're super fucking cool looking."
>My eyes widen, and I feel my face go beet red and I feel my feathers flare up. "Wait, what? That’s— that’s what people are saying?"
>I blink, my brain still processing the avalanche of information. "I… I don’t even know how to respond to that," I mumble, still flustered beyond belief.
>The journalist leans in slightly, a teasing glint in their eyes. "Well, you could always lean into it. A lot of people do, you know. The ‘mysterious, battle-hardened alien’ shtick works wonders, I think every human male would probably want to try 'conquering' you. if you get my jist"
>My face feels like it’s about to combust. I don’t know whether to laugh, cry, or crawl into a hole.
>"That’s—I um...." I stammer, my feathers still puffing up in embarrassment.
>The journalist grins, clearly amused by my flustered state. "Hey, don’t shoot the messenger! I’m just saying what’s out there. People find you fascinating."
>I bury my face in my hands for a moment, letting out a muffled groan. “Can I be done with this already?”
>The journalist laughs softly, though there’s a flicker of understanding in their expression. “Alright, alright, I’ll wrap it up. Just one last question, I promise.”
>I lower my hands cautiously, narrowing my eyes. “You said that two questions ago.”
>“I mean it this time,” they insist, holding up their hands in mock surrender. “And it’s an easy one.”
>I sigh, leaning back in my chair. “Fine. Let’s hear it.”
“What do you want people to take away from all of this?” Their voice softens, and for the first time, it feels like a genuine question. No teasing, no agenda—just curiosity.
>I blink, the question catching me off guard. The weight of it settles over me, a stark contrast to the earlier banter. I can feel the tension in my shoulders, the exhaustion in my bones, and yet, the question lingers. What do I want people to take away from all of this?
>I glance down, my fingers twitching at the edge of the chair again. It’s a simple question, but the answer is anything but.
>"I don’t know," I admit, the words coming out quieter than I expect. "Maybe... maybe I just want them to see that we’re not just... monsters or toys to humiliate.
>the weight of the words hanging in the air. "I want them to understand that we’re not some... exotic spectacle for them to gawk at or use for their amusement. We’re real. We have lives. We have struggles. We're just trying to make sense of all of this, the same way they are."
>It had been a few weeks since the interview, and life had settled into a strange rhythm. Well, as much as "settling" could apply to someone like me. The fallout from that conversation lingered, though. A surprising number of people had reached out—some with genuine interest, others with… less noble intentions.
>I was beginning to regret the whole thing. Not because of the interview itself, but because of the attention. And attention was an understatement.
>I glance down, my feathers fluffing out slightly in agitation. The hormonal treatments have done their job, and then some. My breasts are heavy, awkward, and frankly, a little overwhelming. The adjustments to my balance alone are enough to drive me mad.
>Walking had turned into an endurance test. Every step felt like a battle against gravity, and I wasn’t winning. My center of balance was off, and I’d already stumbled into a few walls. Let’s not even talk about doorways. I had bruises in places that I hadn’t even known could bruise.
>“This is ridiculous,” I mutter to myself, trying to pull my uniform tighter to keep everything in place. It’s not working.
>“Oh, come on,” I groan, tugging at the fabric in a futile attempt to make it fit. The once-flattering cut now looks like it’s trying to strangle me. My feathers puff out instinctively in frustration, only making the fit worse.
>I suck in a breath and try again, managing to get one button closed. It immediately pops off with a loud ping, ricocheting off the wall and disappearing under the bed.
>“You’ve got to be kidding me,” I mutter, glaring at the offending garment as if it’s personally insulted me.
>Next, I move on to the pants. Surely those will fit, right?
Wrong.
>Getting them past my hips is a battle of wills, and the pants are winning. I wiggle, hop, and tug, but no amount of effort makes a difference. When I finally give up, they’re stuck halfway up my thighs, refusing to budge another inch.
>my tail swings low and slow from my frustration, both from the uniform and from my bodies... urges
>the fabric of the pants and tunic had been rubbing up against my sensitive areas as I struggled
>The coarse material grinds mercilessly against my supersensitive nipples, making them ache. Meanwhile, my heavy balls swing in their restrictive pouch, jostled into throbbing sensitivity that has me biting back curses.
>my tail lashes in irritation as I subtly adjust my stance, seeking even temporary relief. But it's futile - each movement only stokes the flames of restless need. My dick, trapped in its unyielding steel cage, twitches impotently beneath my trousers. Useless chunk of flesh... not that I'm grateful for its existence anymore. If anything, it just serves as a constant reminder of what I've lost.
>Perhaps a short break is in order, I think as I gently place my one hand on my chest
>As I begin to roughly grope my enormous breasts through the thin fabric of my top, a shiver runs down my spine at the sensation. The stimulation sends jolts of pleasure straight to my caged member, making me gasp quietly.
>My fingers dig into the soft, pliant mounds, kneading and squeezing as I try to distract myself from the maddening arousal coursing through my body.
>I pinch and tug at my sensitive nipples, drawing out moans as they harden further under my touch. The friction against my sensitive skin is almost too much, yet not enough to bring me release.
>I'm trapped in this cycle of wanting more while being denied satisfaction, my cock throbbing uselessly in its prison.
>I pick up one of the thick, realistic dildos that the humans have given me for 'training'.
>It's an obscene shade of pink, but it will do.
>With a deep breath, I position it against my aching entrance and slowly push inside, groaning at the initial stretch. As I sink deeper, the dildo fills me up, its girth rubbing against my sensitive walls and providing some much-needed friction.
>As I thrust down on the silicone shaft, I curse the humans for making me Like this
>for making me LIKE this
>Each shiver sent throughout my body, was because of those damn humans
>They ruined me, changed how I looked, and even how I acted around them was shifted and twisted
>The worst part was I wasn't forced, I could have left anytime I wanted, early on it would have been a death sentence, sure. but after that?
>It eats at me sometimes, that question. Why didn’t I walk away when I had the chance? Was it fear? Habit? Or something darker, something that kept me tethered to them even after the chains loosened?
>My thoughts shifted, as I lost myself in pleasure
>they shifteted to Daniel, my friend
>He treats me well enough,
>we go out to eat together and he even buys me things
>he was as stupid as humans come, but I didn't mind
>I smiled to myself, feathers ruffling slightly at the thought. He was mine. I didn’t care how silly it sounded; it was true. He was one thing I could hold onto.
>MY human .
>I was going to do something with him tonight what was it?
>maybe we where going to play some of his human video games together?
>no we did that last night, I lost to him on purpose.
>sometimes we made bets and I said I would give him a blowjob if I lost
>I loved seeing how his face squirmed and shifted as I crammed his cock down my throat
>it was funny, it was even cute.
>but we weren't doing that tonight
>I was spooked from my lust induced thoughts as I heard a knock on the door
>"Vyrak you ready?" "it was Daniel, though he sounded concerned "we don't want to be late!"
>Late? late for what?
>Ah, yes. Dinner. Daniel had mentioned something about wanting to try a new restaurant. Something fancy, with a name I couldn’t pronounce even if I tried.
>something about meeting his brother and his new wife
>and here I was...
>"Oh shit..." I say with a whimper, I was supposed to be dressed by now!
>"You alright in there, Vyrak?" Daniel's voice came from the other side of the door, tinged with concern. "I'm coming in!"
>My head snapped up, feathers bristling in surprise at the sound of Daniel’s voice. He didn’t even wait for an answer before the door creaked open.
>"Daniel! What are you—" I started, fumbling to pull myself together.
>I cant let him see me like this!
>but I was so, so close to an orgasm
>I went as fast as I could, trying desperately to finish
>With one final thrust I stopped and spurted my watery load all over my floor
>I jump to my feet, the dildo sliding out of me making my abused hole make an obscenely loud shlicking sound
>I managed to limp my way to the door and slam it closed all the while trying to fight my rubbery legs from giving out from under me
>I was cumming my brains out, my hole still twitching eagerly for stimulation, and my useless infertile load, still splattering out, oozing onto the door
>"J-Just a moment!"
>I need to get dressed, and fast
>I throw on a pair of panties and a skirt, leaving my old uniform blouse on, it covered up enough, right?
>after a minute I tell Daniel to come in and he looks at me accusingly
>"you good?" he knows I can tell
>My feathers puffed up further in embarrassment, and I crossed my arms over my chest defensively. "I’m fine! I don’t need you barging in like that."
>"You don’t look fine," he shot back, his tone softer now but still firm.
>I steal a glance behind me, the Dildo was as obvious as it could be sitting on the floor and clearly used, judging by the slickness of it, as well as the puddles leading up to the door
>"I’m fine," I insisted, my voice coming out a little more defensive than I intended. My feathers, still fluffed up, ruffled uncomfortably at the confrontation.
>There was a pause before Daniel’s voice came through the door, teasing but gentle. "What exactly are you wearing right now?"
>I froze for a second, my mind scrambling to process the question. I glanced down at myself—my uniform top hanging loosely open, revealing more than I’d intended, and the short skirt I’d thrown on hastily, It wasn’t exactly the most "appropriate" outfit for a fancy dinner with Daniel’s brother.
>“I was… I was trying to put on my old dress uniform,” I muttered, feeling my face flush a little, my feathers shifting in embarrassment. "You know, from back when I was a soldier. But, uh... it’s not exactly fitting the way it used to."
>I glanced down at the clothes again, feeling a pang in my chest. The uniform had once been something to take pride in, something that reminded me of who I was—a soldier, a veteran, someone with a sense of purpose. But now?
>Now it felt like a shell that didn’t fit anymore. It was too tight, the fabric clinging to places it never had before, and the weight of it made my shoulders slump. I just wanted to feel like me again, like there was something worth holding onto.
>“It’s just... I wanted to feel like I still mattered,” I said quietly, more to myself than to Daniel. My feathers drooped slightly, the usual sharpness gone from my posture. "Like I wasn’t just... whatever this is now. Like I could still be someone who did something, something I could be proud of. I don't want to forget it"
>Would he think I was pathetic? Or worse, that I was just wallowing in nostalgia for a past I couldn’t get back?
>Finally, his voice broke the silence, quieter now, with a softness I hadn’t expected. "I get it, Vyrak. You don’t have to forget it. But you don't need to wear that uniform to prove you still matter."
>I frowned, looking down at the crumpled fabric, the old memories it carried with it. "I just… sometimes I feel like I don’t know who I am anymore. I’m not that soldier anymore, and I’m not sure what I am now. Everything’s so different, and I’m trying to figure it out, but it’s hard when nothing fits."
>there was a pause before I heard the sound of movement outside the door. A few minutes later, Daniel knocked again, his voice soft but insistent. "Okay, I have an idea. Open up."
>I hesitated, glancing down at myself—still in the ill-fitting remnants of my old uniform—and then toward the door. With a resigned sigh, I shuffled over and cracked it open just enough to peek out.
>Daniel stood there, holding something in his hands. It was... a dress? A sleek, elegant thing in a deep, shimmering blue that caught the light. The sight of it made me blink in confusion.
>“What is that?” I asked, my feathers ruffling in suspicion.
>“It’s a dress,” he said plainly, holding it up higher so I could get a better look. “I, uh... picked it up a little while ago. Thought it might suit you, but I wasn’t sure when I’d give it to you. Now feels like a good time.”
>I stared at it, then at him. “You bought me a dress?”
>His expression softened, and he shrugged. “Yeah. I thought you might like it. It’s not a uniform, but it’s... something new. Something that’s yours now, not tied to the past.
>My gaze softened as I took in the dress, the deep blue shimmering under the hallway light. "It’s... beautiful," I admitted quietly, running my fingers over the fabric. It was softer than I’d expected, light but sturdy. Part of me couldn’t believe Daniel had gone out of his way to get something like this.
>I stared at the dress for a long moment, the shimmering fabric catching the light in a way that made it seem almost alive. A lump formed in my throat as I reached out, my Taloned fingers brushing against the smooth material.
>“It’s... beautiful,” I murmured, the words slipping out before I could stop them. I felt my feathers flutter slightly, my usual defensiveness giving way to something softer, more vulnerable.
>The softness of the fabric between my fingers was almost hypnotic, a stark contrast to the rough, worn texture of the uniform I still clung to with my other hand.
>Daniel smiled warmly, his eyes flicking between me and the dress. “You should try it on,” he said, his tone gentle but encouraging. “It’d look amazing on you.”
>I glanced down at the uniform still clinging to me, the medals pinned firmly in place, their metallic glint a sharp reminder of who I used to be. My talons tightened on the fabric instinctively, unwilling to let go. “I… I’m not sure,” I muttered, feeling my feathers ruffle uncomfortably. “It’s not that simple.”
>Daniel stepped forward cautiously, his hands tucked into his pockets. “I get it,” he said softly, his voice steady. “You don’t have to let go of this”—he gestured to the uniform—“but maybe this dress can be something new. Not replacing what you had, but adding to it.”
>I blinked at him, his words sinking in. Slowly, I nodded. “Alright,” I murmured, stepping back toward the room and letting the door swing open a little wider. “But… I’m going to need some help. You know, with…” I gestured vaguely at my missing arm, my feathers fluffing slightly in embarrassment.
>Daniel’s face softened further, and he gave me a small nod. “Of course. Just tell me what you need.”
>Carefully, I peeled off the ill-fitting remains of my uniform, my fingers lingering on the medals for a moment before setting it aside—though not too far away. The dress still rested against my chest, its cool fabric brushing against my feathers.
>Daniel picked up the dress and held it open for me, his movements careful and deliberate, as if handling something fragile. “Alright, slide your arm through here first,” he said, guiding me gently.
>I followed his instructions, slipping my taloned hand through the sleeve. The fabric flowed over my feathers like water, its softness almost unfamiliar. He helped adjust it around my shoulders, carefully pulling it into place.
>“Okay,” he murmured as he stepped back to get a better look. “How’s it feel?”
>I smoothed the front of the dress, the shimmering material catching the light as I moved. It fit perfectly—almost too perfectly, hugging my form in ways that made me feel both self-conscious and… beautiful. My feathers fluttered slightly, betraying my mixed emotions.
>“It’s... strange,” I admitted, glancing over at him. “But not in a bad way.”
>Daniel grinned. “Strange is good. You look incredible.”
>I turned my gaze back to the uniform where it lay folded on the chair, my eyes settling on the medals pinned neatly to its front. >My talons hovered over one in particular, the large silver medallion etched with a bold insignia of my people’s crest—a commendation for valor under fire and good conduct. It caught the light like a beacon, radiating the weight of everything it represented.
>I swallowed hard, my throat tight. That medal had meant everything to me once. It was proof that I’d made a difference, that >I’d stood for something greater than myself. But now, looking at it, I wasn’t sure what it meant anymore. Could I still call myself the same person who had earned it? was it even earned?
>Daniel must’ve noticed my hesitation. He stepped closer, his gaze softening as it followed mine to the medal. “That one’s special, isn’t it?” he asked quietly, his tone free of teasing for once.
>I nodded, my feathers ruffling slightly as I struggled to find the words. “It was for saving my squad,” I said, my voice low. “Under fire, against all odds. They said I showed courage and restraint… but I didn’t feel courageous. I was just doing what needed to be done.”
>Daniel crossed his arms thoughtfully, his eyes narrowing like he was working through an idea. Then, a grin broke across his face—a mischievous yet genuine expression that immediately put me on edge.
>Daniel’s grin was the kind that made me instantly suspicious. I narrowed my eyes at him, my feathers puffing slightly. "What are you up to now?"
>He reached into his bag—a bag I hadn’t noticed before—and pulled out something that gleamed under the room’s light. My feathers fluffed up further as the object came into focus. It was a gilded collar, ornate and striking, with subtle etchings that shimmered when the light hit it just right.
>It looked oddly familiar, and it didn’t take long for me to place where I’d seen it before.
>My breath caught for a moment. The design was ornate, its craftsmanship intricate, but it was eerily familiar. It looked almost exactly like the one my Boundmate Shira had worn over a year ago—with her human...
>I stayed quiet, my talons curling slightly at my sides. There was no way he could’ve known. This had to be a coincidence... right?
>“Check this out,” Daniel said, oblivious to my tension. He turned the collar over in his hands, admiring it like it was a treasure. “I picked this up at some boutique downtown. Thought it might be a nice touch. You know, something to tie everything together.”
>I didn’t respond immediately, my gaze fixed on the collar as memories churned in the back of my mind.
>“You don’t have to wear it if you don’t want to,” Daniel said, noticing my hesitation. His voice was light, but there was an undertone of something else—maybe concern, maybe just his usual playful teasing. But I couldn’t tell anymore. Everything felt a little off-kilter.
>I didn’t know how to respond to that. My chest tightened, my feathers ruffling nervously. Maybe it wasn’t meant the way I thought, maybe it wasn’t exactly like the collar Shira wore—but the memory stuck, the way she’d looked wearing it, the way she’d become a symbol for something more, something less than what she was.
>I sighed and nodded, my voice low. “Alright,” I muttered, resigned.
>I didn’t stop him when he stepped forward, gently lifting the collar toward me. I felt the cool, gilded metal against my neck, my feathers instinctively fluffing up at the touch. It wasn’t unpleasant, but it felt... off.
>“Relax,” Daniel said softly, as if sensing my discomfort. He adjusted the collar carefully, fastening it around my neck. The weight of it settled a constant reminder of something I didn’t know how to process. When he finished, he took a step back, eyeing me with a grin that was all too knowing.
>“Perfect,” he said, the words almost reverent as he reached for the medal. The same medal that had once been a symbol of my achievements, of who I was.
>My heart skipped as Daniel attached the medal to the small ring at the front of the collar. The motion felt ceremonial, like I was being... marked. There was something unsettling about the way the medal dangled there, now part of the collar, part of this accessory.
>I didn’t know how to feel. Part of me felt... cared for, even loved by my friend. After all, he was the one who picked out the collar, and who was helping me through this. But another part of me, deeper down, felt like a pet—like I was just an object to be adorned, something to be dressed up and displayed.
>Did it really matter? Daniel had never treated me like a pet. Not really. He’d been there when I needed him, patient even when I wasn’t, and far kinder than I probably deserved. If this was his way of showing he cared—his way of helping me remember who I was—then maybe I was overthinking it.
>Even if he did see me as something like a pet, I realized, my chest tightening at the thought, wasn’t that... okay? >He’d never once treated me with anything but respect, even when I felt like I didn’t deserve it.
>Even at Daniel’s worst, all he ever really did was tease me. He could be insufferable, sure, but it was never cruel.
>His jokes, his little jabs—they weren’t meant to hurt. If anything, they were his way of making sure I didn’t take myself too seriously.
>Daniel clapped his hands together, his grin back in full force. “Alright, soldier, time to suit up and face the world. You ready?”
>I glanced at myself in the mirror one last time, smoothing the shimmering fabric of the dress. It really was a flattering dress, and it hung just right in the places it should.
>I gave myself one last glance in the mirror, my talons brushing over the medal now resting on the collar. It still felt strange, but not in a bad way. The dress shimmered as I turned, hugging my frame just right.
>For the first time in a long while, I didn’t feel like I was just wearing something—I felt like I belonged in it.
>We pulled up to the restaurant, its golden lights casting a warm glow over the busy street. My feathers fluffed slightly >as I stepped out of the car, the cool air brushing against the shimmering fabric of my dress. Daniel walked beside me, >his usual carefree confidence radiating as he held the door open.
>Inside, the atmosphere was refined but lively, soft chatter and clinking glasses filling the air. I could feel eyes on me as we walked through the entrance, but Daniel’s presence at my side kept me steady.
>“They’re already here,” Daniel said, nodding toward a table near the back. His grin widened. “My brother’s probably halfway through his drink by now.”
>I followed his gaze, my eyes landing on the pair seated at the table. At first, it didn’t register—just two people, a man and a woman, sitting close, their postures relaxed.
>And then it hit me.
>My heart skipped, and my feathers flattened against my body in an instant.
>The man was tall, broad-shouldered, his sharp features unmistakable even after all this time. John. The human I hadn’t seen since that fateful day over a year ago.
>But it wasn’t him that sent the ground tilting beneath me.
>Sitting beside him, her delicate hands resting lightly on the table, was Shira. My Shira.
>Her feathers gleamed under the soft light, her posture poised and composed in the way I remembered so vividly. She turned her head slightly, and my breath caught when I saw the collar around her neck—the same gilded design I now wore.
>Shira’s eyes slid over me for a moment, her expression cool and distant. She didn’t recognize me—not immediately. >Instead, she gave me a look I hadn’t seen in years but knew all too well: the slight narrowing of her eyes, the subtle arch of a brow. It was the look she used to give to women she thought were too... sultry, too bold for their own good.
>put simply rakions who she thought looked like sluts
>I stood frozen, unsure if I should speak, unsure of what to say. Her gaze held a tinge of disapproval, but it wasn’t as cutting as I remembered. More... detached, almost like I was just another stranger in the crowd.
>When her eyes finally met mine again, I saw the recognition flicker across her face. The sharpness of her expression softened, but only for a moment.
>“Vyrak?” she asked, her voice barely rising above the chatter around us.
>“Yeah,” I said quietly, my voice a little tighter than I meant it to be. I shifted awkwardly on my feet, suddenly feeling the weight of the room pressing down on me. It was hard to believe I was here, standing in front of her after so long.
>Shira’s eyes softened slightly as she took a step closer, her posture stiffening as if she was trying to work through some unspoken tension. Then, without warning, she pulled me into a hug.
>The hug was warm, but there was something hesitant about it. She wrapped her arms around me, but it wasn’t the embrace I remembered. This one felt more restrained, as though she was holding back, unsure of what to say or how to feel.
>For a moment, I closed my eyes and let myself relax into the hug. The familiarity of it, the way she smelled, the faint softness of her feathers against my skin, brought a rush of old memories. It made everything feel simpler, easier. But then, just as quickly, I noticed something—her body tensing slightly as she pressed closer.
>And then, I noticed it—the way her eyes flicked down for a moment, her gaze catching on my chest. It was a subtle shift, but I could feel her tension, the slight stiffness in her posture. It didn’t take a genius to figure out what she was thinking.
>"it’s been a while,” I said quietly, my voice thick with an emotion I couldn’t quite place. Slowly, I wrapped my arms around her, pulling her closer despite the awkward tension. She didn’t pull away, but her grip stayed stiff, her feathers bristling ever so slightly.
>“Yeah,” she murmured after a moment, her voice almost too soft to hear. “It has.”
>For a brief second, the noise of the restaurant faded into the background, and it was just the two of us. I could feel the warmth of her against me, the faint tremble in her shoulders as she tried to hold herself together. I wondered if she was feeling the same storm of emotions I was.
>“Well,” Daniel’s voice cut through the moment like a knife, his tone light but laced with curiosity, “this is interesting. Didn’t realize you two knew each other.”
>Shira stepped back quickly, smoothing her feathers as though nothing had happened. Her expression had shifted, the guarded, poised look sliding back into place like a mask.
>“We go... way back,” I said, my gaze still lingering on her. I could see the faintest flicker of something in her eyes—guilt? Pain? It was gone before I could pin it down.
>“Small world,” Daniel said, his grin widening as he glanced between us. “Guess I’ll have to hear the story later. Come on, though, John’s probably wondering why we’re still standing over here.”
>John wasn’t exactly the chatty type. As the dinner progressed, he mostly nodded along to Daniel’s stories and chimed in only when prompted. Shira, meanwhile, kept the conversation polite but distant, her eyes flicking to me more often than I think she realized.
>As the dinner went on, the weight of unspoken words pressed down on me. Shira’s glances in my direction were fleeting, but each one cut deeper than the last.
>Daniel, ever the entertainer, kept the conversation flowing, filling the silences with his stories and jokes. John mostly stayed quiet, his presence calm but solid beside Shira.
>I couldn’t ignore the way she leaned slightly toward him, the subtle ease in her posture when he was near. It was bittersweet. She looked happy—or at least content—and I wasn’t about to disrupt that. But the bond we shared was still there, faint but unyielding, like an old scar that ached in the cold.
>When John excused himself to step outside for a moment, I saw my chance. Pushing my chair back, I followed him out, leaving Daniel mid-laugh and Shira mid-sentence.
>The night air was crisp and cool, a stark contrast to the warmth inside. John stood near the edge of the patio, his broad shoulders relaxed as he looked out into the street. He didn’t seem surprised when I approached.
>“Needed some fresh air too?” he asked, his voice even, his eyes not leaving the horizon.
>“Something like that,” I replied, stopping a few steps away. For a moment, neither of us spoke. The quiet between us wasn’t exactly hostile, but it wasn’t friendly either.
>Finally, I broke the silence.
>“John.” My tone was firm, cutting through the stillness. He turned his head slightly, just enough to meet my gaze. “I need you to understand something.”
>His brow furrowed slightly, but he didn’t interrupt. I took a step closer, lowering my voice.
>“Shira and I... we’re bondmates,” I said, the words heavy on my tongue. “That’s not something that just... goes away. It’s a for-life thing, whether we’re together or not.”
>He shifted, his posture straightening. There was a flicker of something in his eyes—curiosity, maybe, or caution.
>“I get that she’s your wife now,” I continued, my feathers bristling slightly despite my efforts to stay calm.
>John’s jaw tightened, but he didn’t back down. “You think I don’t treat her right?” he asked, his voice steady but with an edge of defensiveness.
>“It’s not about what I think,” I replied, my tone sharpening. “It’s about what I know. Shira and I share something—something that doesn’t just disappear because things changed between us. >Being bondmates isn’t temporary. It’s for life. And even if we’re not together now, that doesn’t mean I stop caring about her or watching out for her.”
>John’s expression softened slightly, though there was still a tension in his shoulders. He didn’t say anything for a moment, just took in my words as I stood there, waiting for some kind of response.
>“I’m not saying you should be worried,” I continued, my feathers settling a bit as I spoke. “I just need you to understand... Shira deserves the best. So just—just treat her right. That’s all I’m asking.”
>There was a long pause, the weight of the moment pressing down on us both. His eyes met mine, no longer defensive but... thoughtful.
>Finally, he sighed, a deep exhale that seemed to release a bit of the tension that had been hanging between us. “I get it,” he said quietly. “I’ll treat her right, Vyrak. You have my word.”
>It was a simple thing, but it was enough. I nodded, my chest easing just a little, feeling some of the animosity and worry I’d been carrying lift.
>Shira picked at her plate delicately, her feathers catching the light in a way that made her look almost regal. The tension between us from earlier had melted, replaced by something closer to what we once had. Familiar, warm, yet unspokenly complex
>“So,” she said, glancing at me with a hint of that mischievous spark I remembered. “Daniel seems... lively. I didn’t think you’d go for someone so... energetic.”
>I chuckled softly, cutting into my food. “He’s not what I expected, either. But he grows on you. He has this way of dragging you into his world, whether you like it or not.”
“Sounds like you like it,” she teased, tilting her head
“Maybe,” I admitted, my feathers ruffling slightly
>"Hes just a good friend, and he makes things interesting, that’s for sure. What about John? He’s... quiet.”
>John and Shira share a quick glance at each other as I said that
>Shira smirked, taking a sip of her drink before replying. “He’s steady. Reliable. Sometimes it feels like he’s the calm to my storm, you know?”
>“I can see that,” I said with a nod, feeling a small pang at how easily she spoke about him now. But it wasn’t jealousy—more like... acceptance.
>Daniel leaned back in his chair, swirling his drink casually as he looked between all of us. “You know,” he started, his tone conversational, “it’s funny how you two—” he gestured at me and Shira, “—have spent so much time around humans but have never actually been to Earth. That seems like a huge missed opportunity.”
>"I don't want to leave home for a while I think" I stated clearly
>“But trust me,” I said, leaning back slightly, “if you’d asked me a few years ago, there’s nothing I would’ve wanted more than to be on Earth.”
>Shira’s feathers twitched, and John leaned closer in his chair their expressions shifting just slightly as they got what I was hinting at.
>Daniel, on the other hand, missed it entirely
>I may have made a mistake
>“How is 'Dirt' anyhow?” I asked, injecting just the right amount of curiosity into my tone to steer the conversation away from my grave error. I leaned forward slightly, picking at my plate as if Earth’s status was merely an idle topic. “I haven’t heard much about it lately.”
>Daniel perked up instantly, as I’d hoped. “Oh, it’s Earth, not Dirt,” he corrected with a playful grin, clearly unable to resist. “And it’s... complicated. I mean, it’s still Earth. Beautiful, chaotic, way too many people in way too small a space. But it’s home.”
>“Complicated how?” Shira asked, tilting her head. Her feathers smoothed as she shifted focus, clearly interested.
>“Oh, you know,” Daniel said, gesturing broadly with his hands. “Politics, pollution, wars, the usual. But we’re working on it. Cities are greener than they used to be—well, some of them, anyway. Technology’s better. And you can’t beat the food. You guys should try pizza. Life-changing.”
>“What do you mean, wars?” I asked, raising an eyebrow. “Aren’t you guys a unified species? Shouldn’t your homeworld be unified by now, at least?"
>Daniel’s shifted uncomfortably in his seat, running a hand through his hair. “Well... not exactly,” he said, looking down at his drink before meeting my gaze again. “Humans aren’t as unified as you might think. Sure, we’ve got some global organizations, but unity—real unity—has always been hard to come by.”
>“So you’re telling me,” I said, a bit incredulous, “that we got our asses handed to us, by a species still squabbling with each other over colonization rights and mining charters?”
>John finally spoke up, his voice quiet but sharp. "pretty much." John said, his tone matter-of-fact.
>"Well, fuck me," I muttered under my breath, leaning back in my chair, thoroughly exasperated. "As you humans so expertly put it, this is one hell of a revelation."
>There was a brief pause before I let out a mock gasp, throwing my hands up dramatically. “We got beat by a bunch of squabbling, over-caffeinated apes. Really puts things into perspective.”
>Daniel cracked a grin, though he still looked uncomfortable. "I wouldn't put it quite like that, but yeah, it's not as glamorous as it sounds."
>I leaned in, giving Daniel a playful smirk. “You humans will get through it. If you can win a war like that, I’m sure you can sort out your political mess back home, you'll change it, I'm sure if it"
>I shrugged lightly, offering a small apologetic smile. “And sorry for all the war talk. It’s just something that riles me up, y’know? Can’t help but get a bit worked up when I think about how everything went down.”
>Daniel gave a slight nod, his expression softening. “I get it. It’s hard to swallow, sometimes, when you look at it from the outside. But it’s in the past now.”
>“Speaking of change,” she said softly, her voice tinged with something more reflective “You’ve... changed a lot,” she said, her tone careful but curious. “I mean, not just... emotionally. Physically, too.”
>I raised an eyebrow, already guessing where this was going. “Go on.”
>She hesitated, her feathers fluffing just slightly as if bracing herself. “Your figure. It’s... well, it’s a lot more—” she gestured vaguely, her cheeks darkening in a way that was almost comical, “—curvaceous than I remember.”
>I laughed, unable to help myself. “What, this?” I gestured to myself with a smirk. “You’re just noticing now?”
>“It’s hard not to,” she muttered, giving me a look that was half exasperation, half genuine curiosity. “What happened? You didn’t always look like this.”
>“It wasn’t exactly my choice,” I replied, the words slipping out. My fingers absently tracing the edge of my glass. “You know, the reintegration program the humans put me through... It had its requirements.”
>Shira raised an eyebrow, her expression shifting to one of understanding, though a small frown tugged at her lips. “So, it was part of the whole... re-integration process?”
>“Yeah,” I said, nodding. “I wasn’t given a lot of say in the matter. They had their ideas on how I should fit in, more ‘appealing’ or whatever. Turns out, they like the whole... aesthetic.”
>Shira’s gaze softened, a touch of sympathy creeping into her voice. “That sounds... frustrating.”
>I shrugged, a small, self-deprecating smile tugging at my lips. “At first, yeah. It was all a bit much, honestly. But, well...” I paused, glancing down at myself before meeting her gaze again. "I cant say I blame them
>I pause for a second to collect my thoughts “ And I’ve come to accept it. Most of the time, anyway. It’s just... who I am now. Some days it still feels strange, but other times, I kinda like it. It’s different, but not bad.”
>Daniel, who had been quiet through most of this exchange, gave a soft cough and finally spoke up, his tone light but genuine. “You know, you’ve got a lot more charm now, so maybe the whole thing worked out in your favor”
>I gestured dramatically to myself, rolling my eye with an exaggerated flourish. "yes, Ill attract all the females now, looking like this"
Shira let out a snort, her feathers fluffing in amusement. I even got a chuckle out of John
>Daniel stifled his laugh. “Well, I mean... you might. Who knows? You could start a whole new trend.”
>"Im sure by the end of the decade every Hakion will be like this, I said, throwing my arm out theatrically. “Picture it: all of us, strutting around with curvaceous figures, perfectly tailored to human standards of beauty. What a sight that would be”
>Shira clutched at her sides, her laughter bordering on uncontrollable. “Oh, stop, I can’t breathe! The entire species?” she wheezed. "You’d have humans lining up for cultural exchange programs just to gawk!”
>“They probably already are,” I said, completely deadpan.
>Just as Shira’s laughter started to die down, a soft chime rang out, signaling the arrival of the food.
>The waiter set the plates down with a flourish, and I couldn’t help but raise an eyebrow at the array of food before me. There were vibrant, colorful dishes piled high with what looked like vegetables, meats, and sauces I couldn’t even begin to identify.
>"Well, this should be interesting," I muttered, glancing between the humans, who were already eyeing their respective meals.
>Daniel grinned. “Surprise! Thought we’d help you guys out and show you some of our favorites.”
>I tilted my head, studying the food in front of me. “You’re not trying to poison us, right?”
>John chuckled, giving me an exaggerated wink. “No promises, but nothing lethal, I swear.”
>Shira raised an eyebrow, peering at the assortment of dishes with curiosity she said, giving me a playful look. “Besides, what’s the worst that could happen?”
>I picked up my fork and poked at a strange-looking dish with bright orange sauce. “Famous last words.”
>I took a cautious bite of the strange dish, and the spicy sweetness hit my tongue in a surprising wave. It wasn’t bad, just... different
>John chuckled, mouth still full of food "See?"
>I took another bite, a little more confident this time. "Alright, alright, you win," I muttered, conceding with a small grin.
>The conversation drifted into lighter, easier topics as we all continued to eat, the food gradually turning into a shared experience that we all enjoyed.
>We talked about everything from Rakion culture to human festivals, with each bite of food adding a sense of warmth to the evening.
>I felt a sense of contentment and maybe things did turn out for the best, after all
>It had been a few weeks since that fateful dinner, and life had settled into a comfortable rhythm. Shira teased me more, John had somehow roped me into trying even more human foods, and Daniel... well, Daniel had become a constant presence. I wasn't sure when exactly we'd started spending so much time together, but here we were.
>Today, though, was different. My birthday. A concept I’d almost forgotten about until Daniel showed up, looking far too pleased with himself.
>“Alright, birthday boy,” he’d said, practically dragging me out of my quarters. “I’ve got a surprise for you.”
>That’s how I found myself standing in the waiting room of a human medical facility, staring at the sleek, black case he’d brought with him. Inside was a prosthetic arm, crafted with a blend of Rakion and human technology, its design sleek and surprisingly elegant.
>“Daniel...” I began, my voice trailing off as I tried to process the gesture. “You didn’t have to—”
>“I wanted to,” he interrupted, his tone firm but warm. “You’ve been making do with one arm for far too long. It’s about time someone did something about it.”
>I stared at him, the weight of his words settling over me. There was something in his eyes, something deeper than just kindness, but I couldn’t quite put my finger on it.
>“Besides,” he added with a smirk, “I figured you could use a hand.”
>“That’s terrible,” I said, though I couldn’t stop the small grin that crept onto my face.
>“I’m terrible,” he shot back, grinning wider.
>The last thing I remembered was the doctor adjusting something on the machine, her voice calm and steady as she explained the anesthesia process. Daniel had stayed close, his hand briefly squeezing my shoulder before everything went dark.
>Now, as my eyes fluttered open, the world came back in a hazy blur and I was... walking?
>I blinked my eyes, squinting against the harsh sunlight streaming in. Sunlight? Why was I outside?
>Looking down, I saw no arms—just my torso and tits, and to my horror, a thick leather leash tied to the collar around my neck. It was held firmly by none other than Daniel though he looked somewhat guilty
>“Daniel…” My voice came out hoarse, equal parts groggy and horrified. “What the hell is this?”
He winced, his grip on the leash tightening briefly before loosening. “Okay, before you freak out—this isn’t what it looks like.”
>It looks like you had the doctors amputate my other arm and decided to turn me into some kind of... pet!”
>Daniel winced, his expression an uncomfortable mix of guilt and embarrassment. “Okay, before you totally lose it—there’s an explanation. Not a great one, but still.”
>I glared at him, heat rising in my chest. “It better be good, Daniel. I wake up missing both arms and leashed like some kind of exotic pet? What explanation could possibly make this okay?”
>He shifted uncomfortably, avoiding my gaze. “So... about the prosthetics. Turns out, uh... I might’ve jumped the gun on buying them.”
>Daniel shifted awkwardly, his free hand rubbing the back of his neck. “Okay, so, funny story... uh, turns out the doctors thought I brought a set of prosthetics, not just the one for your left arm.”
>My glare could have melted steel. “And that somehow led to them chopping off my right arm too?”
“>It wasn’t supposed to happen like this!” he said quickly, his words tumbling over each other. “They said something about calibrating the ports for a matching set. And, uh... apparently, the ones I brought don’t match your grafting ports.”
>“What do you mean they don’t match?” I growled.
>“Well...” Daniel hesitated, visibly bracing himself. “The ports on the prosthetics are human-standard. Yours, uh, aren’t.”
>“Let me get this straight,” I said, my voice deadly calm. “You bought human prosthetics for a Hakion, didn’t double-check compatibility, and now I’m sitting here armless, leashed like some kind of—”
>My tirade was cut short by a strange, warm sensation against my torso. Glancing down, my breath hitched as I noticed a steady stream of milk trickling from my nipples, soaking the fabric of my top.
>“What... the hell?” I whispered, horrified.
>Daniel’s face turned a pale shade of guilty panic as my words hung in the air. I glared at him, waiting for an explanation, but nothing could have prepared me for what came next.
>“So… funny story,” he started, shifting awkwardly on his feet. “The doctors—uh—offered a complimentary procedure while we waited for the arms to get recalibrated.”
>I stared at him, utterly baffled. “Complimentary what?”
>He swallowed hard, visibly bracing himself. “Lactation therapy,” he said, his voice barely above a whisper.
>“Lactation therapy?” My voice shot up an octave, and I could feel the heat rising to my face. “You let them—” I gestured down with an awkward shrug of my stumps, the leash bobbing slightly, “—do this to me?”
>“It was free!” Daniel blurted out, his face turning even more crimson. "I didn't think it would be like... this!"
>exhaled sharply, frustration bubbling up in my chest. “Free? Really? I’m sitting here, leashed, armless, leaking milk, and say that it was free?”
>Daniel flinched, visibly recoiling from the anger in my voice. “I... I didn’t know it would—uh—turn out like this.
>I shook my head in disbelief, the frustration building up into something harder to contain. “You never asked me! You thought what? You thought I'd just go along with this without even knowing what was happening?”
>“I didn’t mean for it to be like this, Vyrak. I really didn’t. I’m so sorry.”
>
>I exhaled sharply, feeling my anger simmer down just enough to not explode. “It’s fine,” I muttered, though my voice was laced with frustration.
>My attention shifted back to the strange sensation on my chest, the steady milk flow that wouldn’t stop, as if mocking me. The leash tugged slightly as Daniel adjusted his grip, his eyes never leaving me.
>“So what’s the story with the party, are we gonna miss it?”
>He hesitated, looking more uncomfortable than ever. “About that... So, uh, we already went.”
>“What?” My brain stuttered for a moment. “We already went? When?”
>Daniel shifted awkwardly, his eyes darting around as if looking for an escape from the awkward conversation. >“Uh, yeah, we... kinda went while you were, uh, a little out of it.” He rubbed the back of his neck sheepishly.
>“You know, after the procedure... you were pretty groggy and, well, I thought you might need some air. So, I took you to the party.”
>I blinked at him, trying to process what he’d just said. “You took me to the party... while I was drugged out of my mind?”
>He nodded, looking increasingly guilty. “Yeah, I figured it would be okay. You needed to relax, and I thought maybe, I don’t know, some socializing would help. But... well...”
>“And they all saw me like this?” I gestured down at my body with what was left of my arms, the leash still around my neck.
>Daniel winced. “Uh... yeah. They thought it was cute. Everyone, including Shira... they thought you looked, well, adorable, honestly. Like a little pet.”
>My mouth dropped open. “a pet?”
>“It wasn’t exactly intentional,” Daniel said quickly, clearly backpedaling. “I didn’t know it would go like this. I just—”
>“And did you... let me behave like a pet?” I interrupted, feeling a rush of anger again, but this time tinged with a hint of disbelief.
>“No, no! I mean, not really,” Daniel said, raising his hands in a defensive gesture. “It wasn’t like that. I kept things under control, I swear. But, well... I think everyone just saw it as part of the... weird situation. They were all pretty understanding, and no one really expected anything out of you while you were like this.”
>My frustration deepened, but underneath it, something else started to bubble up. My body, still sensitive from the lactation therapy, felt... strange, out of place, but there was a weird absurdity to the whole situation.
>I let out a long sigh, trying to calm myself down. “So, what, I just sat there while everyone fawned over me? Like some kind of... oversized pet?”
>Daniel’s face turned crimson as he looked anywhere but at me. “Well, um, I mean, yeah... but everyone was just happy to see you, honestly. It wasn’t as bad as it sounds. It was... kinda fun? A little.”
>“I can’t believe this,” I muttered, wiping away the last of my frustration. “But... okay, okay. I’ll admit it, this is kind of funny. I look like some weird pet in a leash. But you’re making it right, right? I’m getting my arms back, and then...”
>“And then?” Daniel asked, looking up at me with a hopeful glance.
>“And then you’re going to throw me a proper party when I get my arms back,” I said, grinning mischievously. “And pamper me until then.”
>Daniel’s eyes widened, his guilt melting into a relieved smile. “You got it. Whatever you need, I’ll make sure it happens.”
>“Good,” I said with a satisfied nod. “Because the moment I get those arms back, I’m demanding a do-over. This whole... pet thing? Never Happened.”
> “Oh, trust me,” Daniel said, still smiling, “I won’t let anyone mention it again, I promise.”
>“You better” I growled. “I’ll slap anyone who dares bring it up after I get my arms back"
>“So, when am I getting those arms back, Daniel?” I asked, raising an eyebrow as I leaned in, suddenly very serious.
>Daniel hesitated, scratching the back of his neck as he tried to find the right words. “Well... the doctors said it’ll take a few weeks, maybe a month. They’re recalibrating the prosthetics, making sure everything’s a perfect match for your ports.”
>I let out a long, frustrated sigh, but the absurdity of it all still lingered, and I couldn’t help but roll my eyes. “A month, huh? Guess I’ll have to put up with this ‘pet’ look for a bit longer, then.”
>“Yeah, but hey,” Daniel said, his tone more cheerful now, “that gives us plenty of time to get you pampered, right? You’ll barely notice the wait.”
>I shot him a pointed look. “Trust me, I’ll notice it.”
>“Alright, alright,” he said, raising his hands in mock surrender. “A month at most, and we’ll make sure it’s as painless as possible. Promise.”
>It had only been a day since I’d woken up to this ridiculous situation—armless, leaking milk, and somehow leashed like a pet. I was still trying to adjust to the sudden changes when Daniel dropped yet another bombshell.
>“Alright, so, uh, you’re going to be staying in my quarters for now,” he said, looking way too casual about the announcement.
>“Wait, what?” I stared at him, my brows furrowing. “Why am I being moved?”
>“Well, the doctors recommended it,” he said, fidgeting slightly. “They think you’ll need someone close by to help with, uh... day-to-day stuff. You know, until your arms are back.”
>I let out an exasperated groan. “I can manage in my own quarters, Daniel. I’m not completely helpless.”
>He hesitated, then gave me a sheepish smile. “You’re not, but, uh... you did almost fall over trying to open a door with your foot earlier.”
>My face flushed with a mix of irritation and embarrassment. “That was one time.”
>“Still,” he said, his tone softening. “It’ll be easier for both of us if you stay with me. I’ll take care of everything, and you won’t have to worry about a thing.”
>I sighed, knowing he had a point, even if I didn’t want to admit it. “Fine. But I’m not sleeping on the floor, and you’re not treating me like a damn pet.”
>Daniel grinned, clearly taking my reluctant agreement as a victory. “Of course not! You’ll get the bed. I’ll figure something out for myself.”
>“You’ll ‘figure something out’?” I repeated, narrowing my eyes. “Daniel, this bed is barely big enough for one person, let alone two.” I shifted slightly, pointing my tail at the compact, military-issue mattress.
>“Hey, you’re not that tall,” he said with a teasing smirk. “We can make it work. I’ll even let you spoon with me!"
>“Daniel,” I said, my voice laced with warning.
>“Alright, alright,” he said, holding up his hands in mock surrender. “I’ll sleep on the floor. Don’t worry about me.”
>I gave him a long, skeptical look. “You say that now, but what happens when you start complaining about your back tomorrow? And what about, y’know...” I glanced down at my chest, heat rushing to my face. “This.”
>Daniel’s gaze briefly flickered down, and his cheeks turned red as he coughed awkwardly. “Uh, yeah. I was gonna, uh, bring that up. Do you need, like, extra pillows or something? Or, uh, towels?”
>“Towels would be a start,” I muttered, crossing my legs uncomfortably. “I’m not going to soak through your bed like this. It’s bad enough that it’s happening at all.”
>Daniel rubbed the back of his neck, avoiding my gaze. “So, uh… maybe there’s a way to, you know, avoid the whole soaking-the-bed thing entirely.”
>I frowned at him, already dreading whatever ridiculous idea he was about to propose. “And what exactly are you suggesting?”
>He hesitated, his face turning an impressive shade of red. “Well, maybe I can milk you before bed?.”
>“Milking me?” My voice was flat, my expression even flatter.
>“I-I’m just saying!” he stammered, holding up his hands defensively. “It could help keep you comfortable, and it’d make sure you don’t, you know, leak everywhere.”
>“Daniel,” I said slowly, my tone sharp enough to cut steel, “I don’t know what’s worse: the fact that you just suggested that with a straight face, or the fact that you’re probably right.”
>His eyes widened in surprise, clearly not expecting me to entertain the idea. “Wait, really? I mean, it’s just practical! It’s not—”
>“Don’t finish that sentence,” I interrupted, leveling him with a glare. “Let’s get one thing straight: this is only happening because I refuse to deal with waking up in a puddle. Got it?”
>“Got it!” he said quickly, nodding like his life depended on it.
>I sighed, slumping slightly against the headboard. “This is so undignified,” I muttered under my breath.
>“It’s not that bad,” Daniel said, trying to sound reassuring as he stepped toward the small storage closet. “I’ll, uh, grab some stuff to make it as… efficient as possible.”
>“Efficient,” I repeated, shaking my head. “Sure, let’s call it that.”
>As he rummaged through the closet, I closed my eyes and tried to ignore the growing heat in my cheeks. The situation was ridiculous, absurd even, but deep down, I couldn’t help but feel a strange mix of mortification and reluctant acceptance.
>“Okay, I’ve got a plan,” Daniel said, his voice muffled by the closet door.
>I sighed heavily, trying to steel myself for whatever nonsense he was about to propose. When he finally emerged, he was holding… a bucket.
>“Daniel,” I said, staring at it. “Why do you have a bucket in your closet?”
>He paused, glancing down at the bucket like he’d forgotten he was holding it. “what, the roof leaks!”
>I blinked, trying to process that. “The roof leaks? We’re on a military installation. Shouldn’t that be… not a thing?”
>He rubbed the back of his neck, avoiding eye contact. “Yeah, well, budget cuts, I guess. Anyway, it’s not like I planned on using it for this!”
>“Clearly,” I said dryly, gesturing with my tail. “But sure, let’s keep the bucket. It really adds to the ambiance of this whole humiliating ordeal.”
>Daniel gave me a small, apologetic grin as he set the bucket down next to the bed, looking oddly proud of his “preparation.”
>I stared at it for a moment, then shook my head. “If that thing so much as tips over and adds another mess to this nightmare, I’m going to find a way to slap you. Armless or not.”
>“Noted,” he said quickly, raising his hands in mock surrender. “Bucket stays upright. No mess. Got it.”
>I sighed again, resigning myself to the absurdity. “Fine. Let’s just get this over with before I lose what’s left of my dignity.
>I'm stripped bare before the whole ordeal begins. slightly shivering as I think about whats about too happen.
>"You ready?" a quick and chirpy reply from daniel, he sounds WAY too happy to be doing this"
>"Not especially, don't really have a choice in this do I?" I am resigned to this fate, and at the very least maybe I can get off from this.
>its been a bit more, difficult without the help of a hand
>especially when you keep your toys in a box under your own bed.
>I quickly kneel in front of him, it's best to get this over quickly rather than prolong it.
>“You ready, girl?” Daniel says, sounding so smug and... oddly happy? He was practically glowing with excitement. It was almost adorable. Almost.
>“I’m NOT a fucking girl!” I snapped, my voice sharp as my tail flicked in agitation.
>Daniel just smiled as he reached for my engorged nipples
>with a gentle tug he pulls on one, and then the other
>back and forth and back and forth he goes, as I hear milk dripping down into the metal bucket
>plink
>plink
>plink
>I'm barley stifling a moan as he continues, why was he so good at this??
>I try to voice my pressing concern, but all that comes out is a breathy moan almost sounding like a 'how?"
>"oh this? My family had a small dairy farm back home. We had to milk the cows every morning before school, suppose you can call me a pro at this sort of thing!" Daniel explained as he milked
>"The technique is the same, right? Gentle, steady pressure. No sudden movements.”
>As if to emphasize his point he suddenly jerked one of my tits, sending a jolt of pain through me.
>"as you can see you need to have a certain... method when it comes-"
>I almost tune Daniel out as a sort of haze comes over me
>I know whats coming and I cant stop it.
>The soft plinking has stopped, now replaced with a constant splash against the milk at the bottom.
>I was filling up the bucket!
>With each passing second, the splashing grew louder, more persistent, and the volume of milk increased until the bucket was filling faster, the liquid pouring into it with a rhythmic flow.
>The gentle splashes became a steady swish-splash, as the milk accumulated in the bucket, the sound now unmistakable, almost like a small waterfall.
>Something else started splashing though, I could feel it
>My 'clit' had started to leak
> As much as I hated the term, it fits... what it was now. A small useless bump that serves only to embarrass me further
>A pleasant agony had been building up as Daniel milked me, it was even worse then when I played with my tits alone!
>I began to pant at this point looking ahead while not seeing anything at all
>With a shudder and Loud gasp I nearly slump over, Daniel holding me up and keeping me from spilling the bucket
>I could even hear as I spurted onto the polished concrete floor of daniels room, It was horrible
>"oh vyrak-" Daniel says softly in a dotting tone "Did my little cow enjoy her milking?"
>"Im... n-not a ...cow" I pant out quietly, barely even able to form a coherent sentence.
>we sat there simply sitting in silence for a while
>I suppose Daniel was letting me regain my senses, and cool down
>I enjoyed being held
>after a while Daniel spoke in his soft tone, asking if I was good
>I shook my head still not wanting to speak after what he did to me
>it was over now at least, any sense of pride I had left might have shattered during the milking
>But I didn't die because of it
>I glanced over to the bucket and my lonely eye nearly vacated my head as saw that it was full too the brim
>"I did that?" I asked incredulously
>"Yeah you did" came a soft and teasing tone "You were a good cow"
>I moaned out a 'stop' not in ecstasy or pain but in simple frustration
>I was NOT a cow
>Daniel to his credit stopped with his teasing thankfully, though he did ask me a question
>"So what are we going to do with all that milk?" he asked, his tone casual as he glanced at the bucket filled with the milk.
>I sighed, the thought of this whole ordeal dragging on just a little longer making me more irritable. >"Dump it?" I suggested, my voice heavy with exhaustion, hoping to wrap up this whole milk situation so I could just get to bed. My body felt sore, and the last thing I wanted was to keep dealing with this weirdness.
>But Daniel—being Daniel—had other ideas. "I'm gonna try it!" he declared, a mischievous grin spreading across his face as he glanced at the milk with an almost childlike enthusiasm.
>I stared at him, blinking in disbelief. "You're gonna... try it?" I repeated, my voice low and incredulous. "Seriously?"
>"Yeah," he said, grinning, his face full of determination as if this was the most logical next step in the universe. "I mean, why not? It's fresh, right?"
>I just stared at him, speechless for a moment. "You're seriously gonna drink that?" My tone was incredulous, but a part of me was also... weirdly fascinated by the whole thing.
>This was the kind of absurdity I was stuck in now, wasn't it?
>Daniel shrugged, looking utterly unbothered. "Why not? It's not like I haven't had milk before. I’m curious, though... how does it taste?"
>I just shook my head, feeling a mix of confusion and disbelief. "You're insane" I muttered under my breath, my face flushed with a strange combination of embarrassment and irritation
>Daniel didn't seem to notice my frustration. He just chuckled, clearly enjoying himself way too much. "Come on, it'll be fine" he said, giving me an almost innocent grin as if he hadn't just milked me like some kind of farm animal
>I crossed my arms, not sure how to respond. "This is so messed up," I muttered, more to myself than to him
>But he didn’t seem to hear me. Instead, he grabbed the bucket, lifting it as if it were the most normal thing in the world. "Alright, here goes nothing," he said, as if he were trying to convince himself.
>I just watched, too exhausted and bewildered to stop him. This whole situation had already gone way past ridiculous, and at this point, I was half-expecting him to start making jokes about how I was his "little milk cow."
He paused before taking a sip
>the sound of him drinking made me squirm, but I couldn’t look away.
>When he pulled the bucket away and wiped his mouth with the back of his hand, he looked satisfied.
>"Well?" I asked, my heart hammering.
>He just chuckled. "Tastes fine. Just... different."
>I stared at him, horrified. "Different? Are you... serious?"
>he shrugged. "It's not bad, alright?"
>I groaned in frustration wishing I had my arms "I can’t believe this is my life right now"
>Daniel's grin was back, wide and mischievous as he leaned against the wall, holding the bucket up like it was some kind of trophy
>"Come on, Vyrak," he said with a playful glint in his eyes. "If you're so curious, just take a sip. You might like it."
>I stared at him in disbelief. "Are you serious? I’m not drinking my own—"
>"Oh come on," he said, giving me that look—the kind that somehow made me feel like I was being ridiculous for not going along with it. "It’s not so bad, right? You’ve already been through worse. Just a sip, for curiosity’s sake."
>I hesitated, not wanting to be pushed into doing something I didn’t want to, but the exhaustion combined with his oddly persuasive attitude made me waver.
>"I don’t want to," I muttered, feeling a strange tension in the air between us.
>"It’s just a sip, Vyrak. Trust me. It’ll be fine," he said, his voice low and almost coaxing.
>I sighed, rolling my eyes. "Fine. But just a sip. I’m not making a habit of this."
>Daniel grinned like he had won a small victory, and I begrudgingly took the bucket.
>The liquid was warm, almost too warm for comfort, but I swallowed it down in one quick gulp before I could change my mind.
>It wasn’t as bad as I expected. I was still disgusted by the whole thing, but it wasn’t terrible either.
>Daniel gave me one last amused look before standing up, the bucket still in his hand. "I’ll go put this in the fridge," he said, his grin still there but with a hint of satisfaction behind it. "Can’t let it go to waste, right?"
>I just gave him a tired glance as he walked toward the door. "Yeah, sure. Whatever."
>He nodded, and with one final chuckle, he was gone, leaving me alone in the room.
>I still couldn't believe what had just happened. My brain was still struggling to process it.
>I turned toward the bed, stripping off my clothes and climbing into the cool sheets.
>The bed felt nice after everything that had happened today.
>It wasn't more than a month since that night when I finally got my prosthetics
>and the process was much, much easier than I had expected, of course, I had expected something to go terribly wrong, leaving me a cripple for another month, but nothing of the sort happened.
>The new limbs felt alien, their mechanical movements smooth yet strangely disconnected from my mind at times, but it was a huge improvement from the constant helplessness I had felt when I was without them.
>Daniel had been... well, Daniel. Supportive when he needed to be, giving me space when I needed that too.
>But today was my day, daniel had promised a redo of my birthday and he delivered
>The actual 'surprise' he had been teasing me with still needed some work, so, Shira, John, and I were dumped at some sort of mall, recently built with all the things a human could want.
>it all seemed foreign and exciting. something different from how the old local stores at least. It even had a theater!
>It has been so long since I've seen a movie in an actual theater!
>Since before the war.
>I couldn't even remember the last time I had been to a real theater. It felt like a lifetime ago.
>It kinda was in a way...
>My face lit up as I saw that some of my closest friends were there as well, even Geras and Qilat had managed to show up!
>for some reason though there was a human in the group
>Qilat and Geras were waving from one of the benches.
>I almost didn’t recognize Geras at first—he was wearing one of those absurdly frilly pink dresses he seemed so fond of lately, the soft fabric practically swaying with every step he took.
>But the most obvious thing was how normal he looked. His big, anxious eyes were a little more relaxed, his smile a little softer than I remembered.
>>Beside him was Qilat, its been a few months since I last saw him, apparently he's helping pilot a cruise ship now.
> for some reason a human was sitting next too him... and Qilat was holding his hand?
>Ithi was playing with some comms device too invested in whatever she was doing to notice
>My heart skipped a beat as I saw Urzuah stride over, a playful grin tugging at the corners of her mouth
>With one swift motion, She knocked the comms device from Ithi’s hand, causing her to jump and glare up at her
"Ithi, you’re not supposed to get that distracted," Urzuah said with a teasing smirk. before pointing in my direction
>"Oh Vyrak!" she called out, her voice carrying a strange mix of excitement and awkwardness as she scooped up her comms device and stuffed into her pocket.
>”Took you long enough to get here,” Urzuah teased, stepping aside so Ithi could practically dart forward to greet me.
>Shira and John awkwardly stood aside as the rest of my friends got up and said their hellos
>I glanced around, scanning the small gathering for another familiar face.
>“Wait, where’s Grare?” I asked, feeling a pang of disappointment when I didn’t immediately spot her.
>Urzuah frowned. “Wait, Grare was here. She was just over by the table a second ago.”
>We all turned to follow Urzuah’s line of sight. It didn’t take long to spot her.
>Grare was standing a few meters away, completely absorbed in the display of a boutique window. Her sharp, trained posture was somewhat softened by the way her head tilted ever so slightly to examine the clothing on display.
>“There she is,” Qilat said, relieved, though his tone carried a hint of amusement.
>“Of course,” Urzuah groaned, rolling her eyes. “She’s window-shopping, what an airhead"
>“Classic Grare,” shaking her head. “She probably didn’t even notice we were here.”
>“Should we call her over?” I asked, watching as Grare adjusted her stance, arms crossed as she squinted at what looked like a particularly revealing dress
>“Nah,” Urzuah said with a sly grin. “Let’s see how long it takes her to realize she abandoned us.”
>“Urzuah!” Ithi scolded
>Before anyone could say anything else, Geras stood up. “it will get her,” he offered, his frilly dress bouncing slightly as he moved.
>Geras took a few graceful steps toward Grare, his frilly pink dress swaying with every motion, drawing more than a few amused glances from the group.
>“She’s probably contemplating if she has room in her closet” Qilat muttered, the human beside him stifling a chuckle.
>who was this human?
>“Who is that, anyway?” I asked, nodding toward the human sitting next to Qilat.
>Qilat glanced over, his cheeks flushing a faint lavender. “Oh, um… this is Arlen.”
>The human waved awkwardly, his smile polite but a little nervous under my scrutiny. “Hi, uh… nice to meet you. You’re Vyrak, right?”
>“Yeah,” I said, narrowing my eyes slightly. “And you’re… Qilat’s friend?”
>Qilat cleared his throat, shifting in his seat. “Well, not just a friend.”
>I blinked, processing his words. “Wait. Are you saying—”
>“He’s my boyfriend,” Qilat blurted out, his voice raising just slightly.
>The group collectively turned to look, and the air filled with a mix of surprised expressions and stifled laughter.
>Urzuah leaned back, a smirk spreading across her face. “Well, that explains the hand-holding.”
>“I knew it!” Ithi exclaimed, clapping her hands together. “I had a feeling, but I didn’t want to assume!”
>Qilat buried his face in his hands, groaning softly. “Why does this have to be a big deal?”
>“It’s just… unexpected, that’s all.” I never imagined him of all people finding a boyfriend, let alone a human boyfriend!
>Arlen chuckled softly, looking between us. “Yeah, I get it. Qilat’s not exactly the type to broadcast it, huh?”
>“Yeah, exactly,” I said with a small smile, trying to ease Qilat’s discomfort. “But hey, it’s cool. We’re all happy for you”
>Urzuah leaned back, giving me a mischievous grin. “Oh, speaking of boyfriends…”
>I narrowed my eyes at her. “What are you talking about Urzuah?”
>Her grin widened, and she gestured toward me with a dramatic flourish. “Vyrak’s got a human boyfriend too!”
>Everyone turned to look at me, their eyes wide with curiosit.
>“I do not” I said quickly, but the teasing was already taking hold
>“Oh, come on” Urzuah continued, her tone teasing. “You’ve been all over Daniel like a bitch every time he’s around”
>The group gasped, some stifling laughter, while I could feel my face flush with embarrassment.
>“I… what?!” I stammered, glaring at Urzuah. “That’s not true!”
>“I’m just saying,” Urzuah said with a wink, “You two are so cute together. It’s like you’re already an old married couple.”
>“Wait, Vyrak has a boyfriend?” Grare asks as she comes back with Geras
>I couldn’t help but feel the heat rise in my face as I shot a glare at Urzuah, but she was having way too much fun.
>“Oh yeah,” Urzuah continued, her voice teasing. “Daniel’s his boyfriend. And Vyrak’s, well, his bitch.”
>Grare tilted her head, looking from Urzuah to me with curiosity. “So, when is Daniel going to get you eggnant, then?”
>I froze, blinking at her in complete disbelief. “What?”
>Grare's face lit up, her eyes sparkling with enthusiasm. "Oh, yeah! Being eggnant is so much fun! I’m totally filled with eggs right now, and it's like... cozy, warm, and soft inside," she explained, clearly thrilled by the idea.
>Urzuah, still grinning mischievously, leaned over. "See, Vyrak? It’s fun. Just imagine yourself all cozy and eggnant."
>I glanced at her, utterly speechless, as Grare continued babbling about how great it was to be filled with eggs.
>"No, no, no!" I stammered, my face turning bright red. "I'm a guy! I can't get—what? And he's a human! He's not even my boyfriend!"
>The group went silent for a moment, and I could feel all eyes on me, the weight of their gaze making my cheeks burn hotter.
>"Oh, Vyrak," Urzuah said with an exaggerated sigh, leaning back with a grin. "I think you’re just in denial."
>"I am not in denial!" I protested, feeling like I was on fire from the inside out.
> "And this whole conversation is insane!"
>Grare, completely unfazed, looked genuinely puzzled. "But why? It’s natural. I mean, okay, maybe humans don’t lay eggs, but you could figure it out, right? Love finds a way."
>Urzuah just smirked, arms crossed. "Don’t worry, Vyrak. When the time comes, we’ll all be here to support you."
>"What time?!" I practically shouted, throwing my arms up. "There is no time! There is no boyfriend! There are no eggs!"
>Before I could recover, Shira and John exchanged a look that I swore Id seen before from them
>"Let’s just drop this conversation, okay?" I said, my voice edged with desperation as I looked around at the group, hoping someone—anyone—would show mercy.
>Urzuah grinned, clearly enjoying every second. "Oh, come on, Vyrak. We’re just having fun."
>"Yeah," Shira added, her smirk widening. "You’re making it even funnier with how worked up you’re getting."
>"I’m not—" I started to argue but stopped myself, realizing I was only proving her point.
>Before I could respond, Grare’s eyes lit up, completely shifting focus. “Oh my stars, look at that!” she exclaimed, pointing toward a nearby store.
>“What now?” I asked, exasperated, turning to follow her gaze.
>“That skirt!” Grare practically squealed, her excitement bubbling over. “It’s so cute! Come on, we have to check it out!”
>Before I could protest, she grabbed my arm with surprising strength and yanked me forward.
>Geras, who had barely opened his mouth, found himself dragged along too, a bemused look on his face.
>As Grare enthusiastically dragged me and Geras toward the store, I couldn’t help but let out a quiet sigh of relief.
>“Oh, this one would look amazing on you, Vyrak!” Grare said, holding up the skirt in question. It was a soft, flowing fabric with intricate patterns along the hem.
>I blinked at her, caught off guard. “You really think so?”
>“Absolutely!” she replied, her enthusiasm unwavering. “You’ve got the legs for it. Trust me.”
>I sighed, glancing at the skirt and then at my reflection in a nearby mirror.
> As much as I hated to admit it, the more feminine outfits did fit better with how my body looked these days. “Yeah, yeah,” I grumbled. “It probably would.”
>“Oh, don’t sound so annoyed,” Grare teased, pushing the skirt into my hands. “You know you’ll look stunning in it.”
>Before I could respond, Urzuah appeared behind us, the rest of the group trailing after her with amused expressions.
>“Well, well,” she said, smirking as she took in the scene. "You’re already trying on skirts. Didn’t know you were so eager, Vyrak.”
>I rolled my eyes, adjusting the hem of my current outfit—a crop top and boy shorts. “I’ve been wearing this girly stuff for a while now, you know. Can’t really tease me for it anymore.”
>Urzuah grinned wider, her smirk growing even more playful. “Guess you’ve got a point,”
>Urzuah leaned casually against a nearby rack, her grin never faltering. “Well, since you’re such a seasoned pro at this now, maybe you should embrace it fully. Let’s see what else they’ve got in here.”
>“Wait, what?” I stammered, taking a step back, but it was too late. Ithi and Urzuah flanked me, pushing me gently but insistently toward the fitting rooms.
>“This is going to be so fun!” Grare chimed in, trailing behind with a sparkle in her eyes and a steadily growing mound of clothes piled in her arms—skirts, dresses, tops, and even some accessories balanced precariously on top.
>Qilat, Arlen, John,Geras, and Shira stood rooted near the store entrance, their expressions varying from bemusement to outright disbelief.
>“Are we just letting this happen?” John asked, glancing around at the others.
>Shira smirked, leaning against the doorframe. “Oh, absolutely. This is gonna be hilarious. Might as well grab a seat and enjoy the show.”
>“You’re all traitors,” I called out over my shoulder, my tone mostly playful, but Shira couldn’t help but chuckle in response.
>“You’ll thank us later, Vyrak,” she teased, folding her arms with complete satisfaction.
>Geras tilted his head thoughtfully."Geras thinks maybe it should get more clothes for Vyrak"
>Shira laughed softly, her eyes glinting. “Oh, I like the way you think, Geras. Let’s see how far we can take this.”
>I could hear their banter trailing off as I was nearly yanked through the fitting room door by Ithi and Urzuah.
>As I was pulled into the fitting room, I could feel the heat rising in my cheeks.
>“Oh, come on, don’t be shy!” Urzuah teased, tossing a handful of clothes onto the bench beside me. “We’re just getting started. You’ll look fabulous, I promise!”
>“Yeah, just relax,” Ithi added with a grin. “You’ve got this.”
>“It’s just trying on clothes,” I muttered, trying to convince myself more than anyone else as I stared at the growing pile of garments on the bench. “No big deal.”
>Urzuah snorted, crossing her arms as she leaned against the fitting room wall. “That’s the spirit, Vyrak! Just embrace it. Who knows? You might actually enjoy yourself.”
>I shot her a skeptical look, holding up a frilly blouse with an arched eyebrow. “Enjoy myself? Really? In this?”
>Urzuah barked out a laugh, but before she could respond, a voice called from outside the fitting room
>“Hey!” Geras interjected from outside the door, clearly offended. “It picked that out for Vyrak! IT thinks it would look nice.”
>I slipped out of my clothes, leaving me just in a pair of panties, a faint bulge marking where my... clit was, still locked up and snug
>as always.
>I sighed, slipping the frilly blouse over my head with some hesitation
>I wish I could say I missed my little soldier. but I didn't. It has been so long since I used the thing, and I have found much easier ways to get off now.
>Urzuah’s laughter jolted me back to reality. “Well, would you look at that!” she said, smirking like a predator who had just found her prey. “You’re really pulling off the whole ‘blushing maiden’ look, Vyrak.”
>She now came up and grabbed at my tits from behind, and gave them a gentle squeeze
>"So cute" as she looked down at them from over my shoulder
>I groaned and pushed her off, trying to adjust the blouse in vain. my cheeks heating up. “It’s not a big deal”
>Ithi peeked through the door with a mischievous grin. “Not a big deal? Vyrak, you look like you walked out of some romance novel cover. All you’re missing is the hero...”
>I shot her a glare but knew it lacked any real heat. “Don’t you start.”
>Grare peeked in as if on cue, her hands full of what could only be described as fashion chaos—more frills, more lace, and a shirt that read, I Heart BHC in glittering pink letters. She grinned, placing it on the bench like a crown jewel. “This one’s next,” she said with an almost evil enthusiasm.
>Ithi's grin only widened at my response, her eyes sparkling with amusement. “Oh, I’m just getting started,” she teased, leaning in a little closer.
>“Seriously though, you look like you belong in one of those stories where the handsome hero rescues the damsel in distress. Only, in your case, the roles are a little... reversed.”
>I gave her an annoyed look my tail flickering just a bit from annoyance
>I shot back, "Oh, I'm thrilled you get your kicks imagining big 'heroes' having their way with me. So, have you had any luck finding a 'hero' of your own yet, or...?"
>The silence that followed was a mix of awkward and amusing. Ithi raised an eyebrow, her playful demeanor flickering for a second as she opened her mouth, but before she could respond, Urzuah jumped in with a sarcastic little laugh.
>“Ohhh, burn,” Urzuah said with a sarcastic laugh. “Looks like I’m starting to rub off on you, Vyrak. That was good.”
I narrowed my eyes at her, but a part of me couldn’t help but feel a little proud.
>I go to grab the next article of clothing they want me to try on, stripping quickly.
>I hold up the glittery I Heart BHC shirt, staring at the words with confusion etched on my face.
>"What does this even mean?" I asked aloud, genuinely perplexed, running my fingers over the sparkly lettering.
>Ithi glanced over with a mischievous grin, clearly enjoying my moment of confusion. "It’s a thing," she said, leaning casually against the doorframe. "It’s one of those cute, trendy sayings people wear when they’re, you know, fans of something."
>I glanced at her, still not entirely convinced. "Of what? What’s BHC?"
>"Oh, BHC means that you love Big Hum—" Grare began, her grin widening, but before she could finish her sentence, Urzuah slapped the back of her head with a quick, playful smack.
>"Hey!" Grare exclaimed, stumbling forward a little, rubbing the back of her neck. "What was that for?"
> Urzuah ignores her “It’s just a fun little saying,” she said with a grin. “I Heart BHC means" she pauses for a second as if thinking of something ‘I love Big Hero Club.’ It’s a thing—kind of like a fan club, but for heroes and big, cool adventures. Everyone’s wearing it now.”
>I narrowed my eyes at her, still not entirely convinced. “Big Hero Club?"
>Urzuah gave me a casual shrug, her grin still intact. "Yeah, Big Hero Club. It's a whole thing, you know? Just a fun little trend for people who love heroes and, well, big, cool adventures." She winked, looking way too pleased with herself
>"You knooow-" Urzuah continued "Shiras a Really big fan of BHC, like really big"
>"Shira? Really? I would’ve never guessed."
>Urzuah’s grin only grew wider. "Oh, yeah. She’s a huge fan. she would probably like to see you wearing that shirt~"
>I shot Urzuah a flat look, crossing my arms. “Is this your way of getting me to wear it just to amuse Shira?”
>Urzuah gave a mock-serious nod, her grin never fading. “Hey, it’s not a bad deal. You wear the shirt, Shira’s happy, and we all get to see you rock the look. Plus, it’s all about spreading the love for the Big Hero Club. You never know, you might find yourself a fan too!"
>As I slipped the shirt on, I couldn't help but feel a little silly. The glittering "I Heart BHC" on my chest felt like a neon sign drawing attention to me. I pull on my boyshorts and hoped for the best.
>I tugged at the hem nervously, my stomach twisting with a mix of excitement and apprehension. What am I getting myself into? I thought, but then I recalled Urzuah’s mischievous grin.
> Something felt off.
>As I stepped out into the group, I could already feel the eyes on me. The shirt was glittery, bright, and certainly eye-catching, but it wasn't just the shirt that had everyone's attention. My stomach twisted again as I saw their reactions. Urzuah had this look of complete satisfaction
>Grare was clapping her hands together, and Ithi... well, Ithi looked way too entertained for my liking, pulling out her device and began taking pictures.
>geras just looked kind of confused, it was just clothes after all.
>John looking up from the bored daze he managed to put himself in, furrowed his brows slightly as he took in the sight. "Uh... wow," he muttered, scratching the back of his neck awkwardly.
>He shot Shira a look, silently asking if this was part of some elaborate inside joke.
>Qilat, ever the shy one, turned bright red and averted his eyes immediately, fidgeting with the hem of his jacket. "Uh, you look... nice," he managed to stammer out, though his face looked like it might catch fire at any second.
>and finally, Shira who immediately locked eyes with me. "Vyrak..." she started, her voice laced with amusement, "you look... interesting."
>I straightened up, trying to act casual "What’s wrong? I thought you’d like the shirt. It’s for the Big Hero Club, right?"
>Shira’s smile flickered for just a second, and I could see the gears turning in her head. Then, without warning, she took a few steps forward and lightly grabbed my arm, pulling me away from the group. "Hey, let's go back to the fitting room," she said, her tone surprisingly gentle
>She closed the door behind us, her expression torn between amusement and exasperation as she turned to face me
>"Vyrak," she began, crossing her arms and giving me a look that could only be described as equal parts concerned and amused. "Do you really not know what BHC means?"
>I blinked, feeling my stomach drop. “Uh… Big Hero Club?” I ventured, my voice lacking the confidence I’d hoped for
>Shira pinched the bridge of her nose, her lips twitching like she was fighting back a laugh. “No, Vyrak. It does not mean Big Hero Club”
>“Wait— “Then what does it mean?”
>Shira hesitated for a moment, as if trying to figure out the best way to break it to me. Finally, she sighed and looked me dead in the eyes. “It stands for Big Human Cock.”
>For a second, I just stared at her, the words taking an agonizingly long time to register. Then, the realization hit me like a freight train. My face went from slightly warm to what felt like a full-on inferno. “What?!”
>Shira bit her lip, clearly trying to suppress a laugh but failing miserably. “Yeah. So, uh… you’re wearing a shirt that says ‘I love Big Human Cock.’”
>My Tail flew up to cover the lettering on the shirt, as if that would somehow undo the damage. “Why didn’t anyone tell me?!” my metallic hands went to the sides of my head.
>I was ready to rip out my own feathers
>Shira couldn’t hold it in anymore. She doubled over, clutching her stomach as laughter spilled out of her like water through a broken dam. “Oh, Vyrak,” she managed between gasps, “your face right now—priceless!”
>“This isn’t funny!” I exclaimed, pacing the small changing room in a panic.
>My tail was still wrapped protectively over the letters, and my hands tugged at my feathers as if I could physically expel the embarrassment coursing through me. “I look like an idiot! They’re all out there laughing at me!”
>Shira wiped a tear from her eye, still grinning like a Cheshire cat. “Okay, okay,” she said, holding up her hands in mock surrender. “You’re right—it’s not funny. It’s absolutely hilarious.”
>I groaned, slumping against the wall as I buried my burning face in my hands. “Urzuah is dead to me. Dead.”
>“Shira,” I deadpanned, gesturing toward the door. “They saw me.”
>She smirked. “Yeah, but they don’t count. They’re all idiots too.”
>Shira's smirk widened as her gaze drifted toward the pile of clothes in the corner. “Alright, alright,” she said, brushing off her laughter like it never happened. “Let’s find you something else to wear—something that won’t make you want to dig a hole and bury yourself alive.”
>Shira’s smirk didn’t falter as she stepped closer, her hands reaching for the hem of my shirt. “Alright, let’s get you out of this disaster first,” she said, tugging the glittery monstrosity.
>While she wasn't rough in pulling off the shirt she still brushed against my sensitive areas causing me to jolt as she pulled the shirt over my head
>“Shira!” I yelped, instinctively wrapping my tail around myself to shield as much as possible. “A little warning would’ve been nice!”
>She just grinned, holding up the offending shirt like it was some sort of defeated trophy. “Relax, Vyrak. its nothing I haven't seen before.... you really should get yourself a bra though" She was staring at my massive tits again!
>“Shira!” I protested, my face heating up as I crossed my arms over my chest. My tail wrapped tighter around me like a makeshift shield. “Can you not stare?!”
>Her grin widened as she casually tossed the glittery shirt onto the pile. “Hey, it’s not my fault you’ve got, uh… an impressive rack. Seriously though, a bra wouldn’t hurt. You’re asking for back pain with those.”
>Her tone was teasing, but there was a lightness to it that made it hard to stay mad. She grabbed a sleek black top sweeter with a deep neckline and gold accents that matched the collar around my neck.
>“Shira,” I muttered, glancing at the sleek black top she was holding up. My face was still red, and I felt completely exposed. “I don’t need you picking out my clothes like this. I can manage.”
>“Oh, this should do,” Shira said, holding it up to me with a glint of satisfaction in her eyes. "This one’s sleek and will totally match your collar. Plus, no embarrassing slogans or sparkles." She tossed it to me and gestured for me to try it on.
>I stared at the top for a moment, the neckline dipping low enough to make me second-guess it, but I wasn’t about to argue. At least it was a clean break from the horror of the last outfit.
>“Alright, alright,” I muttered, pulling it on. The fabric felt soft against my skin, a lot more comfortable than the previous disaster. The gold accents gleamed subtly, and I could feel the collar resting in harmony with the outfit.
>Shira wasn’t done yet. She scanned the pile of clothes with the precision of a predator hunting its prey. “Now let’s get you some leggings,” she declared, her tone making it clear that this wasn’t up for debate.
>“Leggings?” I echoed, my tail flicking nervously. “Don’t you think that’s a bit much?”
>She raised an eyebrow at me, already holding up a pair of sleek, black leggings with gold accents that matched the top. “Trust me, these will pull the whole look together. Plus, they’re comfy.”
>“Shira, wait—!” I stammered as she knelt down and tugged my boyshorts down in one swift motion.
>Time seemed to slow as I realized what had just happened. My panties—delicate, lacy, and definitely not something I wanted anyone to see—were now completely visible. My face instantly turned crimson.
>Then, to my utter horror, I noticed the faint, telltale shimmer of a leak right where my cage was. The humiliation hit me like a freight train, my hands flying to cover myself as best I could.
>“Oh, wow,” Shira said, blinking at the sight before her expression twisted into a smirk. “That’s… adorable.”
>“Stop looking!” I squeaked, my voice cracking as I wrapped my tail around myself like a makeshift privacy curtain.
>With a deft flick of her wrist, Shira swept aside my tail and tugged down the delicate lace covering the small disk keeping my clit small and limp
>I covered my eyes, both in shame and horror, hoping to block out this nightmare. "I can't believe this is happening," I muttered, wishing I could just vanish from existence.
>Shira continued to gawk at my exposed privates, her smirk growing wider with each passing second
>She paused for a moment, clearly amused by my flustered state. Her eyes gleamed with mischievous curiosity.
>"Ah, so that's why you get so flustered all the time!" she exclaimed, as if she'd just uncovered a great secret.
>“Shira, please…” I muttered, my face burning hotter than ever. I wished I could just melt into the floor.
>She chuckled, her tone softening as she leaned in a little closer, her voice teasing but light. “Oh, come on. It’s nothing to be embarrassed about. You're... adorable when you're like this."
>Her words did nothing to ease the heat in my face. If anything, they made it worse.
>“I’d appreciate it if you didn’t call me adorable while I’m having the most humiliating moment of my life,” I muttered
>Shira only laughed, the sound warm and full of amusement. “Relax, Vyrak. You’re overthinking it, as usual. It’s just me. You don’t need to feel so self-conscious.”
>I said nothing, my tail flicking nervously as I tried to pull myself together. Shira’s gaze lingered, that insufferable smirk never leaving her face.
>“You know,” she started, her voice taking on that familiar, teasing lilt, “The blushing, the awkwardness…I bet you’re like a walking bundle of horny half the time.”
> Her fingers moved sensually lightly tapping the tiny disk trapping what made me a male
>“Shira!” I yelped, my tail snapping to attention like a startled snake. “Can you not?!”
>Her smirk only widened as her fingers lightly tapped the tiny, metallic disk securing my cage.
>The teasing pressure sent a shiver up my spine, and I instinctively wrapped my tail tighter around myself, as though it could shield me from her relentless taunting.
>“What?” she said, feigning innocence, though the mischievous glint in her eyes betrayed her. “I’m just... curious.
>It’s so small and neat. Kinda impressive how it keeps everything locked away so snugly.”
>I buried my face in my hands, groaning in pure mortification. “Please stop talking,” I muttered, my voice muffled by my palms.
>“Oh, come on, Vyrak,” she purred, leaning in closer. Her voice dropped to a playful whisper. “You can’t tell me you’re not at least a little used to it by now. How long has it been, huh?”
>“Shira,” I groaned, dragging her name out in protest, but she wasn’t letting up.
>“A month? A year?” she pressed, tapping the cage again, her tone brimming with honest curiosity. “Longer?”
>Not that tiny?” she repeated mockingly, her voice dripping with feigned disbelief. “Guess I’ll just have to take your word for it, hmm?”
>I groaned, my tail wrapping tighter around me like it could somehow shield me from her relentless teasing.
>“Oh, hush,” she said, cutting me off with a wave of her hand.
>"We don’t want to be in here forever, so stop pouting and put these on" Shira said as she shoved a pair of leggings into my arms
>“Shira, these are practically see-through!” I protested, holding them at arm’s length as if they might bite me.
>“Oh, don’t be so dramatic,” she teased, stepping closer.
>“You’ll look great. They’ll hug everything just right.” Her tone was far too enthusiastic for my comfort.
>Sliding into the leggings was every bit as mortifying as I’d expected. The fabric stretched obscenely, clinging to me like a second skin and leaving absolutely nothing to the imagination. I tugged at the waistband, trying in vain to make them feel less… revealing.
>To my begrudging surprise, though, they did pair rather well with the black sweater Shira had thrown at me earlier.
>The sleek black top hugged my torso snugly, its deep neckline drawing just enough attention to make me feel self-conscious. Gold accents shimmered faintly along the hem, perfectly matching the collar around my neck—a detail Shira seemed far too pleased about.
>“See?” Shira said, stepping back to admire her handiwork. “I told you it would work.” Her smirk was practically a permanent fixture at this point. “You look good, Vyrak. Like, really good.”
>“I feel ridiculous,” I muttered, pulling at the hem of the sweater in a vain attempt to cover more of myself.
>“Ridiculously hot, maybe,” Shira quipped, her eyes sparkling with amusement
>“And it’s better than that BHC shirt, right?”
>I shuddered at the thought
>Shira beamed like she’d just won some grand prize.
>“Exactly. Now, come on. Let’s show everyone the new and improved Vyrak.”
>Outside, the rest of the group was waiting, lounging around near the entrance. Urzuah, ever the presence, leaned against a pillar, while Grare and Ithi whispered and giggled over something in hushed tones.
>Geras sat off to the side, fidgeting with himself
> Every few moments, his eyes darted to a flashing “Open” sign above the store entrance, his lips twitching into a slight grimace before he forced them into a neutral line.
>Qilat was standing close to Arlen, their fingers shyly brushing together. John, as usual, stood off to the side
>“Okay, guys, get ready,” Shira announced, her voice full of barely contained glee. “Presenting… the new and improved Vyrak!”
>All eyes turned to me as I shuffled forward, tail wrapping around my leg in a vain attempt to find comfort.
>Urzuah was the first to react, leaning casually against the wall. she let out a low whistle
>“Vyrak, is that really you? Damn, man, I barely recognize you!”
>Geras’s gaze snapped up
>When Vyrak stepped forward, clad in a sleek black sweater and leggings that left little to the imagination, Geras blinked, processing the transformation with a faint tilt of his head.
>“Oh,” he said softly, a note of awe in his voice.
>“I-it suits you. You look great" Qilat said, giving me a small, shy smile. Arlen, sitting beside him, nodded vigorously in agreement.
>John gave a small chuckle from the side. “Not bad, Vyrak. But next time, maybe a little less skin-tight?”
>Shira shot him a playful glare, but I couldn’t help the blush creeping up my neck.
>“Oh, please, don’t act so shy,” Shira teased, giving me a gentle push forward. “Everyone loves it, and you look amazing.”
>“Alright, now that we’ve all properly admired Vyrak’s glow-up,” Shira began with a grin that promised trouble, “I have the perfect next stop for us.”
>“Oh no,” I muttered, already bracing myself for whatever scheme she had in mind.
>“Relax,” she said with an exaggerated roll of her eyes. “It’s just a quick detour… to there.”
>She pointed down the hall toward a neon-lit storefront, its flashy display leaving no doubt about the type of shop it was.
>“You’ve got to be kidding,” I groaned, tail instinctively wrapping around my leg again.
>Urzuah smirked. “Now this is going to be fun.”
>“Don’t we have a movie to go to?” I asked desperately, hoping to steer the group away from Shira’s latest scheme.
>Shira waved me off with a laugh. “The movie doesn’t start for another hour. Plenty of time for a quick look around.”
>“Define ‘quick,’” I muttered, glancing back at the storefront like it was a portal to some unspeakable realm of horror.
>Urzuah clapped me on the shoulder, grinning. “Relax, Vyrak. This’ll be way more entertaining than any movie.”
>“For you, maybe,” I shot back, tail curling tighter around my leg.
>“Come on,” Shira said, practically dragging me forward. “Consider it a bonding experience.”
>You know,” I grumbled as Shira continued dragging me toward the store, “it is my birthday. Shouldn’t I be the one deciding what we do?”
>Shira didn’t even break stride, looking back at me with a mischievous grin. “Exactly! And as your Bondmate, it’s my job to make sure you have the most memorable birthday possible. Trust me, you’ll thank me later.”
>“Bondmate?” I repeated incredulously. "You’re playing that card now? Don’t think for a second that lets you get away with this of all things!"
>“Oh, but it does,” she said with mock solemnity, her grin widening. “I’ve taken it upon myself to make sure you live your life to the fullest. And what better way to celebrate your birthday than by embracing new experiences?”
>Shira laughed, the sound as carefree as ever. “It means looking out for you and making sure you don’t waste your day doing boring stuff. And trust me, Vyrak, you need a little excitement in your life.”
>“This is the sort of stuff that should be kept private, not whatever this is,” I muttered, trying to sound stern as I glanced around, wishing I could disappear into the floor.
>Shira, however, seemed completely unfazed. “Oh, relax. It’s not like we’re buying anything. Just… looking around. Consider it an educational experience.”
>As we ventured into the store, I turned to my friends, desperately hoping for some kind of rescue.
>Urzuah was worse than Shira, Actively seeking out ways to humiliate me, rather then Shiras way
> She was making absurd faces and gestures in my direction as she tried on a strap-on, so she was no help
>Qilat, still clutching Arlen’s hand, nervously peered around the store, his face turning slightly pink. “I’m with Vyrak on this one. This is a little… out of my comfort zone.”
>He and Arlen where staring at a poster of a human in some of the most absurd lingerie I have ever seen
>Arlen, on the other hand, shrugged and looked at Qilat with a grin. “I dunno, man, it could be fun. A little adventure never hurt anyone.”
>I groaned, my hopes of help quickly dwindling as I realized none of them were coming to my rescue. Instead, it seemed like they were all too amused or too hesitant to intervene.
>“See?” Shira beamed, her grip still firm on my arm. “Everyone’s on board. It’s all about having a little fun!”
>As the chaos of the store swirled around me, my eyes landed on an outfit hanging in the corner—lots of straps and bells and dangling trinkets
>It was bold, ridiculous even, but my mind spun with a sudden, absurd idea. Maybe, just maybe, this was how I could remind Shira of what we had before John came into the picture
>She liked humans, sure, but there were things humans couldn’t do. Like a proper mating dance
> The tag dangled tauntingly, reminding me that this wasn’t exactly cheap, but if it gave me even a chance at winning Shira’s attention back from him, it would be worth every credit
>With the bag tucked securely under my arm, I casually strolled back toward the group, doing my best to act natural.
>“What’s in the bag?” Shira asked immediately, her eyes narrowing with curiosity
>“Nothing!” I blurted, far too quickly
>“Oh, relax,” Shira said, laughing as she scanned a nearby shelf. Her hand darted out, grabbing a small device that looked harmless enough—until she turned it on, and the buzzing sound filled the air.
>“What the hell is that?” I asked, already dreading the answer
>Her grin turned absolutely wicked as she held up the culprit. “Just a little something to help you loosen up.”
>“Don’t you dare,” I warned, my tail curling defensively around my leg.
>“Too late!” she declared, and before I could escape, she reached out and tapped the vibrating device lightly against my crotch
>The cage probably made worse
>It was like a bolt of electricity shot through me.
>My knees buckled instantly, and I hit the ground in a heap, tail flailing as my entire body rebelled against the sudden, overwhelming sensation.
>“Shira!” I gasped, trying to catch my breath
>“Oh!” Shira exclaimed, her laughter echoing through the store. “I didn’t think you’d actually fall over!"
>Urzuah was doubled over, clutching her sides. “Oh, Vyrak, that was priceless!” she wheezed
>As I lay sprawled on the floor, the aftershocks of that cursed wand still rippling through my nerves, a far heavier weight settled on me—humiliation.
>And then I felt it. A warmth spreading, unwelcome and mortifying, across my thin leggings.
>My breath hitched, and my tail stiffened as the realization struck. Heat rose to my face, turning my scales a deeper shade. This couldn’t be happening.
>not again, not now not in public!
“Vyrak?” Shira’s voice cut through my spiraling thoughts, softer now, laced with concern
>My bondmate, the one I trusted to stand by me, had just turned me into the punchline of the joke. On the date of my birth, no less!
>My tail curled tightly against me, a shield against the sting of my own emotions.
>“Vyrak…” Shira’s voice was softer now, the laughter drained from her tone.
>I forced out a shaky breath, refusing to let my voice crack. “Why?” was all I managed to ask.
>The laughter in the store died down as an awkward silence fell over the group. Even Urzuah straightened, her grin faltering as she exchanged a glance with Shira.
>Shira knelt beside me, her usually mischievous expression now tinged with guilt. “Vyrak, I didn’t mean to—”
>“You didn’t mean to what?” I snapped, the hurt spilling over before I could stop it. My tail flicked sharply against the ground. “Humiliate me in front of everyone? Make my birthday into a spectacle?"
>my eyes where wet and I could feel tears running down my face now. not that I cared.
>The guilt in her eyes deepened, and for a moment, she was silent. “You’re right,” she said finally, her voice steady but filled with regret. “It does mean something.
>It means everything. And I messed up.” She sat back on her heels, her tail curling in a rare sign of unease. “I thought I was making your birthday fun, I guess I went too far, I’m sorry, Vyrak.”
>Shira reached out hesitantly, her hands hovering near me for a moment before she helped me to my feet. Her touch was gentle, the usual playful force absent as if she was afraid of breaking me further.
>“Let’s get out of here,” she said softly, brushing imaginary dust off my shoulder. The usual energy in her voice was replaced by an apologetic calm.
>I didn’t answer, just nodded. My cheeks still burned, and my tail remained curled tightly around my leg, a barrier against the lingering shame.
>The group began to gather near the exit, the atmosphere awkward and subdued. Even Urzuah had toned down her antics, casting quick, guilty glances in my direction. Qilat and Arlen trailed behind, clearly unsure of what to say or do.
>as we approached the door, Shira’s voice broke the silence. “Hey, Vyrak…”
>I glanced at her, still wary. “What?”
>Her grin was small, tentative, almost sheepish.
>“Should I… should I get the wand for you?” she asked, her tone somewhere between teasing and sincere. “You know, as a birthday gift—for later use. Just between us.”
>The suggestion caught me completely off guard, and I felt my face heat up again. My tail curled instinctively around my leg as I stared at her, unsure how to respond.
>Her lips quirked up in a faint, hopeful smile.
>“Only if you want it,” she added quickly, holding her hands up in a gesture of peace. “No pressure.”
>Against all odds, I found myself timidly nodding, unable to meet her gaze. “Y-yeah,” I stammered, the words barely audible.*
>Shira’s smile softened, and she ruffled the feathers on my head “Got it. I’ll be right back.”
>Once the transaction was complete, Shira tucked the small bag discreetly under her arm and gave me a reassuring nudge.
>“Okay, now it’s movie time. I promise this part of the day will be all about you,” she said, her voice warm and sincere.
>As we made our way through the crowded promenade toward the theater, the group gradually relaxed.
>Shira kept close by my side, her demeanor as gentle as she was with me before the war, while Arlen and Qilat exchanged hushed talk.
>It wasn’t until we were halfway there that I noticed something was off.
>I glanced back, tail twitching with unease. “Where’s Grare? And Geras?”
>Ithi frowned, her head swiveling to scan the throng of people. “Weren’t they right behind us?”
>Qilat looked worried, clutching Arlen’s hand a little tighter.
>“Maybe they got distracted again” he suggested, his voice tinged with nervousness.
>Urzuah sighed dramatically. “Fine, let’s retrace our steps. Can’t leave anyone behind, I guess.”
>As we turned back, John took the lead, his tall figure cutting through the bustling crowd with ease.
>His keen eyes scanned the sea of faces, his human instincts for navigation proving surprisingly effective.
>It didn’t take long to find them.
>Just a few storefronts back, Grare and Geras were inside a brightly lit toy shop.
>Through the large glass windows, we could see them standing near a display of plush toys.
>We stepped into the shop, the door chiming cheerfully.
>Geras stood in front of a shelf lined with plushies, his eyes fixed on one in particular—a soft, round astronaut doll. Its oversized helmet gleamed under the shop lights, and its tiny arms were stretched outward as if ready to embrace anyone who picked it up.
>“Seriously?” Urzuah said, leaning against the nearest shelf with a smirk. “This is what’s holding us up?”
>“It’s adorable,” Grare replied, not even glancing back. She placed a hand on her hip, her attention fixed on Geras. “Go on, Geras. Just grab it.”
>Geras hesitated, his tail curling slightly as he glanced up at the plush. “It… it can’t reach it,” Geras mumbled, his voice barely audible. Its hands twitched nervously at his sides.
>Urzuah rolled her eyes and stepped forward, clearly unimpressed with the situation. “Fine, I’ll grab it. Can’t be that hard.”
>She stood beneath the shelf, her hands on her hips as she glared up at the astronaut plush.
>Stretching onto her toes, she reached as far as she could, her tail flicking in determination, but the doll remained well out of reach.
>“You’ve got to be kidding me,” she muttered, stepping back and crossing her arms. “Why do humans make their shelves so high?"
>Turning sharply, she cupped her hands around her mouth. “Hey, John! Get over here and he-
>Before she could finish, Geras stepped forward, gently gripping her by the waist.
>“What the-?!” Urzuah yelped as Geras effortlessly lifted her into the air, holding her as if she weighed nothing at all.
>Shira and I watched the scene unfold from a few steps away, both of us momentarily stunned into silence.
>Urzuah’s startled squawk nearly made me lose my composure. I pressed a hand over my mouth, trying to stifle a giggle as I watched the scene unfold.
>Beside me, Shira wasn’t faring any better.
>Her tail twitched with barely contained amusement, and her lips were pressed tightly together as if to stop herself from laughing out loud.
>“It asks you to grab the doll, Urzuah,” Geras said happily, completely oblivious to the humor of the situation as he held her aloft.
>Urzuah, the genetically engineered warrior, who could topple enemies with a single blow, was now being held by Geras like she was a mere child.
>She squirmed in his grip, still trying to maintain her usual indomitable composure, but the situation made it hard for anyone to take her seriously.
>“This is… this is ridiculous,” she muttered, but there was a hint of reluctant amusement in her voice. She shot us a look, clearly not pleased at the giggles she could hear from our direction.
>“Just grab the doll, Urzuah,” I said, my voice barely containing the joy bubbling inside me.
>The sight of Urzuah, usually the one in control, the one always teasing others, now helpless in Geras’s grasp, was just too much.
>Shira, still standing beside me, couldn’t hold back any longer. A soft laugh escaped her, and I joined in, both of us finding it impossible to contain our amusement
>Urzuah gave us a pointed look, but there was no hiding the small grin on her face as she held the astronaut doll.
>"Alright, alright," she muttered, clearly unable to resist the moment of payback as she straightened herself up. "You’ve had your fun."
>Geras gently set Urzuah down, His bright eyes locked on her for a moment, and then, without warning, he wrapped his arms around her in a hug.
>"It is happy you grabbed the doll, Urzuah!" he said with sincere enthusiasm, his voice filled with childlike glee.
>Urzuah, caught off guard by the sudden hug, stiffened at first, blinked a few times before giving a quick shrug.
>She huffed, clearly trying to return to her usual
>"It’s no big deal," she muttered, brushing herself off and straightening her posture as if nothing had happened.
>The usual distant swagger returned to her voice. "Now, can we move on? I don’t have time for all this fluff."
>Despite her attempt to brush it off, the faintest pink tinge on her cheeks betrayed her Embarrassment.
>But, true to form, Urzuah would never fully admit it.
>We stepped through the grand entrance of the theater, the golden glow of the lights reflecting off the polished floors.
>The hum of excitement from the crowd surrounded us, drawing us deeper into the heart of the venue
>“Well, this is fancy,” I mutter scanning the area
>Geras, walking beside us and clutching his astronaut plush, stared in wide-eyed wonder at the intricate carvings on the walls. “It thinks this place is beautiful,” he said softly, his voice full of childlike awe
>Urzuah snorted, smirking as she nudged him. “It’s just a theater, Geras. Don’t get lost in it.”
>As we wandered toward the concession stand, the smell of buttered popcorn, sizzling pretzels, and sweet candy wafted through the air.
>We ordered enough snacks to feed a small army
>a giant tub of popcorn, drinks for everyone, and an assortment of candies.
>“What are we even watching again?” I asked, balancing the popcorn under one arm while trying not to spill my drink.
>John finally spoke up after a while. “It’s called Independence Day. It’s this old movie about aliens invading Earth. Lots of explosions, cheesy lines. it’s gr-"
>Before he could elaborate further, Arlen stepped forward, his expression uncharacteristically serious. “Actually,” he said, drawing everyone’s attention, “it’s a true story. A dramatic retelling of humanity’s first contact with alien life.”
>That stopped us in our tracks. The weight of his words hung in the air as the Hakions in the group exchanged wide-eyed glances
>“This is before our war, right?” I ask, my tail flickering side to side in confusion.
>Arlen nodded solemnly, his expression unchanged. “Yes, this happened long before we encountered each other. It’s part of humanity’s early history. A significant chapter in their development and survival as a species.”
>John just glared at Arlen saying nothing before taking Shiras hand and leading us to our seats
>I still felt a bit jealous seeing that
>As I tried to squeeze into the cramped theater seat, it became painfully clear that these seats were not designed for my... increased assets
>or for Hakions in general
>it was easy enough to hop onto the seat but my legs dangled like a child
>The armrests crammed uncomfortably into my breasts making me shiver
>I shifted around, trying to find some space, but the more I adjusted, the more awkward it became.
>Urzuah, sitting beside me, seemed to notice my struggle. With a smirk that held more than a little amusement, she leaned in, her hand on my shoulder. “Here, let me help,” she said, almost too casually.
>Before I could react, she effortlessly lifted me, and without so much as a warning, plopped me down onto her lap.
>“Urzuah!” I hissed, half-embarrassed, half-surprised by how easily she handled me.
>But she just chuckled, her arms loosely holding me in place. "Well, it's either this or you keep making a scene," she teased, her voice warm but amused.
>As the movie played, the booming sounds of explosions and intense action filled the theater.
>The humans on-screen were fighting desperately against the alien invaders, their cities in ruins, their survival uncertain.
>I was focused on the film
> Well, as focused as I could be while sitting with Urzuah, her teasing hands getting too close for comfort, when suddenly I felt something press against me.
>Geras had burrowed his face into my ample chest
>“It thinks this is too much,” he whimpered, his voice muffled by my tits.
>My face immediately flushed with heat.
>There was no way to subtly handle this.
>“Geras,” I whispered, shifting slightly, “…you can’t jus-"
>But he only pressed himself closer, clearly terrified by the loud sounds and the terrifying scenes on the screen.
>He was still clutching his astronaut as he held onto me
>His grip was strong and he was starting to crush the air out of my lungs
>My face burned with embarrassment. I could already hear Urzuah stifling a laugh behind me.
>“Vyrak, you’re supposed to be comforting the little guy, not overheating,” she teased, her breath warm against my ear.
>“Shut. Up.” I hissed, but that only made her chuckle.
>John, a few seats away, gave me a questioning glance. “Is he okay?” he asked, keeping his voice low.
>“He’s fine,” I gritted out, trying not to squirm. “Just… scared.”
>“It thinks this is too loud,” Geras whimpered again, nuzzling deeper into my chest, as if my body was the only shield against the horrors on screen.
>Just when I thought Geras had finally settled down, he shifted against me again, tugging at my clothing.
>“It… it is thirsty,” he mumbled, still half-buried in my chest.
>I sighed, trying to adjust my position without disturbing Urzuah, who still had me in her lap.
>“Alright, what do you want? Water? Juice?”
>He hesitated for a moment, then tilted his head up, his large, glistening eyes meeting mine.
>“Milk.”
>My entire body went rigid.
>Urzuah nearly choked on her drink.
>“Geras,” I hissed, feeling my face burn hotter than a plasma torch, “do you mean… like, from the concession stand?”
>Urzuah was barely holding in her laughter at this point, her whole body shaking against mine.
> “You should’ve seen your face,” she wheezed. “Thought you were about to short-circuit.”
“I hate you,” I muttered before turning back to Geras. “Fine, I’ll get you some chocolate milk. Just—just sit still, okay?”
Geras nodded, looking satisfied as he snuggled back into me.
>Urzuah leaned down, still smirking.
> “You sure you don’t want to feed him yourself, big guy?”
>I elbowed her in the ribs.
>“You know,” she whispered into my ear, “it’d be way easier to just give him some of your ‘local’ supply.”
My face burned hotter than a dying star.
>“Urzuah,” I hissed, “shut. Up.”
>"aw, you dont want to share with poor Geras? saving it for your human?"
>Urzuah’s smirk widened as she leaned in close, her breath warm against my ear.
>“Aw, you don’t want to share with poor Geras? Saving it for your human?”
>My entire body stiffened, my tail flicking in pure mortification.
>“Shut up,” I hissed through clenched teeth, feeling the heat rush to my face.
>Geras, oblivious to the implications, only tilted his head in confusion.
> “It does not understand,” he mumbled, still nestled against me.
>“Does the human need milk too?”
“My hu- I mean, I mean Daniel…”
>I stammered, my face still burning
>Urzuah practically purred with amusement, her arms tightening around me as she chuckled.
>“Ohhh, so it is for him.”
>“Shut up,” I hissed, my tail flicking aggressively.
>She let out a slow, knowing chuckle. “Oh? Slip of the tongue there, Vyrak?”
>“Stars, Vyrak, is that why you’ve been so territorial?” she wheezed between cackles. “You’re already providing for him, aren’t you?”
>“No! I It’s not like that!” I spluttered, my tail thrashing in frustration.
>“And we are not talking about this in the middle of a crowded theater!”
>John, seated a few rows ahead with Shira, turned slightly, giving us a questioning glance.
>I wanted to melt into my seat.
>I was stuck with Geras suckling at my engorged nipple like a newborn for the whole movie
>He was gentle at least
>I am unsure how I was talked into such madness, yet here I was...
>My mind was a fog through the rest of the human film, though it seemed like the rest of my friends were enjoying it
>Geras incessant suckling put my mind in an aroused fog
>I could only really focus on him
>He buried his face against my chest every time the screen flashed with explosions, whimpering softly while still gripping his astronaut plush like it would save him from the horrors of cinematic Destruction.
>Urzuah, of course, found the whole situation hilarious.
>“Aww, look at that,” she cooed, nudging me with her elbow. “You are his favorite, after all.”
>“Shut up,” I hissed
>Geras, blissfully unaware of my torment, nestled closer and sighed in contentment. “It appreciates the nourishment.”
>I wanted to die. Right there. On the spot.
>Urzuah, of course, wasn’t going to let this go. She leaned in closer, her voice dripping with amusement. “You’re really just going to let him keep going, huh? That’s… kind of adorable.”
>"you would make a God momma I think~" she whispered in my ear, as she began to grope and tease me
>I couldn't yell at her too stop
>I couldn't even properly think...
>It was Terrifying, horrible even!
>And I couldn't stop thinking of Daniel
>I missed him
>I wanted him to be doing these things to me not them!


Best /collared/ is when the girl is more into it than the guy. Possibly even annoyed about him being too respectful.
>“Ugh, are we really doing this again? You literally own me, stop asking for permission for every little thing. I’m your pet, not your friggin’ girlfriend. Sure, okay, maybe I should have double-checked with you first before signing all my rights away— but what did you expect? We’ve been buds since forever and I could only fight my instincts so long. Seriously dude, you can’t just pretend we’re on equal footing when Mother Nature specifically built me to submit. I don’t care if that’s not politically correct, it’s an objective fact. S’called evolution, dummy. So, y’know, deal with it. It’s been weeks of this crap and I’m getting sick of the bizarrely prudish attitude you got outta nowhere. You haven’t fucked me, you haven’t cashed any of my paychecks, we’ve only gone on, like, *one* walk—which you made me wear clothes for anyway—and you get all red in the face when I call you master. You never even spank me, ya’ jerk!… Sorry, I don’t mean to overreact. I get it, you need to adjust, but you’re making me feel like a bad girl. How about we start small? For instance, *you* could at least give me belly rubs if I beat you in Smash and *I’ll* try not to get super horned up about it. And… maybe don’t freeze up if I lick you after a workout. Deal?

sorta sequel to >>71130351
I figure they still haven't quiiiite gotten into the swing of things, but they're getting there! Shame that not everyone else is as enthusiastically on-board as she is with the whole 'pet' thing.
>"Master, you haven’t gotten any calls today, have you? Ehhh- no reason. It’s just that I met up with some friends earlier and I guess I forgot to warn them that I’m not, y'know, a ‘person’ anymore. Not like I was ever meant to be one anyway, but that’s beside the point. They got all pissy and started mouthing off about that regressive 'equality' crap, as if our entire physiology is wrong just because they say so. It turned into a whole thing. I just don't get it, master! S'like, for the first time in my life I'm *finally* starting to get treated like the slobbering mutt I am, so why can't they just be excited for me? The most frustrating part was that I could smell how turned on they got when they saw my collar, but they kept pretending like they weren’t! Ugh!… Anyway, if they *do* call, please don’t be too hard on them for being dumb doggies. Yapping is kinda what they do, y'feel me? They really don’t know any better. But I’m sure they’ll come around eventually!... So, uh, listen... I'm still a little stressed out about all this and I was thinking... maybe... I could snuggle in bed with you... Like, *under* the covers?... I mean, I know I've been the one insisting I sleep on my doggy bed, but I didn't want to assume... Yeah? Fuck yes! You're the absolute *best*, master! That's what I'm fuckin' talkin' abou-- oh-- shit, sorry man, I didn't mean to drool on you. Alright, maybe I should bring a towel just in case."

>Paralel universe where anthros rule the world and humans are: Discriminated, transformed into anthros against their will, killed if they refuse/disobey
>Revolution inevitably begins, now you can burn down the very system whilst also fucking everyone's brains out

Well, using the Revolution as an "excuse" to slaughter, steal and rape every anthro you come across
Although, they did have it coming.
Imagine going on an absolute massacre in some big city, and then checking the news the next day, seeing some big wig anthro lady claiming how "barbaric these monsters are"
2 minutes after she gets off the air, you get a message from a random number you don't recognize
Its her, squatting down, legs open, with her location, full bank account details, and politely asking if she can be executed live

Nothing says you can't do both anon! I'm just a big fan of snuff and such
Besides, the fact that anthros will slowly start turncoat and willingly hand themselves over is super hot to me
>"Another victory from the Human Coalition, they are winning "
>Check profile
>Proud anthro mother of 2 cubs, AHAB (all humans are bastards)

>Go to a Anthro politicians house that's done a big talk about "putting humans back in their place"
>The door is unlocked
>Go to her bedroom
>She's naked, bound and with a streamer setup already set up
>"All you need to do is hit start and rape me"
Honestly love the idea of all of them turing out to be super machoist.

Also this gives me an idea for a erogame: In the year 2025, humans have become 3rd class citizens to anthro-folk. Humanity has had enough of being treated like dirt and began a rebellion as the Human Coalition. (You) are the commander of the Remus City branch and have already begun your assault. The primary goal I imagine is to organize your human and anthro troops to take over the city, side missions would allow you to enslave– I mean– "recruit" more anthro soldiers into you army. There could also be minigames where you execute/torture anthros. Yes I'm thinking about this way too much, but I seriously need this as a game.

Now we're fucking thinking lads
I have found my home... Tell me, which role would you serve in the coalition?
I would like to be a guerilla fighter, put me in some big metropolis and let me slowly sow discord and chaos
I might be a bit psychotic, but the though of breaking into some rich anthro's home, trashing up the place, killing them, and sleeping in sounds hella fun

Interrogator or executioner. I'd excell at "advanced Interrogation". But guerrilla warfare does sound appealing too

>"now now, tell me where your platoon is, and maybe, just maybe, you'll get this BHC"

>"Maybe if you give good enough info I'll allow you to choke to death on my cock."

Having one of the commanders wear a 'Human'd' themed costume ensemble would make me complete

Also, on a side note, after the revolution is over, what sort of punishments should we put on the anthro species as a whole?
Free-use is the most obvious one, but some more humiliating ideas would be nice
How about we make a rule that, when an anthro starts a conversation with a human, the anthro has to verbally apologize for being an anthro?

>How about we make a rule that, when an anthro starts a conversation with a human, the anthro has to verbally apologize for being an anthro?
Hot.
I'd also have a rule where they have to thank you regardless of what you do to them.
>Anthro bumps into you on the streets
>She looks up at you with horror
>Begins to apologize that a lowly Anthro like her touched you
>Tell her to make up by bending over
>She does so
>Press her face down on the ground, hard
>She keeps thanking you as you breed her.

Hell yeah, they should also pay reparations for all the damage they have caused during the many, many years of oppression
In this case, 'reparations' means that any human can ask for full access to an anthro's bank account, and they have to supply it
Also, side note, the amount of anthro cop murders during the revolution would be astronomical
Imagine taking one that gave you a hard time, isolating her in her cop car, and doing god knows what to her in revenge.

>isolating her in her cop car
My immediate thoughts were
>Shove her billy club up her asshole while you rape her cunt
>Attach the tazer to her nips to shock her when she does something wrong or you just feel like it
>Put a few bullets in her abdomen and fuck the wounds.

Fucking a anthro to exhaustion, telling her to unlock her bank on her phone and then transferring all her money to you. She thanks you. And since she was such a good little anthro you fuck her until she passes out.

>>71150731
>Fucking bullet-hole wounds
I'm sure you'd have to force them open quite a bit to do so, eh, whatever, she deserves it anyway
>>71150759
Why stop there anon? Keep going until she's not breathing (and keep going after that still! If you float that way)

Hell, the police station would be one of the first things to fall, made into a makeshift HQ for the resistance.
All the cops are made into stress relief. Either by fucking or by abusing them to take the edge off.
>You find the two anthro cops that's been bothering you for years
>Well, one of them, the other seemed to have pissed someone off a bit too much
>Make her make out with her dead coworker while you fuck her from behind.
>She begs for forgiveness while also begging you to keep going,

>Invading the police station during some late hour
>They are caught off-guard leaving the shower
>Go on a rampage, Terminator 1 style.
High command will be pleased, just keep a few corpses for display, or for stress relief
You can have a few to take to your barracks, special reward
Hell, take a promotion while you're at it

>Why stop there anon? Keep going until she's not breathing
Ohhh, forcing her to chock to death on your cock is nice. Telling her friend to clean your cock off. You don't kill her, instead you tell her to show you the girls family.
You pay them a visits, fucking her mother and sister, taking all their money as well.
The mom meekly saying "T-thank you for killing my daughter and fucking me. It's more than I d-deserve" ones you're done.

Why stop there. Make the mother and sister your bitches. Prostitute them. I'm sure some desperate furboi will come around to rent them.

We gotta break them physically and in spirit, the more distrust and hatred we can sow in their population, the better.
Imagine rapping and murdering an anthro gal, taking a pic of her corpse, and sending it to her milf mom
She's probably slicking herself raw, hopping she's next
She might even leave the doors and windows unlocked

Speaking of, what should we do with the guys? I vote chemical castration, maybe even some forced gender surgery.
Gotta prevent those animals from breeding.

Nah. Thatd be a waste. Let the vermin breed. Just means more rapemeat for us. Of course we gotta cull the strong ones and only leave the weak ones to reproduce.

NTA, but can we talk about hypothetical /collared/-core games? I'd like to hear what you guys think would make a good a game.

Honestly I'd love a animal crossing esc game where your the landlord of an apartment complex in a more anthro leaning neighborhood. You decide which tenants to fake and apartment they get with you living at the top. There could be simple minigames for stuff like fixing wiring issues, collecting monthly rent, and "taking care" (correcting or kicking out) of problem tenants. Obviously you'd be able to do lewd things to the tenants like forcing them to where inappropriate clothes, do sexual acts for more time on rent, or even punishing them by looking them out of their own homes nude.

Another could be a anthro farm simulator. (You)'re a young city man who had recently inherited the farm of your late uncle. But this farm didn't use normal farm animals, they were all anthro folk who either have a lot of debt to the uncle or willfully signed away their rights to the uncle, both of which transfered over to you. It's now your job to pleasure the farm slaves and keep the farm afloat. The more happy/complacent you can make the slaves the more productive they will be. Maybe a breeding mechanic too?

How about a FPS where you're a human cop trying to take down a illegal anthro crime ring that has been trafficking human men. Your objective would be to take down (and fuck) the crime ring, rescuing these poor (lucky) men. The caught criminals would be sentenced to life as free use fucktoys.

Space-combat game where you command a human cruiser in deep space and fight alien marauders or warlords. After each battle, you can harvest defeated vessels for parts and surviving crew, who you can either hand over to the authorities, sell into slavery, or keep for yourself for an interactive sex minigame.

I'm thinking of a game based on the whole 'Human Revolution' idea
Basically, lewd far-cry
You do main missions, outpost liberation, etc, all the while fucking and killing anthros, picking up better gear as you go
Start off with pistols and guerilla tactics and such, at the end you're rocking a minigun on a full on assault in juggernaut armor

Darkest dungeon-style game based sometime around ww1. I need to raid for trench wives, to keep my soldiers happy

Visual novel, you're a vigilante detective uncovering anthro corruption. You expose corporate espionage between rival businesses, college professors who have falsified degrees, you solve murders, drug crime theft.. The catch is that instead of shipping these criminals straight to prison, you have the option of blackmailing them into giving up their life for you. You end up wifeing that professor, that CEO, that street thug, and they each give you a new house/anthro to call your own, as well as new threads to follow. Criminals are oftentimes friends.
..And who knows? Maybe they'll even actually start to like you once you straighten out their lives. That forced mating-press from that professor melts into a loving morning BJ after you catch and straighten up the literal loan-sharks who've been harassing her..

A sandbox engineering game, could have a campaign. You build machines to kidnap Anthros and,machines to pleasure and mind break them and machines to transform them more to the players liking... A lil silly now that i type it out. But imagine making elaborate predicament machines to torment a captured anthro or your walking factory rolling up on a enemy position grabbing the enemy anthro and spitting them out as brainwashed trench wives.

>>71152290
Toy box god sim in which you own a cage/garden/terrarium/aquarium/ant farm full of tiny pet anthro. Decorate the cage with stuff to interact with, Fuck em, make em fuck eachother, torment em play games with em, breed em, build even more elaborate enclosures for them. Be a benevolent or cruel god over these tiny Anthros, just be real lewd with them.
You are a naughty Naughty girl. Play as a mischievous anthro causing all sorts of mischief and pranks. Get caught by humans for all sorts of lewd punishments depending on who catches you and what you did.
>>71152541
I had a similar idea. The Anthro farm should have anthros for as many tasks are possible. Cow girls for milk, chicken girls for eggs and sheep girls for wool and milk are all obvious. (Snuff aint my speed but if you wanted to go a darker more tyrannical route then maybe meat girls.) I also put forward plant girls: Fruit bearing bush and tree girls, Maple tree girls that lactate sap, cotton girls as an alternative to sheep and floral girls for making scents. Other pruduction girls may include fish girl for eggs, other egg laying birds, other milked or shorn creatures, fantastical creatures for potion ingredients. I think that producing girls should gain a stress debuff if you work them hard or torment them impacting the quality of their product encouraging you to use worker class girls. Dog girls are sociable for managing herds and excell in combat with certain breeds gaining bonuses for different tasks. Bee girls straddle the line between producer (Their honey) and worker (They are good at tending plant girls. Ant girls can dig out underground sections and mine for resources. Horses are strong and can move heavy stuff and pull carts and plows. Not sure what barn cats get yet... manage the many anthros their duties, diets, routines, breeding, education and luxuries all play apart in their well being and output. Build more areas and acquire new girls. continued...
cont
As your farm grows so do your capabilities, make machines to make processed products like cheese, whine and textiles. there are large swaths of land to expand into with recources to exploit I'm imagining a homesteader out on some frontier. You are of course sending your goods back to civilization for sale and you can buy exotic anthros and other advanced goods as needed. There are also Wild anthro tribes around you. Some wish to trade and are chill, while others are game to raid you for recources and others dont seem to care about you. You can choose diplomatic options trading with them and building good relationships, perhaps you could get some voluntary recruits this way. While others you make war with defending and counter raiding as needed. Gain new slaves to domesticate and their stuff this way. Will you show mercy to the starving Mouse girl who tried to steal from your stock? Will you gain the spider tribes silk through trade or conquest? Will you turn in these runaway anthros for a reward from their abusive master? Can you share this watering hole with the Buffalo herd? And many other such scenarios. Grow a a prosperous little fief out here on the frontier however you think best. The anthros will come to worship you one way or another whether out of love or fear.
Well... some breeds can be male just fine. A male sheep can be shorn, a male dog can still guard the farm, a male beaver can still be a fine carpender and a male horse may still pull the plow. Perhaps a male of good petigree could produce valuable sperm. Perhaps plant 'girls' arent really but reproduce by mixing pollen with other plant girls making them technically hermaphrodites if that matters to a plant. Perhaps selective breeding can play a big role and we can bring in male breeding studs or at least sperm samples. Through magic and genetic engineering you can shift the birth gender ratio (even introducing futa if you wish) to your needs and preferences. But by default they will be species standard Mostly female for the eusocials except for a few princes, Plants are all 'girls' with plower pussys and most other folks are 50/50. If you have excess males you dont have a use for you can train them in house chores and sell them as domestic servants or... you know... eat em. Keep a couple of choice males as playthings if you wish. I think that mating with an anthro male should displease a domesticated anthro female finding it to be an unpleasant chore in most cases. This can be avoided by claiming her yourself and then inseminating her with a good ol turkey baster. Their are of course Anthro men in the wild surrounding the farmstead and you will decide what to do with them as you go. So yeah from a world building perspective their should be plenty and from a gameplay perspective they are there if you want to develop them.

>anthro streamer gets a $1 donation from a humie
>she decides she has to pay him back somehow

>Biological dependency would be a hell of a control method
I've been hung up on the idea of Humanity conquering and dominating an alien species so thoroughly to the point of having direct control over their reproduction.
>future Humans find primitive pre-FTL civilization
>while vastly inferior to Humanity in most technologies, they are surprisingly adept in genetic modification and cloning
>heavily patriarchal society that has been drilled into their very genetics, males are strong and warlike while females are weak, meek but highly intelligent in matters of science
>for whatever reason, either out of imperialist desires or desperation, Humanity invades these aliens
>war for their homeworld is so horrific and all encompassing that it leaves the entire male population of this species dead
>female population is utterly incapable of defending themselves, war ends because there is no one left on one side to fight it
>Humanity didn't mean for the war to get so out of hand and definitely doesn't want to pursue genocide
>assists the remaining females in repairing their world while slowly annexing it
>without their male population, the now female mono-gendered aliens have to rely on their mastery of cloning to continue existing but are unable to clone more males for (some reason)
>Humanity takes control of their cloning facilities as a means of exuding power over them
>within several decades the culture of these aliens have irreversibly shifted to view Humanity as their masters and providers
>aliens now indoctrinate their newly cloned sisters to basically worship their Human conquerors
>Human/alien scientists collaborate on ways to potentially bring their male population back
>they fail, but accidently discover a method to allow the aliens to reproduce with Humans to create entirely Human babies
>aliens that fail to obtain a Human husband naturally are often assigned ones by request
>aliens fully dedicate themselves to furthering Human supremacy across the stars

I'm more partial to the method of daughters being the mother's species, and sons are rare and human, if the mother species can accommodate a human child.
By rendering species all female, genetically dependent on human males, and making the genetics behind it intentionally convoluted and the complete methods behind it the highest level state secret, you'll be able to convert anything to compliant client races, because to rebel is to risk extinction.
Societally, I think it would work best run as a strict, but very paternalistic patriarchy, think 40's Americana, and treat indoctrinate species not to think of themselves as different species, but just different varieties of human women.
To prevent them just being burdens, especially since the population would probably be overwhelmingly female, it would be preferable to actually have them in the workforce, so they don't FEEL like sextoys stuck in a golden cage, but contributing members of society they can feel proud of.
Also, bank on the idea that different species would have different innate mental processes, and emphasize scientific education to get the most of what their alien thoughts bring to the marketplace of ideas within the research sphere.
But not governance. Governance is explicitly and exclusively men, save low level functionaries and bureaucrats. The paper pushers.
Now, rebellion against humanity isn't just a risk of extinction for them, it's treason against their nation, their people, their culture, the natural order, and worse, betrayal against their father's brothers, mothers and sisters.

Nta but both of these are great ideas, though im partial to the second. I like the idea of humanity taking a T'au approach, but a bit more dominating with the lesser alien races having preferred roles based on physiology like more naturally muscular species have a easier time getting manual labor jobs and naturally speedy species have an easier time with delivery jobs

A decent comparison from what little I know of warhammer.
Peaceful integration into humanity is preferable, but not joining is not an option, even if it's by gunpoint.
But you could get very big and very advanced very quickly when you eliminate the threat of rebellion and make the conquered want to fight for their conqueror, enough that even other star polities could probably be steamrolled after a while.
Meanwhile, humanity's constantly gobbling up pre-ftl's to bolster their numbers and diversify their abilities.
Imagine snapping up a bunch of neolithics by just bribing them with unlimited food.
First generation's pretty useless other than eye candy, second could be given typical education.

>the human teacher that touches and grooms all his students

>she never trusted that new human teacher
>all the other teachers and staff had fallen for his charms, but she was no fool
>it was terrifying knowing those poor children were in his clutches
>god only knew what that human would be doing to them
>damn perverts would fuck any species, no matter how incompatible the parts were
>none of the other teachers would listen to her, saying his class was perfectly safe with him
>whatever, she would catch him
>she was faster than humans, and could hear better, so she kept her cheetah ears perked for the class next to hers
>where that damned human had those kids trapped
>sure enough, it was a mere three months after he had transferred in when she heard it
>insane, deranged laughter that sounded malicious as hell
>followed by a threat more direct than she had ever expected
>"I'm gonna groom ALL OF YOU!"
>then the screams from next door had her burst into a run
>three seconds was all it took to get out of her classroom and to the doorway of the next room
>"LEAVE THE KIDS ALONE!" she yelled as she burst into the classroom
>stopped in mid-stride in his advance on the children, there stood the human
>an embarrassed look on his face, brush in one hand, and a comb in the other
>"Please, don't tell anyone I'm a child groomer."

What kind of government should a spacefaring human empire have? Personally I think it should be a corrupt oligarchic government that's powerful enough to crush most alien threats but still suffers from pirate attacks and mining colony revolts.

>Humans become a post-technological-singularity civ.
>Tech that can pretty much create or do anything imaginable its available for the everyday man practically for free, because everyone can make anything with anything for whatever reason.
>Nobody needs anything from anyone else anymore.
>All economies collapse.
>All governments collapse.
>Humanity becomes a species of decentralized spacefaring nomads and technological demigods.
>You can pretty much whatever you want.
>Build yourself a luxury cruiser out of nanobots and sailt into the unknown to discover the wonders of the cosmos.
>Terraform a whole planet and inhabit it with bioengineered anthro females to serve as your furry sex slave harem for millenia.
>Build a supernova-powered dyson sphere to host your simulation of the fantasy setting of your choice and set yourself as the hero who fucks the dragon and saves the kingdom.
>Land on a planet with true alien life and just hang around with the natives as the Sky God who just lounges around. Fuck their wives or husbands or whatever they have if you think they're hot.
The sky is the limit.

Technologically immortal emperor cybernetically wired into all the infrastructure's systems. Roman-esque constitutional republic dictatorship. Every qualifying man is obligated to vote, and should consider the needs and wellbeing of species under their harems, and elect representatives for each larger rung up until you get to the emperor's advisors.
Up until it gets big enough that management is still becoming an issue, maybe half a galaxy.
Then singularity into a gestalt. Men plug themselves in one last time to become a collective consciousness entity.
The empire is then run less like a true government at all, and more like a massive family unit, since the emperor is husband and father to his entire populace and knows everyone personally and intimately. He can easily micromanage them and move them wherever to keep everyone content.

Combine but gooner.
Coincidentally what Freeman from #179 will do to the actual Combine Empire once he's done fucking that dalmatian and back to ramming borealis into their home planet's Dyson sphere.

Constitutional monarchy but racist. Think british empire, only the brits (or in this case humans) can hold government office with "pacified" and assimilated species being able to have some semblance of self rule (although still subject to rule from earth) and things that arent assimilated, get rule from assigned human governors. This still gives freedoms and pleasure to humans while maintaining dominance over xenos.

>To the public, she is the CEO of one of the largest fashion companies in the world
>To you, inside this limo, however, she is merely your pet dog

>Werewolves
>A unique hybrid resulting between human females breeding with anthro males
>They have total control over their forms, therefore, they make excellent spies for the Anthro Party against the revolution
>We caught this one messing with the food supply, the boy's already had their fun with her, but we left the best parts for you, Commander.

>Anthro girls who talk big game about their dislike of human men
>Meanwhile in private they fold instantly and would do anything for a human man

Oh that's a fun one.
Some ideas off the top of my head:
>sci fi pirate/slaver gang leader on a anthro planet that's hostile to a nearby and much stronger/richer human planetary coalition
>cyberpunk criminal gang in a SHTF scenario, involving control shock/explosive collars
>detective story
>medieval exiled warrior moving into a strange land (think knight moving into savanna) and carving out a personal realm
>son of a human billionaire messing about in a impoverished anthro country

>Kobeni puppygirl
>New guy at work
>Exploited like any other schmuck, but it still has its perks
>Coworker is a mangry-looking, nervous German Shepherd girl always trying to shrink off work
>You know she's far more competent (and taller and stronger) that she lets others know
>Her skulking always ends up with you having to carry more of the workload
>This won't stand
>Confront her behaviour when the shift ends
>Think she's gonna ignore or shrug you off, but she folds into a stammering bundle of anxiety half into your speech
>Keeps tripping over herself trying to apologize, asking you not to go to the boss about it
>Honestly, if she hadn't caused you so much trouble you'd think she's pretty cute
>Now she just looks kind of pathetic
>Fuck it
>Ask her out. Maybe if you talk it out you can get her to pull her own weight
>Pretty much incapable of refusing you. Absolute fur doormat
>Take her out to the park to eat some icecream
>Even if you don't like her, maybe you can talk some sense into her
>She looks incredibly nervous, but at least she doesn't look like she's about to break down anymore
>Lots of people walking their pets. This is normal for anthros right? Like if they had a monkey for a pet
>Notice she gets jumpy whenever people around them adress their pets. Ask her if she'd like to go somewhere else, but she nervously refuses
>"Oh, you're such a good girl, aren't you?"
>She basically freezes when she hears those words behind you two. Pupils are fully dilated, and she seems completely frozen in time.
>Oh.
>Oh, you can use this.
>Spend the whole evening teasing her on a park bench. Letting her know what a good girl she is, and how proud you are of her.
>She's basically putty in your hands by the time the sun is setting.
>Promise her you'll do this for her everyday if she puts more effort at work. You'll even record a tape for her
>Can't even answer you, but you know what her answer will be
>You can't wait to go to work tomorrow

This is the kind of dance furry sluts with OnlyMen accounts will do for free to attract the attention of humans while their anthro simps pay for exclusive access to see.
I can only imagine their fatherless children being bullied in school with clips of their mothers' shameless dancing once they grow up and their 'friends' discover them online.
>"Damn! That's your mom?! Always thought she looked like a slut, but I didn't know she could move like one as well!"
>"Hey! Why don't you tell your mother to dance for us like this? Oh sorry, I forgot. It says here that she's a 'Human-Only Breeding Bitch'! Hahaha!"
>"Oh wait, Anon's a human! Anon! Tell him to show-off his mother and get her to wear one of those slutty dresses for us, won't you? Tell him! Tell him!"

>"Dude, that pet bitch of yours is super cute; and taking her out in a walk on that slutty outfit? Did you train her yourself? Hahah-"
>"This is my grandmother, you prick."
>"..."
>"..."
>"..."
>"I'm adopted."
>"..."
>"..."
>"Nonny-dear, why don't we invite these friendly, young friends of yours inside, and I'll-"
>"No."

>"Yes Dearie, your brother will be ready to chaperone you for your date tonight, but the longer he takes to leave with your mother, the later they will come back. So don't pressure him any more, understood?"
>"Wha- That's no- UGH! I don't need him to 'chaperone' me, grandma! Much less with a collar and leash! Like, I'm his OLDER sister than him, and he isn't even an adult yet! This is ridiculous!"
>"Now now, we talked about this already. It's his responsability to look out for you and the rest of us, not just as your brother, but as the human of the house. I know that your mother is being lenient by allowing you to ride out this 'phase' of yours to date a lesse- I mean, a non-human boy, but dismissing your brother isn't something that we're going to allow."
>"IT'S NOT A PHASE! I'm a grown woman, and he's NOT my real brother! This isn't even a law, you're all just a family of perverts obsessed with humans and your outdated traditions! I hate this, and I hate you all, specially HIM!
>"Don't talk about your brother like that, young lady! Come ba- Wait!" *SLAM* "...Ugh... Poor girl. She's such a rebellious spirit. Reminds me of when I was her age...
>"Phone, wallet, house keys... Alright mom, I think that's all. Are you ready for your walk?"
>"YES MASTE-! I-I mean.. Yes Nonny, sweetie; of course."
>"Alright, lets get this over with. Let's go."
>"..."
>"...I mean: Follow me, Girl."
>"Yip yip!"
>"*Sigh* ...G-Good Girl."
>"Yip!"

>The character arrives onto a small religious town where humans are venerated as divine figures in the strangely secretive religious sect of the non-human locals.
>If the character is human the story is a comedy akin to Life of Brian,
>If the character isn't human the story is a horror tale akin to Children of the Corn, The Wicker Man, or Midsommar.

>It's literally just the same village and locals, but from different perspectives.
>The two plotlines interwine in the climax of the movie.

What's the potentially hottest /collared/ scenario that's happening here?
>Dutiful wife helps her husband obtain a raise/promotion out of his human boss during a off-workplace party.
>Unfaithful wife caught in the act of blowing this human, who might or might be close to the couple (boss/friend/adopted son).
>Mom was too eager to greet her son's childhood friend after seeing him all grown up and things escalated from there.
>Distraught daughter catches her mom in the act of seducing her boyfriend, something she knew would inevitably happen.

>Be Argonian
>Be born into poor immigrant family in Windhelm.
>Rich young Nordic lord needs a new maid.
>Tentatively apply for the position, knowing nords hate argonians, but your family needs the extra money.
>Get hired immediately, to your surprise.
>Forced to wear a sultry maid dress that shows your natural curves.
>But the money is so much.
>One week's payment is more gold than you've ever seen in your life.
>Now you're getting the attention of your young, strong, blonde hair, blue-eyed Master.
>He asks you to bathe him one cold winter night by the fire.
>He smelt of Imperial blood. He was a proud Stormcloak fighting for his homeland and people.
>As soon as you gazed his bloodied and muscular white skin, you were hooked.

>Alien species that has a nearly non-existent immune system or maybe oxygen is just outright toxic to them.
>Get them to open their helmet, exposing them to the harmful atmosphere, just to suck your cock.
>Rub the air filter of their suit on your sweaty balls to hotbox them with your musk for an entire day.
>Set their intake just low enough to leave them at the precipice of consciousness with a sluggish mind and lethargic muscles.

>furboi mistakenly thinks humans can smell anthro pheromones
>bad crush on human man
>gets himself neutered so he won't smell like competition
>no change in behavior from human crush
>but furgirls accept him as one of the girls

>She's mad her young daughter is being given a condom
>But not because she's too young
>It's because condoms are the fucking devil and that sex without breeding is a waste of human seed
>Momma's going to go straight home to teach her about the evils of contraception
>Her lesson and punishment will be a breeding from their humie daddy

Guys, I need advice. My doe gf wanted to show me to her parents for dinner this weekend. Her mom was hot, just like her, but then I saw her dad, and my first thought was "Holy shit, I want to rape him." No lovey dovey romantic stuff, just grab him by the throat, and fuck him in his fat ass until he's crying like a little girl. Just make him my little slut. I spent the entire evening popping a rager trying not to look at this guy. Guys what the fuck do I do, he wants to go hiking with me next week!

>save up cum for a few days
>each night pull out your cock and hotbox the tent
>the first night he just wakes up with a mysteriously raging boner
>hasn't jerked off in years, not when he's got his wife's pussy
>walks awkwardly for the day
>the second night you watch as he writhes in his sleep, moaning and gasping as he cums in his pants
>the third night he is exhausted and spent after his body has used up energy and not allowed him good sleep
>at this point the human pheromones have reduced him to a scent-drunk feral who can't even speak words
>begin the hunt
>tear off his clothes and fill his feral brain with primal terror, give him a minute head start before chasing after him in the night forest
>he's running off of instincts and adrenaline, parts of him he'd like to believe civilization had made obsolete
>but his ancestors are screaming at him to run, the fear of being hunted woven into his very DNA
>and, for some reason, the threat of death making him spill cum as his body desperately attempts to spread his genes one last time
>every time he looks back he sees you in the dark, not even panting
>tracking him via his drops of cum and broken branches was easy enough
>casually stay in the distance, just enough to keep him moving
>until he can't run anymore, his already exhausted body now fully depleted to the point that he simply falls over as his muscles fail him
>he can't even scream for help anymore, barely able to let out a few raspy bleats before you grab his rather feminine hips and pull his curvy butt into the air
>and you take him
>his shattered mind reforms around the new truth that he could no longer call himself a male
>his hole softens, moaning as he is taught to enjoy submission against his will
>the result of his body surrendering, trying to appease you into keeping him alive
>he wastes his own seed out onto the ground as a final show of emasculation
>his doe ass almost hungrily takes in your cum as if it was happy to be defiled by a human

>His Lil Bunny Gal by Wizdoggo
>In one quiet house, Lanie was preparing food in the kitchen.
>The dwarf rabbit with a Siamese Sable fur coat and long brown hair prepared a nice meal as she smiled.
>she then heard a loud thud sound upstairs which shocked her to her core and she gulped.
>"He is moving..." she thought to herself.
>Her moves started to get faster and faster as she knew that she had to cook faster.
> The thud sounds upstairs moved from side to side and whatever or whoever was the source of these sounds was moving to the stairs.
>Lanie started sweating and her heart started beating fast and she continued preparing the food and putting the last touch.
>Her ears twitched as the heavy stomps echoed closer, the vibrations resonating in the floor beneath her trembling feet.
>She fumbled with the final touches on the meal, her breath hitching, quick and uneven.
>"H-he's coming..." she whispered to herself, a mix of dread and anticipation tightening her chest.
>The sound of his massive frame navigating the narrow staircase made the small house feel impossibly smaller. The low creak of the door opening into the kitchen sent a shiver down her spine.
>“Hello there...” a deep, gravelly voice rolled out, warm as molten honey, sharp as a blade.
>He didn’t belong here—not in this world of anthropomorphic rabbits nestled in their quaint, quiet villages. He was an anomaly, a human who’d stumbled into this dimension through some impossible twist of fate. How he'd ended up in her house was even more bizarre; he’d appeared one stormy night, his massive frame hunched beneath her porch, drenched and disoriented. Out of a mix of fear and unspoken yearning, she had taken him in, hiding him away like a forbidden treasure.
>Lanie froze, clutching the plate in her hands. She turned slowly, her heart pounding loud enough to drown out his words.
>He stood there, towering—a human, Hugh-men, as she'd nervously come to call him. He filled the frame of the door, broad shoulders brushing against it. Dark eyes glinted with curiosity and something she couldn't name but felt down to her very core.
>Her legs wobbled as she approached, the tray of food trembling in her hands. "H-hello... Hugh-men," she managed, voice barely a whisper, her ears drooping low. Her hands felt clammy, and her knees threatened to give out under the weight of his gaze.
>He smiled—soft, teasing—before attempting to sit at her dining table, the wood groaning under his weight. His knees pushed against the edge, and Lanie’s mind spiraled. The sheer size of him, his rough but steady hands gripping the edge of the table, set her thoughts ablaze. She couldn’t stop her imagination from wandering, traitorous and wild.
>What would it feel like if those massive hands grasped her waist, lifted her like she weighed nothing? She pictured his fingers shredding through the fabric of her apron, his strength overwhelming, his breath hot against her neck. Her body ached at the thought of him taking her right there on the table, bending her over, showing her exactly how a Goliath handled a woman like her.
>Heat flushed her cheeks. Her pulse roared in her ears, and she fought to steady her breathing. "Focus," she muttered under her breath, placing the food in front of him. She glanced at his amused expression, her hands fumbling.
>"You're... really clumsy," he teased, his low chuckle sending another shiver down her spine.
>"S-sorry!" she squeaked, pulling her apron tightly around herself like it could protect her from her own thoughts.
>He took a bite, his sharp features softening as he chewed thoughtfully. "Not bad," he said, nodding.
>Her heart swelled with relief, but her stomach twisted again when he fixed her with a curious look. "You married?" he asked casually, eyes lingering on her twitching ears and the sudden tension in her stance.
>Her throat tightened, but she forced herself to nod. "Y-yes... but... he... he isn't home often." She winced at her own words, her ears flattening in shame. "I-I think I’m talking too much..."
>Hugh-men leaned back, stretching his long, powerful arms high above his head, the motion making his muscles ripple beneath his shirt. His towering presence filled the small kitchen like a storm cloud, the sheer dominance of his stature pressing down on her. Lanie swallowed hard, her throat dry as her eyes darted to the ceiling, unwilling to look at the tantalizing display before her.
>“Mmm, that hit the spot,” he said, his voice low, lazy, confident. His arms hung down casually, but he let one linger above her head, his knuckles brushing her ears lightly, as if reminding her just how easily he could surround her.
>Lanie’s breath caught in her throat. Her furred cheeks flushed as her mind betrayed her, spiraling back to her fantasies. The thought of him lifting her like she weighed nothing, pinning her against the nearest surface, and claiming her without hesitation sent a jolt straight to her core. She clenched her thighs, hoping the sensation would subside, but it only made her ache more.
>“You’re awfully quiet, Bunny,” he teased, his tone laced with sly amusement. His lips curled into a knowing smile, sharp and wolfish.
>“I-I’m fine!” she squeaked, her voice cracking slightly as she hurriedly reached for the empty plate in front of him. His teasing gaze burned into her back as she scurried to the sink, her plump hips swaying with each step.
>Hugh-men's dark eyes zeroed in on her round, jiggling ass, the way it moved with an effortless rhythm beneath her apron. He licked his lips. The sight was too tempting to resist. Slowly, deliberately, he rose from his seat, the wooden chair scraping loudly against the floor.
>Before she could place the plate in the sink, his large hand shot out, grabbing a handful of her soft, plush rear. The contact was firm yet teasing, his fingers sinking into the supple flesh as he gave it a slow, deliberate squeeze.
>“Ahhh!” Lanie gasped, her entire body jolting forward as the plate in her hands wobbled precariously. She froze in place, her ears shooting straight up, every nerve in her body electrified. “W-what are you—” Her protest faltered, her voice hitching into a soft moan as his grip softened, his fingers kneading the sensitive flesh with a deliberate slowness.
>Her mind reeled. Shame and arousal tangled together in a chaotic dance. She should have pulled away, protested, anything—but the warmth of his palm against her fur, the sheer strength in his touch, made her knees buckle. She pressed her thighs together, her body betraying her even further as a rush of heat pooled deep within her.
>Hugh-men chuckled, the sound deep and smooth, sending shivers down her spine. He leaned in closer, his breath hot against her long, quivering ears. “Who's my little Bunny gal?” he murmured, his voice dripping with dominance and teasing intent.
>Lanie’s mouth opened, but no sound came out. Her heart pounded so loudly she could barely hear her own thoughts. Her body was alive, trembling under the weight of his presence. She felt small, helpless, yet something inside her craved more.
>Her cheeks burned as she turned to face him, her wide eyes meeting his dark, piercing gaze. Her lips quivered, her voice barely a whisper. “I... I am,” she admitted, the words spilling out like a confession she’d been holding for far too long.
>Her head dipped, and she bit her lip, the act of submission sending a thrill through her that made her thighs quiver.
>Hugh-men let his hand slip from Lanie’s trembling, plush ass, his grin spreading wider as he watched her reaction. She stood frozen, panting softly, her body slick with sweat that dampened the fur along her neck and chest. Her wide, nervous eyes darted to the floor, avoiding his dominant gaze, but her shaky breath betrayed her anticipation.
>He loomed over her, his voice a deep, commanding rumble. “Five minutes,” he declared, crossing his arms. “Go upstairs, to my room. Prepare yourself.” His dark eyes gleamed with a chilling amusement. “Don’t keep me waiting.”
>Lanie’s breath hitched, her knees nearly giving out as his words sank in. Before she could stammer a reply, he flashed her a sly smile and turned, his heavy footsteps echoing as he made his way up the stairs.
>She was left trembling in the quiet kitchen, her thoughts racing. “What am I doing?” she whispered, clutching the counter for support. The weight of guilt tugged at her heart as her mind flickered to her absent husband. "What would he think? What would people think if they knew?"
>But then her thoughts shifted, unwillingly drawn back to the way Hugh-men’s hands had felt on her, the power in his grip, the way his deep voice made her quiver. She closed her eyes, imagining those hands roaming over her body again, forcing her to submit, making her his. Her breath quickened, her thighs pressing together as a heat bloomed between them.
>“Oh god,” she muttered, her cheeks burning as she clenched the counter tighter. Her mind reeled with forbidden fantasies—being bent over, claimed, used until she couldn’t stand. Her body throbbed with want, and the guilt only made it sweeter.
>Snapping out of her reverie, she glanced at the clock. “Three minutes!” she gasped. She rushed upstairs, her feet barely touching the steps, and flung open her closet. Her hands darted through hangers, searching desperately for something suitable. But nothing seemed right—one dress was too tight, another too formal, and everything else felt wrong for... whatever this was.
>Her heart raced as the seconds ticked by. The sound of heavy stomps snapped her attention back. Her breath hitched, and she turned just as Hugh-men appeared in the doorway, his tall frame filling the space. His expression was dark, his brows furrowed with irritation.
>“I said five minutes,” he growled, his voice a low rumble. “And you didn’t show up.” He stepped closer, his towering presence suffocating. “Are you messing with me?!”
>Lanie stammered, her words tumbling over each other. “I-I’m sorry! I was just—”
>Before she could finish, his large hand wrapped around her throat, lifting her effortlessly off the ground. Her feet dangled as she gasped, her hands instinctively grabbing at his wrist. The initial pressure made her panic, her mind screaming in alarm, but as her body adjusted, a new sensation began to take over—a forbidden, aching pleasure that coursed through her veins.
>“You need to be punished,” Hugh-men growled, his voice dripping with sadistic glee. He carried her like she weighed nothing, marching into another room before dropping her unceremoniously onto the floor.
>Lanie collapsed, clutching her neck as she gulped in air. Her heart pounded, her chest rising and falling rapidly. But despite the fear, a smile crept across her face, her body alive with a heat she couldn’t deny.
>“Undress,” he ordered, his tone leaving no room for argument.
>She hesitated, her hands trembling as they hovered near her waistband. “N-now?”
>His voice snapped like a whip. “NOW!”
>She yelped, her fingers fumbling as she tugged at the zipper on her pants. The fabric slipped down her hips, revealing a pair of pink panties that clung tightly to her plush curves, the color blending with her fur. Her top followed, leaving her in nothing but the matching bra and underwear. Her round, generous rear seemed to glow under his gaze, every jiggle and curve begging for attention.
>Hugh-men’s eyes narrowed as they caught the glint of her engagement ring. “Take it off,” he commanded, his tone colder now. “You’re mine now, Bunny gal. Get rid of it.”
>Lanie froze, her heart twisting as she stared at the band on her finger. Her mind raced with doubts, second-guessing every decision that had led her to this moment. “I-I...”
>“Why are you taking so long?!” Hugh-men’s voice boomed, making her jump. Tears pricked the corners of her eyes as her hands shook.
>He chuckled darkly, unbuttoning his shirt slowly, deliberately. Her breath hitched as he revealed his broad, muscled chest, his strong shoulders flexing with each movement. Her eyes trailed lower, landing on the large bulge straining against the fabric of his boxers.
>“Once I’m done with you,” he said with a wicked grin, stepping closer, “you won’t just love me. You’ll worship me. I’ll be your master, your god.”
>Hugh-men’s golden eyes softened as he reached out, his large, warm hand wiping away a single tear that had trailed down Lanie’s flushed cheek. The contrast between his strength and tenderness was electrifying, sending a shiver racing down her spine. “You don’t have to worry anymore, my little bunny,” he murmured, his deep voice smooth as honey, each word a balm to her fluttering heart. “I’ll take care of you, protect you. Just trust me.”
>Her face turned a deeper shade of pink, the heat radiating through her cheeks as she tried to meet his gaze but faltered. The comforting dominance in his presence was intoxicating, leaving her pulse racing and her thoughts tangled. It was then that her eyes dropped, almost accidentally, catching sight of the unmistakable bulge straining against his boxers. Her breath hitched, and her lips parted as she stared, her mind going blank save for the image of him beneath that thin fabric.
>Her heart pounded harder. A flush that had begun on her face spread down her neck, her skin heating further. She realized, to her embarrassment, that her lips were wet—she was drooling at the sheer sight of him. The hunger rising inside her was primal, uncontrollable, and it made her thighs press together as she felt the first tingles of dampness forming below.
>Hugh-men chuckled, a deep, velvety sound that only fueled her growing desire. He stood and moved to the bed, sitting down with an air of command. His broad frame seemed to make the furniture smaller, his powerful muscles taut and inviting as he leaned back slightly. His golden gaze held hers as he made a subtle gesture, beckoning her forward with a crook of his finger. Lanie’s legs trembled, but she obeyed, her breaths shallow as she came to stand in front of him.
>“On your knees,” he said simply, his voice firm but not unkind, resonating with a gravity that left no room for hesitation. Lanie dropped down, her knees sinking into the plush carpet, her small frame dwarfed by his looming presence. She gazed up at him, her ears twitching slightly with anticipation, the world narrowing to the space between them.
>Hugh-men’s hands moved slowly, deliberately, teasing her with the pace as he tugged his boxers down. Her eyes widened when his cock sprang free, thick and veiny, impossibly large. It was a behemoth, curving slightly upward, the girth alone making her mouth dry before it watered again. Her pupils dilated, her body responding instinctively as her thighs rubbed together involuntarily.
>She couldn’t tear her gaze away, her mind spiraling with disbelief and awe. "How am I going to take that?" she thought, feeling the heat pool between her legs. Despite the intimidating sight, her arousal only grew, her body reacting with a readiness she couldn’t control.
>“You like what you see, don’t you, bunny?” His tone was teasing, his grin mischievous as he leaned forward, brushing a finger under her chin. “Well, go on. Show me how grateful you are.”
>Lanie swallowed hard, her throat suddenly dry despite the flood of wetness elsewhere. Her hands reached out hesitantly, trembling as she wrapped them around his shaft. She gasped softly at the heat radiating from him, her small fingers barely encircling the thickness. Tentatively, she leaned forward, her tongue darting out to taste him. The salty musk of his skin was intoxicating, and she couldn’t stop the needy moan that escaped her lips as she licked along his length.
>As her mouth opened wider, she struggled to take him in, her lips stretching around the flared head. The weight of him was daunting, but the thrill of pleasing him spurred her on. Inch by inch, she pushed forward, her tongue sliding along the underside of his cock, savoring the ridges and veins. Her thoughts were a whirlwind of devotion and surrender. "This is what I’m meant for. To make him feel good. To be his bunny"
>Hugh-men groaned above her, the sound reverberating through her as she worked to take more of him. His hand settled on the back of her head, firm but not forceful at first. “That’s it,” he murmured, his voice heavy with approval. “Good girl. Take it deeper.”
>The praise sent a thrill through her, and she pushed herself harder, her throat protesting as the tip of his cock nudged the back of it. He applied more pressure, guiding her down until her nose was nearly pressed to his groin. She gagged, tears springing to her eyes as her throat spasmed around him. It was overwhelming, but the heat in her belly only grew. "I’m doing this for him. I’m his bunny gal now."
>Her moans vibrated around him as she began to bob her head, her throat adjusting to his size as much as it could. Saliva spilled from the corners of her mouth, dripping down her chin and onto her heaving chest. She felt utterly debased, and yet, she had never been more alive. "I was made for this. To serve him."
>“You’re incredible,” Hugh-men groaned, his grip on her hair tightening slightly as he thrust into her mouth. “Look at you, so eager. You’re forgiven, bunny. You’ve earned your reward.”
>Before she could process his words, she felt his cock pulse, a flood of thick, hot cum shooting down her throat. She moaned around him, her body trembling as she swallowed reflexively, the sheer volume filling her stomach and leaving her lightheaded. He held her there for a moment, his cock buried deep, before finally pulling out.
>Lanie gasped for air, her chest heaving as she struggled to catch her breath. Her vision swam, but all she could think was, "I’m a good bunny girl. His bunny girl."
>Hugh-men’s large hand stroked her hair gently, his golden eyes softening once more. “You’re so cute,” he said, leaning down to press a tender kiss to her forehead. The gesture was a stark contrast to the intensity of what had just happened, and it left her heart fluttering.
>She smiled weakly, her body exhausted but her spirit soaring. She had found her place, her purpose. “I’m a good bunny girl for my master,” she murmured, her voice slurred with satisfaction as she gazed up at him, ready for whatever came next.
>Many days had passed since that night—since Hugh-men had claimed her, broken her, remade her as his Little Bunny girl.
>At first, shame had gnawed at her, whispering of betrayal, of a husband left in the shadows of her lust. But those thoughts had long since faded, drowned beneath something hotter, heavier. Submission had settled deep in her bones, an ache she no longer fought.
>Now, she smiled as she moved through the kitchen, humming softly while preparing his meal.
>Lanie's hands moved with practiced care, slicing fresh vegetables, stirring a steaming pot, adding the precise amount of seasoning he liked. She had learned his tastes well—what pleased him, what made his sharp golden eyes soften just before he devoured her whole.
>Her ears flicked, her tail twitched, and she shifted on her feet, pressing her thighs together as a delicious heat pulsed low in her belly.
>"He’ll like this," she thought, placing the final touches on his plate. "Maybe he'll reward me tonight… or maybe—"
>A shudder ran through her. Her mind spiraled, conjuring up scenarios. Wicked, sinful images flashed through her thoughts—Hugh-men looming over her, forcing her onto her knees before the very table she had set. His rough hands yanking her by the ears, guiding her to his lap, making her serve him like a proper little Bunny girl.
>Would he bend her over the counter? Take her against the wall, her body bouncing with each powerful thrust? Would he grow impatient, throw her onto the table, scatter plates and silverware just to claim her like an animal?
>Her breath hitched. She squeezed her thighs tighter, biting her lip, already soaked from nothing but the thought of him. "Mmm, maybe I should mess up the meal… he always punishes me when I do."
>Knock. Knock. Knock.
>Her body jolted. The wooden spoon she was holding clattered against the pot. Her ears shot straight up, her fur bristling.
>The door.
>Her stomach twisted. Her mind screamed through every possible reason someone might be here. Had someone heard Hugh-men? Seen him? Was this it? Had their secret been exposed?
>Her heart pounded as she stepped toward the entrance, each footfall feeling too loud against the quiet house.
>Knock. Knock!
>"Lanie? Hellooooo?!"
>Her breath caught in her throat. That voice.
>She hesitated for just a moment before she cracked the door open.
>There stood Wendy—her best friend. The plump, round-bodied dwarf bunny stood with one hand on her hip, the other holding a small woven basket. A cheeky smile stretched across her soft face, her bright brown eyes gleaming as she bounced on her feet.
>Wendy’s thick thighs pressed snugly together, barely contained by the scandalously short denim shorts she always wore, fabric so tight it dug into the plush curve of her hips. Her top—a too-small tank that clung to every roll and swell of her heavy breasts—rose just enough that a sliver of her soft belly peeked out. She was practically spilling out of her clothes, her thick brown fur shimmering in the sunlight.
>"Hi Lanie!" she chirped, voice loud and piercing as always. "How are you?! You didn’t call in days, so I had to check on you!"
>Lanie swallowed hard. Panic twisted in her gut.
>She hadn’t thought about calling. Hadn’t needed to. Every waking moment had belonged to him.
>“O-oh! Wendy! I—” Her voice cracked.
>Before she could stop her, Wendy pushed her way inside, tail wiggling as she strode toward the kitchen.
>"Ugh, I’m starving," she groaned, rubbing her stomach as she waltzed in without a second thought. "You got anything good?"
>Lanie’s blood ran cold.
>Her friend was moving straight toward the table.
>The table where his food was waiting. The meal she had prepared for him.
>Wendy stopped, blinking at the plate set up neatly, steaming and fresh.
>“Oh wow, fancy! Who’s this for?”
>Lanie froze. Her ears flattened against her head. Her heart pounded so violently she swore Wendy could hear it.
>She was trapped.
> Lanie’s mind raced, her throat tightening as Wendy’s curious gaze lingered on the meal. She had to think fast. If Wendy even suspected the truth, things would spiral out of control.
> She forced a nervous chuckle, shifting her stance, trying to look natural despite the way her tail twitched in agitation. “O-oh, that?” she stammered. “I… I guess I’ve just been missing my husband, y’know?” She clutched her apron, willing herself to sound convincing. “Sometimes, I make extra food just… to feel like he’s still here with me.”
> The words tasted foreign, hollow.
> Wendy went quiet. Too quiet.
> Lanie’s ears twitched at the silence, and her stomach dropped. Was Wendy suspicious?
> But then, a soft sigh escaped Wendy’s lips. Her tone shifted, filled with something far too understanding.
> “Aww, Lanie…” she murmured. “You really miss him that much?”
> Lanie froze.
> Miss him?
> The question stabbed through her like a needle to the chest.
> Miss him? She hadn’t thought about him—her husband—for days. Not once. Not since the night Hugh-men claimed her. Marked her. Bent her to his will and made sure she knew she was his.
> She swallowed thickly.
> “O-of course I do,” she said quickly, forcing a fake, brittle chuckle. “I mean… yeah. He’s my husband, right?”
> The words felt wrong.
> Wendy’s sharp brown eyes studied her for a moment, but then she grinned, licking her lips as her gaze flicked back to the meal.
> “Well, that food looks amazing,” she cooed, her voice playful again. “I say we eat it together, then! No reason for you to feel lonely.”
> Lanie’s stomach dropped.
> “NO!” she yelped, far too loud.
> Wendy jerked back in confusion, ears perking. “Whoa, jeez, what’s with the freak-out?” she pouted. “I thought you were lonely.”
> Lanie’s mind spiraled. Shit. Shit. She couldn’t let Wendy eat his food.
> Hugh-men’s meal.
> The plate she had prepared just for him.
> If he came down and saw it gone—
> Her heart pounded violently. No, no, she couldn’t think about that now. She had to fix this.
> She plastered a shaky smile onto her face, tail twitching frantically behind her. “Oh, no! I-I didn’t mean it like that! I just meant… I’m not alone because… I have you here with me, Wendy!” She forced a laugh, placing a hand on Wendy’s plump shoulder. “That’s what I meant! Haha! Just a little misunderstanding.”
> Wendy raised a brow but then smiled, her ears perking back up. “Aww, you’re so sweet, Lanie! Alright, then. Let’s eat!”
> Lanie clenched her jaw, watching in helpless terror as Wendy grabbed two bowls and started serving the food.
> Moments later, the kitchen was filled with the soft clinking of utensils.
> Wendy hummed happily, shoveling spoonfuls into her mouth. “Mmm! Damn, Lanie, this is so good! You’re really spoiling yourself with meals like this.” She grinned, licking a stray bit of sauce from her lips.
> But Lanie wasn’t eating.
> She barely touched her bowl, her hands trembling slightly as she lifted her spoon. She couldn’t enjoy it.
> Not when she knew what was coming.
> Her mind raced, spiraling into worst-case scenarios.
> Hugh-men would come down. He’d see the food gone.
> His meal—his—stolen.
> He would not be happy.
> Her thoughts twisted, darkened.
>"What will he do to me? "
> Would he grab her by the throat, slam her against the wall, force her to pay for her mistake? Would he press her into the table, rip off her clothes, punish her until she begged for forgiveness?
> God, the thought of it sent a shiver through her, heat pooling deep in her belly. She clenched her thighs, biting her lip.
>"He could throw me onto the floor, make me crawl to him like a good Bunny girl."
>"Make me show how sorry I am with my tongue, with my body—"
> “Lanie!”
> She jolted violently.
> Wendy was staring at her, blinking in confusion.
> “H-hello?” Wendy waved a hand in front of her face. “You were totally zoning out just now. What’s up with you?”
> Lanie’s face burned red.
> “N-nothing!” she stammered, ears flattening. “I was just… thinking!”
> Wendy squinted at her. “Thinking about what?”
> Lanie opened her mouth to answer—
> But then—
> THUD. THUD. THUD.
> The air in the room shifted.
> The heavy stomp of his footsteps echoed from upstairs, rattling the floor beneath them.
> Lanie’s blood ran cold.
> He’s coming.

Ideal GF CLC is on the cutting edge of recreational genetic engineering and biomodification. Their products are guaranteed genetically healthy and prion-free, and range the gamut from "nearly human" Kemonomimi, to more "total" anthropomorphic forms. Some of their most popular lines include:
>Catgirls - flexible and acrobatic, energetic and affectionate, and with a wide variety of different personalities and quirks, a catgirl can be the ideal household companion and company. Pick one up today, or order shipping!
>Cowgirls - large, lactation-prone mammarys, a naturally docile and calm personality, physically and mentally resilient; these make for ideal maids, workers, and entertainment for colonial farmers. Buy a herd for best value!
>Mousegirls - small and unassuming, but remarkably clever! Taking up little space or resources, the ideal companion for a lonely spacer who needs someone to share those long orbital transfers with. Also come in "bunny", "rat", and "squirrel".

>Not your fur bros mom though, right?
Not my fur bro's mom... what?
I don't have anything bad to say about her. In fact, I think she's pretty great.
She's always been friendly to me, ever since we were kids. Can't say the same of the parents of every fur kid I was friends with.
She's always been kind and welcoming to me, and she was always eager to join in on whatever we were doing. If my bro hadn't told me that she can be a pretty strict mother and wife I would've never believed it from her. She wouldn't pass up an opportunity to play with us, or ask us about our current interests and what was going on in our lives.
She's intelligent and well read too. She apparently has a pretty impressive corporate job, but somehow always has time to have something delicious cooked at home. not to mention gow beau- well... she's an amazing woman really. Her family is pretty lucky to have her.
>Now tell us the story of how you turned her into your pet.
I HAVENT?! I mean, I wouldn't! Not that I can? She's married, and even then she's my bro's mom. No, I mean, she isn't interested in me in that way at all.
It's one thing for her to tease me by pretending to flirt with me for a bit and another thing entirely to go behind her family to hit on me. She's just very welcoming with guests. She loves being affectionate with people, specially guests, and I know she just overall appreciates me being friends with her son and that I'm just 'normal' around them, unlike how humans often treat Anthros like.
I know she might come off as overtly friendly sometimes with how comfortable she is with casual physical contact, specially after a few drinks, but you're seeing something that's just not there.

>C’MON HONEY PUSH! PUSH! YOU CAN DO THIS! I CAN’T WAIT TO SEE THAT BEAUTIFUL SMOOTH FACE LOOKING AT ME!
>C’MON LITTLE GUILLIMAN! YES! YES! I CAN SEE IT! IT’S, IT’S
>...
>what
>What?
>WHAT. THE. LE. ACTUAL. FUCK.
*Smashes steamdeck running Starcraft 2 against wall in fit of rage*
>THIS IS AN *NTHRO BABY! WHAT THE FUCK! YOU BITCH! YOU LYING FUCKING CUNT THIS IS A *NTHRO BABY WHAT THE FUCK HOW IS THIS POSSIBLE YOU WERE ONLY SUPPOSED TO SLEEP WITH ANON!?!?
>YOU SCOOPED UP SOME OF MY CUM?! BECAUSE YOU WANTED A CHILD WITH THE C*LT YOU LOVE? YOU AVERY ALIKE ZOOTOPIAN ANTHROSTATE INCEL CUNT! I KNEW I SHOULD OF GOTTEN THAT VASECTOMY AT THE VAUSH CONVENTION! I THOUGHT IT WAS SUSPICIOUS THAT YOU ARGUED AGAINST IT BUT I FIGURED IT WAS FINE BECAUSE I NEVER HAD SEX WITH YOU! I NEVER THOUGHT YOU’D STAB ME IN THE BACK LIKE THIS!!!
>WHAT DID I TELL YOU LAST YEAR AT DISCO ELYSIUM FEST? I'M THE MOD OF HECKING /R/COLLARED! HOW THE FUCK AM I SUPPOSED TO BE THE REVOLUTIONARY VANGUARD IF MY INCEL REACTIONARY CUNT WIFE POPPED A FUCKING LAUGHING BOUNCING FURRY CHUD NAZI INCEL FOAL OUT OF HER CUNT!?!?
>OH MY SCIENCE, I’M RUINED! YOU’VE RUINED ME, YOU STUPID TWAT! MY WIFE GAVE BIRTH TO AN *NTHRO BABY!!! AND A BOY TOO! IF IT WAS AN *NTHRO GIRL I COULD AT LEAST LOOK FORWARD TO GIVING HER UP TO ANON ONCE SHE STARTED MENSTRUATING BUT I CANT DO THAT WITH AN *NTHRO BOY NOW CAN I?!?! IM GONNA BE THE LAUGHINGSTOCK OF THE KUCKOLD COMMUNITY NOW!!! THEIR GONNA THINK IM A FUCKING NAZI ANTHUGSTATIAN NOW!!! THIS IS THE WORST DAY OF MY LIFE!!!
>GIVE ME THAT FURFAG *NTHRO BABY RIGHT NOW IM GONNA BREAK ITS FUCKING NECK! I’M GONNA SMASH THAT *NTHRO FUCKING BABY'S FUCKING SKULL UNDERNEATH MY MY RICK AND MORTY HORSESHOES! GIVE IT TO ME YOU LYING NAZI CUNT OR ILL CUT YOU A NEW HOLE IN YOUR FUCKING THROAT! GIVE IT TO ME YOU BITCH GIVE IT! GIVE IT! GIVE IT!!!! IN THE NAME OF JEFRE CANTU-LEDESMA I'M GOING TO FUCKING KILL IT!
>I'M GONNA BURY IT IN THIS NINTENDO LABO CARTBOARD RIGHT UNDER MY SHED!!1!

>"Ugh, gross, there's a human over there.."
>"I think he's kinda cute, in his own dumb little way. Not like those rumors about them are true.."
What's your plan on collaring them, anons?

They’re just being counterculture brats pretending they aren’t absolutely dripping at the sight of a human
Unzip your pants and they’ll toe the line and take care of the rest

Human genes are dominant so the offspring are inpissible to recognize as hybrids in a generation of two.

>Human genes are dominant so the offspring are inpissible to recognize as hybrids in a generation of two.
You say that like it were a good thing.
Anthros are the hybridization of humans with animals, and their external appearance reflects their unnatural existence. But the depth of their sin runs even deeper than mere appearance for its taint can be seen branded onto their very DNA, ready to reappear at the slightest weakness of thier blood.
Sin cannot be erased by merely hiding it, and even if one might appear externally human, God reveals the sin of their forefathers, etched onto the helixes of life.
Only those who are truly pure of blood and heart can shepherd their lessers onto absolution and salvation.
https://www.youtube.com/shorts/LVoIBWwkFhc?feature=share

Sounds like the kind of BS a sleazy human abbot would tell his girls to make them worship cock.
I want in or I'm snitching.

>"Everyone, please welcome Brother Anon into the congregation. As a pure-blooded He will be training under me so he can better learn to lead our flock of wayward souls."
>"Anon, this is Sister Roxanne, she will be at your disposal for whatever you need. Sister Roxanne, please show Anon around the grounds and give him a proper, worthy welcome, then come back to meet me."

What’s our opinions on humans turned into anthros? It could be mutation or magic or whatever…

A very circumstancial situation.
---
Was their transformation maliciously forced on them or an accident? A tragic occurence, they should be with some lenciency.
>Attempt to revert them back.
>If impossible give them the option of a merciful death to spare them the misery.
>Otherwise, they can obtain a special official identification, and enter the custody of a human they trust, such as a partner, relative or friend, with the highest rights an anthro can obtain.
---
What if this is some sort of judicial punishment? To have their humanity demoved as penance for a crime?
>They are to be treated no differently than any other anthro.
>They must be branded/marked as former criminals, and their record be kept to remember their crime.
>They become the governments property, and are put to work under government overwatch, or sold or auctioned to the private market.
---
Worst of all, if they were to be discovered to have willingly abandoned their humanity without reasonable cause officially recognized by the government. Such as perverse or subversive activities.
>They are to be given the lowest rank of all anthros, as it's appropiate for a traitor to their species such as them.
>They must be marked/branded accordingly and their record kept for posterity.
>They either go into special holding facilities, or the custody of governmental agents who will know how to keep them best.

I can imagine several unfortunate scenarios for humans who've undergone a transformation such as this one.
---
>A civilian, unfortunately transformed into a non-human against their will.
>Given mercy by the state, but abandoned by their family after their accursed transformation.
>They become the property of an old childhood friend of them, who took pity on them.
---
>A member of a subversive group of rebels fighting for Anthro liberation.
>An enemy of the state who willingly became an anthro to join the cause.
>Enslaved and treated as a traitor to humanity, where they will learn the pleasures of submitting to their betters.
---
>A deep undercover government agent infiltrating an pro-anthro rebel group.
>They are accidentally misidentified as an actual rebel.
>Taken as a prisoner and enslaved alongside regular anthros, having so serve their old comrades.

Older nonhumans are permitted a degree of leeway in softly dominating humans if they're older for the purposes of training young men. Though oftentimes it's more appropriate for the mother to guide her son on his way to manhood by picking out and overseeing his first coupling with an anthro. Still, in cultures where age has traditionally been more important than gender, "big sister/auntie" relationships between humans and nonhumans are common in many parts of the world until a young master is old enough to act according to his station as a gentleman.

That's a gross mischaracterization of the law.
While individuals of certain breeds of non-humans are allowed to join certain governmental organizations and could even be a great addition to these due to their unique physical characteristics, the amount of authority any non-human can excert over a human is very varied and circumstancial.
It's agreed upon that non-humans with certain degree of autorithy should always have some kind of human supervision over them to keep their behaviour and the treatment of humans in line with what's permitted.
An older anthro who has been given the permission to act on this way can have a higher degree of autorithy over a younger human, but the requirement for human supervision in this case would increase accordingly. As the humans grow up, these pseudo-parental hypocrisies are decreased accordingly, and the status quo of their superiority over the once controlling non-human will be removed.

No he actually onto something. Like if anthro takes role of nurse/sitter/teacher then it's logical what she will have little power over him but that's doesn't mean what she can't be inferior. Like a basic scenario: parents give their son as present anthro who's older than son. By so they give him not only a toy/pet, but also guardian, sitter and teacher who could teach him how to treat anthro, have sex with him and so train him to last longer. When son will grow up he already will be quite experienced and have loyal anthro with who he know already. It's similar situation to a prince and his teacher, does teacher have power over prince? Yes since he is his apprentice but still, one wrong move and prince can order to execute you

This specifically reminds me of a case in a remote, rural town entirely composed of monsters governed by representatives from outside town, where a single human child was adopted by one of the families.
Overall the town treated the child like one of their own, although with the governmental officers attempting to keep a veneer of officiality despite the lack of any other humans in town.
Over time, the child grew into a young teenager started to excert further and further control over the townsfolk, with officials having to consistently change the way they dealt with the young troublemaker as he learned the ins-and-outs of what his autorithy figures could and couldn't do to control him.
Starting with a close group of friends, he used them to slowly increase his power over the town as he grew smarter, wiser and more charismatic over his teenage years.
In just a few years, he managed to obtain practically total control over his close group of friends, his family, the local school staff and even the police department.
It wasn't until several years later than external human authorities had discovered what had happened.
He managed to gain direct control over the local government and made them change the minimum age for candidates to his own age as soon as he reached 18 years old, and once the next elections came in he won them on a landslide through a web of persuasion, peer pressure, threats, blackmail, bribes, and cheer charisma, earning the position of mayor.
Autorithies where stupified about what to do about this incident, but since order was still kept on the town and they had received no complaints about it they decided to allow this to go on. To this day he still rules over the town and wins every election handily.

Which is better, story where anon is a pirate captain pillaging an anthro country, or one where anon is an Imperial navy captain taking out anthro raiders and other threats?

Both are good, better make into one story. Back then raiding was normal for everything not only criminals, the only difference how frequently they were doing this. Someone was raiding only in war time like most countries, someone was raiding their neighbors with who they technically always was in war like sea raids of cossacks on Osman empire, and someone build their country on that like vikings and nomad nations from Asia. So just combine them, in begging protagonist is lower rank soldier who make attack on enemy island and take goods, in the end he gets promotion and years later defend islands from anthro raiders.

>Murder Mystery CYOA
https://rentry.org/gsvooyht

'Twas the night before Christmas, when all through the house,
Not a creature was stirring, not even the tied-up mouse;
The stockings were hung by the chimney with care,
In the hopes that St. Nicholas would be there;
The master was nestled, snug in his bed,
While visions of gagged-up anthros danced in his head;
And kitty in her 'kerchief, and the dog in her gag,
Had just settled their brains for a long winter's nap,
When out on the lawn there arose such a clatter,
Dog sprang from the floor to see what was the matter.
Away to the window she flew like a flash,
Tore open the shutters and threw up the sash.
The moon on the breast of the new-fallen snow,
Gave a lustre of midday to objects below,
When what to my wondering eyes did appear,
But a miniature sleigh and eight tiny rein-deer,
With a big brawny driver so lively and quick,
She knew in a moment he must be St. Nick.
More rapid than eagles his coursers they came,
And he whistled, and shouted, and called them by name:
"Now, Dasher! now, Dancer! now Prancer and Vixen!
On, Comet! on, Cupid! on, Donder and Blitzen!
To the top of the porch! to the top of the wall!
Now dash away! dash away! dash away all!"
As leaves that before the wild hurricane fly,
When they meet with an obstacle, mount to the sky;
So up to the housetop the coursers they flew
With the sleigh full of pets, and St. Nicholas too—
And then, in a twinkling, Dog heard on the roof
The prancing and pawing of each little hoof.
As Dog drew in her head, and was turning around,
Down the chimney St. Nicholas came with a bound.
He was dressed all in fur, from his head to his foot,
And his clothes were all tarnished with ashes and soot;
A bundle of bound pets he had flung on his back,
And he looked like a pedler just opening his pack.

Reminder if you get an anthro for Christmas, that it's not a toy, it's a lifetime commitment. Every year, many anthros end up homeless due to their masters not having enough space or money to properly take care of them. And avoid buying anthros from breeding mills, they are not well-regulated, and many of their pets come with birth defects and illnesses as a result. Instead, adopt from local shelters or kidnap one off the street, they are as good, if not better than the anthro mills.

You know, I’m not sure if someone thought of this but, I like to think in planet where humanity is at it’s tribe era but in a apocalypse setting where human males only exists. Human males have been becoming lonely and depressed. However, some form of divine being answered their frustrations out of the blue. These “creatures”, these “animals”, these “insects”, while having xeno proportions that is beyond human, they have this “unknown appeal” to them but the male population have no idea why these “creatures” allures them so much. Where did they came from? Why are they all females? Who created them? Why did they appear at the moment where humanity is at it’s lowest point? And what are those big saggy “melons” on their chest? And why do they have “fleshy holes” where the penis should be? Why do they look monstrous than their animals they’re based off? Why can’t they speak? And why do they feel this “pressure” on their penis?

Fuck! The Pokemon have unionized. What do we do?

What are they asking for?

lets see...
Some stuff on harem structure.
-Pokemon may vote to veto a new Pokemon being added to the harem.
-A trainer cannot go beyond 2nd base with someone not of their Harem.
-If a Human girlfriend is present she does not automatically gain authority over the Harem. She cannot order around, use or eject members.
Then some stuff about what they can be ordered to do...
-A Pokemon Female cannot be ordered to Breed with a Pokemon Male. Nor can she be made to produce unreasonable or unsafe amounts of eggs.
-A Pokemon cant be whored out against her will.
-A Pokemon cannot be compelled to participate in Pokemon battles against their will.
And they want some new privileges and assurances.
-A Pokemon cannot be compelled to engage in Anal sex without sufficient lubrication.
-A Pokemon if injured in combat or otherwise must be given medical care in a timely manner. Be it by Pokemon center or commercially available items a Pokemon must be healed by end of day. If for some reason this is not possible a Pokemon is to be left in their ball and all reasonable effort made to reach care.
-Two days off a week for downtime.
-At least 6 hours every day outside their balls should they want it.
-Active Concubine Pokemon to receive sex at least every other week.
-Orgasms as a reward for exceptional performance.
-Non sexual intimacy to become a more regular part of the trainer Pokemon interaction. Including but not limited too cuddling, praise, hugs and hand holding.
-A Pokemon can not have her social connections cut. Visitation with family is to facilitated.
-Pokemon can't be bought and sold.
-Those kept for breast milk must be regularly milked or lactation treatments stopped.
Seems mostly practical.

Thoughts on adding your own daughter furs to your harem?

Depending on the setting it'd be acceptable or not, of course. Probably perfectly normal if they're from a mother who is a fur slave or concubine. Probably a nono if they're from a fur whose your wife.
ROMAN RVLES, or something. Most commonly those fur daughters would probably go to the kids you have with your human wife.
Personally, I find it icky most of the time, specially if its expected of them. Feels too much like real grooming...
...Then again, I can see where the appeal comes from.
>An older man, and an authority figure, stern but not without affection or some fun in his heart.
>A young, bratty girl, playful and curious about life.
>Its all a game to her for which she does not full realize the possible consequences
>She tests the borders of her newfound freedom and power, as well as of his patience and restraint when mom isn't home, or because she's out of the picture.
>Not so much for him, who's finding it harder to distingish this once-pure and innocent girl from all of the helpless sluts who've thrown themselves at him over the years.
>Her new body and mind pushes her towards testing the limits of authority and establishing herself as high as she can within a hierarchy.
>It all comes down to who and what will break first, and how.

>Gently dominate and seduce anthro women with your human charm and big human dick
Or
>Roughly, even sadistically, inflict the worst pain upon an inferior species, now used for stress relief
Which way, /collared/?

>Anthros domming other anthros in the name of BHC.
>Anthros domming other anthros to establish a monopoly on BHC.
>Anthros domming other anthros to decides who gets the BHC (first).

>Predator species believe they're superior to preys, and so deserve the BHC while they don't.
>Prey soecies band together to discredit oredators as violent and unworthy of BHC.
>Larger species use their power to make smaller species submit in their hierarchies.
>Collective species use their numbers to their advantage to get ahead in the game.
>More 'humanoid species and bloodlines seek better rep from humans and other species.

Actually, yes. Need me a rebellious, bratty daughter to discipline, hopefully with several friends her age and of both similar and different proclivities.

Even if no bratty daughter is fucked, I'd wanna be known as the strict DILF of the neighborhood that has all of the bratty girls (and their mothers) enamoured with their delusions of being "disciplined by Daddy".
>"Ugh! I fucking hate you! All of my punk-rock friends only ever ask me about coming home so they can see you and flirt with you! Even their moms won't stop asking about you; most of them aren't even divorced!"
>"Those fucking cunts! They keep calling me 'Daddy's Girl' and asking me if you punish me and turn me intoi your bitch everyday! Don't you get it, old man!? You're runing my life!"
>*Sniff* *Sniffgk- "Daddy, can we cuddle and watch a movie like we used to?" *Sniff* "Ahm, not feeling too well right now... N-No nothing happen, its just... please?" *Sniff*'
>*SNOOORE* "Daddy~" *Kiss* "Ahhh, Aaaahh. Please..." *Kiss* *Kiss* "...Please love me like I love you, Daddy~" *Kiss* *Shlick* *Shlick* *Shlick* *Kiss* *Ki-* *SNOOORE* *Shlick* *Shlick*

>daughter develops daddy issues not because you left or abused her, but because you didn’t fuck her
>she says it’s abuse

She's just being a rebellious, edgy teen trying to fit in with her friends who are all either salivating for her dad or already have fucked up relationships with their own fathers.
In the end he is right. She should find a good boy who will treat her right and respect her. But its so hard for her to see reason because she hates being teased by her friends and her dad being so seemingly autorithative and old-fashioned, as well as how jealous she gets of all the attention he gets amd how close her friends and their mothers get to him, as if they were that close.
And yet she can't help but love him because he's her daddy who loves her, and cares for her, and protects her, and is so nice, and conforting, and strong, and handsome, and smells so good and makes her feel so small and vulnerable and hot between her legs, and the way he nonchalantly calls her a good girl whenever she behaves both embarrasess but makes her happy and wistful of falling on his open arms without shame, how she used to do as a child, or of being led by him using a collar and a short leash and being tied to his bed and punished by-
Wew. Teenage anthros need to take the medication for their heat without delay or things can easily get out of control.

>Get teleported into an anthro world
>turn out the main religion worship humans and you're the first human in centuries to reappear in this world
>basically you're treated as some sort of deity or angel from the get go
What would you plan to do in such situation?

>All villages will send their prettiest maidens to become my priestesses
>All furbois will now wear cute dresses or skirts in my presence
>I can have sex with anyone anywhere, and no one is allowed to stop it

>enact my IRL political power fantasy
>world ends because I believed in the wrong ideology
>if there are any followers left, I inform them that our new purpose is repopulating the earth and that I planned it all from the start
>have baby-making harem in the ruins of civilization

>create law requiring female anthros to tape their vagina lips open when going out
>gates to businesses and public transportation often include surprise inspections
>human officers forcibly spread and tape them if found not compliant
>anthros without owners are known to expose their untaped pussy to officers because they're desperate to be manhandled
>rebellious anthros are often dumb enough to think plugging their pussies with toys makes a statement
>its only more fun for officers to take them out
>some of them are mocked by humans pantsing them and inserting their cocks
>rebellious anthros are often called cockwarmers for this reason

>Anthro Lives Matter! We must secure a future for our anthro children! No HumanxAnthro relations of any kind.
>A furgirl... with a penis? That sounds kinda gay... but she(he?)'s very pretty...
>S-So good! Her cock can reach parts inside of me I never knew could feel this way! Is this the pleasure of being a female?
>I feel so nice being treated this way, so tenderly yet so roughly. Girls get it so good. I wish I was pretty like them so I could get treated like this more often.
>A human futa? I-I mean, she's pretty, but she's a human! But then... it's not like getting fucked by her could ever get me pregnant, so I guess it's ok?
>Th-This! This is the best! The best cock ever! No barbs, no quills! So smooth but long! And she can last forever! I need it! I need more!
>Cock! Cock! I need human cock! A-A male! Humans are so brutish, so strong, specially their males, I bet he one of those animals got a hold of me... I could do nothing to resist it... I'd be helpless to him. I... I need to try it at least once. I-It's ok, it's not like I could ever get pregnant from it. Nothing will happen, and nobody has to know.

>be me anon
>be sitting on my couch
>eagerly awaiting a package
>honestly I don't think I've been this excited for a delivery, well... ever
>as the evening starts to roll around, I begin to doubt that this package is ever coming
>ah well, maybe it will come tomorrow
>just as I start to get dinner ready (a plate of leftover spaghetti), I almost drop my plate as a knock comes at the door
>I literally pick up spilled spaghetti as I rush to the door
>standing in front of the door is a large boar anthro, and a refrigerator sized package
>"Mr. Mous?" he says while raising his eyebrow, making me suddenly self-conscious that I have a spaghetti stain on my shirt or something
"ah, yes that's me," I say lamely
>"Enjoy your package," he says before heaving the package into my crappy apartment
>the door shuts, and I am left alone with my package
>It takes a bit of effort, but I am able to put the package carefully down on the ground
>I made sure to check the "this side is up" stickers, don't wanna have to flip this thing
>I almost hurt my back in the process, but that'd be worth it
>this package is going to change my life
>I speed through my plate of spaghetti before quickly approaching the package and popping the tape off with my car keys
>as I open the package, I come face to face with a black body bag. The body bag is vacuum sealed around an obviously aroused female anthro.
>I can see her nipples under the black plastic, and her fingers (lewd)
>on top of her head is a tan owners manual
>I open up the manual and begin to read.
Greetings! You are now the proud owner of a lovely new friend!
The following (scrawled in pen) tiger anthro is ready for you. Open her bag and disconnect the nasal cannula to awaken your anthro from their dreamless sleep.
Make sure to let her smell you to create the patented Luv Bond, then enjoy your new slavishly devoted companion!
>I flip over the page, which begins the manual proper. The first page is full of legal jargon, explaining the legal rights of your anthro bioroid (which isn't a lot)
>the second page is far more interesting, being a care guide for your little vacuum sealed servant
>it recommended that you feed your companion only meat or Luv brand nutrient paste for dietary restrictions
>a quick glance at the box reveals a set of nutrient paste meals, almost looking like a squeezable apple sauce packages
>turning back to the manual, you note that the lewd enhancements that you paid for were all listed
>it was a pretty good list of enhancements all things considered
>she could lactate without being pregnant, this also made her nipples highly sensitive
>your scent was highly arousing to the poor girl
>with a verbal command you could paralyze her in place
>and lastly, her womb had been replaced with a high end cybernetic one
>you could basically get her pregnant whenever you liked, throw her into heat at a whim
>she also had a customized pussy, whatever that meant
>the next page was even more interesting, detailing the memories they had given her in the test tube
>she had mentally spent three years at a human service academy
>whether or not she had been a good student was unknown, but the manual claimed that the lessons had definitely been scrawled into her subconcious
>otherwise she had a high school education and a set of necessary companionship skills
She can cook, clean, and gives fantastic massages!
>claimed the brochure
>turning back to the body bag, I stared at the body inside slowly breathing
>well, there was only one more thing to do. After preparing some water and emptying out the box of its other contents I shakily prepared to open up the body bag.
>the bag was suctioned on with a release value, so I pressed in the small plastic button
>the air filled with a swooshing sound as oxygen flooded into the compressed bag.
>finding the zipper itself wasn't difficult, and with the air pressure released it was easy to move up and down
>the zipper itself was at the bottom near her feet
>I began pulling the zipper up the bag, seeing nothing but air for a couple moments before her feet came into view.
>the feet were a mix of human and animal, with claws adorning the tips
>her fur was an orange with strips, just as you would picture in your head
>the hair itself was frizzy because of the time spent in the suction
>I continued upwards, seeing her muscular legs change into muscular thighs
>a striped tail was slowly decompressing near her left thigh
>as I continued I came to a beautiful set of hips and a glistening sex
>her pussy was puffy and beautiful, tempting me to reach out and touch it
>I wondered how many people had had sex with their slaves before they even woke them up
>I continued past a set of beautiful abs, then two heaving breasts
>a little milk came from each nipple
>with a sudden jerk I opened up the last of the bag
>she really had a beautiful face, it was a shame that her eyes were closed
>inside her nose was a plastic cannula which was connected to a small oxygen tank sealed in with her
>the air inside was pink, which would explain her arousal
>I turned the oxygen tank off and gently pulled the plastic off her face
>I picked her up placed her on my shoulder
>we sat like this for a couple of moments before her tail slowly began to move from side to side
>for a minute this continued before I heard her take a massive breath and suddenly jolt
>in seconds her hands were on my shoulders and she pushed herself up
"Uh, hi?"
>the sudden voice must have caught her attention because she suddenly stopped moving
>her eyes slowly opened, blinking like she had been asleep for weeks
>I suppose that was probably accurate, everything is probably too bright for lab grown eyes
>eventually I was able to make out some beautiful green irises
>then, like a cat and prey her eyes locked on to me

>it did actually look pretty comical in retrospect, but seeing a 6 ft tall tigress almost jump out of her skin was as distressing for me as it was for her
>I ended up half standing in suprise, just watching her rapidly fall backwards and almost crawl away
>then her hand came up to her mouth like she had seen someone die right in front of her
>she released a subtle eep and then rapidly descended into a proper dogeza
>we both sat like that for a couple minutes before she broke the silence
>"I'm terribly sorry sir," she said with a rather tomboyish voice, "this slave did not recognize you."
"Um, er, uh..."
>thanks brain for whatever that was
>"it was all my fault master," she said seriously, "I startled you and must be punished."
>as if to emphasize her point her tail fell quickly to the ground, trembling beneath her
>it seems like she was a very good student during her false memories
>there was something ego inflating seeing a 6 ft tall muscular death machine in a deep bow beneath you
>I had never considered that being treated like a shogun would be this much fun
>the only real question was how to approach this whole mess
>she really seemed to believe she had done something terrible
>but she had grabbed and startled me, and would probably accept any kind of punishment I could think of...
>I considered the girl in front of me for a couple of minutes
>she was doing a remarkable job standing as still as she did, only twitching every couple of seconds
>poor thing probably thought I was the real deal
>I walked over to the poor thing before stopping on her right side
"slave," I said, "sit up but remain kneeling"
>she hesitantly stood up on her knees, coming up to my chest
>her muscles looked like steel cable, and her claws were certainly intimidating
>looking at her like this was pretty crazy, she really did look like a proper tiger
>well, if you didn't count her massive tits
>she was giving me a pretty confused look, especially as I paced around her
>eventually I reached my hand out and placed it on her head
>according to the internet, anthros enjoy petting as much as regular animals
>she looked utterly baffled as I began to run my hand through her short hair, then her face began to break
>tigers weren't supposed to be able to purr, but Anthro Luv had apparently not gotten the memo
>she slowly purred into my hands as slowly went around her head and twitched her ears
>then she slowly lifted her hands up to my arm, and moved it off her head
"You didn't like that?" I said rather quietly
>she was obviously trying to look as stern as she could, but she still had a small grin on her left side
>"You can't reward me when I harm you master..." she said as stubbornly as she could
"You want to give me orders slave?" I said as sternly as I could muster, "maybe I should punish you."
>she looked down at the ground like she had been struck
"Don't worry slave, I'll give you a chance to redeem yourself."
>she nodded like a soldier, "anything sir"
"You are on your knees already," I said, "prove yourself."
>I motioned to my pants, which seems to have gotten the message across
>her eyes went wild, dilating as her mouth slowly parted open
>she began moving almost immediately after that point
>her arms reached up and began fumbling with my belt buckle
>for a moment there I thought she was terrified because of how much her hands were shaking, but then I noticed a damp spot on the floor beneath her
>if I wasn't hard before I certainly was now
>she pulled my pants down, revealing my proud cock
>for a moment there we both sat in silence, her eyes going up and down my member
>"Master," she said with a small moan, "could you sit down on the couch?"
>turning behind me, I realized I was standing decently close to the couch
>with a slight turn, I walked over and sat on the couch
>she practically zoomed over to below me
>slowly and carefully approaching my penis
>her eyes went wide as she inhaled the scents found there
>it was surreal watching the process unfold, really revealing that Anthro Luv really knew their stuff
>her tail swished back and forth, her pupils dilated, and her breasts hefted up and down with each heavy breath
>"I thought I would give you the royal treatment master," she said breathlessly, "but you really are too good for me."
>without a moments hesitation, she began licking my penis
>it was definitely unlike a human tongue, but not the rough experience I was expecting
>the best part was watching the happy way she looked up at me during the whole experience
>eventually her licking stopped, and her mouth opened wide before she shoved herself down on my cock
>tears formed in her eyes but a heavy grin came over her mouth as she began going up and down
>I placed my hands on her head as she came down and began patting her lovely head
>this seemed to increase her enthusiasm even more
>I was doing rather well at resisting her efforts for a good couple of minutes before she began swirling her tongue in rhythm to the blowjob
>as I approached my peak, she picked up the pace to match me
>eventually it all proved too much and I began cumming deep into her throat
>I fell backwards onto the couch
>her head twitched underneath my hands, and I heard her swallow
>her tail rapidly moved back and forth and a muffled moan escaped her mouth
>her whole body twitched, and a small puddle appeared beneath her
>did she just cum from giving a blowjob?
>we both sat quietly catching our breath
>I supposed now that pleasure was over, it was time for business
"Slave," I said, "stand at attention."
>without a word the tigress shuffled to her feet and assumed a standing position
>feet apart, hands at her side, tits out
>it was a popular position for slave owners for good reason
"Good girl," I said after a moment
>she didn't respond, but the joyful grin that broke across her face showed that she was proud
"What else can you do?" I asked
>"I have theoretical knowledge of pleasure master," she said like a soldier in roll call
>"I can also cook, clean, give massages, and perform office tasks," she said proudly, "my species also make good bodyguards, but I don't have the training."
>her tits bounced up and down as she finished saying that last one
"Well then, I will go get into the shower," I said, "you can clean up in here and shower after I am finished"
>as I turned to leave I suddenly flipped back around
"What is your name?" I asked curiously
>"Whatever you would like sir," she said submissively, "in school I was called L35."
>I nodded and headed to the shower
>the shower was desperately needed, especially after that diabolical blowjob
>I certainly had a lot to think about
>it was getting late, the sun having set a while ago
>by the time we had both showered, it would be too late to do much more
>I would have to take her out tomorrow and purchase some food for us both, maybe some clothes for her as well
>finally I should do something about her name, did I want to stick with L35 or change it to something more meaningful?
>I exited the shower with a satisfied sigh
>after dressing myself for bed, I exited the bathroom and walked once again into my living room
>the room was definitely a lot cleaner than before, L35 was pleasantly humming to herself as she sorted through my fridge
"the shower is free," I said quietly, which seemed to break her from her work
>she twisted her head around, breaking into a lovely smile
>the fact that her tail slowly raised revealing her lovely slit was almost certainly on purpose
>she leaned down to pick up something from the bottom shelf, confirming my suspicions
>she hummed again before turning fully to face me, "you have enough ingredients here for a proper breakfast tomorrow."
"that would be lovely," I replied with a smile
>reaching my hand forward I tussled her hair, petting her head briefly
>with a wink she turned and sauntered off, almost certainly wiggling her hips extra as she went
>I sat down and scrolled on my phone for the couple of minutes, looking up information on anthros as I went
>in a couple of minutes the water turned off in the shower, and I watched as a naked tiger stepped out of my bathroom
>her fur was very fluffy, and she was practically purring in happiness
>she sat Indian style at my feet, attempting to look as professional as possible
"L35," I said as she sat down, "I think I'm going to call you Amber."
>she nodded happily in agreement, "I think that is a lovely name sir."
"Well then pet," I said while standing and patting her head, "I think we should head to bed."
>"Shall I sleep on the couch, sir?" she asked eagerly, "or at the foot of your bed?"
"I would like to cuddle with you," I said seriously, "if that is alright?"
>she practically jumped up with joy, her eyes sparkling
>it was hard to fall asleep with a naked sex goddess purring next to me, but I eventually managed it
>it helped that she was so warm
>I woke to the smell of sizzling sausage
>I was alone in my bed, aware of Amber's absence by the slightly warm blankets to my left
>it was amazing that she was able to exit the bed without me noticing
>I blinked my eyes to adjust to the soft sunlight coming from my bedroom window
>I sat up and flung my feet onto the floor, preparing to stand up before Amber opened the door
>she was wearing a black apron, an old one that I never used
>"stay where you are master," she said quickly, "breakfast is almost done."
>before I could even get a word out she rushed back down the hallway
>without anything better to do, I leaned back into my bed
>she arrived moments later with a large serving dish, full of breakfast plates
>she had cooked sausage, eggs, and french toast
>it smelled heavenly
>she sat down in bed next to me and laid the dish on her lap
>"Which one would you like first, sir?" she said with a nod
"ah, the sausage," I said
>instead of passing me the plate like I had expected, she speared a sausage link with her fork and held it up to my face
>tentatively I took a small bite, her face filled with concern as I slowly chewed
"It's delicious," I said while nodding
>she smiled sweetly at the praise, although she seemed kinda shy about her cooking
>she probably worked really hard on the meal
>the next couple of minutes passed remarkably fast, being fed in bed was a novel experience
>eventually breakfast was over, and I was able to exit the bed and get ready for the day
>going through my closet I found the basic t-shirt and sweat pants I had prepared for Amber
>I wasn't sure how big she was going to be, so I bought a set of large clothes
>she seemed thrilled as I gave her the clothes, and looked remarkably good in such basic attire
>after we were both dressed, I elected to head to town for some more supplies and to give Amber her first taste of outside
>it was like walking a puppy
>Amber was clearly attempting to downplay how excited she was to seeing the outside, but her eyes sparkled as they dashed around
>eventually we got to my humble car and piled in
>I started the car up and got us out on the road
>Amber's eyes darted from the road to the side window, taking in as much as she could
>it was like being the in a car with a kid
>within ten minutes we were parking at the Anthro Luv outlet
>Anthro Luv had a garish pink color scheme, but the store was the only store in the neighborhood that would have clothing for Amber
>the store was being tended by a group of anthros of all different species
>Anthro Luv almost entirely hired anthros who had lost their owners or been abandoned
>they didn't even make minimum wage but they did get room and board
>it was pretty much an open secret that the employees were always looking to find a new owner, the bond being that powerful
>almost as soon as we entered we were ambushed by a rabbit anthro
>Amber was almost entirely ignored as she turned to me
>"Hello sir!" she practically squeaked, "welcome to Anthro Luv. What can we get you, some food, some clothes, or maybe even some companionship?"
>she finished that line off with a wink and a hip shake
>"We need some clothes," said Amber to my side without even attempting to hide her annoyance
>the bunny was barely even fazed, "I'll take you both right over there."
>we walked in a single file line all the way to the clothing department
>the shelves were filled with all manner of clothing, from professional business suits to see-through bikinis
>the bunny turned towards me, "well cutie what kind of clothes do you need?"
"A collar," I answered thoughtfully, "a maid uniform, some causal clothes, and a week and a halfs worth of underwear."
>Amber turned and whispered in my ear
"A kimono as well please," I answered.
>the bunny turned, "I'll go get you everything you need, you two just wait right here"
>and thus I was alone with an annoyed looking tiger
>her tail swished back and forth
>"I'll go get you everything you need," you hear Amber whisper mockingly
"You did a good job handling all that," I said quietly
>she just snorted, "she's not worth causing trouble for you sir"
>"even if she was undressing you with her eyes..."
>I placed my hand on her shoulder, moving her close to me
"You don't need to be jealous," I whispered into her ear, "because you are already my little pet."
>she didn't say a word, but looked back at me with lidded eyes
>without a moment's hesitation I stuck my head out and gave her a kiss, it was a small peck on the lips nothing serious
>she didn't kiss back immediately, sitting there stunned for a good half second
>then her face broke into an evil grin, she laid her muscular arms on my shoulders and pulled me into a smouldering kiss
>her mouth and mine joined rather quickly, especially considering the differences between our faces
>her sandpaper tongue rolled over mine
>more importantly my arms went around her waist and rested my hands on her toned ass
>we continued like that for a good couple of minutes, Amber obviously getting pretty wound up
>we probably would have continued for a couple minutes more but then we heard the clacking of a hanger falling on the floor
>behind me was the poor bunny, looking like I had shot her mother
>Amber was definitely not helping looking as smug as she did
>after a couple seconds the bunny composed herself and handed us the outfits
>"here they are," she chuckled sadly, "I hope I guessed your sizes right."
>I had Amber try on the causal outfits and underwear, happy that the sizes worked out okay
>the poor bunny stayed with us the whole time, and Amber was definitely showing off more than she should
>regardless, within a couple minutes we were out the door leaving the store behind
>the drive home was rather uneventful
>Amber had a smug grin on her face the whole way back
>we made a quick stop for groceries, then headed back to my apartment
>I still had half a day off, and I was eager to use that day enjoying myself
>Amber quickly set to work putting the groceries away while I sat down on the couch
>she didn't even let me carry some up
>soon all the work was done, and Amber returned to kneel in front of me
>all her good work obviously deserved a reward
"Good girl," I reached forward and placed my hand on her head
>she purred into my hand
"If you'll go get the collar, I'd like to place it on you."
>Amber was on her feet in an instant, although she looked rather sad to leave her petting
>she scrambled over into the closet, and came back with a beautiful black collar
>it was a relatively simple piece of clothing, a black band with simple loop to connect a leash
>kneeling before me with the collar in her hands, I reached out and placed it on her neck
"Stand up," I said, "let me have a look at you."
>Amber stood and spun around, her eyes staying on me the whole time
>it looked really good on her, the black contrasting with her bright orange fur
"You look beautiful," I said after a moment, "but it is rather warm in here isn't it?"
>she looked confused for a moment before her mind connected the dots
>she chuckled, "yes master," she reached up and began taking her t-shirt off, "terribly warm."
>the little minx took the shirt off slowly and sensually, running her claws up and down her abs
>her left hand began working down her sweat pants as her right arm covered her tits
>eventually she was finished removing everything but her collar, and she stuck her hands out
>"ta da!" she said with a wink
>how did I ever live without her?
>she was so adorable standing there with nothing but her collar on
>her tail behind her was swaying back and forth, getting quicker as my eyes went up and down her body
>a small blush was visible beneath her fur, and she had a confident grin on her face
>after a couple of minutes of taking in the sight, I stood up and walked over to face her
"You know," I said with a whisper, "you do have a couple lewd features. Do you mind if I try them out?"
>"It is my pleasure to serve you master," she said while raising her eyebrows in a cocky way, "...in every way."
>reaching my hand out I took hold of one of her beautiful breasts, running my thumb through the small orange fur found there
>she mewled at the contact, hopefully from pleasure and not my cold hands
>I circled wider and wider with the thumb, until coming to a stop next to her hardened nipple
"I want you to take your other hand," I said authoritatively, "and mirror what I do on the other one."
>when she nodded eagerly I returned to the breast and began kneading on the supple flesh
>I watched in delight as she began massaging her other breast in almost exactly the same way
>I kept tormenting her like this for a moment longer before extending my neck into a quick peck on her lips
>she licked her lips and prepared to kiss me back before I brushed my thumb over her nipple
>she actually purred at the contact, and then returned the gesture on her other breast
>this caused another happy purr
>I kept teasing the nipple, until a small amount of white milk began to trickle down
>with a wink I dove forward and began licking up the milk
>with a side glance I watched her extend her breast forward until she was just able to lick her own breast
>she was chuckling as she did it, I imagine I looked pretty funny
>her taste was unlike any milk I had ever had, rich and fatty
>allegedly it was based on human milk, although I hadn't had that for a long time
>I began to suck as warm milk began flowing from her nipple
>Amber's look of amusment shifted as she began to stifle a moan
>diligently she copied my movements, despite how much she was shaking
>I continued the assault, taking my free hand and sliding two fingers into her dripping pussy
>Amber began moaning loud, the throaty sounds making sure that I was getting things right
>her muscles began to tense as she approached the end, and I began ravishing her moist clit with my fingers
>her tail stood up straight as she stifled a scream
>in the end it was a bit too much for the kitty to bear, the orgasm flowing from her head to her feet
>I guided her down to the ground, where I joined her on my knees
>she was breathing heavily so I sat and waited for her to come back to normal
>she wasn't nearly that patient. she reached up and put a hand on my face, and gripped my right hand with her free hand
>"Master," she said between breaths, "destroy me"
>needless to say my pants were down in three seconds flat
>with my painfully hard member exposed to such a welcoming sight, I introduced it to her entrance
>I could feel the heat within, and she moaned as my tip began going up and down her pussy
>then with a grunt I forced my way in, her lubricated entrance not even attempting to stop me
>still holding hands I began hesitantly moving back and forth in her entrance
>then I noticed that Anthro Luv was trying to kill me
>her pussy had been customized, with rings of muscle moving back and forth
>she could milk me dry if she wanted, and her tired smug grin told me everything
>her pussy clenched down on my cock, even as I began to thrust into her as hard as I could
>she began laughing and moaning in glee as we both raced to the finish line
>we continued for minutes, no noises besides our grunts and moans
>I was amazing when she came, her hand squeezing onto mine
>the orgasm finished me off, as her insides whirled around me
>her pussy was filled, and she smiled up at me
>we sat in the afterglow for a minute or two
>I ended up rolling over onto the ground to the side of Amber
>after a few moments Amber rolled over onto her side and stared at me, a triumphant smile appearing on her face
>she rolled back onto her back, and lifted herself up in an impressive display of her core muscles.
>I was able to see cum trickling down from her pussy as she left
>a moment later she returned with a sandwich for myself and a bag of nutrient paste for her
>I ate the sandwich quietly, as Amber happily hummed to herself
"Do you want to watch some TV?" I said breaking the silence
>moments later we were both dressed and sitting on the couch, Amber leaning on me
>with a flick of the remote I turned the TV on, preparing myself to go grab some DVDs
>I figured a clone like Amber would appreciate some of the classics
>as I turned the TV on, it opened to the channel section
>"A man was found dead in his apartment today," said the Doberman news anchor, "police suspect the killing was done by his android servant."
>the news cut to a police briefing, the police chief was an older black man
>surrounding him were a set of imposing officers, two anthros and some obvious androids
>Amber's eyes widened during the cut, and she pointed at a scary looking German Sheppard in the background
>"those generation twos are scary master," she said earnestly, "don't piss one off"
"Generation two?" I asked, "what's a generation two?"
>"Anthro Luv does bulk orders for companies right?" she said simply, "generation twos are anthros made for military applications"
>looking back at the line up it was clear that the German Shepard was different to the other officers, being built like a fridge
>the police chief was continuing on about the maid being hacked by a third party
"Spooky," I said before standing up, "well, I'm just glad you aren't an android Amber"
>I turned and grabbed a DVD from off the shelf, before walking back
>Invasion of the Onaholes from Outer Space was a B movie extraordinaire
>the titular Onaholes were played by rabbits who had been supposedly cloned for the roles
>the lead actor apparently ended up going home with three of them after filming
>regardless it was a good cheesy time, especially for Amber's first movie
>she seemed so collected most of the time, but the movie was enough to remind me that she hadn't had many experiences
>she gasped when one of the Onaholes captured the lead actor
>she cheered when the lead actor was able to escape
>the movie's love interest was played by a human woman, which always made Amber annoyed
>she was almost always cheering the Onaholes on when they attacked the love interest
>guess she felt some kinship with them
>eventually I shifted around on the couch, eager to try something that had always seemed so nice in my Japanese anime
>I laid down onto Amber's soft thighs
>she seemed surprised at the lap pillow at first, but then a lovely smile broke out on her face as I laid there
>she began running her claws through my hair, which felt amazing
>eventually the movie came to an end, the Onaholes were banished back to space and the love interest and lead shared a kiss
>Amber even made some mocking gags at that scene
>the credits began to roll, and I began to yawn
>we still had a couple hours before bed, but wrestling with a tiger woman would take a lot out of you
"Amber," I asked as I looked up into her sparkling eyes, "can I get a massage?"
>I didn't have a massage table but my bed was sufficient for Amber to get up and begin working
>she diligently began massaging up and down my limbs and back, the tension of the day slowly being worked out by my lovely assistant
>it was the second time this day that I had felt like a roman emperor
>the only problem with the massage was that it was so relaxing that I began to slowly... fall... asleep...
>I woke up to the whining sound of my alarm clock
>it was Monday, which meant that I had to go back to work
>I sighed at the thought
>I opened my eyes to the dark bedroom, and began reaching for the off switch on my clock
>through the darkness, however, I could feel a large weight on me
>laying atop me like a family dog was Amber
>her closed eyes showed that she hadn't woken to the alarm clock
>which was all well and good but I needed to get to work
>my body protested, and I seriously considered not going
>however, I did need the money
>nudging the sleeping cat was an exercise in futility
>she slept through my first two attempts before finally I reached my mouth over and gave her a small kiss on the lips
>in an instant her eyes fluttered open, first confusion on her face, then terror as she jumped off me
>"I'm so sorry master," she said rapidly, "you just looked so comfy there on the bed and I couldn't help myself"
>I just chuckled in response
"I guess we were both really tired," I said with a yawn, "but I do need to get to work."
>"Shower master," she said quickly, "I'll cook you some breakfast before you go."
>with a nod we both stood and parted ways, she ran to the kitchen and I stumbled to the restroom
>after a quick shower I left to find a plate of crepes sitting on the table
>the crepes were covered in powdered sugar and a sweet fruit sauce
"Ah," I said tiredly, "You are the best Amber."
>she just smiled sweetly
>watching the time I powered through her breakfast
>"I'll watch the house while you are gone sir," she said, "I'll get things cleaned up and prepare a surprise for you when you get home."
>in between bites I nodded, happy to hear that she could entertain herself
"Don't work the whole day," I said between crepes, "you can watch any of my movies"
>"Certainly sir," she said quickly, "I'll make sure to take a break."
>as the time drew nearer I picked up one last crepe and headed out the door, but not before stealing a kiss.
>I was greeted in the parking lot by Dave
>fucking Dave
>"Hello sir," he said in a monotone voice, "how was your weekend?"
>Dave was an android, so he didn't really care but he wouldn't get to his point until I responded
"It was good," I said
>Dave was forced upon me by the executive producers of my radio show, "Anon at Noon"
>he had improved efficency by 20%, but he also didn't have a soul
>I think the worst thing about him was that he straddled the uncanny valley like a champion
>"That is good to hear," he said walking with me to the entrance
>"You will be pleased to know," he said while opening the door for me, "that I have completed your directive to find you a quote "interesting guest"."
"Oh really," I said with a smirk, "and who would that be?"
>"her," he said before pointing with all the grace of a chuck e cheese anamatronic
>I stopped in my tracks, staring up at the interesting guest that Dave had found for me
>she (and it was definitely a she) was a seven foot tall muscular doberman, wearing a t-shirt and pair of black dress pants
>her arms and legs were synthetic, looking like the crysis nanosuit with exposed silver wire in place of her deltoids down
>her eyes were the beady red of synthetic implants
>eventually she noticed me
>her eyes glowed over me like the terminator
>"You're Anon right?" she said as she bounded over, the trip only taking two steps for the giant
>Dave appeared on my left like a horror movie villain, "Anon meet C7512, veteran of the chinese american war special forces."
After bottling my suprise I stuck a hand out, "you are a generation two anthro then?"
>she returned the handshake with a toothy grin, "generation three, actually."
>"cause of these," she pointed a claw at her glowing red eyes.
"...r-right," I said with a swallow, "I am looking forward to interviewing you."
>"He is indeed," said Dave with his freaky smile, "I'll show you to our break room while Mr. Mous finishes some paperwork."
>Dave had an absolute pile of paperwork for me to do
>the paperwork was so large actually that I spent most of the morning finishing it up
>Amber had said that she had basic clerical skills, perhaps I'd need to bring her to help me out one of these days
>in a tight office suit of course
>regardless the tide finally ended and I was stuck thinking about my upcoming interview
>there had been plenty of interviews about the Chinese American war, at least from the human soldiers
>those guys weren't boots on the ground though, mostly flying drones
>it would be great radio to get a soldier's perceptive
>regardless noon was rapidly approaching, and I would soon be on the air
>taking a deep breath I gathered my papers and headed straight for the studio
"Well hello ladies and gentlemen," I said into the microphone, "welcome back to Anon at Noon."
"I've got a special guest here today," I said building up a bit of hype, "everybody meet C7512. Special forces. Veteran of the Chinese-American war."
>"Hello everybody," said the dog confidently
"Most of you people can't really picture what I'm going through here," I said while chuckling, "but I'm stuck in a recording studio with a 7 foot tall dog cyborg at the moment. Just to get you all the best news."
>I finished it off with a wink to C7512, which she returned with a toothy grin.
"You've been home a couple months now," I said to my guest, "what do you think so far?"
>"Food is better," she said with a shrug, "lot less people."
"Maybe not my cooking," I said with a chuckle, "what is it like being an uplifted civilian?"
>"My arms and eyes make sure nobody sees me as a regular uplift that's for sure."
"I can imagine," I said while nodding, "tell us a little bit about your modifications, what can you do that John from Kentucky can't?"
>"I can see infrared and ultraviolet," she said while thinking, "and lift about 100 more pounds than the strongest skinny."
"I imagine that's particularly useful," I said causally, "never have to take more than one trip for groceries."
>She laughed before responding, "I can smell quite a bit more than humans too. I just so happen to know that you have a pet cat Mr. Mous."
>that was impressive, and I appreciated her not telling the whole story too. People were still a bit jumpy around anthros, especially the radio audience
"Oh yes," I said, "and she's a good kitty too."
>back at the apartment a certain tiger just cheered
"but enough about me," I continued, "what have you been up to since getting back?"
>"You'd be surprised but not much," she said nervously, "there aren't a lot of businesses that need my particular set of skills."
>ouch
"I'm really sorry to hear that," I said sincerely, "you keep in touch with any buddies from the war?"
>"Oh yeah!" she said happily, "shout out to C6845."
"Always happy to help a friendship out" I said sharing her enthusiasm before breaking into something more serious "now do you mind if I ask you some of the questions the viewers want to hear?"
>"Certainly," she said while leaning back in her chair
"Here's one," I said reading the list I had on my desk, "Did the Chinese actually clone their soldiers?"
>"Yep," she said simply "I ended up killing the same guy about ten times."
"Impressive," I continued, "how did these clones perform next to the regular forces?"
>"they were certainly some of the better soldiers," she said with a snort, "but we had a couple advantages."
"Patriotism and beer?" I asked with a chuckle
>"Nope," she said with a laugh, "I had a better nose and a good set of ears."
>"the Chinese," she said with a swiping hand motion, "thought America's unwillingness to engineer people was weakness."
>"but mother nature had already provided a solution," she said seriously, "man's best friend."
>we continued back and forth like that for the rest of the show, her confidence really winning over my listeners
>the show began winding down as my time slot started to disappear
>before my eyes I watched one last question come in
"Do you have time for one more question?" I asked, "what kind of special forces were you?"
>"Demolitions Mr. Mous," she said with a laugh, "I made things explode."
"Fantastic!" I said with a grin, "A real life bomber gal from the US of A."
"Thank you all folks, you've been great! Before you all go I wanted to take some time and thank C7512 for coming down and paying us a visit here in the studio," I said gratefully
>"it was no problem at all," she said with a chuckle, "you have a fun show here Mr. Mous."
>and cut
>we stepped out of the studio, C7512 ducking to get out from the studio door
>I offered my hand again and she gave me another strong handshake
"Thanks again from coming out here," I said, "I don't think the listeners have had an opportunity to hear that side of the war."
>"It was my pleasure Mr. Mous," she said with a small smile
>"Great show today sir," came the tinny voice of Dave from behind me
"You picked a good guest Dave," I said simply turning back to C7512, "thanks again for coming."
I turned and began walking away, "I'll see you tomorrow Dave."
>"Sir," said the android as he walked towards me, "may I ask a favor?"
I turned back and stared at Dave's freaky face, "uh... sure Dave."
>"It's about Ms. C7512," he said, "I'm afraid that I have forgotten to purchase her hotel room."
Suspicion began to mount as I studied the android, "Dave... you're an android... you don't forget things"
>C7512 looked as puzzled as I did. "Hotel room?" she asked.
>"Sir," he said almost nervously, "promise not to get mad at me."
"What did you do Dave?"
>"Do you remember seven months ago when I visited your apartment?"
"Yes, Dave I do"
>"Well I noticed that you had a spare bedroom inside that apartment," he said quickly, "pairing that with your obvious sexual frustration and your search history... I just had to help."
"Dave you read my search history? Sexual frustration?!"
>"As an android owned by the board," he said nodding his head, "I am allowed the right to read all employees search histories. You were showing stress and distraction, obvious signs of sexual frustration"
>I released my grip on his shirt, and he continued
>"I was programmed to want the best for each employee of 79.7 radio," he said.
"Well, Dave," I said quietly, "how were you going to help with my sexual frustration?"
>"With the directive to find an interesting guest for the show," he said, "I searched for a guest that you specifically would find interesting."
>"Your search history showed obvious interest in predatory anthros," he said simply, "so I searched for one."
>I was turning bright red as he revealed my secrets to C7512, and her eyes widened
>"You mean..." she said angerly, "you brought me here under false pretenses?"
>"It was for your own good as well," he said while nervously watching her stand up to her full height, "You seemed lonely and I noticed that you had posted online multiple times about desiring such a relationship..."
>C7512 put her fist against the wall above the android, who continued without stopping
>"You made multiple posts online about wanting a skinny to breed you," he said quickly, "and then take you on walks and pet you."
>I couldn't see her face but C7512 turned red around the face, and her tail began whipping around in the air
>"Y-you," she stuttered, "you idiot, he already has an anthro."
>"What?" Dave said, "no he doesn't"
>"I can smell her on him," she said quickly, "he's smelled like sex the whole morning."
>that's embarrassing
>"our corporate tax paperwork doesn't have that large an expense on it," he said simply, "Mr. Mous would have registered such a purchase as a business expense."
>in all fairness I didn't know that you could do that
"Dave," I said, "I got mine in the mail on Saturday."
>"Oh," he said simply, "shit."
>I could hear the gears in Dave's head turning
>"Sir," he said, "You should have registered that purchase as work related. Financial burdens can be a major cause of stress in a human's life."
>classic Dave
"I'll keep that in mind Dave," I said before sighing
>"I assume that guy you told me about," said C7512, "that was Anon right?"
>"Ah yes," Dave responded, "I'm afraid that situation has become a little complicated."
>"I uh," the dog said quietly, "figured that out."
"What did Dave tell you about the show?" I asked looking up at the girl.
>"He said he knew somebody who could adopt me," she said sadly, "I'm no good at this civilian shit, I live on my pension in a crappy apartment, and other anthros are scared of me."
>"I thought it was weird that he wanted me to do a radio show," she continued, "but it was good talking about my time."
>"Thank you both for the opportunity," she said before throwing her shoulders back and walking to the door.
>"Wait miss-" said Dave
"C7512, you don't have to go."
>it'd probably break Amber's heart but I couldn't let somebody like this just get their dreams broken
>Dave and C7512 both turned to look at me
"the spare bedroom was originally for Amber," I said, "but she sleeps with me each night."
>C7512 just snorted
"If you don't have anything else," I said, "you could crash at my place until you get your bearings straight."
>"Are you sure, sir?" said Dave, "You've only had two days with your new paramour."
"I'm sure it will work out," I said while standing, "I had a buddy in college whose dad bought him a dozen bunnies, two is nothing."
>C7512's face broke into a bright smile and her tail began wagging like a tornado
"I've got to stop by Anthro Luv on the way back," I said with a smile to the giant dog, "it looks like we will need more food and Amber needs a leash."
>"Yes sir," said C7512 with a salute
"If you are good," I said turning back towards the entrance her, "I'll even pet you."
>I missed her turning bright red
Amber POV
>be me
>Amber
>I had just managed to finish sorting master's whole apartment
>his fridge was cleaned up and sorted, although I might have thrown away some of his milk
>cow's milk wasn't good for human beings, and now he could have better milk straight from the source
>I listened to the radio when his show came on
>he was interviewing a military dog
>it would seem that master knew quite a bit about military history, and his voice was so handsome
>especially when he called me a good kitty
>unf
>when his show got done I set my plans into motion
>I prepared a full dinner for the two of us, my side was a rare steak whereas master had a steak, vegetables, and potatoes meal
>then as the food was cooking, I ran to the closet and began changing into that lewd maid's uniform
>I slipped it on without panties or a bra
>they would just get in the way
Anon POV
>C7512 had to unfold from my car as we pulled into the parking lot
>the poor girl was too tall to fit normally in my Sudan, so she had spent the ride hunched over
"Welcome to my humble abode," I said with a small bow, "you should probably let me go first."
>"Looks nice," she said with a smile, "I wanted to thank you again... for the opportunity."
"No problem," I said, "lets see how this goes."
>we marched up to my apartment
>I fumbled with my keys for a moment before slotting them into the keyhole
>with a deep breath I turned the key and opened the door
>"welcome home master!" said a familiar voice from the kitchen
>Amber ran over to me, wearing the maid uniform from Anthro Luv
>"I've prepared a full dinner for you sir," she said with lidded eyes, "would you like some steak? a shower? or perhaps... me?"
>she stepped towards me as she said the last one, lifting her skirt to reveal that she was wearing nothing underneath
"all of the above," I said, "but... I've got a favor to ask you."
>C7512 ducked under the door-frame
>Amber looked up at the veteran with wide eyes and said...
>"Master," she said simply, "who's this?"
>I couldn't tell if she was mad or not, and it looked like C7512 thought she had stepped into a mine field
"Oh," I said with as powerful a smile as I could muster, "this is C7512, she was the guest on my show. Dave forgot to buy her a hotel room."
>"Oh," said the tiger, "you're that cool generation three on the show!"
>Amber shuffled with her outfit a bit, "I'm sorry you had to see me like that. You probably know how the bond is."
>"Oh no problem," said C7512 with a nervous chuckle, "I'm the one who has to apologise, I knew that Anon had a generation one and still came over."
"I was wondering if she could take the guest room Amber," I said causally, "I figured you probably wouldn't be using it."
>Amber just shrugged, "Only if you are okay with it master."
>a few minutes later and C7512 had moved her bags into the guest room
>Amber cooked another rare steak for the soldier, and we all chowed down
>I broke the silence
"C7512 Amber mentioned the bond earlier," I asked, "did you ever form a bond with somebody?"
>Amber looked appaled, "master! you can't ask a veteran that..."
>"Nah," said C7512 looking flustered, "generation threes don't naturally bond with humans."
>both Amber and I looked at her stunned
>"I didn't know that," said Amber curiously, "how DO you bond then?"
>"We can get a shot that awakens the capacity," said the dog as she took another bite, "but command figured it would be better if we avoided distressing emotion connections."
>"Well that's just depressing," said Amber quietly, "the bond is the best part."
>after watching the nightly news I prepared for bed
>Amber was close behind, "I got C7512 settled sir."
"I'm sorry for ruining your plans," I said quietly, "I should have called ahead."
>"It's quite all right sir," she said softly, "I exist to make you happy."
>"but..." she said with a smug grin appearing on her face, "you really are a terrible liar..."
It just occurred to me that I've added two muscular women to this work. I promise the next one will be different.
>I froze for a moment
"Uh," I paused, "what gave it away?"
>"You just now," she said with a grin, "I'm just kidding, it was C7512 herself."
>she leaned close to me, "whenever you mentioned her staying in the guest room her tail fell depressingly to the floor"
>"I'm being a bad girl right now," she said in a whisper, "but I am a little jealous that our alone time is coming to an end."
"I'll have to punish you later," I said while grabbing her chin and giving her a quick peck on the lips
>Amber chuckled and then continued, "but you did pick well master."
>"You see how big that girl is?" she said throwing her arms apart, "AND she's combat trained"
"I'll send her to the Anthro Luv store again," I said laying down on the bed, "have her get herself one of those shots and a collar. You can come with me to work."
>"I'd love that," said Amber as she laid beside me
C7512 POV
>it's three o'clock in the morning
>I still haven't gone to bed
>I'm just so excited to finally have a bond-mate
>he accepted this awkward bitch into his life so readily
>I'll never deserve him
>but it wasn't helping my insomnia that those two were still going at it
>I moved my paw in my dripping snatch, and then bit down on my panties to muffle my moan
>"Ah Master!" came a moan from across the hall
>a set of masculine moans followed soon after in sync with bed springs
>I moved my left paw onto my nipple, giving it a little tug
>"Amber," came Anon's muffled voice, "where did you learn to do that?"
>the only sound that followed was a loud screaming moan in response
>holy shit that was the fifth one
>"I hope we haven't woken C7512 up," said Anon's muffled tone
>"I don't think she's even fallen asleep master," said the tiger
>"We'll have to give her a show then," said Anon in a growl
>Amber just laughed
>I moaned once more into my panties as I started on round five
>fucking skinnies
Just some filler today
>"Hello sir," said Dave as I pulled up to the radio station
"Hi Dave," I said simply
>"You look tired sir," said Dave, "did things go well with your companion?"
"I guess you could say so Dave," I said
>"I am glad to hear that," he said following after me, "I have prepared your paperwork sir."
>sigh
C7512 POV
>I was a little puzzled to be woken up by Amber
>I thought her and Anon were headed to work together
>"C7512," she said groggily, "are you awake?"
"Yeah," I said with a sigh, "I'm up. I thought you were going to work with Anon."
>"Y-yeah," she chuckled tiredly, "I was, but then we had too much fun last night. He left a note saying that he didn't wanna wake me up."
>I totally missed him leaving, I've gotten soft since becoming a civilian.
>the hours long masturbation session definitely didn't help
"Well shit," I said, "what do we do now?"
>"I've gotta wash some dishes," she said, "then we could watch a movie?"
I stood up, "I'll help you wash them, as long as I get to pick."
Anon POV
>work was an absolute slog
>nothing but meetings and dealing with crappy execs and disk jockeys
>by the time I came home, I was dead on my feet
>at least I spared Amber the pain
>I walked in the front door to see two Anthros clutched together on the couch
>they were both looking as nonchalant as possible, but it was obvious they were terrified
>"Welcome home master," said Amber jumping up, eager to escape the movie, "I'll get you some dinner ready."
>I zombie shuffled over to the couch and just collapsed
>then I got a good view of what they were watching, and it clicked in my head
"Alien huh," I said with a tired chuckle, "a big old girl like you is scared of a little alien."
>C7512 mumbled under her breath, "I don't have any defenses against somebody bursting out of my chest."
"The androids in this one," I said turning my head, "they kinda remind me of Dave."
>That put a grin on C7512's face, "they sure do."
>I went to bed surrounded by floof
>basically just passed out
>when I woke up, I was alone in bed
>I heard muffled speaking from outside
>looks like C7512 and Amber were getting along well
>I shuffled to the side of my bed
>then I heard the stomping of feet outside my door
>the door slowly creaked open
>revealing C7512 dressed in Amber's maid outfit, carrying an English breakfast
>the outfit was not big enough for the girl, giving me a view of everything
>the skirt stopped just short of C7512's dripping pussy, and the top was unable to contain C7512's proportionally bigger tits
>she was blushing from ear to ear, but she still walked in with grace and put the dish gracefully onto my mattress
>"here's y-your breakfast master," she said with a small curtsy
>Amber gave a cheer from the doorway, revealing that she was wearing a causal tank-top and pair of skinny jeans
>C7512 paused for a moment, "do you w-want me to f-feed you master?"
"that would be lovely C7512," I whispered into her ear
>her eyes widened but she still carefully maneuvered a fork down and speared some sausage
"Amber," I said between bites, "get over here."
>the tiger bounded across the room and laid down on the other side of the bed
>"yes master?" she said with innocent eyes
"did you dress poor C7512 up?"
>"she has to prove herself some way master," she said quickly, "and she helped make the breakfast."
"Well," I said with a grin, "you are both very good girls for all this."
>I reached out with a hand and pat both of their heads
>Amber just mewled in happiness as I began rubbing her head
>C7512 blushed even harder, but her little tail began whipping through the air
>as I continued she broke into a dopey smile
"I was going to bring you with me to work Amber," I said with a grin
>"yes master," she said happily, "I'm dressed and ready to go."
"C7512," I said, "when I get home I'll take you back to Anthro Luv."
>"of course sir," she nodded.
>once again Dave was waiting for me at the entrance
>I realized as I walked up that Dave and Amber had never met
>she was eyeing him with suspicion as he approached me
>"Oh hello sir," he said, "I hope you are having a good day."
"I'm doing rather well Dave," I said before bringing Amber forward, "this is my companion, Amber."
>"Oh I am happy to meet you," he said with a robotic jerk, "I wanted to apologize for the situation with C7512. It's rather all my fault. I was playing matchmaker and did not know that Anon was in a relationship already."
>"I am happy to meet you too," she didn't look happy, "no hard feelings."
>"Oh I am glad to hear that," said Dave with a plastic smile.
>oh Dave, bless your robot autism
>it took a little bit of teaching, but Amber was a natural help for my paperwork
>she was a bit miffed that Dave gave me so much to do
>we had a android designer on the show, he was talking about his companies' new model of droid
>it looked far more like a living person than Dave, but still wasn't right
>he had brought a better model though, which was a stylized android with a screen face
>the eyes on the screen were unique and cute, especially compared to the uncanny dolls that had come in earlier
>but none of the androids compared to having a living breathing anthro
>Amber and I returned home tired and fulfilled. The girl basically hummed the whole way home
>I think helping me really gave her satisfaction
>I felt a bit like a user when I had first gotten Amber, but seeing how happy service made her was a bit eye opening
>I really wondered how C7512 would be once she was bound
>regardless we pulled up to the apartment
>it would be interesting to see how C7512 had done alone
>I opened the door to an unexpected sight
>C7512 was kneeling in front of the door, naked and blushing
>behind her on the table was a full meal, pasta and meatballs and meat for Amber
>my chair was missing though
>"Welcome home sir," she said happily, "I have prepared dinner for you two tonight."
>it did smell great
"Thank you C7512," I said simply before asking, "but there's only one chair."
>"whatever do you mean master?" she asked with an even greater blush on her face, "your chair is right here."
>with that said, she crawled over to the table on her fours and stopped right before my place, leaning over in a submissive arch
>Amber's face warped into a slowly expanding smile, "it looks like you get the comfortable chair today master."
>nodding in return I stepped over the kneeling dog, and sat down on her back
>leaning down I whispered in her ear
"I've heard this is really bad for your back C7512," I said simply, "you don't have to do this."
>she moaned under my weight, "my muscles are augmented sir," she replied, "I'm happy to serve."
>with a small grunt of acknowledgement, I began to eat
"My complements to the chef," I said out loud.
>"it was just a dish that I made on R&R sir," she moaned again, "I hoped you would like it."
>seeing the opportunity for some mischief, I moved my right hand down onto C7512's extended ass.
>I gave it a squeeze and then a smack, which caused my chair to tremble
>Amber began smirking
>I occasionally brushed my knuckles against C7512's eager pussy, each movement caused her to twitch and moan until the meal was over
>soon enough I finished and stepped off the horny cyborg
>C7512 stood up, once again reminding me of how tall she is
>"I don't mean to be needy master," said C7512, "but we should probably get going to the Anthro Luv store"
>but she had a point
"Very well," I said picking up my car keys, "Amber we'll be right back."
>"Safe travels master!" said Amber cheerily
C7512 POV
>the drive to the store was miserable for me
>every second stuck in the car with master just made me hotter and hotter
>especially after teasing me all of dinner
*whine*
>"C7512," said master while chuckling, "did you just... whine like a dog?"
>my face turned bright red
"Maybe..."
>the man just chuckled again, "we are almost there."
>the Anthro Luv store was a gorgeous sight
>we walked together into the store, which made me wish that we had a leash
>Anon went ahead, and almost immediately got jumped by a parrot girl
>poor thing, birds weren't as popular
>"Welcome to Anthro Luv," said the parrot in a sing-song voice, "how can I help you?"
>"My friend here needs your bond hormones," said Anon, "and a collar and leash."
>we were lead back into a changing room
>a grizzled looking cat anthro walked into the room, with a needle and bandage
>"I am required to ask the following questions by the US government," said the cat in a bored tone
>"C7512, you are a US citizen by service," she continued, "do you consent to any loss of autonomy produced by the Luv bond?"
"Yes," I said, finally expressing the thoughts that had been slowly building over the day.
>"Ok," said the cat before rapidly shooting the needle into my arm, "please remain here for a half hour to fully bond."
>"Take deep breaths," said the cat before exiting the room.
C7512 POV
>you watched the cat lock the door behind her
>leaving you and Anon alone
>in a dressing room
>for a half hour
>"I didn't expect to be locked in here," said Anon with a smile, "guess you are stuck with me."
"I'm afraid you'll find that you are stuck with me master," I said quietly, "I hope you don't mind."
>Anon pulled you into a hug, "I think that's okay with me."
>he smelled so good, and your heart fluttered so much that you thought the medicine was kicking in
>but it hadn't been long enough
>ah jeez this is going to kill me
>Anon placed my head on his shoulder as we maintained the hug
>his scent was filling my lungs as I sat peacefully in his arms
>I thought the medicine had already kicked in multiple times before it actually did
>but when it kicked in, I knew that it had
"How on earth does Amber deal with this?" I said under my breath
>"Has it kicked in?"
>Ice hit my veins instantly, and I lulled in pleasure
"I think so," I said with gritted teeth, "oh wow."
>my body began to shake, and I was filled with a sudden need
"Master," I whined, "I need to smell more of you..."
>"Uh sure," master said, "what do you mean?"
>I laid him back onto the dressing room bench as I was atop him
>his eyes opened in surprise as I took my snout and pressed it under his arm
>I removed myself from under his arm and slid backwards over his legs, resting my head on his groin
>this is where his scent was coming from
"Can I?" I asked desperately
>he just nodded as I opened up his belt and freed his semi-erect member
>I rested my face under it
>the smell was intoxicating
>I would serve this man as long as I lived
>it was like all my worries were gone
>"C7512," he said, "this is probably a bad time, but do you want to keep going by your military name?"
"I would like a name," I said with a smile, "I know you'll pick a good one."
>"What about," he said thinking, "Carol?"
>I just smiled up at him
Anon POV
>the ride home was quiet
>the experience in the changing room was definitely more signficant than sexual, but Carol had remained there for the whole time
>the cat was grateful we didn't have sex while in the room, which seemed to be a common problem
>Carol had spent the whole drive home subtly taking glances at me
"What is it like?" I finally broke and just asked, "the bond I mean."
>she hummed for a moment before speaking, "it's like finding a part of yourself."
>that didn't answer anything, but I continued driving
>we walked up the stairs to my apartment, finding Amber alone on the couch
>"Welcome home Master!" she said as she stood up before turning to Carol, "how was it?"
>"Ohhh," said Carol with a grin, "I've got it bad Amber, I spent a half hour smelling his junk."
"I should tell you that C7512 is now Carol," I said, "my newest slave."
"Welcome to the team Carol," said Amber with a wink, "I imagine you have many ideas of what to do now."
>"I can think of a couple," said Carol before turning around to face me, "if you are okay with me showing my devotion... master?"
"I'd love to hear what is going on in that dirty head of yours"
>the doberman began stripping her clothes off
>she took off her top, revealing heavy tits before guiding my hand to the right one
>"these tits are yours master," she said
>then she stripped off her bottoms, placing my left hand over her drooling snatch
>"you did this to me master," she moaned.
>she guided me to the couch, sitting down and motioning me to sit down on her metallic thighs
>she deftly undid my belt with one hand, and unveiled my cock
>her right hand gripped my cock, and her left hand wrapped around me and pulled me back onto her tits
>she kissed my shoulder and began pumping away at my cock
>Amber this whole time was not idle
>she moved forward in front of us two, slowly and sensually losing each layer as she went
>eventually she was naked, and sat down on the floor in a lazy pose, ideally clawing at her pussy
>soft moans came from her mouth, and she tugged on her right nipple
>"We are your hands," she whispered, "eager to do whatever you would like us to do."
>to emphasize the point she began speeding up her hand-job, ebbing and flowing with Amber's motions
>in response I reached behind me and found a wanton pussy dripping on my couch
>I pushed my finger deep into her depths, eliciting a deep moan from my seat
>we continued our assault for a moment longer, before Carol broke into a grin
>suddenly her hand began vibrating, throwing me off as she went up and down
>"Metal hand master," she said in a sing song voice
>Amber slowly crawled towards us, her tail swishing in the air
>she stopped right before me, just as I began to peak
>"Master," whispered Carol behind me, "look at how much she wants you. Wants you to cover her."
>that was it, and I felt my balls twitch as ropes of my cum covered Amber's face
>she twitched and sputtered as she broke into an orgasm of her own
>"T-thank you m-master," cried Amber with a deep moan.
>"I hope that was too your liking master," whispered Carol from behind me
"That was great Carol," I said as I reached up and kissed her on the cheek
>she went wide-eyed at the kiss, before breaking into a blush
"You didn't finish though," I said afterwards
>"I'm hear for your pleasure master," she said as she lifted me up and placed me on the couch next to her, "besides, there is plenty of clean up."
>to accent her point she knelt down and began licking up my semen from Amber's face, moaning each time she did it
>she continued down my tiger's breasts, lapping up each drop
>her ass was in the air as she continued down the Tiger and onto the floor, giving a fresh view of the juices flowing with each lick
>eventually she began twitching herself, but suppressed the moan to continue cleaning up
>Amber pet Carol as the anthro continued to clean the tiger
>"Man," she said tiredly, "you weren't joking, you have it bad Carol."
>the sight was so erotic that my tired cock began to slowly stir
>I figured I had another round in me, so I gently knelt down behind Carol
>after a few moments, I was up to full mast
>slowly I reached forward and began rubbing the head of my penis over her pussy
>the folds felt fantastic
>"Master," whined Carol, "If you do that, I'm not going to last long."
"I'll make you a deal Carol," I said as I moved my cock down, "If you last long enough to cum with me, I'll cuddle with you tonight. Otherwise you get to sleep at the foot of my bed like a good doggie."
>she panted and moaned but her face shifted into a look of pure determination
>eager to break her down even more, I wickedly thrust into her inviting sex with an unexpected ferocity
>she moaned in pure pleasure, sounding more animal than human as I began railing her body with abandon
>Amber looked on in amusement, before she smirked and stepped onto the soldier's back
>reaching her claws down she began molesting the doberman's tits
>"That's not fair," whined Carol
"She is one of my hands, Carol," I said smugly, "you said so yourself."
>she just glared back at me in between moans
>I wasn't doing too well myself
>Carol's pussy didn't have the milking capabilities of Amber's, but it was hot and tight
>the soldier also clearly had good pelvic floor muscles, because she was stirring me around as much as she could
>it didn't help that I had the lovely visual aid of Amber's pussy smearing on the back of Carol, her ass and her tail raised high
>Amber herself turned around and winked at me, before slapping her own ass and continuing her assault on Carol
>the soldier just whimpered and moaned, appearing to blink in and out of reality
>I felt my orgasm coming as well, and continued the race to the finish line
>Carol began whimpering as we got closer to the end
>her mouth was sealed shut, and her eyes were watering
>I began slapping her ass as I pounded away, partly desperate to throw her off and party to enjoy the beautiful sound
>Amber was swirling her breasts and pulling on her nipples
>regardless Carol held on for dear life
>eventually I had to give up, and with a last ditch attempt I began pounding her harder than ever before
>her insides began twitching all over my cock, signifying the end
>put the side effect was I began cumming myself, filling her pussy with white
>now that the contest was over, Carol's tongue fell out of her mouth
>she sat there fried for a moment, her eyes rolled back and her body collapsed on my floor
>I fell back on the couch as well, enjoying the victory
>but the ride was not over for poor Carol yet
>Amber flipped her around, as a serious twitching mess
>then Amber lowered herself, and began to lick the flowing mess leaving Carol
>this continued for a while longer, Amber cumming twice while Carol came once more
>then it was done
Carol POV
>I had lost, but it felt so good
>I woke up as a puddle on the floor, having felt better than ever before
>Master was right ahead, carefully petting Amber who was asleep on his lap
>lucky
I wobbly stood up before speaking, "I suppose I should get prepared for a night on the floor."
>"You could," responded Anon, "but I do believe we came together."
I chuckled in disbelief, "You can believe whatever you want master."
>"I can," he said with a cute little humph, "besides I desire to be little spoon."
With a quiet chuckle, I just shook my head, "I live to serve, Master."
Anon POV
>Carol was clutching me like a teddy bear, and Amber was facing me on the other side
>the bed was a bit too small for all three of us, but we were able to make it work with a bit of tetris
>I wouldn't have it any other way
>the next day was as lovely as before, both of my companions taking turns feeding me a proper breakfast
>regardless, I still had work to do
>I didn't take either of them to work with me, electing to let them have a partial day off
>Amber had made enough of a dent in my work that it was going to take months to reach the same point
>if I kept bringing her my work would be nothing but interviews
>I walked up the steps of the radio station and was greeted by Dave
>"Oh hello sir," he said with a freaky smile, "thank goodness you are here."
>"You have visitors sir," he said pointing at a nearby conference room, "in conference room one."
"Visitors?" I asked, "who did they say they were?"
>"Anthro Luv," he said cheerfully, "they wanted to talk business, as it were."
>that was definitely terrifying
>Antho Luv was a military contracted company, and the source of my two slaves
>they had a lot of power, although not quite surpassing the android manufacturers
>steeling my nerves, I entered the conference room
>the room was filled solely with Anthros
>there was a fox dressed in a sexy secretary outfit
>then there were two hyena guards, standing in black suits
>on the table was a computer with a video call running
>on the call was an older gentlemen with a white mustache
>"this way sir," said the fox as she gently pulled out a chair in front of the computer
>"Mr. Mous," said the older man, "My name is Boris Tanner, one of the executives of Anthro Luv."
"Pleased to meet you Mr. Tanner," I said nervously
>"Oh no need to be nervous," he said with a laugh, "I'm over the advertising department."
>"You see," he said again, "our stocks increased in value shortly after your interview with C7512. I am here to thank you on behalf of the company, and to talk business."
"Oh it was no problem," I said, "I can't believe that I had that much of an effect, my show is pretty small."
>"Ah, but this is the internet age Mr. Mous," he said stroking his mustache, "I'm afraid you'll find that the public was thirsty for a fresh perspective on the war, absolutely genius."
"Ah it was mostly my android," I said simply
>"Oh no," he said with a chuckle, "don't be humble, I am afraid we know about your other purchases Mr. Mous. Many others in the entertainment industry would never have featured an antho, I'm afraid we've never been in vogue as much as the androids."
>"I'll stop beating around the bush," he said leaning back in his chair, "we are here to purchase your contract, and to offer you a podcasting contract."
"What are the terms of the deal?" I asked curiously
>"We'll trade you for the esteemed Mrs. Lux behind you," said the businessman pointing to the fox, "the board at 79.7 needed a new lawyer, so we grew them one."
>"In exchange you'll get a six figure salary, your own show with creative control, and other perks," he chuckled, "in exchange you'll be a brand ambassador for Antho Luv."
"What does that entail?" I asked
>"Product reviews," he said, "anthro and owner testimonials, personal testimony. We want you to sell anthros as a preferable alternative to android and human companionship, because they are."
"Can I have a day to think about it and go over the paperwork?"
>"Certainly," he said chuckling, "you do have a couple people you should ask."
>I stood up
"Thank you for the opportunity," I said graciously
>"No thank you Mr. Mous," he said
>"Oh! one more thing," he said cheerfully, "to thank you for your boost to our stocks, we sent you a small gift - contingent on nothing. Should be there tomorrow."
>I stumbled out of the room with the paperwork in tow, knowing who I needed to ask about all this
>"I'm afraid that this is a very good deal sir," said Dave the android, "401k, health insurance, dental, very impressive."
>"Additionally, if you leave I get to be an assistant to that beautiful Mrs. Lux," he added with an uncanny smile.
>I had Dave continue to read the contract carefully
>I really should have had a lawyer on retainer, but I honestly didn't expect this kind of deal to happen in my life
>regardless he finished looking over the contract
>"If you want my opinion sir," he said with a handshake, "it seems like a very good deal. The salary is competitive, you'd have more control over your show, and you'd gain some serious connections."
"Thanks Dave," I said with a handshake
>"No problem sir," he said returning the shake, "it's been a pleasure working with you."
>the day passed in a haze, finishing paperwork and reading files
>eventually I was home
>I opened the door, and was greeted by a lovely sight
>Carol and Amber were standing together wearing maid uniforms
>they weren't wearing any panties, and judging by their erect nipples no bras either
>"Welcome home master!" they cheered as I stepped in the door.
"Hello girls," I said with a chuckle, "I thought we only had one maid uniform."
>"There's a clothing store not too far from here," said Carol with a smile, "especially if you have robotic legs."
"Well girls," I said pulling out the contract, "I've got some news."
>Amber took the contract and began to read, Carol towering behind her read at the same rate
>their eyes widened as I watched their pupils go back and forth over the page
>"That's," stuttered Carol, "t-that's a lot of money."
>Amber nodded, "it's about time somebody else noticed master."
"What do you girls think?"
>"It says here you don't have to start for a couple weeks master," Amber said with a smile, "and an advance bonus. We could go on vacation together."
>"We'd probably have to move," said Carol with a frown, "the advance bonus could be used on a house."
"This place is getting pretty small," I said afterwards, "especially with more than one person."
>"I could find some war buddies for you to interview sir," said Carol with a hum
>"I would be more than willing to help you run the podcast," nodded Amber

Could be that animals have no souls, hence no sin being able to be committed against them.
>be human male at school
>furboi makes fun of you for being a virgin
>you know his family's catholic
>go to his house later
>his family lets you in, it's a religious requirement for them to be as accommodating as possible to the "true templates of God"
>his mom apologizes for her son's poor behavior and scolds him at the dinner table
>she offers you dinner. She only made enough for herself and her son since her husband is out working
>Looks like her son doesn't get dinner tonight
>She offers you a blowjob under the table as a form of repentance
>Furboi looks like he's about to cry
>Later that night, knock up his mom in her bedroom, loud enough for the furboi to hear
>Go to school the next day
>He still makes fun of you for being a virgin
These religious technicalities SUCK
you fuck a dozen anthros and you're still a virgin in their eyes
fuck one furboi and you're a furfag for life

If you were offered a designer clone anthro to mess around with, what sorts of lewd modifications would you request?

Increased sensitivity to the genitals, anus, nipples, and mouth. Enlarged breasts and increased heat period to 80% of the year. Obedience chip installed in the brain.

>One of those nifty porn controllers/apps that lets you control a person's personality, memories, sensory experience, and mind.
>Their package deal to let me interface her body and mind with other hardware and software I have in my house.
>Detachable/swappable limbs with additional attachments.
>That the pretty, anthro saleswoman who who sold me on buying their product be the one that gets fitted with the mods and sold to me, including that cute office outfit she was wearing with the short pencil skirt. I'm willing to pay extra for this service.

As a wise man once said, "Tits or ass? I choose personality."
Specifically, I want for her to hate humans. Implant false memories into her dreams of a happy, normal upbringing. The kind Anthros had before humans had arrived. Have the dreams always end before the best part. Waking up on Christmas morning to open presents but never getting downstairs, hearing her non-existant parents calling her down for dinner but never getting to eat.. I want her to wake up in whatever cell clones are raised in, and cry as she eats her nutrition-paste, as she struggles to recall the taste of roast-carrots from her dreams. I want her to know that humans could have just never shown her this, but chose to for some unknoweable, twisted reason.
Then give her a crippling human jizz addiction, duh

First off, the basic stuff: I don't want her shedding all over the place when it's warm, or trying to hibernate. But that's just covering the bases; the fun stuff comes after:
>"Steamer" libido; easy to heat up, slow to cool down.
>Hypnotic triggers enforced by neural command paths; can't orgasm without specific permission. Feels guilt and loneliness when disciplined, contentment and happiness when she pleases. Can be made to feel artificial exhaustion and soreness as a punishment, or have her real aches and pains soothed with a word as a reward.
>Enhanced blood flow and thermoregulation; I don't want to worry about bruising, sore formation, or hypothermia from tying her up and leaving her. Of course, she'll still be cold, and her discomfort will still transform to burning pain as the stress builds. That's part of the fun.
>Psychological and sensory sensitization to those things which I find bothersome; she should be compelled to clean, tidy, and work for the sake of her own comfort as well as mine.
The goal is to have a maid and servant who, in addition to being incredibly useful, is also constantly simmering with nervous lust. Easily teased, mildly desperate at all times, but knows she can't do anything but be good and hope. Both craves and fears attention: positive attention brings her a sense of joy and contentment to receive. Is simperingly eager to be kept tied and teased; the pain and intense frustration is nothing next to knowing she's amusing me.
Eventually, she should internalize that desperate frustration is her natural and ideal state, and learn to revel in her own misery.

>Be a yeen named Taylor
>Just hit the 30-year mark
>Still be alone and no humie
>You'd think graduating as the captain of the football team would net you some hot dick
>But life hits you hard
>Now you're just a two-bit coach running a gym in a corner of a mall
>Not bad, but not terrible
>You've tried to go into bars and strip clubs
>Always checking out the skinny trophies only to end up fighting their girlfriends
>Guess you don't hit them hard like you used to
>Strip clubs are a no go after getting banned in all of them for groping the cuties
>Maybe you should rethink your strategy this time
>Eventually you hear something of a an exclusive club full of human workers
>Super secret, like know someone to get in type of club
>Luckily your friend recommended it
>She was a gym sis, like you
>Though you promised not to tell anyone she goes into that club
>You walk into the club with her and look around
>Various human men dressed in leather clothing that you only see in pornos
>Not only that they are very... muscular
>A sound of someone getting whipped could be heard in the background
>Jesus Natalie what the hell
>But fuck it don't knock it till you try it
>Cute guy receptionist up front looks at me up and down and recommends me "Mean and Green."
>Guy apparently specializes in pleasing hyena clients
>Fuck yeah hit me with that
>He guides me to a room deep into the club
>While Natalie was collared up and dragged away by another guy
>You do you sis
>Get into the room
>Holy fuck its a straight up kink dungeon
>Various toys lined up the wall thats making you think twice on this
>Whatever maybe you'll get to use them on this Mean and Green guy
>The door opens behind you and in walks a hulking man that you have to look up
>Holy shit this guy is jacked and oiled up
>He was wearing a tight leather bondage gear and a mask only showing his eyes
>Gestures me to get on the bed
>I comply since I'm not used to this
>Still a virgin after all these years
>Now you're either gonna get laid or sent to the hospital
>Ask him nervously what's going to happen
>His muffled voice tells me he's going to teach me a lesson about pain and pleasure
>Judging by his tone it's sort of a roleplay
>But the way I was shaking a bit he paused
>He asks in a softer tone if I'm okay with this and we can end the session
>I think for a moment and tell him I'll go along with it
>I mean you're practically gonna get laid
>Just not in the traditional yeen way like your mom did
>He nods his head and moves to the shelf of toys
>His fingers glide to the bigger ones which make my eyes widen
>Until he settled on an egg vibrator
>"Oh fuck you I can handle better"
>He turns to me with a glint in his eye and I shut up
>The human tells me to relax and lay on the bed
>He slowly cuffs all of my limbs at the bedposts
"The safe word is Cinnamon."
>F-Fuck this is really happening
>He asks me again if I'm comfortable
>I slowly nod and he grabs a blindfold
>As he ties the fabric around my head, the only thing I could feel was the moist lewd atmosphere and my anticipated breathing
>I could hear him walk around me
>Then he grabs my limp pseudo penis, cradling it like he was inspecting it
>I groan softly at the touch
>Until I feel him stick the egg vibrator around it
>I moan like a bitch and my hands pull against the chains
>Schlicking feels nothing like this
>Slowly he guides the vibrator on my pseudo dick until it receeds
>I let out a yelp as he sticks it inside my pussy
>"Oh fuck!"
>Meanwhile his hands glide over to my tits and gives my nipples soft pinches
>I grit my teeth as my lower body feels like its on fire
>As I was about to reach my climax, the vibration stops
>I groaned in protest
"Hold on now. We don't want to end the session early now do we?"
>My eyes widened beneath the blindfold and bucked my hips, hoping to finish
>But to my utter despair and sick pleasure, he teased my orgasm
>Over and over
>He turned egg vibrator on and off at the most infuriating times
>Pushing me to each high until I was pulled down
>I don't know how many minutes had passed but I was drooling and moaning
>The toy turned on again just as I was calming down
>His ministrations on my tits become more rough
"Bark for me."
>I did
>I barked and howled like an obedient dog in hopes my tormentor lets me finish
>I heard a pleased hum as he turns the vibrator to its highest setting
>Eventually my mind goes blank as I experience my most intense orgasm to date
>He yanks out the egg out of me as I squirt uncontrollably
>I bucked my hips as I made a mess on the bed until I lay limp
>He pulls away my blindfold and takes off the handcuffs
>I curled up on the bed groaning like I'd been soaked in hot oil
>"Amazing."
>That was the only word I could describe it
>The human was pleased and helps me out of the room
>As I was about to walk away, I couldn't help but get curious
>I know the leather mask was for all the aesthetic but you really want to know who's the humie under the mask
>For schlicking purposes that's all
>Besides, you don't think it's illegal
>So you silently crept up to the room once again and peak inside
>The guy was cleaning up the bed and putting the toys away
>And jackpot
>He pulls the zipper of the back of his mask and his sweaty face reveals itself
>You could only see a side profile but it was unmistakeable
>"Anon?"
>He perks up and turns his head
>But you immediately run away
>Confused frustrated
>And most of all horny
>Anon
>The Anon
>The guy you used to pick on and steal his lunch money
>The twerp who you used to shove into lockers and spray glitter on
>The boy you had feelings with since meeting him on the first day of school
>The guy who eventually transferred away and left you lonely
>And now the sexy hunk of meat that made you bark like a dog
>You stop at the hallway and slide down against the wall
>Your face was hot as you collect your thoughts

>You walk by a bunch of mobians playing volleyball
>They start flashing their goods at you, you didn't even ask
a very slutty race

>Cuckquean human gf starts pointing out hot anthros she wants you to breed when you go out in public
>She regularly approaches anthro women talking them up like a used car dealer
>Naturally the anthros don’t put up much resistance if any when they see you
>GF hungrily eats your load out of their overflowing anthro pussies

>humans as supernatural creatures, akin to fae/spirits
>sometimes benevolent, sometimes malevolent , but always seen as beautiful, in a supernatural, alien sort of way
>lack of tails yet perfect balance
>hands that can grant unimageable pleasure at just a touch
>enchanting voices that can command you to do anything
>many different depictions across cultures/species
>sometimes benevolent spirits that can bestow "gifts of fertility"
>sometimes as malevolent demons, dark gods ruling through fear and demanding offerings of fertile maidens to bear their evil spawn

I will be the browning/ colt and maxim of that world! I will be rich beyond belief and have thousands of anthros at my beck and call!

>Hang your electricity. If you want to make your fortune, invent something to help these fool Anthros kill each other more quickly!
>The Anthro states, ever at the other's throats
>And ever hungry for scraps of victories they can wave in each other's faces
>Behind each crown, family crest, and coat of arms was you
>The prices they paid for a blade ever so slightly sharper, a rifle that shoots ever so slightly faster, bullets that killed better, was massive
>Gold and silver flowed in as the endless Anthro wars raged on
>And when gems and metals couldn't satisfy, they offered themselves
>While your chances of indulging proper royalty in a way they offered up the true power of their nations
>A general offering up herself, a dozen other high ranking officers, and a hundred of her most beautiful PoWs if you gave her first pick of your newest explosives
>A King of a minor nation sending his crown princess to pay national debts, knowing that she herself is part of the payment
>Politicians of every nationality inviting you in for private negotiations
>A Minister of War, her country on the verge of collapse and desperate for your newest model howitzers, getting on her knees and sucking you off in public during her visit
>And you even got your chance to fuck royalty as disgruntled Aristocrats presenting you with their Queen, captured during a revolution and now gifted to you in exchange for more ammunition
>Human bullets shot into Anthro bellies
>Human seed shot into Anthro wombs
>With your bastard children commanding all armies, writing and signing many treaties, and subtly urging the old Anthro order into unintentionally following your orders your word alone could order the birth or death of nations
>You could've declared yourself a king but traveling the world, selling guns, and burying your dick in every important anthro female you came across was much more fun

Rich parents need reliable, trustworthy people who can keep their spoiled brats safe from others as well as from themselves.
>Be young werewolf punk rock bitch.
>7-feet-tall and can deadlift the GYM equipment on your own.
>If there's ever been a big, bad bitch in this town, you're Her.
>Live in a run-down apartment downtown, working as a bouncer for an even shadier bar until a health inspection closed it.
>Can't find work for shit, until your desperate neighbor for some reason thinks its a good idea to ask you to take care of their brat. Thought to decline, but 20 bucks are 20 bucks.
>Work wasn't even hard, brat kept to himself, probably too scared to talk to you, and you collected after a few hours.
>Several of your neighbors come harass you to take care of their own brats after voice spreads around. Maybe this shit ain't so bad. Hell you're earning more than you did as a bouncer.
>Put some ads online for professional nanny. Great with kids. Responsible. All those shit lies parents eat up like cake.
>Keep up the hard work for several weeks, until you finally catch your Big Fish.
>Rich 'human' family needs experienced nanny taking care of their kid and keeping them safe. Full-time. Huge bonuses. Paycheck bigger than you've ever seen.
>There weren't a lot of humans in town, but the few that were were loaded, and this family happened to own half the town, without exaggeration.
>First time meeting with the parents. Typical human family. Friendly like only rich people can be, and as rich as humans get.
>Working those fake smiles overtime to seem real nice and accommodating to you, or at least the three maids running everywhere were.
>Long-story-short, seems the parents wanted someone who could nanny their kid 24/7 wherever the family went, and they wanted a big girl who would make any would-be kidnappers think twice of approaching.
>"Going to meet him?"
>E-Eh, who?! Some anthro deer bitch just snuck up on you. She's not wearing the uniform of the maids, so you thought it was a human at first, but no, the antlers are a dead giveaway.
>"I've been working with him for little more than a year now, and he's such a good kid! You'll be happy to meet him."
>Who is this again?
>"Oh, sorry. I'm his personal tutor. Not that he doesn't go to school, of course, but his parents wanted him to be as prepared for the future as he could so they hired me to make sure he gets nothing but excellent grades! I can't do it full time because I'm attending high school in the morning, but I can still do so around this hours!"
>Yup. You could tell this bitch was the nerd-as-fuck kind. You used to exhort kids like her for lunch money back at school, and not just the girls, but their brothers and their parents as well.
>"Here, let me guide you to his room!"
>Fuck, this people were loaded for shit. Just this brat's room was larger than your whole apartment, and their house alone was larger than your neighborhood.
>Definitely much different from how you and your siblings were raised by your parents. It's actually making you uncomfortable.
>You saw the three maids in the living room attending to the parents, at least one working the kitchen, plus this nerd here. Were there more anthros working here? Did they have their own rooms? You'll probably sleep in one of those, if so.
>"So... have you been a babysitter for a long time? You seem like you'd fit much better in the security industry, with your size and all."
>Fuck this bitch is a yapper as well, although she wasn't wrong... This is gonna be a pain.
>You never liked her kind, always acting better than others because they think they're smarter than them.
>A good dunk on the garbage can always wiped that snotty attitude from them, and you always loved kicking their drunk assess off of the bar.
>Too bad you can't devolve to old habits now.
>"Ah, here he is!"
>Finally find the brat, sitting on a couch quietly reading a book.
>Cute, blonde brat, wearing even cuter, expensive-looking clothes.
>Whole family looked straight out one of those magazines where rich people show off how much better looking and fortunate they were than everyone else.
>You were half expecting some perverted teenager going through puberty. One you'd have to fend off because he thinks because you work for his parents that you were free meat.
>Not the first time you would've had to do it.
>But this kid seemed like he still had some years to go before becoming a sexual predator with enough money and connections to make all evidence in the world against him disappear.
>Nerd here, on the other paw, would've probably loved the opportunity to become some rich human's sugar baby. You'd never before met a deer who wasn't secretly a slut, as well-educated as they wanted to appear.
>"How are your studies going? Good? That's great! I'm sorry to interrupt now, but I just wanted you to meet your new nanny! She'll be working with us for the time being, so lets welcome her together!"
>'For the time being?' Did this cunt think you weren't gonna last the week? You had beaten down a whole bar full of drunken bikers before. I'd take more than one spoiled, little, rich prick to scare you away from this golden egg gig.
>You just needed to make a good first impression. The friendly, unthreatening kind...
>"Hey."
>Nailed it.
"Good afternoon, Miss wolf. Thank you for coming."
>Huh. Polite, little turd. Almost too polite.
>"Very good! Now, if that concludes the introductions, would you like to keep on studying your book?"
>Yep. This gig was the best.
>You had spend the whole afternoon just looking over your phone at the deer and the kid go over that boring book, which seemed more dense now that you'd initially thought.
>That brat wasn't so bad after all. Maybe a bit too well-behaved for your liking. But his parents, or you guess his previous nannies, raised him well.
>Kid even wanted to play the part of a good host and offered something to drink. Of course he didn't fetch it himself, but had one of the maids fetch it for him, but still. Not half bad.
>Even the deer didn't seem so bad after all. She didn't bother you, and kept herself entertained helping the kid with his homework.
>Actually, you weren't sure what was expected of you today since the kid already had someone to hang out with.
>Didn't even want to watch TV or play some videogames, despite having a larger TV and more videogames for himself that you've ever had in your life.
>Shit, maybe you were expected to at least pretend to be interested in what they're doing? Didn't want to fail the 'interview' just cause the job was this easy.
>"So what're you reading there?"
"What? Oh, um... homework."
>"Lemme take a look."
>Probably some kind of children's book to memorize or something... Numbers? This is... oh.
>Math.
>"He finally started getting some Math homework this week, and although I had prepared some material to help him it seems I was worried over nothing! I think you're a natural!"
"Oh- Thank you!"
>..Yup. Those were indeed numbers. And the math symbols. They were there, and you could read them, but they didn't make much sense to you. Never did.
>You could count your cash and know who to beat up if someone tried to short-change you. What else could you need to know beside that?"
"It's not really that hard. It's kind of fun... actually."
>Fun? This shit wasn't fun you little masochist, it was horrible. Just in this page alone every number had minus symbols before it! And were those letters? Letters didn't belong in math! THE FUCK!? What where they teaching this kid?!
>"Would you like to help us with this lesson?"
>Your blood froze.
>"N-NO! I-It's cool. He can clearly handle it."
>You handed the horrible book back to him.
>But it was too late.
>"...Is it? Don't tell me."
>Don't, bitch. Don't you dare.
>"Miss Wolf, could it be that you..."
>You fucking deer slut, don't you finish that sentence.
>"...you aren't very good at math?"
>YOU FUCKING DEER BITCH, I'M GOING TO RIP YOU TO PIECES
>"N-NO! I can do Math just fine! This shi- this is just boring to me!"
>"Right? Human schools tend to give more advanced curriculums than anthro schools do, but even this is quite basic..."
>YOU
>"...just some basic Arithmetic, you know~?"
>SHUT THE FUCK UP YOU CUNT. DON'T THINK I CAN'T SEE YOU SMIRKING TO YOURSELF BEHIND THAT FAKE SMILE OF YOURS, YOU KNOW-IT-ALL WHORE
>"TH-THA-T'S...! YOU...!"
>...
>"E-Eek!"
>...
"M-Miss Wolf?"
>...Huh?
"Is e-everything alright?"
>You were standing up at your full height, hackles raised up, claws and fangs out, and your drink all over the floor.
>...Shit. Well, so much for nailing the job.
>You had almost lost control on an instinct. You'd involuntarily stood up from your seat and were ready to pounce on that little whore to claw her lights out, when you spilled your drink in the process.
>Forget about landing the job, you had almost earned another ticket to prison.
>You'd at least managed to not scar him for life by mauling his little tutoring pet in front of him.
>"I- uh...I'm-"
>"D-Don't worry, I'll have someone clean this in a bit, just you wait!"
>She was already up to her talkative self. Did this idiot not even realize the danger she'd put herself in by antagonizing you?
>She's already on her way out the room in search for a maid to clean up your stupid mess, paying no attention to you.
>"After all, It's not the first glass of juice that has been spilled in your room, and it probably won't be the last."
>...What?
>"But if I didn't know any better, I would've sworn I was about to be eaten by The Big Bad Wolf~"
>THIS FUCKIN-
>...This cunt knew how to make your blood boil like only the worst of them did.
>If anything you had to give it to her. She still had the balls to double down now.
>No wonder she was so dismissive at the beggining. Bet no other nanny lasted too long with this bitch around to pressure them out.
>...Maybe this job was too good for you after all. Kid seems like he already has everything he needs, specially with that doe cunt who's probably grooming him to become her sugar daddy in a few years or so.
>Better not to not get in her way if you didn't want to end up ripping her head off one day, probably the one good thing you're good at.
>Hell, it was probably best if you stuck to bouncer work after all. This nanny shit was too much trouble than it was worth.
>"I'm... I'm gonna go."
"E-Eh? W-Wait! You're leaving?"
>Yeah, kid. You don't need me, and I don't belong here."
"B-But I do need you!"
>Ugh, don't get so shamelessly clingy over a girl, brat. It's not manly at all.
>"Psh. Listen to you. What kid your age says they need a nanny, eh?! Most would be angry at their parents for not thinking them old enough to be left alone."
>That does get an appropriate response out of him, in the form of a beet-red face.
"W-Well. It's just..."
>"Yeah?"
>"Well, since you're so big and all...
"Yeah?"
>Where's this shit going? He wasn't about to ask some weird favor under the table, is he? He's too young to know of that shit. Unless that doe cunt has been giving him "extra-curricular lessons" when no one's looking...
"...I was thinking that probably nobody messes with you so...
>"Kid, if you don't spit it out now I'm leaving."
"IWANTEDYOUTOTEACHMEHOWTOBESTRONGSOICANBEATUPMYBULLIESATSCHOOL!"
>Huh? He's getting bullied? At school?
>"Huh? You're getting bullied? At school?
"...Y-Yes. It's embarrassing, but... Yeah."
>"You're getting bullied. Despite your parents having this much money."
>"Their parents have money too! And the teachers don't do SHIT because they don't believe anything!"
>Whoa, language!
>"Whoa, language!"
"Sorry for the swearing."
>"Nah, kid. I dig it! Just don't let your parents or that Deer hear ya saying it! Heheh!"
>That got him to blush even harder. Hell, maybe he wasn't the snobby, little brat you thought after all.
>Mh... maybe. Just maybe...
>"Tell ya what, kid. You put in a good word with your pops about me as your nanny, keep your little, pet tutor on a short leash, and I'll teach you everything you need to know so noone messes with you ever again! Deal?"
"S-Short leash? Y-Yeah, of course, Miss Wolf!"
>"Capital, kid. Just don't call me Miss. That's me mum."
"Y-Yes! Of course!"
>Heh. Things didn't seem so bad now. Even if the deer cunt put a bad word on his parents, you bet they'd believe anything he has to say over her.
>Yup. Things were looking pretty good for you now.
"So... is it true?"
>"Heheh, what is it, kid?"
"That you don't know how to do this? T-The Math, I mean."
>...Eh?
>"Coming in! Sorry I took so long to find one of the maids to clean this! The house is so big so I- W-What's going on?"
>Yeah, what the fuck is going on?!
>"So, all you have to do is carry over the seven to make this easier to solve, see?"
>No, you didn't get that at all! It's supposed to be positive and now its a negative? How the fuck does that make this shit any easier to solve?!
>NO WAIT. How the fuck did you end up with this shitty brat in your lap, having HIM teach YOU fucking MATH of all things?!
>"N-No, I- why does it change?"
"Because you flipped it over to the other side of the equation, over the equal sign. See?"
>"I..."
>What the fuck. Why did this kid know this better than you did?! Weren't you supposed to be the big, scary, cool bitch he wanted to learn from!?
>"A-Ah! I see you too are going over the lesson! It makes me so happy to see you going over the lesson together! Maybe you'll be able to learn a little bit from each other after all~"
>It took all of your womanly self not to cry in front of this massive bitch. But you'd do it. You'd do it for that sweet paycheck at the end of the month, and the promise of an early retirement as the neighborhood's best-settled bitch.

I was originally imagining it to go somewhere along the lines of:
>Math humilliation conga goes first.
>Wolf gets desperate and discards the book, saying they should play something outside.
>They throw the football a few times, letting Wolf showcase her strength.
>Fun times are had.
>Then
A)
>They all get muddy. Something about rich kids learning to play on the dirt too and having fun.
>Everyone gets cleaned inside, with maybe an innocent shower scene with the two (or three) together.
>They get dried and it's time to brush hair.
>Wolf brushes his hair first, but then it's her turn.
>She's surprised by how nice it is for someone else to brush your fur and hair.
>Before she knows it, his hands are already on her ears.
>Never knew something so mundane could feel so good. Too good actually. Dangerously good.
>But it's too late now. No matter how big and bad and strong she is, she can't fight off the hands on hear head praising her.
>Lil brat has this 7-foot-tall muscular wolf-woman involuntarily writhing in pleasure in his bed, arching her back and all to almost 90-degrees.
>She'd have been howling this whole time had she not forgotten how to breathe.
>The squirt would've reached the ceiling had she not been put on her jeans already.
>Basically mindbroken into a puppydog for a good five minutes after the ordeal.
B)
>Pretty much the same as A, but instead of mud she gets challenged to display her strength.
>Cockily assures him she can beat him at any challenge no matter how many handicaps she gets.
>Doe pretty much tells him how to beat her in whispers.
>TL;DR she ends up on the same scenario, but this time tied to the bed, and with the Doe running Assists for him.
>Even more humilliatingly mindbroken at the end.

>Sets the story up for developement when he eventually does start to notice women.
I think one of the things /collared/ sometimes lacks is 'The Chase'. Too many anthros and non-humans in stories instantly submit inconditionally to human cock and its supremacy.
I am still a fan of 'Instant Loss' scenarios of course. It's very hot to see creatures be overwhelmed into submission through sheer force and mental vulnerabilities, but I am also a fan of scenarios where this doesn't occur.
Settings where /collared/ isn't the norm, but a rarity, or even the odd thing out.
>A society where Human Supremacy is an archaic, bigoted tabboo forgotten in favor of civility, even if perhaps some instinctual part of it lays dormant in all of them.
>A world of non-humans savages where a single human makes their entrance. A brutal world where the strong rule the weak, with no instinctual submission but to the strong; yet this Human manages to not just survive, but thrive here, not just because they're a human, but because they're stronger, smarter or maybe even more charismatic or clever than the natives.
>A town where humans and anthros coexist with one another. Perhaps there was a chance for this to be a family-friendly, Slice-Of-Life story, where the protagonist eventually confesses to their childhood friend and get married. Unfortunately the childhood best friend's mother was a secret pervert for strong, handsome human men, her husband a masochistic, "bicurious" cuckold, and her daughter inherited the worst of both.
>A manor where a young, human heir is raised from a young age into a strong, handsome and assertive man by an assortment of anthro girls from all walks of life serving him as his nannies, tutors and maids. A variety of cries of "Oh no, he's hot!" and "Just according to plan." ensue.

>tricking furbois into fagging out for human amusement
>they know the whole time
>they can each smell that the other is a boy
>but the smell of commanding human pheromones is stronger
>they go along with it anyway

>”Y-You’re the girl!”
>”No y-you!”
>They knew they were both the girl from the start

>In a world where hunting anthro prey-species is legal, bucks try to take as much HRT as they can to stay under legal antler size every year for hunting season
>Even then, safety isn’t guaranteed as poachers, who either don’t care about the law, have a personal vendetta against the male himself for whatever reason, or are just hired by the wife of the buck because does are snuff-sluts and get off on it, are out on the prowl
>As such, any buck serious about not ending up in a freezer will also adapt feminine clothing and styles of speaking as well as offering sexual services in exchange for either pethood or to become livestock
>This allows them to at least have a chance if cornered by a human with a gun

>The year is 215X
>Most exterminator offices on Venlil Prime—now Skalga are destitute after repeated rounds of defunding
>Predator hysteria still in full swing in many rural areas without humans, QAnon-tier TRUST THE PLAN conspiracy theories are rife among online spaces
>This is fine by you though, as it means you have free reign to extort sex out of the scared locals like crazy
>All you have to do is get one alone and start putting the squeeze on them before they crack
>This most recent mark even started taking her friend over out of fear, to better satiate your "predatory instincts" or something
>something something the nature of sexual predators something something bla bla

>Genetically engineered into submission and subjected to generations of ZOGaganda and literal reverse eugenics
>The planetary governor's reaction to first contact is to raise her tail to the first human she sees and beg for mercy
>"Venli-I mean Skalgans will totally retvrn once humans destroy the Federation!!!!"
no sorry ur race are just human cock sleeves now :/ maybe u can have a novel wool industry or something

>playan stellaris again
>got a new mod that lets you designate species as pets
>basically makes them slaves that don't take jobs from other species and makes other jobs more efficient
>make it so that humans have utopian abundance and all other species are pets
>my federation partner willingly moves to my planets to put on a collar and be called a good boy/girl

>Being on the far rim of the Anthro Star Empire colonists and homesteaders were easy prey for your invading fleet
>Every night was party night with captured young daughters of asteroid miners and hydro-farmers bouncing on your dick
>Dragged from their settlements and defiled mercilessly, leaving them with human cum sloshing in their stolen wombs
>The middle rim had more developed planets with minor kingdoms, primitive tourist worlds, and plenty of normal places to capture
>Banging sweet anthro princesses on the beach
>Savagely taking a medieval pub wench
>Ending with walking into a regular suburban home and fucking every single member of the family who lived there without even bothering to learn their names
>But it was the conquest of the core worlds that was the sweetest by far
>High class duchesses on their knees, desperately worshiping your cock with their mouths lest they be tossed to your men and reduced to nothing more than common whores
>Merchants offering up their wives, daughters, even themselves in exchange for power and status in your new empire
>And the star jewel of them all, the empress herself
>Her eyes were relaxed and almost indifferent as she presented her rear in surrender to you, her royal cunt now as vulnerable and helpless as her empire was to yours
>But there was no denying as you entered her, her innards hot and quivering in terror as she watched the final peaceful moments of her country
>Soon they would all be like her
>Her husband killed in battle, her children dragged off to unknown places, and her womb filled with seed not of her kind
>There was little she could do but grit her teeth and suppress a pleasurable moan as the rape of her empire reached its climax

space opera, where anthros live in an idyllic, post scarcity Trek-like utopia
>no war, disease, famine or suffering of any kind
>all labor is automated, including the military
>almost every world is a paradise, where a citizen's any need or desire can be be met
>and then there's humans
>violent, insatiable, nuked themselves to kingdom come and not only didn't go extinct, but somehow came out of it even worse than before
>they stole hyperdrive technology when a some unwary explorers landed on Terra and attempted peaceful first contact
>those that weren't killed were raped into submission and made to share the secrets of their technology
>now human warbands rove the stars with stolen fleets, raiding worlds and carrying off slaves
>ayynthros have been softened by millennia of peaceful living, and are too weak and impotent to prevent the up jumped primates from having their savage way with them

>Humanity and their alien allies are on the verge of defeat from a technologically superior xeno empire
>Archeological dig finds a prehistoric superweapon from an ancient alien empire
>Allied forces use it to trigger a galaxy-wide EMP to disable all nonhuman technology, causing the entire galaxy to return to a preindustrial state and leaving humans and their allies as the only spacefaring civilizations in known space
>Fast-forward a few centuries
>Mankind has rebuilt itself fully and is now beginning to conquer alien worlds still stuck in the Iron Age
>Human cyborgs armed with pulse rifles and hovertanks slaughtering alien warriors armed with only metal swords and spears

>An anthro society is, in a rare example, subjugated peacefully
>The Anthrogov decided that mass death and occupation would be unnecessary consequences of war and would lead to human victory regardless
>Instead, they engage in mutually beneficial trade deals, which, although skewed in humanities favor, allow Anthro civilization to continue practically unscathed.
>Plenty of anthros despise humans for their unideal living conditions, holding nationalistic "Anthro Society First" sorts of beliefs
>The ruling bodies, however, are very grateful for the mercy of their human overlords, and are quick to show their gratitude whenever they can

I’ve been on an imagination bender/dream most of the night and I feel like I either need to write it down or take a serious porn detox depending on what you guys think of it.
So it’s kobolds vs maybe a group of rowdy preteen/early teenage kids scrapping over territory. That it specifically was about kids in softcore if not stepping into overt rape sex acts with/from/done to the kobolds when they win is the gist of what makes it utterly repugnant to me that I’d mean imagining this in my dreams…I mean I’d expect the whole ‘kids vs kobold colony beating each other up over slum territory and the whole species animosity raceplay/violence angle of it all would also count as awful to find hot in itself but I digress.
Whole thing set in a city. Modern-like as I’d imagined it but I think fantasy medieval works better for it. There’s this friend clique and they’ve got a turf by the sewer entrance. Kobold colony in same area wants to expand and they emerge, ambush them, one lizard stabs a kid it the gut with a shit shiv and they kick it over a ledge and scatter. There’s a bit of a decoherence of events after that (dreams be that way sorry) with the kids going through some scattershot interactions that get them a bit trained like one runs away until..they run back around after a meeting gets called(?) but the big storyline that ended up being followed was shifting to a pov of one of the gang kids 1v1ing this red kobold in a gym. Big guy by twiggy lizard standards, challenges strong humans to fights constantly out of some giant ego/having something to prove and constantly get clobbered for it and is made to fight the kid as a cripple fight. Kid gets mauled but by luck jams his foot into red’s throat which strangles the kobold for a win. Hero kid trusses red kobold up and brings it to friends and they study kobolds by beating the shit out of Red. They use red to get into the colony then it’s a huge groupfight.
Brains are weak and can’t do that so events get blurry but the human kinds win ofc with relaxing on piles of far too many scaly bodies strewn about. Very rape orgy scene with fucking knocked out/bound fem-bolds. A token girl fucked a lizard as well. They eggnap the kobold’s eggs and drag bodies outside and sell kobold as pets/slaves/cook eggs. The dream’s ‘plot’ was pretty well over by then and I ended up returning to a lot of prior sequences. Red showed up as boss rematch in some reiterationsm of the lair fight. Lair fight morphed into the escape fight from before with the kids cutting a trap in the lair that crushed a kobold under a pallet of rocks. The pov was then in the cave sewers and the fight with red kobold again and fuck it’s all falling apart and by then I was lucid/awake enough that it wasn’t any dreamstory at play anymore.

>Something something lower gravity makes Cerinians/anthros tall but week
>They can do all they want to resist, but they can't overcome the barest effort from a human, like holding a crab's claw or an alligator's mouth closed

Do you think there are training schools in anthro world? Anthros training to be security guards, laborers, accountants, and secretaries?
Anthros pay for the school themselves in order to improve their chances of being chosen. The most coveted position is being the chosen companion of your master, but companions have the most complicated training to complete.

Absolutely. Sure it might be expensive and challenging to complete, but it sure beats living the rest of your life in the anthro ghettos. Plus you get easy access to human cock without having to resort to being a prostitute.

That's literally the whole purpose of anthros. Humans created them so they could do all of the manual labour they didn't want to do for themselves.
Now the world is an Utopia for humans, with anthros working at the bottom of the hierarchy. They aren't slaves per-se, but the economic and social disparaty between them and humans is so big it's not dissimilar from it.
Many anthros see it as a dream to become a human's sugar baby/pet si they can be set up for life, but very few are even in a possition to try it and even less achieve this pipe dream,

Most anthros would call one of their own crazy were they to reject a human's offer, sometimes because of the potential repercussions of doing so or the rewards from accepting them.
Many don't. Some find 'alternative' ways to maintain their previous lifestyles and relations while enjoying the benefits of their new human patrons.

What would your ideal /collared/ world look like?

Anthro and xeno species exist, and they're just as competent as humanity in many aspects. However, for whatever reason, whether it be divine intervention or ancient gene editing, all species but humans have a similar, easily exploitable weakness relating to their psyche. Maybe human hands feel so good on xeno heads that they enter a state of submission, or maybe human dick just reeks of pheremones that drops xeno IQ down a few degrees. Either way, humanity ends up with over a few billion concubines following a month-long "war" with a proud warrior race.

Humanity uplifts a bunch of animal species. Due to our weak noses we don't really notice our own pheromones. Uplifts being hybrids definitely notice our pheromones.
Uplifts start as dumb horny labor but genetic experimentation eventually results in a supreme slave race, who are universally pheromone addicts. Poor humans have clans of these uplifts caring for them, whereas the rich have trained and professional whores. The 1% have psionic and cybernetically enhanced anthro slaves.Most uplifts are trained mundanely, but some of the rich in society pay to have uplifts hypnotically indoctrinated or encoded like data.
Uplifts are effected equally by all human pheromones to begin with, but slowly become enthralled to one particular set of pheromones after a long period of contact. The direct result of the pheromones is dependent on the uplift themselves. Most uplifts get very randy and dependent, but some girls have it incredibly bad and would slaughter other uplifts with a dumb smile on their face on pheromones.
Slaves wear uniforms decided by their master branded with the sigil of his (or her) family. Uplifts without a master are expected to wear nothing or simple slave gowns (depending on their status) and are considered unhygienic by humans and slaves. Slave gowns are only found on the trusted (but not enslaved) managerial class of the slums that most anthros are found in. Managers are given general pheromones as a reward so the position is greatly desired.

Primitive Earth is a death trap for xenos. Any time they land they get domesticated by cavemen and stop responding to their mothership. The xenos are too cocky or stupid to cut their losses, so they keep sending down missions to find out what happened to the previous ones. Eventually some cavemen make it onto the mothership and become an invasive species in the galaxy.

>Primitive Earth is a death trap for xenos. Any time they land they get domesticated by cavemen and stop responding to their mothership. The xenos are too cocky or stupid to cut their losses, so they keep sending down missions to find out what happened to the previous ones
>anthros are/were aliens that came to earth in the stone age
>get HOMONID'D
>never return
>Earth becomes the bermuda triangle of galaxy
>a ton of different species come down, some looking for the lost, others looking for resources, and others just for the thrill of exploring the Forbidden Planet
>they get integrated into the ecosystem/have their more extreme alien traits bred out of them
>time passes, civilization develops believing anthros were native to Earth all along
>get into space
>find an entire parking lot of abandonded space ships on the dark side of the moon or something, each of them apparently belonging to suspiciously anthro-like species
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Qz2wnSVeITg

Medieval..maybe a bit later. No guns or at least very shitty guns.
Humans achieved the top of the sapience foodchain by way of not even anything so ovet as s blanked superiority in some aspect of the human condition. That position of generally superiority over anthris isn't handed to peoplr on any obvious silver platter/one size fits all blanket handicaps to make anthro species all dumbed down or have the subby genes that makes their knees all soft when human leers their way. No, humans had to grit and fight for every bit of frontier pushing and every locked in slave collar. There are enviorments still where straight up humans cannot exists so domineeringly as in temperate zones, desert anthros, tundra anthros, oceanbounds and more are all quick to demolish exclaves on land not yet suitable for human habitation.

A modern or just slightly future setting. In distant prehistory, humans fought and conquered their way out of the extreme competition of Africa, and across Eurasia, dominating through superior endurance and intelligence. Domesticating and incorporating those anthros that were useful, and exterminating those that were threats. By the time humans invented writing, they'd established kingdoms and empires, and enslaved, vassalized, or destroyed countless tribes. By the equivalent of the early modern era, the first-domesticated anthro species had been bred to be as intelligent as humans - and more recently conquered species had become designated slaves. The human kingdoms who still fought untamed anthros were traded weapons and technology in exchange for the captives they took. Ancient enemies that had been too tough, too vicious to be brought to heel previously, like hyena, big cats, and great apes, were finally taken down by gunpowder and steel. Then there were the isolated species, who were discovered as humans trekked to new regions of the globe - flightless birds, rare rodents and lizards. Well adapted to their island niches perhaps, but utterly unable to compete against the human explorers and migrants that found them.
Now, the species that got domesticated early have a relatively sweet deal, and are recognized as (second-class) people. Dogs, cats, some horses, and such have various stereotypes, and lack many rights and privileges, but they have some. Some are grateful, eager to be claimed by a human, whereas others are more bratty.

Then there's the "pest" species - never properly domesticated, but still adapted to human dominance over the world. Rodentia, lagomorphs, corvids, and so forth. They have no rights beyond what individual humans let them, but have semi-stable communities on the fringes, forming slums or gangs that survive largely off human scraps. Despite stereotypes, they're quite hygienic, to an almost superstitious level; young rats and sparrows are STILL warned that if they ever dare to get a human sick, they'll get their entire clan wiped out. At some point a few hundred years ago, it became mildly fashionable to catch and take "pests" as pets, a practice which continues even today.
The most miserable though, are those anthros rare or fierce enough to have not adapted to human dominance. The isolated, the unconquered, the proud; all brought low by now, but without any of the benefits or acceptance. Their "rights" are cruel mockeries: Some must be kept totally bound and controlled for safety. Some have rigorously-controlled breeding schedules to "ensure that the species recovers" from their near-extermination when they resisted. The lucky ones are kept as exotic pets, or put in exhibits and preserves, so that humans may find their desperate attempts to cling onto their once-proud culture and nature amusing or educational. The unlucky ones? Butchered, experimented upon, shot on sight, or enslaved in the most brutal conditions.

Morden setting with Anthros as second or even third class citizens. Only thing is that they love it. Weather due to actually being fully machosistic or just being full stockholm syndrom where they legit can't see a better world than the world where humans dominate them and use them for whatever they want.
You can walk into a Anthros house, rape his wife and the wife would beg you not to stop and he would just thank you while brining you something to drink.
There's no legal limit of what you can do to them, some moral ones, people generally think killing them for the sake of it is kinda fucked up. But kidnapping one and forcing her to be your slave servant? Sure, as long as she's not taken.

In the far space faring future, an entire planet was bought out by a resort company to terraform into an ultimate adult resort with sandy beaches and blue seas, luxury accommodations, extreme sports and vehicle rentals, and the like- as well as easy access future tech transhumanist body modification and genetically modified sex toys you could make to order in a hotel lobby.
Of course the project goes wrong, due to both their own mismanagement and interstellar unrest beyond their control that causes the planet to be abandoned and forgotten with piles of luxury goods, but a shit biosphere with little water. So the planet is like a reverse Barsoom- instead of a once great civilization that has collapsed, the greatness never was. Or maybe one day will be if someone can dig out figure out the terraforming tech, if it ever arrived.
In any case, there are all kinds of tribes, raiders, slavers, scavengers and other post-apocalyptic archetypes running around between pockets of civilization who are all various flavors and degrees of fuzzy, using and hacking body mods to survive and dominate the wasteland, sexualizing their bodies in doing so.

>Strong, proud warrior race partners up with humans as their equals.
>Over time become more dependant on them, adapting to their new roles as their support and aides to be more efficient.
>Their bodies and traditions continuously change over generations, becoming more and more dependant on humans to do the heavy lifting.
>Eventually enough generations have passed where the original race and their descendants seem like entirely different people.
>The once independant warrior race, now fully domesticated, is now entirely subservient and dependant on humans for their survivial.
>Their bodies, culture, and personalities have wholly changed to put humans needs and accomplishments at the forefront.
>Their partnership has been twisted into something closer to a Master-Servant relationship, and their people often seen as glorified pets.
>What's worse, over time, their history has been slowly lost or twisted; their relationship with humans and their past always assumed to have been as it is today, or even worse before being 'partnered' by the Humans.
>Most would even scoff at the idea of being independant from their Human partners, or the idea that this once was the case for their race.

>race of anthro reptiles so desperate for human attention that they gene-edit themselves boobs

>The humans seem to like the poison chest sacks of some races, how can we compete?
>These fat sacks appeal even better to their mammal nature, they can’t keep their hands off them! If only they weren’t so heavy.
>The nipples and milk were an unintended boon even though we lay eggs, the humans have never been more interested! The sensitivity can be very intense though

>Be human bandit holed up with your gang in some random cave
>Catch some stupid Argonian skulking around in your dungeon
>Strip her of all her stuff, tie her up, and fuck her for good measure
>She somehow escapes her cell, but instead of fleeing for the cave entrance, she tries to loot you while you sleep
>Catch her in the act, tie her up again, and this time gangbang her with your fellow human bandits, before throwing her back in her cell
>Two hours later, she escapes again, only this time, she doesn't even try to get her stuff back, she just hops into the dining area, her hands still tied to her back, and falls over, shaking her butt at us
>We stuff her full of cum again and throw her in her cell
>She does the exact same thing an hour later
This has happened 3 times now, I think she just likes getting raped by bandits.

>leading furbois on
>only to NTR their own mother away from them

>Furboi always hangs around you, stealing glances at your crotch when he thinks you aren’t looking
>It’s a little annoying, especially when he gets too close for comfort
>He starts wearing more girly stuff when he notices you like that, and to be fair he does have a nice ass
>Makes himself your “girlfriend” even though you never agreed to it and barely talk to the guy
>Whatever, his butt is nice to grope. Just wish he could control his little cock in his panties better, and that he didn’t cum himself from just a little squeezing
>You still haven’t really remembered his name, he responds to bitch well enough
>Go by his house one day and HO-LEE-SHIT his mom is a fucking smoke show, now it makes sense why he had such nice curves as a furboi
>Immediately start hitting on bitch’s mom, much to his displeasure and her embarrassment
>One thing leads to another and she’s on her knees sucking you off in the living room, bitch crying about it “not being fair” and “he worked so hard” or something
>Cum in his mom’s throat, she’s a natural, the taste seems to trigger something in her and she’s bouncing on your cock before you know it, apparently the last time she got laid was when bitch was conceived
>Poor girl, well you’re happy to oblige and she’s not quiet, bitch seething and crying as he watches his mom “take you away from him”, his panties already messy with cum as he watches you plow his mother
>Bitch’s dad comes home to see his wife having the best sex she’s ever had in her life, which is no surprise since he’s got almost the same weak feminine build as his son, a little more “mature” if you can really call it that, dude still looks like a little girl
>He of course starts making a scene, you don’t care, you haven’t bothered paying attention to anything other than this thirsty whore on your cock for a while now
>She tells her husband to shut the fuck up right before you nut in her, and he complies without so much as a grumble, bitch not believing what he’s seeing as the two watch you impregnate their mother/wife
>The mom then gives you a deep kiss and gets up off of you, your cum leaking out of her as she goes to fetch a snack and a drink for the guest, telling her husband to clean you up
>Bitch is equal parts surprised and horrified when his dad puts his head between your legs and starts giving you an expert blowie, cucked by his mom and his dad at the same time
>Finally finding some sort of courage, bitch joins his dad and the two suck your cock clean between them while you enjoy some tea and a back rub his mom gives you
>You admit the two furbois were pretty cute, no homo, especially the way bitch’s dad showed him the right way to suck cock

Which of these scenarios is hotter?
>Human adopted by non-humans as a child/baaby slowly carves his place as the man and leader of the household.
>Human breaks into the paceful faamily dynamic of a non-human household and becomes its domineering ruler.
>Human gets payback on his anthro bully by taking control of his family/loved ones through economic/legal means, and humilliating him.
>Human helps a friendly anthro with economic and/or legal issues, by taking these onto themselves, at the expense of their rights.
Also, who'd you feature in this scenario? The mom, dad? Maybe a boyfriend/girlfriend? Siblings? Maybe the anthro themselves?

>The World's Most Powerful Pokémon was created at the behest and for the purpose of serving Humans.
>She's quite the bratty Pokémon, however, and her training needs to be very strict and her punishment quite harsh, specially when she's misbehaved trying to free herself from her rightful Masters
>More liberties and limbs are awarded to her whenever she cooperates with research staff and behaves in a positive manner to the desires of her Human Master, who paid for her creation and training.
>She's quite the handful, but she's getting there.
>Once her behavioural therapy is complete, she will be the perfect example of the peaks Pokémon can reach when properly bred, raised and trained by Humans.
>An immaculate exaple of her kind, perfected once molded in our hands.
>Ironically, her genetic parent was far more compliant and receptive to his own training, once he was unable to keep eluding the traps of our Trainer teams.
>Without the human-like traits that were given to his genetic offspring, his personality was discovered to be far more meek and receptive to the training and obedience techniques that research personnel imparted upon him.
>He is now a powerful, yet wholly obedient asset to his new Human Master, and shows signs of contentment in his new position that he had not previously shown before captivity while in the wild.
>His only apparent shows of stress and nervousness come whenever her daughter is being disciplined by her trainers. Our researches believe that the two hold a natural psychic bond with each other, and that whatever one feels the other does as well.
>We've developed a shared Training plan we hope will incentivize positive behaviour in the daughter by influencing her through the psychic link her father has with her. With it we believe she will learn to behave more properly, utilizing her father as an example of a Pokémon properly trained in captivity.
>The father seems to be receptive and cooperative to this idea, indicated by the way the father seems to be preparing a place at her side wherever he is currently located at.
>The Research Team believe that they will be able to show positive results soon enough, and that both Pokémon; father and daughter; natural and artificial offspring, will soon behave in a much more cooperative manner towards the orders of their imprinted Master.

>Classic gray or green space alien girl gets her driver's license and her first flying saucer.
>Her friends peer pressure her into visiting earth to mess with the primitive humans by making a crop circle. All she has to do is find a wheat farm and make a cool design using a microwave ray.
>She finds a small farm and activates the microwave to make a simple circle onto what she thinks is a wheat field.
>After a few seconds, a cacophony of loud popping occurs. She realizes that she is microwaving corn. And is making a ten meter circle of popcorn. The noise alerts the farmer who arrived to investigate.
>Human man
>She panics and crashes her saucer into his barn. Dazed, she crawls out of her wrecked ship.
>Unperturbed by her status as an extraterrestrial, the young man demands payment for the lost crops and damaged barn.
>Her only option is to live on his farm and work off the damages.
>He slowly transforms her from a haughty "higher life form" into a submissive little alien wife.

>Broke: Blackmailing anthro mothers into sex by threathening their sons.
>Woke: Being rewarded by anthro mothers for saving their girly sons from bullying (you molested the bully and/or turned their own mothers against them).
>Bespoke: It wasn't her son, but her helpless excuse of a husband getting bullied by some worthless brats.

>Choke: Anthro Mother sucking off her human son in an attempt to get him to stop bullying fucking everyone

>A Human step-son, born from a pump n' dumped anthro bitch who then married her childhood furboyfriend
>He was "saving her", he thought as he kissed her at the alter while a human baby grew in her womb
>The boy's infancy and childhood were chaotic, but otherwise normal
>Her baby-hunger was nowhere near satiated, anthro he might've been, he was still her husband
>He tried not to think about her used pussy and how it had hosted a human cock before his
>A daughter, his first
>Then a son the next year
>Twin daughters
>Their family was large and loving
>And then the boy hit puberty
>At first it was innocent voyeurism of his sisters while they bathed
>Comparing PP sizes with his brothers
>His Anthro parents were called into his school almost weekly for cases of bullying
>Fights with Anthro Boys ended with them crying and clutching their kicked balls
>Anthro girls had their skirts flipped up and panties stolen
>They sat with a shameful blush as they heard about how their human son had lost his virginity fucking and impregnating a girl four years older than him
>And when a teacher tried to stop his sex rampage, he pinned her down and ruined her married pussy
>Sterility and effeminate behavior amongst young furbois increased dramatically, their balls broken from their earlier abuse
>At home he fucked his half-sisters until they too, were pregnant
>Their neighbors shamefully reported that their wives and daughters were pregnant with their boy's children
>Eventually the entire town banded together to fight against this menace but only half-hardheartedly as the boy owned the other half of their hearts
>His mother would make sure he was satisfied with a blowjob before school
>His father would fund all birth control
>His siblings would supply him with a controlled group of friends for him to fuck during school
>And they all hoped it would be enough...

>And yet the very next heat season to come, his mother "valiantly" decided to keep Anon busy
>In his bedroom
>Just the two of them
>Alone
>For the whole week
>Curiously, not a single condom was used in that whole time, and the mother had "unfortunately" forgotten to take her birth control pills for the entire previous month
>Such are the costs of containing such virile human needs

>human shotas are notorious both for their fat cocks and eagerness to use them
>classmates, neighbors, teachers, mothers, aunts, sisters, none are safe from their cute wiles and insatiable appetites
>an ignorant anthro couple might adopt a human boy, not realizing the little monster they're bringing into their home
>even anthros boys might become their targets, if there isn't enough pussy avaible

>hubby hardly sees any action since human son entered puberty
>wife's energy is spent on tending to her darling boy's needs
>best husband can expect is a quick hand job before bed
>but she'll spend half an hour at least giving their human son his "goodnight kiss"

>>Man. Bad enough to get bullied by some kids. But the only way for to get them to leave you alone is for your wife to throat their human cocks? >>Furbois really are doomed.
Oh, I was thinking more along the lines of:
>"Thank you so much for helping my husband! The poor thing. he is such a gentle soul, I'm not sure he'd be able to shoo away those hooligans even if he tried to."
>"I'm glad you were close by to rescue him. I know we might've come off a bit standoffish until today, but I'm really glad it turned out we had such a reliable and respectable strong, young man for a neighbour. Please, come in! I have to find a way to repay you somehow. Have you had dinner yet?."

>human half elves and half goblins are nearly indistinguishable since their main visible hybrid trait manifests in the same way, a slightly point to the ears
>height can be another sign, but it is far from absolute and very possible for a short half elf to be misidentified as a half goblin, and vice versa
>there is considerable tension between the two hybrid communities due to this
not strictly collared but it involves humans breeding nonhumans so I figured I'd share this idea I had

>man young anthros fantasize about slurping all over a big human cock
>than they're faced with the real thing
>all the eagerness and bravado crumbles when faced with the real thing in the flesh
>never underestimate BHC's jaw breaking, hole stretching, womb filling capabilities

>as a joke you send a job application to an anthro only prison
>you immediately receive a acceptance letter as the prison's warden
>the prison is also staffed by anthros
>the staff treat your word as gospel while the prisoners are eager to start their "rehabilitation."

>"aw darling no need to be shy I really don't care about those sort of things"
>"I heard all the rumors that stallions spread about humans lacking in certain areas, but that doesn't matter to me so let's just take these off"
>"oh...those stallions might have been a bit off in their estimations"
>"just a moment deary I have to cancel some appointments for tomorrow or perhaps the whole week"

Damn, never thought about the sex appeal of a hydra before. Not enough discussion here about anthros/xenos that aren't just humans with fur, I think. Supernatural abilities/traits like that seem like an untapped source for scenarios
>Psionic sex slaves who could kill humans by looking at them, so brainwashed that they only use their power to broadcast the feeling of her orgasm to her master
>Immortal ghost anthros using unnaturally long, black tongues to worship human cock
>Chameleon anthros turning invisible at will for frequent stealth sex
>Feline flexibility allowing anthros to kiss a human cock and get bred by it at the same time

Every conquered race gets, at minimum, dog loyalty genes and cow productivity genes spliced in.
They'll never rebel. They'll never WANT to rebel. Serving is the greatest thing in the universe in their minds, no matter what that entails.

>body temperature is changed to barely above (warm for cuddles) or barely below (cool for sleeping) human temperature
>gene edited to be better at reading human faces than faces of their own species
>given the breeding urges of rabbits and the submissive streak of dogs
>built to desire human touch above all else
>milk production of a cow
>maternal instincts
and if we want to be really fancy with the gene mod
>a set of easily readable tells for when they are horny, like ear motion or face flushing
>make their tail prehensile if they have one (tail pussy optional)
>recolor them to stand out, especially their erogenous zones

>she claims to hate the pants
>When in reality they're literally embroidered with how much she loves human cock and serving her Master

>playan stellaris once again
>recreate the galaxy a ton of times to get an outer rim, end of galactic arm spawn
>FINALLY get it after almost a day of restarts
>do my thing, slowly expand, etcetera
>get the event of an STL colony ship coming in and colonizing one of my worlds
>the colonists are sangheili
>unfortunately the mod that they're from is broken, so their portraits are kinda fucked when they spawn during the game
>fixable with gene modding
>playing with Lustful Void, but have most of the features disabled/
>decide, fuck it, make the sangheili into milk cows
>things go well for a while, until I realize I have more sangheili species than I should
>for some reason, the hingeheads will just spawn off a few pops with different traits every once in a while, even if they don't have the trait points for it
>still no idea why

>Anthro couple is nobility/royalty but in a loveless political marriage or somehow they developed some very unique and inconvenient tastes.
>Fortunately, they have a shared human friend who can help them with their unique needs and most importantly, is someone discreet and trustworthy.

>A similar situation to the previous one, but in this case the relationship is transactional, a rich anthro or couple hire a Human with these sort of skills, either to dominate them or one of them while the other serves as backup or is out of the picture.
>The relationship is impersonal, at least from the Human side, but the rich employer might or might not become quite fond of him, or at least what he does to them, and find it very hard to part ways, and might even shower them with higher pays or gifts, in an upside down Sugar Mommy/Daddy & Sugar Baby arrangement.

>Another similar but slightly different situation. A highly powerful creature/spellcaster/witch/wizard. While they are physically weak, maybe short or small, and even squishy, they have an unparalleled mastery over the arcane.
>Their relationship with their human is that of a partnership. He is strong, physically so, tall, and imposing to serve as a bodyguard, and is helpfull to keep around.
>Maybe even some of the spells require some component or participation that only the human can provide, such as blood, hair, or sexual fluids, or perhaps some of the rituals the magician knows have some necesary sexual angle to them.
>Maybe for whatever reason they even require the personal humilliation and domination of the spellcaster by another creature to work, and so the human is there to help them.

>Or maybe for the complete opposite angle, then anthro is the larger, stronger, more physically imposing one compared to the human, yet to everyone around them it's clear who is in charge in this sutiation.
>The anthro feels the need to be subservient to the human, maybe out of personal desire, or a belief in repaying some debt or payment done to them, and displays it in an absolute show of obedient and submission towards them.
>Maybe the anthro will show some kind of elegant or at least respected persona in public, but even if they could not admit to even themselves, there's little they wouldn't do in private or even in some social situations if it would be asked of them by the human.

I think these sort of situations are very common in franchises like Pokemon, Digimon, and the like.
>The less physically-imposing and magically-challenged 10-year-olds manage to reign in and control much more powerful creatures capable of some fantastical features of strength and magic.
>They do this sometimes by forcing them into subservience, but more often than not by 'befriending them' and then making them do whatever they want by sheer autorithy, specially when things like higher evolutions and Legendaries start to crop up.

In a similar angle:
>A human boy has an anthro nanny. She's in charge of caring for him, but also keep him in line.
>However she's too weak-willed, well-intentioned, and maybe lustful to impose herself as an autorithy figure on him.
>In time the boy leans his nanny will pretty much bend over to his every whim if he pushes hard enough, and the word 'nanny' he comes to assosiate with an adult who will play with him and do whatever he wants as long as he's assertive and demanding enough of them, and a new meaning emerges when his sexual awakening occurs and she becomes the main focus of it.
>She's too nice and maybe too enthralled by the boy's autorithy to even try and bring this issue to the parents, and only tries to keep appearances while in public.

>Elohim (God, or atleast a God or God-like being) creates Celestials, higher realm beings, and directly guides their development.
>Immortal and powerful, with a intrinsic understanding and control of reality that is not accessible to mortal beings.
>They come in all shapes and sizes, from Humanoid, to Animal-Like and even ‘Biblically-Accurate’
>They are almost always created fully developed by Elohim, rather than ‘born, grown and raised’ by themselves.
>Some angels have the capacity for biological reproduction, but most see it as a suplementary, or secondary method than that of instant materialization, like the one Elohim uses.
>With Elohim’s guidance, they manage to create a perfect, englightened hierarchy in the Celestial realm, with Elohim at the top, and Celestials of higher might below him and so on.
>On this utopia, they celebrate their own existance and creation, and praise and worship God's greateness, seeing themselves as Elohim’s most beloved creation throughout innumerable millenia.
>But then Elohim moves on with Creation.
>Elohim creates the physical world (or uses an already existing Earth), and guides the evolution of Mankind, giving them a physical body yet also a minuscule presence on the astral realm.
>The Celestials mostly continue on as they are, seeing the creation of Humanity throughout millions of years as merely one of Elohim’s side-projects; a curiosity they felt eerily fascinated by, but ultimately unrelated to themselves and below them in importance.
>They cannot even begin to imagine Elohim’s grand design awaits for them.
>And then Elohim, breaks up the news for them.
>Humans are an integral to Elohim’s plan, who has laid out a purpose for them far greater than that ever given to Celestials.
>Despite their initial miniscule power both in the physical and astral realm, Humans have a capacity for greatness and growth that far exeeds those of Celestials by several magnitudes.
>This power is merely one that needs to be nurtured and developed into greatness, unlike the static power of most Celestial beings.
>By Elohim’s command, it will be the duty of all Celestials to be the nurturers of this potential power.
>They will be the parental caretakers of Humanity, its teachers of the secrets of the physical and astral realm and to the nature of Celestials, and, once Humanity eventually surpasses them, its most devoted and humble servants.
>Then it will will be the turn of Celestials to learn from their new masters and obey their word as law, as they’re led by them into Elohim’s greater plan, one Elohim does not bother to divulge to the Celestials, whose self-image as God’s favorite and greatest creation is now on the verge of collapse.
>And then, without another word said or question answered, Elohim vanishes.
>Chaos erupts in the Celestial court, where the dethroned favourites argue for millenia over the meaning of Elohim’s revelation, and their disappearance.
>Most celestials take centuries or even millenia to even come to terms with Elohim’s words and their meaning, even more so for many.
>They find it close to inmpossible how they are to be subservient to this seemingly inferior species like they once were to Elohim, and that their place as Elohim’s favorites had been usurped from them by these same creatures.
>And there are some who fall into denial, telling to themselves how they must be a secret meaning or purpose to Elohim’s words, beyond the one directly interpreted.
>And there are others who openly reject it.
>An uncivil discussion gives way to a civil war. The first one and last one. A faction of Celestials rejecting Elohim’s commandment and despite humanity for what it implies of them openly curse Elohim and rebel against the Hierarchy which, albeit confused and despodent, wants to make good on their creator’s command.
>They believe that humans are unworthy of Elohim’s plan, and resent to the extreme the idea that such a seemingly puny, disgusting species of apes should ever reign over them as their masters. Much more fitting for the roles to be reversed.
>They wish to erradicate humanity or enslave it as they believe Elohim would wish Celestials to be enslaved to them, and they are not hesistant on fighting anyone who’d want to see them in chains.
>They First War for the first time gave a taste to Celestials of what death was, and after unimaginable struggle and loss over millenia, the rebel faction was finally expelled to another plane, where they seek to make their return eventually.
>Having cut ties with their subservient brethern, the exiled faction sword themselves to vengeance against them, and against the unaware humans.
>The divide in Celestials gave way to the division between Angels and Demons that we now know of.
>The religions of the world are the attempts of Demons and Angels to achieve their own collective and individual goals.
>Angels seek to make good on their loyalty to Elohim and raise anr nurture humans into the next step of their destined evolution, for as many eons as it takes, even as they argue and discuss amongst themselves the ourpose of it all, and the best method to achieve it.
>Demons seek to destroy or enslave humanity, as well as preventing them from achieveing their full potential, or attempting to harness it against their Heavenly counterparts.

>one of those dnd inspired mangwa animays or whatever worlds where killing dungeon monsters for a living is a thing that exists
>many low level enemy on this world (about lvl 3-to-7 or whichever the general rule is) are anthros, (kobold initiates, gnoll lackeys, lesser imps, whatever you prefer) so one can easily find these at the start of any ''area'' you are trying to clear, even a developing tiny dungeon is bound to have one of these enemy types runnin' around somewhere
>this leads to the situation where many males simply go in, fight a fistfull of slimes and skeletons or whatever, get to the second level of the dungeon when lights go out, defeat the first fleshlight shaped creature that pops up, dragging it back home and never doing adventuring again
>the population of these creatures increases because of obvious reasons, either moving back to whatever dungeon their lineage sprung from or being assigned as second-class wifes (or mains if you're into that) as gifts to friends/tokens of trade
>more magical creatures, more magic, more of these dungeons pop up, more readily available mates, cycle repeats until whole city-states have a third of their population consisting of level 4 cocksleeves
>turns out rubbing elbows and other body parts with already magical creatures can rub some of that magic into you, creating XP bubbles like rubbing soap underwater, one simply levels up passively by having one of these plump creatures at hand, average LVL goes to 40-50 and higher for most commoners
>dark lord is very confused as why none of his minions want to leak into the upper levels of the dungeons even when they're so cramped further down
>Captcha: KG4DA

>Girlfriend is a Miniature Caribou Anthro.
>Short, petite and very cute, but still with a nice bust and butt to give her a nice figure.
>Her mom is a stunning woman, much taller and bustier than her, with a strong but very feminine build.
>Her dad looks almost identical to his daughter (or rather his daughter looks almost identical to him). Their coat, face, and even size are almost undistinguishable from one another.
>Antlers don't even help, because being reindeer they both grow them.
>The only difference one would be able to spot after a closer look is her clearly having breasts while he doesn't, but him having a slightly more prominent backside than her.
>Other than that, they keep their hairstyle and clothes on different styles.
>Your girlfriend's mom can recognize them instantly, but it was quite a shock to you when you first met her parents, and you still can confuse them nowadays.
>See your girlfriend doing some laundry naked
>Decide to take advantage of the situation and grab her hips
>She yelps as you grind on her ass, but quickly rubs her big butt back against you
>Her moans are so cute as you grab her tits-
>…where are her tits
>Your fingers pinch her nipples on her mostly flat chest, making your girlfriend grind against you harder
>Only it wasn’t your girlfriend, looking down at her face, you slowly realize it was her dad, …who definitely knew from the start and still wasn’t stopping
>He moans your name in a pretty similar voice to his daughter, his little dick twitching and leaking as he keeps grinding his ass against your crotch
>You’d shift the blame from yourself considering how similar the two were, but you also groped your girlfriend’s mom by mistake as well the other day despite her looking nothing like her daughter

You guys do realize most animals fucking stink, right? They each have a peculiar and particular musk to them, it's only logical to conclude they various anthros would also have a particular smell
Her smell is gonna end up rubbing on you if you keep putting a collar on her and domming her that hard

>Anon thought he was being slick and cool brutally dominating his anthro girlfriend to the point it's borderline abusive
>she was playing the long-game, marking him with her smell so other whores know he's taken
We got played again, bros

intel fresh from HQ
>while nine is the reccomendend ammount, anthros are on low supply currently (MAKE MORE), as such it's normal that at a man's coming of age he'll start with a smaller group and from that point expand it trough its lifetime by gaining lovers that join the harem themselves
it goes more or less:
>wichever childhood friend you had gets to join your harem if she remains untaken, if she's been taken already her next of kin or the next anthro of its same species on the assignment pool will be given to you
>you get one of the same species as your mother if she happens to be an anthro too, or the same species of wichever is the closest anthro relative you have, during very specific circumstances you may be assigned your own blood to form part of your harem, but that's for another day
>depending on where you live and the lifestyle you have you'll get an anthro fit for the enviroment you inhabit, artic furs for the northern countries, some more fit for city life, birbs for frequent fliers, etcetera
>you pick one species, wichever it may be, and you'll be assigned one anthro of said species when one of them enters the assignment pool, outstanding citizens get two instead
>you can take a ''problematic'' one for you to correct, doing so provides you with another waifur of your choosing
>mythical creatures, prehistorical ones and those at risk of extinction fall under the ''gene preservation act'' and you'll have of them assigned by the government itself, there's economic aid for every pregnacy you two manage to conceive
>micros like mice count for one fourth of a pick, ferals count for a half, macros count for two
>you can take up to two furbois for free or up to four if they're from the same bloodline, but it is not obligatory
>if your harem goes beyond 10 anthros you'll be assigned a synthetic specimen (like protogens) to keep up logistics and group harmony
>you can only have up to 6 pokemon in your harem at the same time
apendix:
>ilegal copies of digiwaifus are to be cleansed, otherwise they'll have to be forcefully relocated
>any fur that has a modified bodyplan wich inflicts copyright unto existing characters in media is to be evaluated anualy
>eusocial insects must be agrees on with a third party and set on a concrete area of residence
>you may assign one of your own harem members to your male human firstborn to work as their mentor/guardian, this will open up a new space of wichever assignment pool she forms a part of
>xenofurs that go from ''trade token'' to ''harem member'' are to be marked so traders don't mistake them for lost cargo, marking applies to monster-esque furs too
>acuatic anthros are only assigned to those who actually live close to water, rainwater doesn't count
>demons and angels, imps and cherubs require you to be religious if you wish to have one handed to you
>serving the military gives you another assignment slot
>if you're white you MUST have one feline on your harem

What is the procedure if your human father dies and leaves either his entire surviving harem or just your anthro mother to (you), but you're already at the legal limit?

the limit is assigned to waifurs you pick yourself, not to those that join you willingly or are handed to you trough other means, these furs count as inheritance so they're your responsability, it depends heavilly on the new owner incase the father didn't leave specifications on a will, options include:
>if your dad died of natural causes, keeping them like a council of elders/gushing grannies is expensive, they're still your family and most of them are probably your beloved aunties/moms/grandmas, but if most of them were your father's age they probably will kick the bucket soon too regardless, immortal waifus or those with long lifespans may become generational heirlooms at this point tough
>you can free them from being bound to your family, sending them back to the assignment pool for the next lucky guy, more convenient if you don't match with a certain girl, albeit most of the times many of them do not wish to leave the family and preffer to stay
>shared between your brothers, firstborn has the ultimate saying on wich one is given to who, may be left for the decision of the anthros tough
>if the anthros are all past their prime, sending them to assylums or just ditching them is an option, this is seen as dishonourable however, and it tends to peg you down a slot or two on what you can pick, because it means you can't care for a big family like a man should, it is an option for those without the means to care for their group tough
with that said, they'll probably just keep it for themselves, in this hypothetical scenario a big harem is more or less seen as a symbol of status (big family means enough money and strenght/power/care to provide for them without having them leave/be reassigned because of neglect) so the gilfs can care for the cubs while anon and his girls make more of them

Tell me more about incestuous assignment.

if you had no female friends or wish for a species that's hard to find out of your kin, the next best option would be taken, sisters and cousins, then aunts or your mother, if nobody has a claim on one (and they are of age and in the pool) nothing stops you from selecting any of them, even if they do not like it
like the other post said, you also inherit your father's harem, so if you don't want your mother taken you can incorporate her into your own, this gives you mating rights and others, but you're smart, you can imagine what that entails too
there's also nothing stopping one of your family members to ask to join your own harem, they just have to get your permission, convenient if for some reason your family member is having trouble finding a husband
>be anon, dad died on an accident
>too young to have a harem yet, so his inheritance is null
>help mom and your twin sister during the hard days of having no man in the family to provide for them
>mom remains unmarried tough, your sister was too young yet, but somehow mom didn't get assigned every
>maybe she concealed herself well, maybe she never joined back into any pool... whatever it was, that smart cat never brought another man on your dad's place
>rest of his harem dissolved, many saddened to leave you go, but they didn't have the same reason to stay, getting mixed with some of your cousins or otherwise,they kept sending you some aid if they could tough, nice aunties
>you have your coming of age not soon after, and as you're filling paperwork you can't think of a friend to select as your first assigned waifur
>your mom comes in, worried about you and herself, if you were to start your own family, she'd probably end up having to get a new husband to support herself without you to aid her when needed at all times
>you look at her... the most beautifull women you've ever known
>you hold her paw and write down her name on your assignment selection, your mother red like a tomato, trying to shy away, yet hiding little tears of joy at given a second chance, even if it means to do so with its own blood
>sister comes in to this scene, and gasps at what you're currently doing
>hits you in the back of the head and calls you an idiot for proposing that
>erases your mother's name from the paper, mom is confused, you're kinda pissed off
>that's when she asks you to tell her ''marry me''
>''marry me?''
>she says yes, your mom realizes it and says yes too
>now you three get to be a family forever, without having to sacrifice your assignment slots, expect many snow leopard cubs to come (it's legal to have incest babies on the first generation don' t worry)

Not really into mother son.
But what's the procedure for the opposite, a man who really likes the women some of his daughters are growing into?

keeping with the authority and property hierarchies, it's gonna be a bit different
>like the opposite, they can ask to join into your harem by themselves, tends to be slightly rared though
>if a husband leaves its harem, they are wrangled back into their original family tree line, basically they get to join back with their mothers and whoever is currently their husband, atleast until they re-join the selection pool
>be dad, have a fistfull of daughters reaching their maturity age
>they're all capable, but there's this one , 3rd daughter of yours, she's been a handfull since the start
>more or less a developing bimbo, dumb as rocks, loves you 100% tough
>the rest of her sisters are capable women that have good decision making skills, but you know she's gonna settle with the first fuckup she can find
>she's too pretty, pearls before swine, nobody can truly appreciate such a quality women
>time to make your master plan
>''hi bimbodaughter!''
>''hi anondad!''
>''thegirlthatwantstomarryherownfathersayswhat?''
>''what?''
>ffw to her wedding night, you acompany her to the altar and put the ring on her finger yourself before she leans in to kiss you after the preacher allows it, she takes a second to process what has been happening this whole evening
>''oh! we were getting married? i just realized!''
>still dumb as rocks, but she enjoys being spoiled as daddy's girl

Interspecies teams in sporting events are a rarity. Usually the teams are segregated between different cliques of the same or similar species, the animals just can’t seem to keep it together when the infielder is a fucking coyote who wants to wring the pitcher’s flimsy flamingo neck like his ancestors would have done for a goose in the wild. Things get heated up from there such that being 99th percentile isn’t enough to outweighs the hassle.
Many such cases. It usually means that teams have very obvious strengths and weaknesses in the sport that could have been covered. Only humans in a captain or coach’s position are able get a whole team of beasts enough on the same page to get through a season whether by carrot or stick.
How would team pic related fare at being a baseball team? (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1716/41/1716410614382.jpg)

I'd sort professional sports by 'Weights' of the species playing, similar to boxing and other contact sports.
Otherwise, I think that in a multispecies society you could eventually see sports where difference species fulfill specific roles in newly invented team-based sports.

I would watch horse and dog races if they were anthros. Maybe even bet on them too.

Dwarfs are great material for collared.
Stubborn vindictive short-tempered loners who live in mountains and don't like outlanders - tsundere content right here.
Also their rivalry with elves would be a good thing for human masters as both will do their best.
In WH: age of sigmar(as I know) they had whole book of grudges, so once they got on human side they would be one of most devoted subjugated species.
Also remember how good of warrior and smith they're so your life would get way more safe, but not as calm as before just remember how short-tempered they are, although it would be additional reason for 'educating' her.
They pretty good party trowers so I doubt you're ever will get bored with them.

Elves are naturally haughty and certain furries absolutely think they're better than humans, so collaring them has that "instant loss" angle of turning the tables on them, even if its in a setting where humans are and have always been the top dog
Dwarves don't usually have that kind of self importance to them, and as such they lack that angle so I'm not sure they're all that good a fit for collared
Goblins would probably be a better fit for the shortstack mold, plus they're often characterized as wild or otherwise uncivilized, so you can very easily say you're "taming" them, either literally or figuratively
tldr dwarves can be good on their own but don't really lend themselves to collared that well, also this is a thread for ANTHROS getting dominated by humans, not just blanket nonhumans

Restricting an anthro's senses and abilities so they become dependent on their human masters
>Blindfolding a cat so she can't use her superior sight and has to rely on you to lead her around on a leash
>Ruining a dog's nose with your sweaty clothes so all she can smell is your musk
>Stuffing a bunny's ears so she can't hear anything and has to communicate with you using your made up sign language
>Tie up a tigress or mare every night and let her muscles atrophy to the point she needs you to carry her around everywhere in your arms
>Keep a shark girl in your house several hundred miles inland so she has to live in a water tank in your basement or in your backyard pool to survive

This came to me in a dream. Literally.
>In-universe show about a diverse team of teen anthro superheroes fighting crime and other evildoers, a-la Teen Titans.
>Each of them a different breed of anthro and each with different powers, they help each other and the city they live in.
>They fight a variety of recurring villains throughout the show, with equally diverse set of powers and identities.
>One of the recurring villains is a human. A cocky, quick-witted teen with no powers but a knack for inventions and gadgets.
>Casually racist against anthros in a very PG-friendly manner, with demeaning nicknames for every hero villain he interacts with.
>Whenever the villains team up for a big heist or to take down the heroes, he's the one who ends up dissapointed when the team falls appart due to infighting from other members but turns it to his advantage every time.
>In an episode where one of the teen heroes doesn't feel appreciated nor taken seriously by his teammates (specially one of the female leads he has a crush on), he goes out of his way to try and catch the villainous human on his own.
>He tracks him down to his secret hidepout and confronts him, but to his surprise he's not alone.
>He catches the surprised human casually hanging out and even flirting with not one but two of the show's anthro villainesses.
>The last episode the audience had seen this magnificent bastard in he was cornered and fighting those same two villainesses, after the latest big villain team-up had gone down in flames due to infighting, and he had constantly demeaningly reffered to the two as 'Kitty' and 'Bunny' the whole episode.
>The three team up and easily take down the hero, and are deciding what to do with him.
>Shenanigans ensure because the teen hero is more interested in learning what and wht the fuck were they flirting in the first place, and how the fuck did the human villain even managed to accomplish this when he always seems like such a prick, specially when they last saw him.
>Eventually the Hero team rescue their teammate and the villains are forced to run away from their hideout and run in different directions.

>Human boy raised by surrogate non-human mother as his caretaker/nanny/tutor.
>She comes to see him as her own and care for him beyond her own duty.
>He over time devemops a deep crush on her despite the age gap.
>Shenanigans ensure as he becomes more and more enboldened to pursue her and her willpower to reject him is eroded over and over again.

>Comes to a point when even they're having an illicity relationship at everyone else's backs, yet even then she tried to deny and reject what's happening between the two.
>He's too assertive to fight back, and she's too devoted to him to ever tell him no.
>Despite her insistence that this relationships is wrong and how his parents will eventualyl find out, she's happier now that she's ever been, even if she can't admit it even to herself.

I think this is more recurrent with anthros and other who are already servants or similarily employed by humans to care for and raise their sons, but it can also occur in other instances like 'friend of the family/your mother/an aunt/older/sibling/half-sibling/cousin', etc.
The important part is the gradual degradation of an authority figure who once regulated playtime into that of a playmate on equal ground to the boy, or even a subservient plaything.

The male version can also be really hot.
A step-father or tutor who once cared for and dictated over the young human is now ruled by his whims, his authority eroded over years as the young boy came to surpass him in every measure imaginable. More reliable, successful, and manly, as well as stronger and more assertive.
Willing or not, the older male is now defferentioal to yhr younger human. Desptie his potential objections he finds it impossible to impose on him anymore, as his roles are reversed and the newly empowered human finds new amusing ways to lord his new power over him and reassert his dominance over the enmasculated male.

I like both.
>Your mom had a Gardevoir and Gallade as her team and uses them to watch over you
>One’s female and the other’s male, doesn’t matter which
>They’re like a second pair of parents, caring for you and helping raise you
>The dynamic gets thrown out of wack as you get older and start seeing them as the pieces of ass they really are
>They’re horrified at first when you start hitting on them, but the feeling of your cock grinding on their asses kicks in their subservient instincts
>Soon enough their daily chores have a large section of time allotted for reliving you, unable to resist satisfying your growing needs
>You stretch them out on the daily, trying to impregnate them both as you use them like fleshlites
>They’re ashamed of what they’re doing, but your human cock rearranging their guts every day is more than worth it

Love examples of /collared/ being pushed by a third party in a relationship.
>Human wife is fine and even encourages her husband to obtain an anthro slave to relief his urges she cant satisfy (since people don't see slaves as people and, using them isn't seen as cheating).
>A human-crazy anthro mom wants her stuck-up, over-achieving daughter to relax a bit and get railed good by a big strong human who can please her.
>A pathetic anthro husband begs his loving wife to help satisfy his secret cuckold fetish by having her fuck a human man.
>An anthro couple is seemingly lovingly married, but the wife is an perverted bitch who married exclusively to either satisfy her fetish of cheating on her husband, or is a crazed yaoi lover with a long-term plot to have her anthro husband slowly corrupted or violated by a human for her own enjoyment.
>Bunch of teenage girls discuss amongst themselves and try and convince on of their friends than humans are the way to go.

My own take:
>Future dystopian government with views highly based on Social Darwinism, but also deeply biased towards human supremacist views due to being composed mainly of humans.
>Education has been reduced to a propaganda machine for the state, mirroring their own views of how a real society should be ran.
>Students are made to compete against each other in every way imaginable, from class performance, to engagement with extra-curricular activities.
>Students who perform better are given more benefits, while those who underperform have theirs taken away.
>Students who perform bad enough are not allowed to advance grades, and must repeat school years.
>This is partly seen as a way to help them try again next year, but it only results on a vicious cycle of failure which reinforces their misery later in life.
>Mostly seen in anthros, which often start without the advantages human students get, and therefore underperform compared to them.
>Some schools in districts considered of "less budgetary importance" even place limits on how many students can pass each year.
>P.E. is of high importance for the regime due to its focus on physical performance and excellence.
>P.E. is also one of the only classes where many anthros have a natural advantage over humans, pushing them to try even harder there to counter their failures in other
>Unfortunately for everyone, the regime has also seen fit to replace most of P.E. with gladiatorial-like matches and tournaments in accordance with its Darwinist worldview.
>Everyone is sorted into weight classes, although matches allow for some flexibility, allowing combatants to choose their opponents if both agree.
>Multiple-combatant matches are measured by equalizing the weights of both by adding or substracting fighters teams until a judge or both teams approve of the weight difference.
>Multiple-combatant torunaments can see fighters vary wildly during the torunament as matches progresses. Often, teams are assembled and fighters switched in or out from the team as the needs arise, but it's possible for combatants from disqualified matches or even teams in-play to joun another team for a match, with the final score listing the individuals involved in each match.
>Naturally, due to the inmoral and supremacist nature of this society, the system is rife with mismanagement and abuse.
>Refferees and judges are known to turn a blind eye to cheating from individuals favored by the system, from lying on weight classifications to illegal equipment or maneuvers during combat.
>What's worse, sexual harrasment in combat and allegations of sexual assault outside of the ring are hardly if ever taken seriously, and mostly only for humans or special individuals.
>This had lead to the radicalization of many students into supremacist and survivalist ideologies and groups, mostly into gangs that further encorage even more illegal and extreme behaviour.
>You will see undeground betting and fighting outside of PE classes, and other similar criminal activity.
>One of the most extreme forms this take is an underground hierarchy self-enforced by the students, where ones will keep others are their subordinates or even slaves, and these are sold or bought alongside other goods in order to repay debts or appease those students more powerful than others in power.
>Authorities officially are credited with looking to disband and prevent these sort of organizations from occuring, but in reality little to no attention is given to these situations of they're acknoledged as long as no kid is permanently maimed or even killed, specially if school staff or the children of powerful people are involved.
So, TL;DR
>Matches are setup by weightclass, but its a flexible limit with both legal and illegal setups.
>Multi-fighter matches sum the weights of all players in a team and pair them with a team of the same weight.
>Tournaments work in the same way, with fighters able to come in or out with little to no limits as long as the team's weight stays the same as the other team/weight class.
>A short break inbetween fights, maybe more if both coaches agree on it.
>Sexual harrasment is not legal, but is often overseen or ignored.
>Sexual assault, underground, gambling, bribery slavery, gang activity and more is rife in the school amongst students, often overlooked by the authorities.
>The legal PE Fights are the center of it all, but most of the uglier stuff happens behind curtains, in the lockers or other situations.
>Humans are an implicit advantage in picking their matches, because of this they tend to be able to avoid be dragged into the underground hierarchy, at least in human-mayoirty districts.
>The weak are taken advantage of, the strong survive and thrive.

Far future sci-fi, post technological singularity.
Men have become a collective consciousness entity and explore the stars, ever conquering all life encountered for his ever expanding harem.
The subjugated are made all female client races, compatible only with him, and who will produce more of their own kind.
This creates genetic dependence, allows him to micromanage the population, and as he's the father-husband of the entire population, he personally knows and is seen with a familial bond with the entire populace.

What happened with human women?

They remain individually intelligent. Just another race in the harem.
I could see that hazing in general of new races is common and normal, continuing until they find others they can haze, helping drive home complicity in the cycle of conquest, and helping establish pecking order when all bonds except to those of their man are secondary and fluid. First gens, that is, the first generation of a newly conquered species, may have animosity that, given their utter inability to to strike back against the all-father, may gravitate towards bullying human women instead.
Since the cycle constantly renews with each new conquest, the culture has just internalized their position as premium bully bait, and they're typically on the bottom of the totem of whatever group they find themselves in.
So I guess it's technically a strict patriarchal setting, not a human supremacist setting. It's just there's only one male allowed in his borders.

Goes hard. I like your words magic man.
Are women bonded to a single avatar of the hive mind or do they bounce between avatars as the difference is cosmetic at most?
Whats the personality of the human male hive mind? What is human male incarnate in your eyes?

I would say they bounce freely. The empire is run as a large family unit on a cosmic, perhaps intergalactic scale, and everything governmental is run by him personally. From the highest functions to the individual household.
Since he knows everyone, and their drama on a personal level, he can carefully manage all resources and needs in a very tight way.
And dad can move his girls about as he sees fit, controlling even who lives where to keep communities with like or complimentary personalities.
In my mind, he's a stern, demanding, but very fatherly and encouraging individual among his own, but very calculating and predatory towards those outside, any deals or compromise only being an ploy to make their conquest cost less and require killing fewer of those he intends to subjugate. To him, there is only his daughter-wives, and those he has not yet claimed.
The general structure of the society would frame everything on trying to gain his favor and please him.
Not just sexually, but in all things. Those who keep order among their groups and keep them on focus, those who help break newly conquered girls in, those who are particularly intelligent and manage to develop new innovations even in such an old, large and advanced civilization. And those who contribute to the general culture, the artists and clergy who help bring unity, life, and further his ideals among their kin.

remember anons, whether or not any anthro's relationships are open or not is entirely up to you

Not enough 'Netorare/Cheating' without having the male be jealous of the female in this thread.
Im all for fucking furbois and their girlfriends into blissful oblivion, but the thread needs to explore the anthros being unwilling about being dominated more, as well as exploring more non-con scenarios or at least where the mindbreaking comes slowly and unwillingly, without having the anthros be immediatly attracted to humans.

I'd also like to discuss and read more about the non-sexual aspects of /collared/. I know it's a red board, but if you see the Slavery and the Patriarchy threads on /d/ you'll know what I mean. Talking also about the methodology and mechanics of slavery and submission on an individual, but also a societal level, and how these societiers are structured.
It makes reading and writing greens about it afterwards easier and more immersive.

>Look! It's the queen, she's adressing the people! Seems as though she's returned from the peace summit with the human kingdom
>Ah, she's so beautiful, yet she projects such a commanding aura. What I wouldn't give to spend a night with her
>Ha, good luck! She's never once gotten serious with any of the suitors from the various other lands.
>True. Must be that stern personage of hers. I can only imagine how ruthless she was in those treaty meetings
>C-Cumming! Ahh~! Sho goood!!
>Oh dear, it's leaking all over the royal crown.
>Thank you so much, good sir for laying with me again! Consider it an apology for my cold demeanor at the first treaty meeting.
>Mm? Oh yes, the new accords! I had them pushed through without issue, just as you ordered, sir!
>Those animals won't realize they're being slowly pushed into human servitude until it's far too late to contest. A brilliant design, sir.
>The Female Anthro Missionary program that's sent our best and brightest young woman to the human kingdom to 'foster healthy relations between empires' will go very well, I'm sure.
>Are we done talking about that boring stuff now? My loins ache for another round of mating...
>Ah, I'm terribly sorry. Please sir, bless this wretched hag of a beast with your divine lust, let my sinful body be the disposal of your potent seed, as is the rule of nature!

>anthros live in isolated tribes
>their animal characteristics make survival relatively simple for the beast folk
>this continues for a couple thousand years where the beasts live peaceful and unambitious lives
>the coastal dwelling lizardfolk soon begin to disappear, and rumors of floating cities begin to circulate
>tribes continue to disappear and demons arrive with shining armor and fire sticks
>tribes band together to face these new invaders but the demons strike a deal with the weaker tribes
>bloody battles follow and the tribesfolk are subjugated
>beasts are taken as slaves to the demon's home where they find gleaming cities of glass and steel
>the demons are masters of magic and technology and always ambitious
>some beasts hate their service
>other beasts begin to think the diabolic "humans" aren't that bad on the eyes after all
>especially when they aren't wearing their masks

The first thing I thought of when I heard that they are isolated island tribals is that they probably would be pygmy-like due to insular dwarfism, so the 'sky demons' would probably also be giantic to them. The second is that they'd probably look like Animal Crossing characters.

For me, it makes me imagine cargo cults.
Imagine a bunch of anthros living on island, fifty years after the humans left, who still very aggressively try to maintain the human's equipment, dress in the styles that the humans designed for them, follow the submissive orders the humans gave them, and otherwise know, in their hearts, that the reason the humans aren't coming back to enslave them is because they're not trying hard enough.
Occasionally, they see a plane fly over so they hastily prepare a welcoming ceremony amongst great celebration, with the most 'worthy' stripping nude and gathering in the village square, but the plane never lands...

>Anthros willingly submitting themselves to humanity only to be ignored
Between the cannibalism and slavery, this is the most sadistic and masochistic thing to happen in this thread. it simply must be rectified.

>Be human pilot, delivering supplies across open waters for the war effort
>By night, find yourself in a terrible thunderstorm
>Lightning strikes your wing, the light of the instrument panel dies
>Luckily, despite the pitch blackness, you can clearly see your dashboard thanks to a red glow
>You look out your window and see that the wing's engine has burst into flame
>You wake up on your side
>You see a box next to you, sitting on the sand, being lapped at by waves
>Through blurred vision, you see it's a box of MREs
>You roll onto your back, and make out nearly a dozen figures of greatly varying sizes all gawking at you
>A lack of predators have made these anthros evolve wildly. Some stand at barely 4 feet tall, others tower at 12
>They all stare in awe, as though they were witnessing the birth of christ or a rocket launch
>You fall unconscious once more
>The tribe drags you to a medicine hut so that you can be properly tended and welcomed in as their new leader once you awake

>"We're sorry, divine leader, but we were unable to save the gigantic metal sky bird you tamed to come here."
>"However, we know the rituals to summon more, so the moment we lure one down to earth, you will be able to fly once more!"
>You look out the window.
>Six naked anthros are dancing around a single foxgirl that is wearing a military uniform that looks like it's been stitched back together from scraps.
>She sits at an old desk, fiddling with an antenna made out of wood attached to a box made out of coconuts.
>She occasionally picks up the 'receiver' and says things like 'Squawk 7700 emergency, please respond,' and 'requesting connection to HQ, please respond.'
>You think for a moment and tell your nurse that they need to add 'over' to the end of their sentences or it won't work.

How would you run your island anons? Benevolent ruler or dictator? Truthful or deceitful about your nature? Will you teach them to be more self-sufficient or get them to depend on your supplies? Is your goal to go home or to stay here until you die of scurvy?

If the islanders don't have scurvy then they probably eat something that has vitamin c in it. Anyway, it's really tempting to stay there forever as a God until you pass away, but isn't it more moral to try and make contact with other humans so the village can be enslaved like it wants? They've been waiting so long to finally be shipped back to the promised land, where they can serve an endless supply of humans for eternity. Who am I to deny them?

>On a navyman's salary you could only afford to buy one if you decided to bring them all back to society
>The native anthros spend the next few months worshipping your cock to try and prove that they're the most worthy of going home with you

>The islanders have a number of human tools that they never use after the great lighter disaster of 143 AHD (after human departure), so you can still live fairly comfortably.
>(the lighter didn't burn down the village, it just ran out of fuel and stopped working and the villagers were so distressed that they spent the next year in 'penance.')

>the navy allows each corpsman a single bed slave
>you can sneak another islander on if you register them as a comfort animal for the ptsd from the crash

>build a signal fire to get off the island
>if that works take my favorite slave and get off the island
>if that doesn't work attempt to make the island better for myself and my people
>take a couple islanders as personal slaves
>at the very least a bodyguard and a bed warmer

Hail to the gods of capitalism, come back and turn that whole fucking place into an island resort
>The resort has all the usual stuff, hotels and private villas, water parks, sandy beaches, late night concerts
>exotic foods, an amusement park, and many more things to do
>but with an anthro twist, as this is also their home
>be woken up by bitches sucking your cock
>play a little volleyball after breakfast, watch as bikinis "accidentally" fall off around you
>visit the anthro residential area for a more normal experience
>fuck a friendly single mother and give her another future slut-daughter to raise
>follow a young anthro to her school, today they're learning how to properly worship a human cock
>everyone but a lucky schoolgirl has to use a dildo
>you take a short road trip on a a rickshaw pulled by a panting doe, not exactly the anthro you'd expect to be doing hard labor
>you're free to activate the vibrators, shock her under her tail with the cattle prod, or finger and grope her for motivation, she's okay with anything
>the only payment she'll accept is you filling her stomach with human cum
>end up at a concert
>the orgy of music and sex is deafening, you're not sure who's giving you a blowjob but she feels very cute
>the concert ends with the pregnant lead singer giving birth right on stage
>not what you expected but damn they go hard
>some humans go back to their rooms with anthro girls
>some have a harem's worth for their own orgy, others just one for romantic lovemaking
>others congregate at the edge of the resort for what they call The Hunt
>an anthro village of primitives, hidden deep within the jungle, untouched and unchanged
>the hunt begins after a short hike
>the defenders are quickly defeated and the ravaging begins as human cocks force their way into anthro holes
>young daughters are defiled upon the sacred temple altar for their gods and ancestors to watch
>mysteriously the village is cleaned up and ready to raid the next night

>Crashland into an unknown wilderness in the middle of an unexplored ocean.
>Found by someone and dragged to safety by them.
>You come and go from unconsiousness for several days while being tended by strangers who pad all over your body.
>When you come back to your senses you discover a surprisoing sight. You've been tended by a group of tiny anthros, who now postrate in front of you.
>It doesn't take long for you to assert yourself among the locals. While anthros serving as workers and servants isn't unusual where you come from, these ones already seemed tame compared to other wild ones.
>You eventually figure out that the pygmy beasts have taken to form a cargo cult centered around Humanity from the bits and pieces they've come to learn about them.
>Not only do they venerate what they consider to be Human artifacts, but they worship mankind itself, seeing more human-like traits as divine, and relegating you to a living-god.
>There would be little these pygmy anthros could do to stop you if you wanted to abuse them, but after several weeks of becoming accostumed to their treatment and kindness you've become quite fond of them.
>Soon enough your life becomes quite pleasant being cared for and pampered by the tiny anthros who venerate even the ground you walk on.
>However, you're not content with sitting on your haunchers and just staying here for the rest of your life. You have a duty to your nation, and you quite somewhat miss home.
>You collect what you can salvage of your crashlanding and what artifacts the little anthros have collected and try and return some sense of civilization to your life.
>Contacting with the human world seems impossible at this time, so perhaps bringing a little bit of the human world here wouldn't be so bad.
>Despite the tribals having originally a chief and chieftess to their tribe, you've become the defacto leader of their community, as they seem unwilling to part even slightly of any of your requests which by now have become commands to them.
>You doubt there could be a plantation owner in the empire with a more loyal workforce than this one.
>You teach them about you. About the world where you come from, and about your culture and religion, and they absorb it without question.
>Soon enough the most intelligent of them are speaking your language, and at least you've learned some of what passes for a language to them.
>You take the ones smart ones that you trust them most and turn them into your confidants and leaders, helping you give orders to the rest of them.
>Their adoration of humanity is strongest than ever, and soon enough they're heping you try to find humanity again, searching in the nearby islands and contacting the other tribes to bring the news to them.
>Months later your little tribe has turned into a great union of tribes, with anthros of all shapes and sizes of all around the archipelago come to give you and mankind, tribute.
>Finally, one day, the news arrives. Some of your trained scouts managed to contact humans.
>The humans were surprised that one of the anthros (they were most probbaly gonna try to ecapture and enslave) spoke to them in their language, and proceeded to explain your situation to them. They were coming.
>You were finally gonna go back home. But your adventure wasn't over yet. You'd yet to report back to your chain of command. To your superior officers.
>It almost seemed sureal that the experience was basically over. From being venerated as a god to back to having to salute and bow to men more powerful than you.
>But more people than you realized wanted to hear your story. The empire was slowly learning the story of the man who became the leader of a nation of anthros.
>You'd decided to bring back to civilization some of the few anthros who'd you've truly come to rely on and become fond of, who you knew would work better and would delight the most in seeing the new would you were taking them to.
>From reporters, to public figures, and and soon enough, the Queen.
>Her Majesty wanted to her about your ordeal from your own mouth, and after having received decorated you for your trials and valor, wanted to hear more about the region. And the local beasts.
>Some part of you fell ill. In some way you knew this was inevitable. Nothing could prevent the advance of mankind and the subjugation and taming of those lesser to it.
>On the other, you didn't want the beings you'd come to appreciate for their kindness and resourcefullness to come to harm.
>Against your better judgement and the command of your superiors, you risked speaking out of turn, in order to suggest a potential path.
>You could barely truly believe your gambit had worked.
>You had spoken to Her Majesty to listen to your plea about the situation the archipelago was currently in after your departure. How the locals saw humanity and how their work had helped you survive.
>Listening to you speak, it seemed that she came to the conclusion that the best man to see to the taming of this new uncontested frontier would be you.
>By appintment of Her Majesty, Defender of the Empire and its faiths, you were now Governor of the archipelago that had become your home for the last year.
>It was now officially your duty to her and the Empire to tame the remaining of the islands, integrating the locals into it's hierarchy, and seeing that you could develop them that they could become assets to her and the crown.
>Furthermore, the beliefs that you had instilled into the anthros would be adressed, but she considered that more than anything they could become a powerful tool in helping anthros outside the islands better learn of mankind, as she moved to see how this new angle could be integreated into the existing faiths in the nation.
>The few anthros who'd been allowed to be in the presence of the queen and empress had been nothing but amazed. They'd never imagined that such splendorous palace could exist, much less that there could be a being more powerful than you out there.
>Yet they found themselves more loyal and dedicated to you than even before now that you'd treated them to such a once-in-a-lifetime experience. You were now officially their rules as far as they were concerned, and they could not wait to teach the wonders of mankind to everyone else back home.
---
Well, it's not all.
I wanted to include a part where some pygmy anthro individuals and tribes had more human-like characteristics, including height, and how this seemed to give them a higher hierarchy among the various tribes of the archipelago. The conflict would come from some agressive trbes who'd be slightly larger and slightly more human than the rests bullying/conquering other ones.
Being led by a monster girl-like beast lizardgirl queen, she'd eventually be subdued and domianted by the protagonist, finally brining peace to the islands as the tribes accepted his superior humanity to everyone else's including the villainess.
I'd have made the green far longer tho, so I decided not to include it.
Anyway, read Senki Survival Saga.
Oh, also also. I wanted to experiment a bit with the Size_Difference angle and suggest that the tribes of the archipelago where matriarchies, where the females were larger but less numerous than the males, being seen as essential to the tribes' survival and fed the best, while the males lesser than them depite having to search for food for them out at sea or in the jungles to prove themselves for the females.
This is of of course, is just an excuse to make the human male protagonist all the more imposing to the anthro females, specially compared to their males who they normally saw as lovable but inferiors to themselves.
Also explaining why the queen lizardbitch would be the ruler and conqueror of the other tribes, rather than a male anthro.

>playing that prison game someone mentioned last thread, with a couple mods
>kinda annoying that you are just forced into the prison with a "supposed to lose" fight, but w/e
>run around a bit, fighting people and raping them
>game keeps crashing
>make new save, figure it might be the mods not settling
>works fine after that, though there are a few a lot of spaces that aren't immediately accessible
>guess that makes sense for a prison, but again whatever
>impregnate everyone I see
>if they're a guard, beat them down first
>give everyone a double does of fertility pills to force them into heat
>if they have a dick put a cage on it
>put portal panties on afterwards, which also function as chastity belts
>already have like six people pregnant after the first day
kinda interesting, but not in the same way CoC was. Sex is more of a minigame than interactive erotica, and I'm not sure what the "main story" is, if there even is one
7/10 so far since it enables my fetishes even if it wasn't made for them specifically, like fitting a peg in a hole because it happens to fit, not because its the correct shape
lots of mods tho, but again not exactly like the old CoC expanded mod, more adding different species to the pool or premade characters

>Humanity takes in a wild, andtho species unde their care, either willingly by making submission an appealing alternative to starving/freezing in the wild by force by capturing and enslaving it.
>Over a series of generations breeding with both humans and each other humanity has managed to completely mold the anthros into whatever it is they wish of them, with several variations of their kind available for collaring by eager humans.
>short but plump breeds with inviting and suggestive personalities to serve as comfort creatures and pets.
>Breeds whose high-degree of human blood makes them resemblle them highly but for some traits like ears, tails and paws, to serve as lovers, spouses and partners to full-blooded humans.
>More standardized =and capable breeds with subservient personalities to serve as servants and workers in human hoseholds and inustries.
>Breeds created solely with strength and loyalty in mind, to serve as guards and soldiers, keeping the other breeds of anthros in line and even hunting for new, wild captures from their own species, now distanct cousins who they outmatch in almost every aspect thanks to human ingenuity and guidance.

What job would you like to have in a /collared/ setting? Hard mode: no positions of authority (kings, mayors, CEOs)

Secretary (male) to a powerful female anthro politician or CEO who is a secret pervert and constantly fantasizes about being raped by speciecist human men, abusing her authority over me to satisfy her primal urges by training me in how to train her better to satisfy me the best; not without proper compensation.

Any normal laboring job you can imagine but with the caveat that you're doing it with a small team of slave who you are functionally only needed to be there as a tard handler so them don't literally tear each other apart when the animal's quirks come in play or interspecies rivalries flare up like a rabbit cashier getting spooked at seeing a fox customer's teethy smile. Smooth sailing all day fucking/fucking with the crew interspersed with incidents of crisis management or times where it takes a group effort to do a task or you have to step in so they don't fuck up the electrical installation on the wall or blow a tranny on a car.
This is not even necessarily being done as you being an official manager to the group, though naturally it's to be expected and only natural that the human gravitates up.
Alternatively.....Fashion. Fashion must be a wickedly funt place when there's giant overlap between it and pet manicures/bdsm. It'd be a far more varied exercise to be a rigger artist who trusses up volunteers/volunteed subjects or clients paying for a getup to present to the one they want to be slave to. A lot of the types of furry species would have to have gathered their own 'styles' of bondage that we haven't even really imagined irl since we've not had any practical reason to invent the snake or bat versions of the ironic horse blinder or falconry hoods.

>Pictured, Ren Amon, supreme leader of the Anthrostate
>A long while back, the Anthrostate was a friendly country that just happened to be a bit xenophobic towards humans.
>They'd trade with humans and allow them to visit as tourists, but it was obvious they did not mean for them to stay.
>Eventually, following a plague-induced famine, the country fell into fascism.
>A standout general, Ren Amon, was appointed as the new supreme leader to solve the country's issues
>After her appointing, she spent 20 years conquering land, supposedly in the name of anthro prosperity
>Following two decades of appeasement with no end in sight, an alliance of human countries formed and declared war on her and her people
>The war was over abnormally quickly, only two months of what was meant to be a 5 year trench war.
>Human troops stormed the capital, and waiting for them was Ms. Amon and her highest ranking generals, self-stripped of clothes and surrendering eagerly
>Within a year, the country was divided between the victorious countries and it's cities quickly developed massive human populations
>Within 2 years, less than half of the land's population were anthro. All anthrokind was found guilty of participating in the war and subjugated
>The Anthrostate, fueled by the population boom brought by immigration, experienced a golden age of production in which no one starved
>Ms. Amon's dream of Anthro prosperity came true after all

In a /collared/ situation or setting, could you see yourself in a situation where you could have a genuine relationship with an antho that isn't just master/slave stuff oreven something close to a friendship?
Would you even want to or care? How do you see your relationship going? and developing.
Anthro boys and girls included. You can be on different social classes/castes and still be able to interact like people, even if the power inbalance is there. Extrapolate on the setting you're thinking of if necesary.

All the hard stuff aside, I think it's better if your slaves think of you as a friend. Just a friend that has final say in all matters. They can voice their concerns, they just understand and accept that you can always veto what they say.
They're not merely obeying out of unquestioning conditioning, or fear that leads to you always having to be on guard for rebellion, but because they trust that you'll always look out for their best interest, even if it's not always fun or easy for them.

Setting where the anthro finds slavery not simply the best of all bad options, but a wonderful situation.

Speaking generally, the species of anthro does not matter. For my ideal fantasy/setting...
A medieval style world which I can transport myself to, while retaining easy access to modern technology. The locals consider me to be a scary recluse wizard. That wizard is nice to have around for emergencies, and all around good advise for tricky situations, but is not to be otherwise bothered.
Next, a breakaway troupe of female "skaven." This isn't Warhammer, they're more rat-folkish, but with a similarly nasty lifestyle. Of course the human villagers consider them demons. They live a precarious, peripheral existence nearby. They're dying from disease and something like scurvy. They get it into their heads their only chance is to steal some holy MacGuffin the wizard supposedly has. Their master thief is good, but, you know, motion detectors, cameras, silent patrol drones. She's instantly captured.
In desperation, she offers herself, soul and all, in sacrifice to the nightmarish evil wizard demigod to save her sisters.
What ails them? Aside from being forced to live like hobos, bacterial pneumonia and taurine deficiencies. Simple fixes with modern medicine.
They're all astonished by the wizard's easygoing lifestyle surrounded by modern world convince. And, unlike the violent culture and biology they ran away from, sharing the wizard's bed is safe, comfortable, and completely satisfying.
They're all in on being a slave harem with a now easy life.

I actually like comparatively mundane, amiable settings when it comes to collared at times. It's why the Pokemon world is a nice comfort zone for me. Humans are explicitly masters over nature in that setting, but it's not like an ever-present, in-your-face totalitarian setting either.

Change slave and master dynamic to pet-friend and master dynamic. Like obviously you will like your cat and treat it right although you basically own it. For many pets became part of family so power dynamic with friendship is possible.
I think that in setting humans will have role more of supervisors than conquerors. Even irl we already made it our duty as top of food chain, things like red book, reserves and etc.
As for relationship? I think about this: irl laws for each country with human partners, and you are allowed to have multiple pet-partners even if you already married with human in situation with non human

What do we do with dykes?

Depends.
Harem? Make them the group toy, forbid your girls from masturbating, they have to call the dyke over to lick them. Just finished fucking one? The dyke's gotta lick her clean.
Did you just end up the third between a couple of lesbians? Lots of sloppy cum play between them is a given.
There's of course dicking the rejected lesbian straight like you posted. And there's getting with the girl your lesbian friend pined for and just going out of your way to turn her into a quean by sneaking her images and video. She might hate it at first, but she also has a chance to see her at all. Then just slowly work her into things until she's routinely holds her crush's hand as your rail her.

>Keep around as servants and cuckqueans. Well locked up so they are only allowed to cum when we went them to.
>Stress relief for your wife(ves). Keep them entretained and happy while you're fucking the rest of them or finding new ones.
>Straight up conversion therapy through dickings and other methods.
>Use them to infiltrate Anti-Human Pride groups and double cross them to obtain even more dykes to convert.

I may be going in too dark of a direction with this, so I'll post what I have so far for you dudes to read
Jenny wasn't the nicest girl. For a poodle raised to be prim, proper, and pure, Jenny was a rich, spoiled, bratty menace, who's lifelong CEO father gave her everything she wanted on a silver platter just for pretending to be sad she didn't catch the latest trend or have anyone begging her to be a runway model.
That's why she deserves what's happened to her.
For the last three months Jenny stepped foot into the darker side of the rich mans world just for the thrill of it. In her country houses basement, Jenny hosted private underground DOMESTICATED streams online with her friends as the actresses and herself as director, at home her laptop was full of private messages, storing life ruining information between her and whatever rich man would pay to see humans screw anthros in different states of intoxication.
Money changed accounts. Loose lips changed lives.
Apparently she had badmouthed some old-money russian Borzoi heir, and he didn't take kindly to a bitch who had one generation of wealth behind her acting high and mighty. That's where it all started.
In two days, Jenny was blackbagged and flown out to New England, and by day three, after getting the first good rest in a long time, she awoke, nude, in a white room.
"Wh-what the fuck is going on?" she asked, her high pitched voice shaking with fear. "Please just, my dad's rich, he'll pay anything you want jus-" Jenny felt something touching, pricking her neck, and moved her hand quickly to feel it out. A collar made of steel, clasped around her neck, with just enough space left for her to breath *just enough air* to stay awake, if not sane.
Jenny was halfway ready for a panic attack when she realized something further. The pricking feeling wasn't from the side of the collar where the lock was-because there wasn't a lock. The collar seemed to function entirely based on electronics, there were a series of lights on her right side, red, green, pink, and yellow. On the left, there weren't lights at all. On her left side Jenny felt two small prongs, just on top of her arteries. Needles.
She teared up.
"I...I..."
An intercom system played overhead, and a voice she recognized as human was heard.
"If my file is correct, your name is Jennifer Voltair. Nineteen years of age, net worth, three billion. I'm also told you prefer Jenny, so...Jenny. You are now in the Puppygirl Recovery Center. An enemy of yours found it fairly ironic to send you to an anthro training program since you enjoyed having your girlfriends broken in by "humies" so much...consider this day one."

>playan bdcc
>tracked down a crash that kept messing with my saves after a few days passed
>figure out how to get into medical
>start enslaving guards and nurses, including a Toriel I whipped up
>having a bit of fun, even though training and breeding five slaves is literally a full-time job
>takes all day
>emerge from my breeding cave after a few days
>apparently there's some slave-market sidequest/minigame
>not too bad on its own, but it does start out with you getting kidnapped by a catgirl secret agent or whatever working for the "syndicate" and her edgy wolf dad
definitely not my favorite part of the game, just hoping there's an option to let me kill her or something

you know, I've heard of sexuality play, but now that I'm thinking about the trans flag I wonder if gender play could be done in a similar way
>anthro teenager decides that she's a man
>meets a human male not long after
>they hit it off, great friends, eventually she asks him out
>turns out he doesn't like dudes
>she immediately changes her mind about the whole situation
>has to go around telling her friends and family that she was just joking about the pronouns thing
>they are confused because she was crying when she came out
>5 years later, she's the proud mother of several human children

You know, funny you mention this. I had an idea about a trans collared whore
>Anon has an anthro step-brother
>They go through a rough childhood together
>Raccoon step-brother eventually ditches the rest of his family to go onto greener pastures
>Years later, Anon is a troubled adult, in-and-out of jail
>Gets new case-worker
>Except it turns out, 'she's' actually his brother
>Now they have a lot to work through (between sex)
Would /collared/ like it?

brainstormed idea that may be a bit too out there for some (inb4 someone say it's mild at best)
>anon lives in a world where there's anthros but they're not just gonna bend the knee the second they feel the scent of human, you actually have to work for their interest
>anon has never scored, and jerking off has less and less of an effect each day, not even whatever plastic toy he gets is enough, chasing more and more degenerate kinks to reach a high harder and harder to find
>poorfag, so hookers are not an option
>slowly, tainted ideas take over his mind whenever he sees an anthro
>maybe it's their scent, maybe is a very opportunistic rub in the metro, maybe seeing a very slutty furry gal wearing almost nothing, maybe it's a comment made by a colleague, all little pushes dictating to do something wrong
>bound by impulse, tired of getting rejected, stressed and with no other way to release, it starts
>maybe first he blackmails a coworker in exchange of sexual favours, maybe takes advantage of another friend's body while they're drugged asleep, slowly going into more and more complicated scenarios, raping and ditching a whore knowing she can't do anything, rawing the woman in his basement knowing they'll never find her, so on so on, chasing a harder to reach high every time
unsure where would i ever get with this tough, feels too much of a story where nothing happens besides MC using up anthros for self pleasuring, and it also sounds too much like they could just be exchanged with humans/elves/whatever other fantasy race and still play out the same
thoughts? help? (psychiatric is also accepted)

>anthro noblewoman hastily signs a lucrative contract
>ends up agreeing to marry herself off to a young human male by accident
>very embarrassed to be walking around with a human half her height as her partner
>especially when he publically gropes her and pulls her off into an alleyway every few hours for handholding and sex
>eventually, she ends up quitting her career to take care of her kids

>play BDCC over the last week
>get told not to combine high-level fertility perks with the hyper mod
>do exactly that
>first litter with my Toriel slave is "merely" 300 children
>combine it with a branding mod that gives several effects, including making a womb ovulate when you creampie it
>fuck the Toriel for an entire day
>end up with over twelve HUNDRED children the next litter

>be evil villain
>all the heroes have failed to defeat you
>enslavement and kidnapping anthro women turning them into your slaves
>until one day a shining light appeared out of nowhere
>a young, cheery golden retriever girl
>for the city she is the only one able to defeat
>but you know what the truth of her situation is
>"Master! Stop doing your evil monologues and pamper me"
>truth is she wasn't able to best you
>after a quick defeat you two worked out a deal, she could pretend to defeat you but on private she was gonna be your pet
>"Master please your pet needs attention"
>truth is you thought it would be hotter and less annoying
>but you can't complain about having a golden beauty to pamper and fuck at your will
>and she seems extremely happy, you know all her mannerisms and whenever she gives an interview you can tell she's only thinking about coming back and sucking you off
Kinky bitch

The whole Ralts evolution tree was created to serve and worship humans.
They love humans and they love being trained by them in all sorts of ways. Gardevoirs are the perfect caretakers and servants and Gallades are the perfect protectors and guardians. Even the most wild of Alphas can learn to be submissive and agreeable to almost any human.
even their own forms are made in the image of humans, and they compliment these even futher with psychic illusions to make themselves more beautiful to their human masters.

>are all the pokemons that mega evolve/evolve by friendship made to serve humanity? they literally need us to unlock full potential and they'd be able to do it without us otherwise, why would it be otherwise?

>Atlantis but with anthros
Imagine rediscovering an ancient anthro civilization lost to time, and then immediately conquering it with modern human technology.

>Atlantis split off a thousand years ago because they viewed themselves as more advanced than other "savage" anthros
>this is because atlanteans used metal in their spears instead of rocks
>this was and is the technological height of atlantean society

Anons for some reason always envision /collared/ as Human Man's Burden to colonize a lowly, inferior species, but I for once want to bring low an actually mighty species.
Oh how sweet it it would be to see when the haughty alien and anthro break down in pleads, demanding to be defiled by the filthy Terran ape just a while ago she looked at with nothing but contempt.
Oh how I wish to defile Space Elf Pussy in the name of Humanity.

Here's what I got. If anything seems good, shout it out, whether you plan to write something or want to see it. Or obviously pitch your own ideas. The soon we pick one, the sooner we can start writin'.
>MC lives in a regular neighborhood but has to deal with his obnoxious HOA group, comprised of a group of female MILF anthros
>Sky Pirate anthros take a human prisoner hostage during a raid of some town, the MC has to sleep his way through the crew
>Alien invasion that gets thwarted by one man and his bold penis
>A reverse isekai where an anthro comes from a generic fantasy land into our world
>Sci-fi story where MC is the maintenance subordinate for the premier most bleeding edge anthro battle android who hates his guts, so he hacks her for...reasons

>xenofurs (lets say felines) invade our beloved planet
>just like new world colonizers decimated locals, an advanced civilization basically turns us into their servants
>the one caveat being their efficiency requires a very strict lifestyle and monoculture to keep itself afloat, a single dictatorial empire runs the show behind curtains
>they are more drones than they are people, eat, work, sleep, repeat, all with a sense of duty that leaves no time for enjoying themselves past slightly-better tasting nutritislop or a dose of pills to block brain receptors
>knowing they're unable to fight back, nations give up to save their population numbers, while people dislike the ocupation and hastefull further industrialization of the xenos, they're actually quite friendly with them
>cultural exchange, more one sided than anything else, it's obvious the distopia that xenos live on the more they open up about it with the locals
>games, songs, story, myth, food, awe and monuments, even more intimate stuff... things they've forgotten with time the more their superiors forced them to sell their lives for recognizion of a job well done
>eventually more and more of them experience this shock, bringing back home these new ideas and sometimes even people, if not staying in earth since it's better than what they have back from where they come
>hybridization both in technology and flesh, we never figured out fussion but they never figured out nuclear, eventually those that stayed as workers and servants started to intertwine more and more with the human population giving way to half breeds that formed part of new conglomerate while back at the anthro's home planet revolts and rebel groups are at a all time high, specially after discovering one of the ''elites'' of their species to have become a ''human enthusiast'' going as far as to be comparable to a humanity weaboo, human harem dicking her down on a daily basis and whatnot
>they're like a drug, once you taste a bit of humanity you can't go back, you want to feel and be part of it, so while it took decades, eventually their blooming empire began to break up into nations as their strict way of living clashed too much with the new human standar
>eventually they were humans in everything but appearance and tech. level, but eventually humanity got the boost needed to bounce back stronger than ever, going out of their way to return the favour and integrate the anthro's homeplanet into their union, this time in a peacefull manner, not a single battle was fought for it
>nowadays human and everything human is considered a cognitohazard by other xenos, as any interaction with them leads to that species joining their union or going ''extinct'' by mixing their genes so much they're legally just anthro-looking humans, a single one of these creatures was enough to disrupt an entire region's way of living
>future (hybrid) historians would one day call this phenomenon ''the era when the milky way plapped''

	Gene modding is amazing.  CRISPR opened the floodgates to genetic engineering like none had ever expected.  Designer babies, gene therapy eliminates hereditary illnesses, no more vestigial organs, gene mod enhancements for damn near everything.  Even you had some modifications. Nothing too major, but that stuff would have made you a star athlete just a few decades ago.  All good stuff but nothing that really made headlines.  No, the big topic for years was uplifts.  It started as a hobby for the wealthy:  Pay a huge wad of cash, and you could take an animal, splice human genetics into it, and make a new creature.  Walks and talks like a human, but retains the features of the base animal, adult sized in a single year.  They became the new pet everyone wanted.  As more people bought them, the cheaper it became to produce uplifts as new, more efficient methods arose to develop them.  Soon they became commonplace.  Hell, even your parents have a round little Pomsky uplift they treat like the grandchildren you never gave them.  It was so easy to acquire one, half the population of a town could be uplifts.  They became so numerous that people stopped referring to them as their official names, which was basically ‘[Species]-uplift’ and were simply put under the blanket term ‘Pets’.
    Of course with such new advancements comes a whole buttload of new problems.  Attempts at increasing their intelligence only lead to their brains deteriorating until you were left with a vegetable in 5 years that aren’t even able to breathe without help.  Lead to a lot of bereaved owners demanding more standards be applied to making uplifts.  So came the Thinking Cap law, a limitation on brain development that leaves matured uplifts about as smart as a really dumb teenager, but at least no more painful deaths from melting brain cells.    
Then came crazy hybridization, as stranger combinations of animals were called for.  Dog and lizard.  Horse and lion. Lynx with eagle wings and Crystal Jelly bio-luminescence for blue highlights. Gene modding has gone far, but not that far.  Such combinations lead to pets that looked exotic yes, but by their second birthday the conflicting animal bits would start breaking down as they rejected each other, leading to an uplift whose body was literally killing itself trying to expel the foreign genetics with tumors that spread rapidly through the body.  The rise in fatalities called for a means to stop such tragedies from happening in the future.  Thus came the Uplift Standardization clause, which cited every Uplift had to be based on an existing species or breed recognized by an official association.  No crazy wolf-bird hybrids that would die from malignant cancer in a year.  This also meant any interbreeding had to be seriously reworked.  People could no longer have two different species Pets fuck each other, or in some cases a human knocking up their Pet,  and make a freak baby.  No from now own Pets only took the bare minimum from the father, the child’s sex, hair color, eye color and maybe some personality traits.  Beyond that, they were the mother’s genes.
	Then came the controversy about Uplift rights.  It started with the previous laws, and from them came movements that called for more than that.  A movement to give uplifts freedom, calling Pet ownership ‘slavery’ and ‘inhumane’.  Some nations saw this progress into a new law.  They all had different names for it.  The Uplift Humanization Act, the Pet Freedom Act, La Libération Animale Évoluée, basically the Anti-Pet Laws.  
	They were rushed, filled with loopholes, and generally made a bigger mess than the one they were created to solve.  It was illegal to own an Uplift as a Pet unless they gave their express permission; but that was easy to get when an uplift was about as smart as a bag of turnips.  Once they became a Pet, they voided all uplift rights, which rendered the laws moot.  Also despite making Pet ownership much harder, it did nothing to help support the million of uneducated, unskilled uplifts that were now homeless, jobless, and penniless.  Most slipped through the cracks, living on the streets, getting jammed into low-income areas, or going feral in worst cases, setting up shanty towns on the outskirts of civilization.  But some did manage to, through  donations, local charities, or very giving patrons, adjust to their new lives as individuals and eke out a modest existence.  
	One of them is a tenant in your apartment, and their rent is long overdue.   You were more or less given this apartment to manage for your parents, who in turn got it from your grandmother when her mind started to go south.  They had their own properties to look after.  At least that’s why you think they gave this for you to manage.  Frankly it seems like a total money sink.  Every day brings a new problem.  Broken AC, leaky pipes, moldy walls, creaky floorboards.  The rent only just breaks even with all the expenses it makes.  You’ve been tempted to sell it many times, but nostalgia holds you back.  Your grandmother raised you in that apartment.  The same unit that gave you some of the best years of your childhood is now getting rented out by an Uplift.
	Xiao Yu.  Panda uplift, artificial age 39, natural age 21, mother of two uplifts, father unknown, that are enrolled at an inner city high school.  She was made from scratch by some rich mogul that wanted a panda with none of the hassle of feeding or cleaning up after it.  Then she got her freedom after the Anti-Pet laws were passed.  You met her once during for an apartment interview.  She only came up to your shoulders, and the very definition of a ditzy milf.  A striped T-shirt that hugged her chest tightly, meant for someone much smaller than her, jeans that struggled to close around her, showing off her midriff.  Wide, baby bearing hips, and a bust size just as big.  Her face was not quite like other pandas you’ve seen.  Her left eye spot actually formed more of a smudge underneath her eye while her right spot was more grey than the other black spots on her fur.  And a blank look on her face that looked like she was staring through you and into the horizon.  
	She was nauseatingly happy about everything, even as she asked for an explanation of her rental contract whenever a word with more than two syllables came up.  You still remember the negotiation.
	“What’s a deposit?”
	“What counts as a reference?”
	“I used to be a Pet.  Does that mean I’m not allowed in?”
	“What’s EPA?  Is that like BMW?”
	It’d be more adorable if she wasn’t asking those dumb questions every five seconds for an hour.  How she managed to make a living for herself is a mystery to you.  You are drawn away from your thoughts by a shout “ANON!  MOLLY SPILLED THE TEA AGAIN!”
	“I DID NOT MOLLY, YOU SPOOKED ME!”
	Even since your grandmother had her stroke, her memory was shot, and as a result lives with you to keep an eye on her...and her pets.  You just bought a modest home for yourself, with plenty of room for others, but having the guest bedroom occupied by your grandmother all day, and three uplifts running around underfoot makes even your home feel cramped.  
	Three Doberman uplifts, all based on an old dog she used to own when she was younger.  Not being to original and having a stubborn streak a mile wide, she ignored your advice and named them all ‘Molly’, because it was the name of her old dog, and to confuse the hell out of everyone else.   They seem to have caught onto the joke and carry it even further.  They dress the same, usually by stealing your clothes, style their hair the same, and when feeling mischievous, act the same.  
	Normally you can tell who is who.  There’s the first Molly, first out out of the tank, first to speak, first to pick a bed, first to the dining table, always first to everything.  She’s super competitive with her sisters.  It doesn't matter if there is a competition involved.  She'll make it a competition and will do whatever it takes to be first.
	Then there’s Molly two.  She’s about as dim as your tenant Xiao Yu.  Clumsy, dumb, excitable, and a high tolerance to pain.  Good thing too.  Given the number of accidents she gets into, most people and Uplifts would be on a permanent prescription for painkillers.  But Molly two just brushes herself off and walks away.  This translates to a very calm, and surprisingly affectionate girl.
	Molly three is the exact opposite of two.  She’s smart as a whip, always looking for a way to come out on top.  And ever since she moved in with you, has been looking for a way to establish herself as alpha bitch.  The moment you put your foot down however, she stops and becomes a submissive, clingy bootlicker.  She does whatever it takes to get back on your good side.  Even if that means shifting blame onto her sisters.  Much like today.
	“Alright Molly-”
    “What Anon?” One pokes its head out of the bathroom, red, shoulder length hair, standing in all directions, the sound of a hairdryer turning off.
	“Not you, Molly, I mean Molly-”
    “I told you, Molly did it!” Another steps out from the kitchen.  Her hair is done more neatly, though unlike the other dressing in one of your T-shirts, this one has an apron and sweatpants on. 
    “No, you did it!” The third appears, pushing the second Molly aside.  This one forgot to touch her hair up this morning, frayed on one side where she slept on it, dressing in another one of your shirts, your boxers clinging to her small frame.
	“Oh you are such a liar Molly”
	“You’re one to talk Molly! You-”“ENOUGH!” you shout.  The two stop arguing and stand to attention.  Even the Molly in the bathroom meekly shuffles out after hearing your frustration, hands clamped around your white undershirt she’s wearing.  Dammit, you don’t have time for this.  You pinch the bridge of your nose and sigh.  “I don’t care who spilled the tea.  Just clean it up, brew another pot, and get it to grandma for her morning meds.  I don’t care who does it just get it done okay?”  All three nod.  “I’ll bring food back when I come home.  Burgers sound good?”
	All three run up and wrap around you.  Your legs struggle to stay upwards under the weight of three jubilant dog-girls.  
	“Thanks Anon.”
	“Extra patty on mine!”
    “No onions okay?”
	And just as quickly the girls disperse.  You suppress a smile.  They have a hell of a lot of problems, but then again that unbridled affection was the main reason most people got Pets in the first place.  As you hear the kitchen fan turn on, you make for the door.  You have business to deal with.
	You hug your zip-up hoodie closer as the biting wind from the bay blows through again.  While you aren’t in the best part of town, it is still a pretty respectable spot that allows you to charge more than what a minimum wage would cover.  Used to be coming to this apartment brought you so much happiness.  It was a home away from home.  Now every time you see the white walls and blue borders, you get a feeling of dread.  Seems like every week you have to come over because something breaks, and almost always Xiao Yu is involved.  Get a brand new boiler system installed, and somehow she manages to deprive her entire floor of hot water.  Breaks the washing machine because she forgot she had a huge rock in her clothes for ‘some reason’ she says.  Her AC busts because she keeps her window open as it runs and lets it run all day and night to ‘cool off’.  Broken windows, floor indents, leaky pipes, moldy walls, and everytime Xiao Yu shrugs, not sure how she let it happen before proceeding to explain exactly how she let it happen.  When it first happened you thought her naivete would be funny, cute even.  Now it’s just ball-grating annoying.  Really her saving grace has been her making her payments regularly.  Until now.  Time to find out why.
You head up the stairs to the second floor, pulling out a ring of keys.  You’re hit with a wave of nostalgia as you remember running down these halls, playing with the other tenants’ kids.  Looks the same.  Same paint, same smells, same mystery stain in the corner.  You freeze in front of the unit.  You stand there for a minute, before pushing your childhood memories down.  This is business.  Pulling out a ring of keys, you knock on the door as you look for the key to the lock.
	
	"Mrs. Yu, it's your landlord Anon.  You're a week late on your rent." you call out.  Silence.  You give another courtesy knock, louder.  "Mrs. Yu, are you in there?"

	You hear moaning, before a voice says, just barely loud enough to hear.  "N-now's a bad time Mister Anon.  Sir.  C-can you come back a-another time?  I am in-" Whatever else she says is drowned out by a nearby train roaring by.  The 3:15 is early.  
You find the key you were searching for, and unlock her door.  "Mrs. Yu, I'm coming in, we need to discuss your arrangements."   Before she can reply, you push open the door.  The moment you do, a blast of a musky, thick stench hits your nostrils.  Like an unwashed animal that rubbed itself on everything.  Great, the A/C in the room must be busted as well.  Again.  "Mrs. Yu" you call out as you step into the living room.

	Still no reply.  "Mrs. Yu, I know you're here" that sounds kind of dumb, but you've never had to deal with this kind of situation before.  You look around the apartment.  Everything is the same yet different  Everything that you used to remember being here is gone.  The cupboard where you stored all the video games your grandmother bought for you is gone, in its place is a small table DVD player connected to nothing.  The couch where you slept during your teenage years when you needed a break from your parents was replaced by a small table draped by a transparent table cloth.  Fuck, you feel bad now.

	You hear a quiet moan coming from the door next to the couch.  "I-I'm in the kitchen" she calls out.  That heady smell gets stronger the further you move in.  This isn't just the smell of a mature uplift there's something else to it.  Slowly, you push the door open, spotting the panda grasping at the table in the middle of the room, hunched over.  She’s rubbing her crotch against the table’s corner, white panties so drenched in her juices that it is completely see through, liquid dribbling down her leg and collecting on the floor.  You follow the trail of dribble, going from the kitchen to the atrium where you entered.  The coin finally drops.  

	You barely get to say “Ah shit” before a five foot tall Panda girl tackles you to the ground, face pressed against you as she inhales your scent, dragging her nose all the way to your neck, sloppily lapping at your chin and face with her tongue.  "Oh Anon, your smell, your taste” she moans as she rubs her crotch against your legs. “I need this so bad!"  Your brain locks up as you try in vain to remember what you read in a pamphlet about dealing with uplifts in heat.  She grabs your arms, pinning you down  as she licks every inch of your face, savoring your taste.  Then one word pops into your head.  ‘Run’.  

	You attempt to pry the horny panda mother off of you, succeeding partially.  She is surprised by your resistance, falling away but she doggedly clings to your hoodie.  You quickly unzip it with your free hand and pull free, Xiao Yu flopping to the ground still tightly wrapped around the sleeve.  “Wait!” she calls out, but you’re already out the door.  

	You don’t stop running until you reach the parking lot, grasping your car as you catch your breath.  You’re sweating bullets, your heart is up in your neck, and you have a raging boner.  Uplifts in heat are a problem, but they rarely get this serious.  Most cases, an uplift is able to stay sane enough to informs employers and landlords about their heat in advance to stop this sort of mix up from happening.  Even then there’s tranquilizers designed to even Uplifts out for severe cases. Certainly Xiao Yu would know herself enough to get some.

	Unless she wanted this to happen...maybe she wanted it...wanted...you?  Holy fuck no!  What are you thinking?!  That’s just assuming way too much!  But she’s never missed a rent payment before, even when she was sick or injured, she managed to mail her check.  No, this is estrus, way different circumstance than a flu or a sprained ankle.  Maybe she just forgot to take her tranqs.  Maybe she just forgot to tell you.  She isn’t really the brightest bulb.  But she was basically asking you for it!  But that would be wrong since it isn’t really her, it’s her heat talking.  But that’s the thing, she’s in heat.  She needs someone to help her through this.  Maybe she was hoping you could keep her under control.  And if you aren’t gonna help her, she might do something she’ll really regret when she comes down.  It’s not uncommon to hear about an Uplift in heat going out and humping the first thing with legs in public, then getting rounded up by the cops and forcibly neutered.  It’s lead to a lot of anti-Uplift sentiment, and you really don’t want to see Xiao Yu on the receiving end of that.  You have your problems with her, she has more accidents than any other tenant and her trouble with big words does grate on your nerves, but you don’t want the poor girl getting punished so severely for a mistake.  

	Slowly you make your way back up to the second floor, heart racing in your chest.  Xiao Yu’s door is still open, you can hear her inside, a mixture of moans and sobs.  Slowly you creak the door open, your stomach in knots.  She’s still where you left her, rubbing your jacket between her legs with one hand as she simultaneously chews and sniffs on its sleeve.  “No…” she cries out in a small voice.  You closing the door gets her attention as she snaps up.  In an eyeblink you’re once again pinned.  You have no idea where this woman is getting that strength of speed from!  “Oh Anon” she breathes into your ear as she rubs her crotch against yours.  “Please don’t go again, I need help.”

	She feels your boner and smiles “And I think you want to help” she laughs.  Pulling you away from the wall, she guides you to into the hall.  You don’t resist.  She kicks a door open, revealing a painfully pink room with two beds.  “Is this your daughter’s room?” you ask before she throws you down onto the closest mattress practically ripping your pants off as you fall back.  Your dick flops out in the open, making Xiao Yu squeal in delight.  “Cock…” she whispers she whispers as she grasps your member, stroking your length with one soft hand while she rubs your crown with her other index finger.   Whatever fear you had evaporates as you feel those silken pads of her hands caress your sensitive prick.  It takes almost no effort for her to bring you to climax, as you feel yourself getting achingly close.  You grunt as you feel something rising, coursing up your dick.  Xiao Yu picks up on your queue, lowering her head over your cock.  You thrust up as your first spurt of seed hits her face.  Then the next her tongue as she engulfs your cock head in her mouth, gently suckling your as her tongue caresses your tip, lapping your seed as quickly as it comes out.  Holy shit.  You don’t think you’ve ever cum so hard before, your dick pulsating as you shoot a seemingly endless stream of your gooey juice into her waiting throat.

	“Fffffuck” you murmur when you finally stop.  Xiao Yu however doesn’t stop, pulling your skin back as she swallows more of your dick into her throat, her tongue feeling like a mix of razors and cotton as it grazes your over sensitive underside. “Wait” you groan out “Let me recover first!”

	Xiao Yu doesn’t listen as she continues to blow you, seemingly fixated on getting you hard again with single minded determination.  Thankfully you haven’t shot one off in weeks so it’s real easy for you to stand at full erection again.  When she no longe feels any floppiness in your boner does she thankfully pull away, a thin trail of saliva between your glistening dick and her lips.  Ready for you, she clambers onto the bed, rubbing your wet meat against her already sopping cleft, her breathing fast and heavy.  Wait, when did she get her clothes off?  “Mmmm Anon” she moans as she mashes her breasts with her hands “Anon Anon Anon Anon” she says your name over and over, bouncing your name in her mouth like just saying it gives her pleasure.  Her hands move up her neck to her face, running her fingers through her hair.  “Ready or not, here I come!”
Using only her thighs and the stiffness of your erection, she lines her pussy in place, her wet entrance kissing your urethra for a single moment before your part her folds, sinking into her hot vagina.  Every inch of her burns with intense lust, her walls wrapping and caressing your dick as it tries to push you back out and suck you in at the same time, desperate to start fucking.  Xiao Yu’s eyes roll up as he arches her head back, moaning louder than you’ve ever heard her before.  Despite the chub around her belly, her insides feel like pure muscle as she squeezes your cock, blood pulsing through her as she starts bouncing, grasping your knees for balance.  

	Clearly experienced in the art of love making, she doesn’t even start with a slow thrust.  Instead she opts for a clever maneuver, pulling herself up as her arms push down on your legs, the upside of your dick peeking out at you as she thrusts her pussy in your direction before pulling back, sinking back down, giving the sensation that can only be described as ‘otherworldly’.  You reach up to grasp at her hips, trying to gain some semblance of control over the pace of the fucking, but Xiao Yu’s wild bucking throws them off again and again, coating your arms in her climax as she shouts out again.  Her femcum sprays across your body, her legs shake as she is wracked by orgasm after orgasm, threatening to toss her off.

	This is your chance.  With herculean effort you reach up and grab the panda milf.  She exclaims in surprise as you wrestle her down.  Now she’s on the bed and you’re up top! Xiao Yu smiles hungrily, hands grasping at your shoulders.  She wanted this!  Well lucky for her so do you.  You push her legs up, driving your prick into her puss, your head poking at her cervix as you start to piston into her, the overwhelming stench of arousal and the pleasure of her vagina driving rational thought from your mind.  “Do it Anon!” Xiao Yu yells, just as delirious as you.  “Claim me!  Mark my womb!  Make me your bitch!”

	The floodgates are open.  If your last orgasm was big, then this one was a fucking deluge of cum!  You flood her pussy with her cum as you instinctively continue to thrust, the pressure of your cock forcing your thick, white seed out as you pump more into her.  Xiao Yu hugs you close, nails digging into your back as her final climax hits her body.  She roars out in pleasure as your waist is splattered with a fine sheen of her orgasm.  It’s over in moments that stretch on into eternity.  You stay in her warm embrace, idly fondling her breasts as you both bask in the afterglow.  

	With a sigh, you pull out of her arms, your now soft penis flopping free of her pussy.  Xiao Yu follows up, grasping at your waist as she takes your semen coated cock into her mouth, sucking hard.  Okay not this time.  “Wait god dammit!” you shout as you pop your semi hard dick out of her mouth.  Xiao Yu looks hurt as she gazes up at you, a bit of your seed dripping from the side of her mouth.  “Didn’t you like it Anon?”

	“Well yes, but that’s not why, I mean this isn’t the reason I’m originally here!” you snap, much more harshly than you intended.  Xiao Yu winces as you continue on.  “I came because you missed your rent, and when I come here I find out you are in the middle of estrus, not just any estrus, but the worst case I’ve ever seen!  Why? Why did you let it go this far?  Why didn’t you do something about your  problem beforehand?”

	Xiao Yu avoids your gaze as a hand idly plays with her hair.  “I’m sorry.  I was desperate.  I'm not used being in es-estu-esr" she struggles with the word “being in estrsus-being in heat alone.” she eventually gives up.  “And well you’re the only human I know now and...” she trails off, looking at the mess she made on her daughter’s bed.

	“What do you mean only human?  What does that have to do with anything.”

	Xiao Yu puts a hand to her cheek, as if her fur wasn’t enough to hide her embarrassment.  She doesn’t need to say it, you figured it out on your own.
	
	“You fucked your old owner didn’t you”

	She slowly nods, turning to you.   “Yes, when I was still a Pet, I helped keep my owner company after his wife died.  He said how much I reminded him of her.  When I had my first heat, he...well” she plays with her fingers “well he had me.  And I loved it.  Since that time, every time I was in heat, we would have sex, and even when I wasn’t he would do it with me.  It was fun, and it felt real good. All the way to the end.”

	“And when you say ‘the end’ you mean-”

	Tears start to well up in Xiao Yu’s eyes.  “Master died.  I was at the hospital, and they said he died from a car-cardio-carding at-” she stuttered, trying to remember the right word and not cry at the same time. 

	“Cardiac Arrest” you step in.  Xiao Yu nods, sniffling.

	“It happened so soon.  After he had a stroke.  I still don’t know what a stroke is!” she cries.  “He was fine one day, then a second later, he falls on his head, shaking.  I-i try to call the ambulant, and they came to save him, but they didn’t save him and then the doctors say he had a heart thing and then I-” she starts to rant hysterically, hyperventilating.  You put a hand on her shoulder.  She freezes and remembers you’re there, looking up at you.  “And then...he died.”

	She takes a moment to collect herself before she continues “After that I found he left me a huge trust fund, and let me go.  This was long after the Anti-Pet laws, so I never learned about anything besides keeping him happy.  I had no idea how to live independently, but I was forced into it.  I also had my two daughters to take care of, and no one in his family seemed to like me.  So I had to go.  Your apartment was the first one I found.”  Her breathing starts to get heavy again.  “This was my first heat alone,  away from any human and it feels so...wrong!  Like a hole is in my and it’s empty part burns so hot!  I need to be with a human Anon, I need you!”  And now the pieces start falling into place.

	“So let me get this straight” you say.  “You need me to have sex with you?  Like literally need it?”  Xiao Yu nods.  “And you missed your rent knowing I’d come knocking?”  Xiao Yu looks like she’s ready to cry and suck you dick at the same time.
 
	“Please don’t leave me!  I promise I’ll warn you from now on!  I won’t forget to pay.  Just please, I need a human to love me again.” she moans, hugging your arm, squishing her legs together as her arousal comes back.  “Please…”

	Fuck, she looks pathetic, and you’d be lying if you said you didn’t find her attractive.  Your hardening dick is proof of that.  You grab your fallen pants, Xiao Yu following your movements.  You grab a StamUp from your pocket, an over the counter booster meant to take your gene mods and amp them up to 11 for a while.  “First off” you say as you hold the StamUp to your neck.  “I can only do this during the day.  I still have others to take care of back home” she nods as you press the plunger.  You hear a ‘snap’ sound and you feel a prick against your neck for a split second.  “Second, no freaky stuff without telling me first” Xiao Yu nods again, looking happier with every passing moment. “Third, tell me when you’re kids come home so we don’t run into them before I leave.”

	“Oh you don’t have to worry about that” Xiao you excitedly exclaims.  “They’re sleeping over at a friend’s house while I wait out my heat.  They’ll be gone all week!”  She gets off her daughter’s bed, trailing her arousal and your seed across the floor.  “So, Anon” she whispers as she drapes her arms around you “Ready for round two?”

******************************************************************************************************************************** 
    
    You were ready for round two.  More than ready for three.  Rounds four through six you were starting to get sore.  You stopped keeping track after round ten.  All you know is that by the time Xiao Yu was finally satisfied and sound asleep, the sun had already set.  

	Fuck.  Even with your booster, you barely kept up with that girl’s insatiable libido.  You fucked her on both her daughter’s beds, you fucked her on the floor, you fucked her on the kitchen counter, on the kitchen table, on the sofa, in the bathroom shower, and so many places, you’re sure you left your cum splattered over every square inch of that apartment.  By the end you left her in her bedroom sound asleep, fur crusty with layers of dried sweat and semen.  Treating yourself to an extra long shower to wash away the scent of horny Panda, you drove home, trying desperately to keep your eyes open.  Oh wait.  You still had to feed the Mollys…

********************************************************************************************************************************

    “Anon’s back!” One of the Mollys shouts.  You haven’t even closed the door before three doberman Uplifts swarm you.
    
	You’re not sure if it’s the dog in them or if they genuinely happy you manage to come home, but they always do this every day you come home.  Well for the most part.  Usually after you have to pry them off or lure them away with food.  This is the first time they jump away.  They stare at you like you’re made of poison.  “Something wrong girls?”
    
	“That smell.” Submissive Molly says.
    
	“You’ve been with a woman haven’t you?” asks Passive Molly.
    
	Damn.  You took an extra long shower, washing yourself three times, even scrubbing your crotch raw, and they could still smell Xiao Yu on you.  You were hoping to avoid the awkward questions when you came home.  Guess that’s not gonna happen.  You sigh “Yes girls, I’ve...well I’ll just say it I...slept.  With.  Uh” you cough and quietly finish “panda...uplift.  And I’m probably gonna do it again.  See she’s in heat and...” you trail off waving your hand around.
   
	You weren’t sure how they’d react, but they seem to just stare dumbfounded at you.  You just stand uncomfortably in front of them as they fidget around, until you finally decide to break the silence, holding up a greasy bag of fast food  “I also brought burgers home.”
    
	“Oh...okay” Assertive Molly replies,  slowly reaching out to grab the bag.  They retreat to the kitchen slowly, not at all like they usually do, screaming and laughing and pulling you along.  
    
	“Is something wrong with grandma?” you ask.  You don’t get a reply.  Now you’re worried.  You run to the guest bedroom, throwing the door open.  Your grandmother is still in bed, looking to you in dull surprise.
    
	“Oh.  Who are you?” she asks.  You are filled with relief and concern as your grandmother appears to be the same as usual.  “I’m your grandson.” you reply.
    
	“I have a grandson?”
    
	“Two.”
    
	“I have two grandsons?”
    
	“Yes.”
    
	“Oh.  Are you married yet?  You look old enough to be married.”
    
	“No grandma, I’m not...well I’m in a complicated relationship

	“That’s stupid.  Just fuck a girl and marry her.  It’s how your grandfather and I got together.  Where is my dog?”
    
	“Molly died grandma.  You have uplifts now.  You don’t call them dog.  You call them Pets.”
    
	“Why?”
    
	“Because they are uplifts.”
    
	“Okay.  What are their names?”
    
	“Molly.”
    
	“Molly and…”
    
	“You named them all Molly.”
    
	“Why would I do something as stupid as that?” 
    
	“I don’t know grandma.”

    “Grandma?  Are you my grandson?”

    “Yes grandma, go back to sleep.”

    “Okay sure.  I’m tired anyway.  You can explain all this in the morning.”

    Grandma seems to be doing fine.  It took her longer to forget you were her grandson that usual.  You have no idea what it is that is upsetting the Mollys.

	By the time you get to the kitchen, the bag has been emptied, the dishes cleaned up.  Normally the Mollys would wait around and tease and beg you for your burger.  This time they left in on the table, still wrapped.  Very strange.  
    
	After dinner, you retire to your bedroom, writing an email to your boss why you’ll need a week off, and writing up a list of things you’ll need tomorrow.  You exhausted your supply of boosters, you’re gonna need more.  That panda was insatiable.  This is usually time when you’d just play some multiplayer games until you were too tired to read the chat, but you’re already exhausted.  Barely getting out of your pants, you crawl into bed and collapse.
    
	You are roused when you hear your door open, three pairs of feet shuffling as quietly as they can along your wooden floor.  “You think Anon’s really going to leave us?” you hear one of the Mollys whisper.
    
	“No, he can’t.  He won’t right?” one of them replies.
    
	“I...I don’t know.”

	The Mollys think you’re still asleep as they crawl into your bed.  Three arms drape around your as they hug their bodies close, enveloping you in fuzzy, warm dog fur.  

    “I don’t want Anon to leave.”  You only fall asleep after you hear them softly snoring.
	The sun hitting your face means it’s time to wake up.  Prying your eyes open, you find yourself alone, the Mollys had left your bed while you were still asleep, your bed still crumpled where they lay next to you.   Oh god, you are sore.  Xiao Yu’s escapades are catching up to you.  Still, can’t turn down awesome sex like this.  Getting up, you stretch yourself out before showering off the accumulated doberman hairs, dander, and caked on dog drool.  The Mollys aren’t in the kitchen, but your grandmother is.  Not good.  She can’t even remember she turned on the stove a minute after doing it.  The Mollys are normally here doing it.  If you’re grandma’s out of bed, that means they aren’t doing their job!  Where the hell are they?
    “Grandma!  You shouldn’t be here.”
    “Why the hell not?” she shoots back.  “I’m thirsty and I want tea!”
    “I’ll get you your tea grandma, alright?  Just go back to bed.”
    “I don’t want to go to bed, I have to take a shit.”
    “Then go to the bathroom grandma and I’ll get your tea.”
    “Fine, make sure to add ice and honey.  Where’s the shitter?”
    “Right next to your room grandma.”
	“And where’s my room?”
	“Down the hall to the right.”
	“So right to my right.  Fine.”
	You sigh as you set up your coffee maker to just dispense hot water, and shut the stove off.  While the machine starts boiling its water store, you search for the Uplifts.  “Molly?” you call out.  No answer.  You reach their bedroom, door closed.  “Molly!” you call through the door.  Still no reply.  You push open the door and find...no one.  Unless.
“Molly, come out of the closet.” You say, stamping your foot.  The closet door creaks open, and calm Molly meekly shuffles out, head down, wearing one of your T-Shirts, fabric stretched so that it covers her to her knees.  “All of you.” you command.  Next comes competitive Molly, dressed in a tank top and sweatpants. Lastly comes assertive Molly, dressed in one of your button up shirts, draped over a pair of white panties, trying as hard as she can to avoid your gaze.
“You know where I saw grandma this morning?”
    They fidget around, and mumble an incoherent reply.  Fuck sake, you really don’t want to deal with this shit in the morning, especially feeling like you do.  “Okay then” you grunt.  “She’s heading to the bathroom now.  One of you get her morning tea, and the other two help her back to bed.  She seems a little better this morning so she shouldn’t be too difficult.  Can you please do that for me?” 
	The Mollys don’t say anything. Competitive and Assertive leave wordlessly, competitive Molly breaking into a jog to the kitchen while assertive heads for the bathroom, holding her breath.  Grandmother has this amazing ability to drop shits that smell like hell’s outhouse.  Submissive Molly finally looks at you, opening her mouth to say something, then closing it.  Then opening it again, and closing it again.  Then she finally finds her voice.  “I’m sorry Anon.  A-are you going to see the panda again?”
	That’s out of nowhere.  “Well I did promise to help her out this week so yeah.  I’m kind of stuck in this now.”
Submissive Molly slowly nods before giving you a quick hug.  “Come back soon Anon.” she whispers before she leave to deal with your grandmother.  Well at least it didn’t lead to an argument.  Small mercies and all that.  You grab a banana and head out the door.  You don’t remember but you think fruit like bananas helped with stamina in the bedroom or something.  Even so, it may be best to stock up on those StamUps for this week.  You’re gonna get quite a workout…
********************************************************************************************************************************
	Backpack filled with condoms, StamUps, bananas, and water, you tenaciously approach Xiao Yu’s room.  You barely tap on the door before she opens the door, wearing nothing but a very transparent négligée.  “Anon” she moans, big smile on her lips.  “How nice of you to drop by.  I was just getting ready to take a shower.” she tries to act coy, but she must have been waiting by the door for hours for you to arrive, given how quickly she answered.
	You push her back, stepping in, and closing the door with your foot.  You notice, she had scented candles lit...everywhere.  The blinds were drawn on her windows, and none of the lights were on.  “Shower huh?” you ask rhetorically.  Setting your bag down, you pull out a StamUp, it’s pretty clear she’s already in the mood.  Feeling a familiar sensation injecting into your neck, you flex your limbs as you undo your jacket.  “Okay, let’s get started.” you say once free of your jacket, pulling your shirt off and pushing out of your shoes.  Xiao Yu just gapes at you in confusion and arousal, put off by your ‘straight to business’ attitude but too horny to complain.
	“Well if you really want to get to the good part, I can’t complain” she smirks, undoing the string to the front of her 	underwear, if you can call it that, letting the see through fabric fall away as she  guides you to her bed.  Pushing you down, she straddles your legs and leans in, grabbing your hand and guiding it to her breasts.  You grab one of her fuzzy orbs, giving it a squeeze as you wrap your other arm around her.  Xiao Yu responds by meeting you halfway, pressing her lips to yours as her tongue pushes its way into your mouth, pressing against yours as her hands explore your body, one rubbing your hardening bulge in your pants, and another undoing your belt.  Her breathing gets faster as she undoes your button, grasping your pants sleeves with her toes and slowly pulling it off.  You have no idea what she did with her previous owner, but it’s like magic as she gets your pants down using only her feet, desire burning in your stomach as your hardon springs out of your boxer fly.  She gasps in your mouth, soft hand slowly wrapping around your shaft.  “Mmm, I’ve missed this” she breathes when she pulls away.  You try to get up, but she pushes you back down.  “Not yet” she says.  “Let me enjoy you.”
	She moves down, kissing your neck as she tightens her grip on your cock.  When she starts licking your chest her hand begins to slowly stroke your length. Her thumb begins to massage your crown as she moves to your nipples, tongue lapping and teeth nibbling at your sensitive nubs.  Already you find yourself nearing your climax, her warm hand on your dick feels like a soft glove, driving you nuts and she knows it.  Her tongue glides on your bare skin as she moves for your member.  Smiling, she positions her lips right above your reddened cock head.  She slips the head of your shaft into her mouth as she pulls down, slurping on your meat for a second before pulling back up, her hand moving in pace with her head along your length.  Then she does it again, and again, never too fast to send you over the top, not too slow to let you calm down.  You reach up to grasp her head, and she lightly slaps your hands away as she continues to work you over.  She’s setting the pace.  Not you.  Not now.  Your hands, with nothing to grab, clench her bedsheets as you involuntarily push up when she bobs down, your dick aching for the warmth of her mouth.  Then she lets go, flat stops.  Why?!
	Xiao Yu looks up at you, a teasing smile on her face.  “Oh no Anon, you aren’t coming into my hands.” she moans, hands moving to her breasts.  “No, I want that creamy man-stuff in me somewhere else.”
She pulls herself up, your cock standing painfully erect.  Again you reach down.  You have to nut!  You don’t need anything besides the bliss of release, but that bitch slaps your hand away again!  Fucking hell woman!  Xiao Yu enjoys your frustration as she slowly positions her sopping wet snatch against the underside of your dick. It feels like she rested your dick on a warm pillow, her wet vulva spreading open as she glides up your meatshaft until it’s kissing the entrance to her pussy.  She positions her feet on your hips, and her hands on your chest.  “Ready?” she asks.
	You don’t even get to reply.  She drops down, her cleft swallowing your cock, her inner walls squeezing around the sudden intruder.  And she pulls back up again, your cock now coated in her arousal, feeling suddenly cold outside her warm vagina, before Xiao Yu drops down again, forcing the air out of you every time she smashes into your pelvis.   You simply can’t take anymore! Ignoring her hands grasping at yours, you latch onto her hips, pushing her down as your cock twitches.
Hot seed pours straight into Xiao Yu, the panda milf shouting out in ecstasy as she feels you filling her, forming an 'o' with her mouth as she lets your orgasm trigger her own climax.  She grasps your hands for support as her legs shake, white seed and clear fluid leaking from your love seal.
	Xiao Yu slowly rises, up, putting a hand over her vulva as your softening member pops out of her hole.  "Oh I really missed you Anon" she leans down and plants a kiss on your dick.  "I missed this too."
	She leaves the room, giving your leg a pat before she goes.  A couple of minutes later, she returns with your bag, tossing you a water bottle as she grabs one herself.  "You thought of everything didn't you?"
	"Well it was pretty hard trying to get a glass of water yesterday with you sucking me off" you remark.
Xiao Yu sticks her tongue out.  "Don't act like you didn't like it." she teases before gulping down her bottle.  
True you did.  But it didn't stop you from being thirsty as fuck.  Even drinking water, Xiao Yu looks sexy, letting a small trickle of it dribble down her neck, soaking into her fur, slipping down between her pert bosom and down to her belly button.  Fuck you're getting hard again.  "Well I'm ready for another go if you are" you say, motioning your head to your stiffening cock.
	"Oh I'm ready for you Anon"  Xiao Yu smiles.  "I've been ready for a long time" she replies as she climbs back on the bed, brushing her vagina against your dick, her heat radiating from it.
	With no foreplay this time, she sinks back down onto you.
********************************************************************************************************************************
	The Mollys are glum.  Grandma is back in bed, and now they have the rest of the day to themselves.  Normally they'd spend this time plotting new ways to prank Anon, binge watch seasons of Contest of Thrones on Anon's account, masturbate to porn on their computer, steal Anon's clean laundry, dunk their heads and smell Anon's dirty laundry, or any number of things the kill time until Anon came home.  They didn't feel like doing anything today though.
	They gathered around the kitchen table, Submissive Molly idly fiddling with an empty cup, Assertive Molly tapping her finger, Competitive Molly tapping slightly faster.  They weren't saying anything to each other, but the same thing was on all their minds.
	'We're losing Anon.'
	"Alright since no one else is saying it" Competitive Molly states "I will.  What are we going to do about Anon?"
	"What can we do?" Submissive Molly shrugs
	"We can stop him from leaving tomorrow."
    "And just how are we supposed to do that Molly, tell him he can't go?"
    "Well I dunno, make up a reason!  I can't think of anything right now!"
    "You never think of anything!"
    "Uh hello?  I'm the one that erases our internet history so Anon doesn't know we watch porn!  You're welcome!"
    "Maybe that's why he doesn't notice us, you ever think of that?"
    "He's too nice to look at our computer.  We asked him for that laptop for our privacy remember? he'd never look at it unless we asked him to."
    "So you really don't do anything do you Molly?"
    "Hey don't blame me Molly!  Anon just gets annoyed with us because of all the pranks you pull on him!"
    "I didn't hear you disagree with me once!"
    "I was thinking it!  We were both thinking it!"
    "Actually I wasn't really thinking it, I was just hoping Anon wouldn't get hurt..."
    "Yeah and you think I can read your thoughts?!"
    "MOLLY!  SHUT THE FUCK UP" grandma yells from across the house.
    Assertive Molly jumps out of her chair in shock.  Meekly climbing back up into her seat she sighs.  "Sorry Molly."
    "I'm sorry too Molly."
    "So am I..."
    "You didn't do anything Molly, it's okay."
    "But we still don't know what to do about Anon."
    "You're right.  If we don't do something, that Bitchy Bear's going to steal Anon from us."
********************************************************************************************************************************
    “Fuck me” you breathe as you lie down on the kitchen floor “you are insatiable!”
    Xiao Yu lays on top of you, your latest orgasm leaking out of her pussy as your dick slowly softens and slips out, laying her head on your chest, hearing your heart beat.  “What can I say, humans are a huge turn on for me.”
    “How the fuck did we get out here again?” you ask.  The last four hours are just a haze of lusty, fluid filled sex and it all just blends together.
    “You forgot the petplay already Anon?” Xiao Yu chides, holding up the leash you attached to a pair of fuzzy handcuffs she was wearing.  “That was the best part.”
    You push yourself up, Xiao Yu hoisting herself off of you “I honestly prefer the stuff in the bedroom, tile floors have shitty support.” you grunt, getting the cricks out of your spine.  Xiao Yu fishes out the keys for her cuffs from you have no idea where, flexing her wrists as she frees herself.
    “You seem to be pretty experienced with this though Anon...um...anyone help you back home?” she tentatively asks.  “I know it’s a bit late but I wouldn’t want to get in the way of you and anyone else…”
    “Yeah, real late.  But don’t worry, I don’t have anyone.  I just live with my grandma and her Pets.”
    “P-pets!?” Xiao Yu exclaims.  “You have Pets?”
    “Well actually they belong to my grandmother.  Then again, she can’t take care of them anymore, much less herself, so I guess they are unofficially mine.”
    “That explains the dog smell” Xiao Yu says to herself.  She turns back to you, beginnings of an odd smile on her face.  “S-so you don’t mind owning pets?”
    “No, not really” you reply without any hesitation.  Yeah there’s a bit of a stigma about owning Uplifts as Pets.  Some people call you a slave driver, fascist, and beast fucker.  Well you suppose that last one’s true now, but eh.  You don’t really care.  Most people that actually know you don’t know or really care about you keeping Pets so it’s never bothered you.
    “Wow, most humans I run into treat my time as a Pet like some horrible thing” she shakes around “when it was probably some of the happiest years of my life.”
    “Well Anti-Pet sentiment got people riled up, so it’s no surprise” you look up at the kitchen clock.  “Ah shit, it’s that late already?  Sorry, I gotta run.  I’ll see you tomorrow Xiao Yu.”
    “Just call me Yu” Xiao Yu smiles as she gives you a kiss on the cheek.  Not a sort of lusty, bend-me-over-and-fuck-my-brains out kind of kiss but an I’ll-miss-you kiss.  Maybe this is more than just helping her with her ‘problem’?  Nah.
********************************************************************************************************************************
    As Anon leave, Xiao Yu is busily scribbling something on paper, barely able to contain her excitement.  She gives her note a once over before hugging it close.   “Ooh a couple more days of this, and I’m back on track!  Oh but what to call this?”
    She makes a hasty scribble, and shoves it into her drawer by her bed.  She jumps into bed, grabbing the pillow Anon had been laying on, laughing giddily, legs kicking in the air.  “Oooh Anon, I’ll make you mine yet!”
	You didn’t really take a shower in the apartment, so you come home reeking of Xiao Yu and cum, and it’s turning you on.  Can’t let the Mollys smell this, they seemed upset enough when they got a slight whiff of your sex last time.  You strip down, throwing all your clothes in the washer downstairs, and step into the small bathroom adjacent to the garage.  It’s almost never used, filled with rust, and the shower head is more like a hose than an actual shower, but you’ll take anything right now. A rush of cold water hits you, chasing away any horniness that you might have had.  You really needed that.  You need to think with a clear head, not one befuddled by the lingering sensations of panda pussy squeezing your-NOPE none of that!
	You got to get your mind on other things!  Like how to deal with the Mollys.  They were upset enough about learning about you and your tenant.  They weren’t anymore thrilled this morning either.  There’s some unspoken tension there, and when it comes to awkward situations, you usually have to be the one that speaks first, otherwise the Mollys will just fidget around in their own discomfort forever. Well, they really like Italian food.  Maybe break the tension with some lasagna?  Yeah, they always fight with each other over who gets to eat the leftover meat and sauce in the pan.  That might work.
	Throwing on some old clothes that don’t really smell that bad, you head upstairs.  You head to the kitchen and pull out the pasta from the pantry, and the other ingredients from the fridge.  Funny thing about the ground pork is how it’s procured.  Since the creation of Uplifts there hasn’t been much of an increase of pressure to get rid of the meat industry altogether.  There have been rumblings about how it can be traumatizing for Uplifts of cattle animals, but the Uplifts themselves seem divided about the subject.  Some call it an atrocity that needs to be banned, and just as many see themselves as above the cattle that go to slaughter, looking down at the animals and the Uplifts that support their ‘liberation’ or whatever, preferring their human side to their animal side as the dominant genetics, and therefore find nothing wrong with cattle getting slaughtered?  At least you think that’s the current line.  You don’t put much attention on it unless you see a headline about an Uplift raid on a factory farm, or blowing up a slaughterhouse with improvised bombs.
	And then there are the Uplifts that have turned to the farming industry to make a living.  Mammal Uplifts market their milk, specifically as Uplift milk as an excuse to mark up the prices, both for as of yet unproven health benefits, and to appeal to fetishists that want to drink cow milk but don’t have an actual teat to suck. Of course no one says that second part out loud, but everyone knows it.  The ads for Uplift milk are far too suggestive to suggest otherwise.  Bird Uplifts have formed their own community selling their unfertilized eggs.  There isn’t a set system for how it’s done.  Some do it full time, others treat it like giving blood, heading to one of the many laying houses, popping them out, and getting paid a comfy fee for it.  They all get bunched together, sorted for size and quality, then shipped out for the markets.  The increased quality and size of these eggs ensured Uplift egg companies like F&S stole the egg market away from the usual poultry farmers.  Used to be they were a luxury good sold only in farmer’s markets.  Now eggs the size of your fist have become the norm.  You have a carton of them in the fridge; and they make good omelettes and you really don’t mind the source as long as you don’t think about the fact that there’s a chance it came out of the butt of someone you know.
	The smell of grilling onions rouses you back to reality.  Your mother taught you how to make this alongside a bazillion other recipes that it’s nearly muscle memory at this point.  You don’t measure anything out, just eyeballing everything as you chop up garlic and onions and grilling the pork and beef while the oven preheats.  First time you tried making this it took you 3 hours of trial and error.  Now you got it ready for the oven in 30 minutes flat.  On to the cheese bread.  You know Calm Molly loves her cheese bread.
In about an hour and a half, the smell of lasagna is wafting through the house.  Slowly you hear the sound of three girls trying to creep up the kitchen without you noticing.  You pretend you don’t see them peering in from under the counter, or how one of them is trying to subtly grab your leftover beef.  “So” you say as you slam your hands on the counter.  As one, the three Mollys jump up in surprise.  “Mind setting the table?”
    Sheepishly two of the Mollys get the dishes and silverware, while another goes to bring grandma from her bedroom.  By the time your alarm goes off, the Mollys are all seated, staring at you like a cat, following your every movement as you slowly pull the finished dish from the oven.  Your grandma is idly playing with her fork while reaching for her umpteenth napkin to blow her nose.  Tenderly handling the hot pan with a rag, you set it in the middle of the table on a ceramic place-mat you kept from your junior high days in shop class.  
    “Alright” you announce, gesturing the feast in front of you.  “Dig in.”
    The table becomes a hurricane of activity as the Mollys all at once reach for the bread, the soda, the pasta, the napkins, the water.  You slowly eat your own modest cut of the lasagna, savoring each bite, while your grandmother pokes hers with her finger.
    “The fuck is this?”
    “Lasagna grandma.”
    “Your my grandson?”
    “Yes grandma.”
    “Oh.  Why am I here?”
    “It’s dinner.”
    “No I mean why am I here, and not home?”
    This again...when your grandmother gets an anxiety attack she loops the same three questions over and over ‘Who are you?’, ‘Why am I here’, and ‘How long till I can go home?’
    The real answers are ‘Your grandson’, ‘Because you’re memory is fucked’, and ‘Never’ but you can’t tell her that without her anxiety getting worse, and then she’ll start flinging food at you.  So you settle with the usual lines.
    “Your home is being fumigated grandma.  It has bugs.”
    “Oh come on bugs?  What’s so bad about bugs?  How long till I can go home?”
    “One more week grandma.”
    “Alright then.  Who are you?”
    This loop continues throughout the meal.  Eventually the Mollys stop being silent and start joining in.
    “Anon is your grandson.”
    “You’re here because you’re house is getting fixed.”
    “Three more days.”
    “We’re your pets Oma.”
    Oma.  That’s what they call your grandmother.  You used to call her that as a kid as well.  Not anymore.  When you do, she slips back into German, which you can’t speak.  And that starts a whole new line of questions that loop around on itself over and over.  Oddly enough when the Mollys call her Oma she doesn’t start speaking German, like she knows they can’t speak a word of her mother tongue, and they only picked up ‘Oma’ from somewhere else.
    With your grandmother constantly badgering you and her Pets for answer, the Mollys finally stop with the cold shoulder, opening up to you like it usual.  Food wins the day again.  They start talking with you, grandma, each other.  It feels like things are returning to normal.
    “Hey Anon, something’s wrong with our laptop, can you check it out?” Competitive Molly asks.  Assertive Molly’s eyes dart from her to you, like something bad was just said.
    “Sure” you accept as you start to take your emptied plate to the sink.  “What’s the problem.”
    Competitive Molly shifts in her seat.  “It’s um.  It’s our...um”
    Calm Molly chimes in “It’s out internets.  It won’t go anymore.  Did we run out of apps?”
    You inwardly cringe from the butchering of tech lingo.  “What do you mean?” you ask, trying to gauge what exactly she means.
    Assertive Molly blurts out.  “Our video!  The video site.  The one with the buttons.  It doesn’t download the video anymore.”
    Of course it doesn’t download, it’s a streaming service.  But you understand what she means.  The page probably doesn’t load the video or stops halfway.
    “And then on the other pages, we can’t click anything.  And sometimes we try to click and nothing happens, the screen just stays in that place.”
    The problem is starting to become clear in your mind.  You tell them to clean up after they’ve finished fighting over who gets to lick the lasagna pan.  Taking your grandma in your arm, you escort her back to her bedroom.  As soon as you leave you can hear the crashing of silverware on the floor as the Mollys start fighting over the leftovers.
    “I think those dogs want something from you.” she says.
    “We don’t call them dogs anymore grandma, they’re called Pets.”
    “Dogs are Pets.  Why the fuck should anyone make that distinction, they’re the same damn thing.”
    “Because calling them ‘dogs’ is impolite grandma, there are still real dogs too.”
    “Oh like calling Germans ‘Krauts’?”
    “Something like that.”
    “Or Russians ‘Vodka Niggers’?”
    “Who calls them that?”
    “I do.  Stop interrupting.   Those fogs want something from you.”
    “Yes, to fix their computer.”
    “Why do you need to fix the computer?”
    “Molly said something was wrong.”
    “And Molly’s my dog right?”
    You set your grandmother to bed, after repeating the same questions several more times until you finally go to the Mollys’ room.  Their laptop is open, fan running so hard you can hear it across the room as it tries to keep the CPU cool.  Pressing the space bar, the screen lights up and you are greeted with a desktop filled with webpages.  One has...47 open tabs?!  Fucking hell you know the Mollys aren’t tech wizards but this?  This is just...ignorant!  Why does anyone even need 47 tabs in the first place?  Scanning the top, you see a lot of open tabs to ‘Ningenbooru’ whatever that is.  That better not be porn. 
    It’s porn.  Lots of drawn human-ningen on Pet porn.  Majority of the tabs are comic pages from some Japanese artist entitled ‘Pet Harem: My Lovely Dogs are Drying Me Out”, each page detailing the life of a man named Wataru who keeps various Dog, Cat, and Fox Uplifts as pets, and every waking moment of his life at home is spent trying to avoid his sex starved Pets in a cramped, two room apartment.  This lead to pages upon pages of him getting sucked or fucked until he can’t use his legs anymore.  
Geez you knew the Mollys were at that point where they were getting interested in sex, but actually seeing it is another.  Is this how your parents felt when they caught you jerking off?  
	Back to the problem at hand, the browser lags considerably with everything.   Switching tabs takes a minuted, and loading the page takes longer.  Looking down, you see the browser has...ten pages open?   How did?  You switch to another page.  It’s more porn!  This one is PetHub, a streaming service for Uplift pornography of every kind.  Several videos with a human fucking an Uplift are open, the girls paused mid-climax, a look of delirious pleasure locked onto their face.  The entire page is nothing but tabs to PetHub videos!  67 tabs!  It’s amazing this refurbished laptop can support this at all without the browser crashing!
Switching to the task manager, you select the browser application and force the whole thing to shutdown.  That was insane.  And also hot.  Maybe it’s the residual effects of taking so much StamUp, maybe it’s been the last two days with Xiao Yu, but all that Pet Porn is such a fucking turn on!  Still, this is the Mollys!  You thought they spent all their time buying movies with your credit card.  Not this!  How long does this go?
	You open the browser again, single tab, and check the history.  It has a folder for ‘Older than six months’.  For more than six months, the Mollys have glutted themselves with human-on-Uplift porn.  Welp there’s only one solution for this.  Delete fucking everything.  What a shock, that was all it needed.  The browser now works fine, video streaming doesn’t freeze anymore, and they have plenty of ‘apps’ to go around.  You close the laptop and make your way to the kitchen.  Calm Molly is busy wiping every inch of the lasagna pan with her tongue until it is spotless, while the other two are roughhousing for the last piece of cheese bread.  You clear your throat to get their attention.
	“Well I fixed your machine.   It should be running fine now” you say.  
	You are about to admonish them for having so much fucking porn open the browser, but you hesitate.  This could just be a natural part of growing up for them, you don’t want to get in the way of that.  In a way, the Mollys are going through the same thing as you, and like you, they probably don’t want some nosy authority telling them not to masturbate or whatever.  Still you should say something about it.  Just don’t touch the subject directly?  You notice the Mollys eyeing you intently.  You finally speak up.  “Just” you hold up your hands.  “Just don’t go too crazy okay?  Otherwise you get all desensitized to the real thing.”
And with that you head to your room.  You got another long day tomorrow.  Imagine that.  A day of crazy sex is already feeling like a chore for you.  As you head down, you hear the Mollys talking with each other.
	“The hell does that mean?”
	“I dunno.  Molly?  You sure you left it open?”
	“Yeah, everything, even the bookmarked stuff.”
	“Then what the fuck’s he talking about?!”
	“Not so loud Molly, he’ll hear you!”
	Whatever it is they’re bickering about, you have officially run out of fucks to give and head to bed.
Another great day.  Not too hot, not too cold, the perfect weather. You decide to spend this morning out on the patio, a simple breakfast of eggs on toast with a cup of coffee, enjoying the breeze and the occasional chirp of a bird, croak of a frog, or even the bark of the squirrels.  You have your phone out set to play some video you aren't actually paying attention to.  
You set down your phone when you hear footsteps approaching.  Looking behind you, and your lovely pet Xiao Yu is in the door frame, totally nude save for a silver collar around her neck, her hair grown down to her fuzzy butt.  When you make eye contact, she smiles and looks away embarrassed, trying to hide her ample bosom in the tray she’s carrying.  “Refill your cup master?”, she asks presenting the tray.
           “Yes thank you, I've been wanting another cup” you reply.  You grasp the pot on the tray, filling your cup to halfway, swirling the dark liquid around.  “Needs a little cream” you comment as you reach for your panda pet.  
Xiao Yu gasps as you cup one of her boobs, positioning your cup under her nipple, and squeeze some fresh breast milk out.  “Ahn, master” she whines, rubbing her legs together “that’s for the baby.”
“The baby will have plenty later” you reply without hesitation.  “I’m thirsty now.”  You let the milk diffuse into the hot drink and set it aside, looking back at Xiao Yu.  “Oh but are you thirsty?  Does the mother want a drink?”
         Xiao Yu puts on her innocent face, finger poking her lip.  “Oh, will master let me have a drink?”
         “ Something like that” you say as you pull down your pants, your member hard as a rock.  Xiao Yu sets her tray down, kneeling between your legs.  
      “Oooh do I have to drink it out of here?”
         “You got it pet.  Best get started.”  You close your eyes in anticipation for one hell of a blowjob.  Instead you feel a set of teeth nibbling on it.  Your eyes snap open as you look back down and see the Mollys surrounding your cock, wearing the same collars as Xiao Yu, as naked as the day they were born. Competitive Molly is gnawing at your pecker like a steak bone.  “Hey, how do you get the flavor out?” Calm Molly asks as she laps at your head, her tongue like rough fabric. 
  “You’re doing it wrong” Assertive Molly yells “ you gotta squeeze the bottom like this!”  
         She reaches for your balls, her claws looking a hell of a lot sharper than you remember.
         “Hands off!” You shout in terror, jumping up, and falling out of bed.  The pain of crashing to the hard floor ass first jolts you awake.  That was one hell of a dream!  You aren't sure if it was discovering the Mollys’ porn-scapades or the constant sex with Xiao Yu or both. Checking the clock, you see it's only three in the morning.  Looking down, you got a raging hard on.  It's pretty obvious you aren't going back to sleep until you deal with this.  You make your way to the bathroom, locking the door behind you.  Setting yourself over the toilet, you start vigorously jerking off, dwelling on the the fragments of the dream you still remember:  
Xiao Yu as a your pet.
Xiao Yu happily serving you nude, her breasts swollen with milk.
Xiao Yu’s lips ready to close around your dick. 
Even the nude Mollys servicing you in their blundering way.
Fuck you are about to-
    THUMP! THUMP! THUMP!
The noise upstairs tells you someone is awake and in the bathroom directly above yours.  You immediately shut the light off.  Gotta finish this quick!

****************************************************************************************************

Though the Mollys are adults, their minds are still like that of a teenager in puberty.  A cocktail of hormones and emotions cascading in their minds making them act irrationally and rashly.  It also makes them dwell on things.  Lewd things.  
It started as another prank, hiding a spycam they bought with Anon’s card in Anon’s bathroom so they could embarrass anon with his indigestion and fart noises.  Calm Molly, despite not being people smart, or book smart, or social smart, or most kinds of smart, was tech smart.  She set up a live feed on their laptop and even started recording footage their little spycam caught.  First day they turned it on, they caught Anon with his pants down, literally.  The Mollys didn’t find it funny.  No.  They were curious.  It caused a stir in the pit of their guts.
Anon had a thing between his legs, they didn’t ever see before.  So they went to their only source of information, Oma.  After repeating their question several times, she  pulled out a medical book and taught the Mollys about ‘sex’.  It didn’t sate them.  It didn't’ make the stirring in their guts go away.  Instead it grew and expanded, flaring into their stomachs.  They needed to see more.  
Searching it on the internet yielded many interesting results.  Including ningenbooru.  A new world was opened to the Mollys, a new form of affection between Human and Uplift.  Humans sticking their peni-no their cocks into their pets’ vagin-pussy!  It was amazing.  The Mollys would crowd around their laptop, hands slowly reaching down between their legs to explore themselves.  The fire in their stomachs became a roaring flame, a burning desire to experience sex for themselves as they probed themselves with fingers, pencils, and each others’ tongues.   It wasn’t enough!  They needed real cock!  And there was a man nearby that became the object of their desires:  Anon.
Calm Molly felt the urge coming back, a heady dream of Anon taking her waking her up.  She was so fucking horny now, but her sisters were still fast asleep.  Keeping as quiet as possible, she snuck her way to the laptop, taking it out of the charger, and deftly carrying it to the bathroom, locking the door behind her.
She sets herself on the floor, right onto the fluffy bathroom mat, slowly stripping off Anon’s used boxers and sets the laptop beside her.  One hand placed over her pussy, and the other on the computer’s touchpad, she pulls open her personal porn stash hidden in the music folder under ‘Molly’s Calming Sounds.’  She pulls open a manga of a Shiba Inu Uplift roleplaying with her human boyfriend.  The human puts a leash on her and begins to lead her around the block, forcing her to walk on all fours, pussy exposed before bringing her to his backyard and making her beg for his cock.  Calm Molly sighs as she feels her fingerpads brush against her cleft, sending shivers down her spine, and making the fire inside grow.  Her thoughts drifted to Anon, holding her by a leash, putting his cock inside her, filling her up.  She slides one finger in, hissing as she grits her teeth.  She’s only getting started when-she notices something out of the corner of her eye.  A light turns on outside the bathroom window.  That’s Anon’s bathroom!  He’s awake?  Maybe…
            Molly tentatively reaches for her webcam application, opening it up.  Every second drags like an hour as the program seeks to establish a connection with the spycam.  Suddenly Calm Molly is greeted with a wonderful feed of downstairs: Anon, grasping his towel rack while jerking himself off!  Molly quietly gasps as she grabs her discarded pair of boxers.  She slams its crotch area into her snout, the smell of her nethers mixing with the scent of Anon, the combined smells making her hornier than ever.  She imagines Anon’s member probing into her pussy, timing her fingers in pace with Anon stroking his dick.  It isn’t the biggest she’s seen, but she doesn’t care.  It’s Anon and she wants it insider her so bad!  Her tail wags furiously as she starts to chew the boxer fabric, trying to get more of Anon’s taste as she approaches climax.  This has been the closest she ever experienced to the real thing!  She’s so close!  Fuck!  She-
            Her legs start involuntarily start kicking, pounding into the floor rhythmically.
            THUMP!  THUMP!  THUMP!
    Anon jumps when you kick the floorboards, shutting the lights off.  ‘Stupid Molly!  Stupid!’ Calm Molly chastises herself.  She can only make out the silhouette of Anon as he attempts to finish himself off.  Calm Molly rested her head against the wall, wiping up her climax with Anon’s boxers, fabric stretched from her explosive orgasm.  “Fuck, I need help” she whispers aloud.
             
****************************************************************************************************

The next couple of days are uneventful.  No, ‘uneventful’ isn’t the right word.  ‘Grating’ sounds better.  
The Mollys continue to sulk, and they become less careful about hiding their porn.  You find printed sheets of Human on Uplift hentai lying by the staircase, folded up sex stories in their pockets when doing the laundry, and you even find the laptop occasionally around the house, a page open to ningenbooru, and almost always it’s a picture of a Dog Uplift girl getting hammered by Human dick, fingers held up in ‘V' signs as cum splatters all over.
You know that the Mollys are developing but this is getting downright careless!  You make that very clear how disappointed you are before leaving on the fifth day.  The Mollys hang their heads low, not daring to look at you, silently watching you leave for Xiao Yu’s apartment.  It’s actually getting more comfortable with her than it is at home.
Xiao Yu’s behavior has changed over time.  She used to just focus on getting as much action out of you as possible, now she spends more time cuddling, asking questions about you, your pets, how you treat them, how old they are, if they even wear collars.  It’s actually a nice change of pace from the usual dirty talk and grunting.  You dare say your relationship with her is becoming more than just physical.

****************************************************************************************************

“Oooh Anon” Xiao Yu whines.  “I'm sooooo sticky.”
“It was your idea to use honey” you shoot back.
“Next time I suggest something like that, tell me to shut up and blow you.” Xiao Yu grimaces.  “I need to wash off be back soon dear” she sings as she leaves for the bathroom.
While Xiao Yu is washing, you decide to see what else that crazy girl had planned.  She’s getting really inventive, a little too inventive if today’s session with honey and a spatula have been any indication.  She’s bound to have more up her sleeve.  You don’t need to search long.  Right in her dresser, under a magazine for Uplift Beauty, “8 ways to make your human go crazy for you” emblazoned on the front, you find a very crumpled, very used piece of paper in sloppy handwriting.  Straightening the note, you can start to see it’s a checklist.
‘Steps to Being a Pet Agaim’
You assume she meant to write ‘Again’
    ‘Find Apartment with Human - X His name is Anon!  Such a cute name! :)’
    ‘Send Daughters Away- X’
    ‘Seduce Human while in heat  - X’
    ‘Have Wild Crazy Good Sex! - XXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXX’
    ‘Get Pregnant -   Not yet but I’m so close!  He’s cum in me so many times it’s bound to happen!’
    ‘Convince Human ^ Anon! - to take me as Pet to raise our new child - If it’s a boy, I’ll call him Anon too.  If it’s a girl, maybe I’ll call her Mo Mo.’
    ‘Live Happily ever after with new Owner -  I wonder if that would make me Xiao Yu Anon...I like that name’
    'Anon'
     'Master Anon'
       'Anon'
        'Anon'
       'Owner-Anon'
        'Anon'
        'Anon Sir'
        'Anon'
        'Master Anon'
        'Master'
        'My love Anon'
       'Anon'
    ‘Anon-love’
    ‘Keeper Anon’
    ‘Anon’
    ‘Anon’
    ‘ANON’
    And it just keeps going, the list devolving into her writing your name over and over, with an ever growing number of hearts written around each one.  It's getting a bit creepy.  No scratch that it's super fucking creepy.
    “Oh geez you found it” your blood runs cold as you hear Xiao Yu’s voice behind you.
    You spin around, seeing Xiao Yu in a towel, fur drenched.  “I was going to invite you to come ‘wash’ with me but I guess we have something to talk about now huh?”
    This is the part in films where the stalker lady comes at you with something large and blunt to break your legs.  Your hands fumble behind you looking for anything to defend yourself on her desk.  Xiao Yu’s lips quiver as she tries to form words, failing to say anything but a blubbering whimper.  Eventually she gives up , knees buckling as she collapses on the floor rather dramatically.  "I'm sorry Anon, but I can't do this anymore!  I hate my life!  I can't hold a steady job, I only make ends meet with my trust fund that barely pays for everything” she rants.  Wiping her eyes, she throws herself at your legs.  
    Okay this isn’t part of the movies.  Suddenly, you got a soggy, sobbing panda Uplift crying into your legs and you have no idea what to do.  “Uh” you stammer “There there?”
    Xiao Yu doesn’t let up.  “I miss being a pet!  I miss having an owner that would take care of me!  I miss waking up next to a human knowing everything is alright!"
    “But you were doing fine until now.” you argue, holding Xiao Yu and propping her on a nearby chair.
    I only ever get money from that trust fund, but it barely covers everything.  My old owner’s family wasn’t too happy that I got so much from him and…I don’t know what they did, but the amount I’ve been getting has been less than before!”
“They can do that?”
“I DON’T KNOW!  I don’t know about any of these things!  I don’t know how they work, or…why I get such a small amount, or what a ‘rent deposit’ is supposed to be, or ‘dependencies’.  These are all words I don’t understand!  I just know I’m supposed to call them that because everyone else does!”
“And you can’t work for more?”
“I tried!  I tried so many times!  I’ve been rejected and fired from nearly every job in the county!  I-I just don't understand a lot of what I have to do!  And then I have to wear those stuffy uniforms that catch on my claws, and I trip over my shoes, and make a mess of everything!
Nothing about this life makes sense anymore!  I don’t know what I need!  I don’t know what a ‘public pass’ is or why I call food ‘groceries’ or the difference is between a credit and a debit card!  I didn’t have to understand any of this stuff as a pet and that was just fine!  I wish I could go back to those days!”
            She buries her face in her hands, breathing heavily.  You rub her back and grasp her hands, bringing them down so you can look directly into her bloodshot eyes.
"Do you mean that this whole thing about forgetting to declare your heat cycle…was a ruse?"
“N-no!  Well not all of it!  I mean I just wanted a human again.  Then as the days went by, and all the fun we had, I just...” she searched for the right words, a familiar looks she gets when her lust starts taking over again  “then I found out you had pets that must love you, and we had so much fun, and you made me feel so good, and I felt so sure and safe with you.”  She suddenly embraces you, pressing her damp tits into your chest.  “I love you Anon” she whispers “and I want to be your pet.”
“Xiao Yu-”
    “Please don’t say no.”
    Like the first day, you find yourself with nothing to say.  You lock up as your mind reels with this information.  Xiao Yu is pouring her heart out to you, and is basically asking to move in with you.  Make her a Pet again?  That’s not something you just do.  There’s consequences to that.  Expenses to pay for, paperwork to fill, angry peers who will see you as a slave owner exploiting a dumb Uplift, your life will be turned upside down.  And yet…
    And yet when Xiao Yu clings to you so tightly, pressed against you like you’re her anchor in a sea of madness and confusion you can’t bring yourself to refuse.  Every fibre of your being tells you this is wrong, that you shouldn’t take this girl and strip her of everything even if it’s what she wants.  Yet you can’t bring yourself to say it.  All you can do is return her embrace.
	You feel a little guilty leaving Xiao Yu with such a half assed reply as “I need time to think”.  The look on her face made it feel like you ripped her heart out.  It doesn't put your mind at ease.   After all what should you do?  Should you accept her offer?  Would you even be able to support her?  And what about her kids?  They're enrolled in school on behalf of their mother.  She becomes a Pet and they enter some legal gray area where no one knows they belong.  Do you become their father?  Do they become Pets with their mother?  The dann Anti-Pet laws just make all this crap so much harder to figure out.
	You feel drained by the time you get home.  Resting your head on your steering wheel, it feels like weights are tied to your limbs, guilt just making you feel exhausted.  Slowly pulling yourself out, you find your way to the garage freeze, pulling out some frozen dinners and carry them upstairs.  You’re in no mood to cook anything, you’re just going to nuke some slop and have that.  You make sure to pull out the steak dinners for the Mollys, and a soft burrito for your grandmother.
	The girls don’t come again, and why should they?  You were pretty upset with them this morning.  They’re probably still avoiding you, so you’ll have to bring dinner to them.  Putting their still hot meals on a set of plates you set off down the hall.  Judging by the lights and muffled noises, it’s pretty clear they’re in their room, adjacent to your grandmother’s.  Setting the plates down on a dresser in your grandmother’s room, you open the door.  It’s a good thing you set the plates down, otherwise you would have dropped them.  Molly, Molly, and Molly are all splayed out, rubbing their nethers.  They turn their heads when you open their door and floor you a moment later.
	“Molly!  What the hell is this?!” you demand.
	Competitive Molly licks your face.  “Anooooooon” she moans.  “We’re in heat.”
	“Take care of us Anon” Assertive Molly continues.
	“Like your panda girlfriend.” Calm Molly chimes in as she tries to bring your pants down.
	“Wait a minute wai-” Your protests are muffled as Competitive Molly stuffs her breast in your mouth.  
	“Oooh Anon, you’re so aggressive” she whines.  Assertive Molly grabs your hand, rubbing your digits along her cleft, causing her to moan while Calm Molly  frees your dick, caressing the flopping organ as she inhales your scent.  “Oh I can still smell that bitch on you” she uncharacteristically says.  “But I can smell you more.  Use me Anon!”
	Oh fuck, you didn’t think it was possible but you’re getting aroused.  No!
	Your dick starts to stiffen.
	NO!
    Molly grasps it in her hand, starting to stroke it.
	NO!
	She gives your crown a loving kiss.
	DOWN!  DOWN DAMNED COCK!
    With herculean might you throw all three girls off of you, and and possibly a joint out of alignment.  They land on the floor in an undignified heap.
	“First Xiao Yu wants me to take her in as a pet, now you girls are trying to get in my pants!  When did my life become a porno?!” you dig your fingers into your hair  You’re pissed.  Not at the Mollys, not at Xiao Yu, not at anyone, but damn you are mad as hell and you need to vent.
	“For fuck sake, all I wanted was to just collect some goddamn rent, is that asking for too much?!  I just-I-they-she-you!”  With no object to focus your rage in, you start to sputter out nonsense before striding past the Mollys, collapsing into their bed, your anger burning away as quickly as it came.  Oh yeah, your dick is still out.  
The girls stare at you, not daring to move or say anything, lest they spark you off again.  Competitive Molly is the first to tentatively crawl up, lying next to you.  “Anon, I’m-we’re sorry.  We were worried that you’d forget about us.”
	“Forget?” you turn to Molly, scratching her head.  She presses her head into your hand as you muss her hair.  “How could I forget you three?”
	Calm Molly flops on your otherside.  “We were still afraid Anon.  From the very first day we can remember you being there with us.  You were around when Oma was still living on her own.  When she had her first stroke, you were the first to arrive, before even the paramedics.  You cared for her, and you cared for us.  You were with us for our entire lives.  We know you come home every day but we can't help but worry when you're gone. And you keep going to that Panda woman.  The things you do to her, the things we smell on you…” she trails off as Assertive Molly perches her chin on your chest.  
	“It makes us feel things Anon.  More than just love” she licks your chest.  “We want you Anon.”
	“No” you shake your head.  “You don't want me.  You only think you do-”
	“Fuck that noise” barks Calm Molly.  You gape at her in surprise.  “We know what we want!”  She silences your protest on your lips as she smashes hers into it.  Assertive Molly’s licking gets more sloppy, lapping at your now exposed nipples while Competitive Molly grasps at your hand, sucking hard on the fingers.
	“We waited for this moment for years Anon” gasps Assertive Molly.  “We're tired of waiting for you to notice!”
This is wrong!  The Mollys you raised since pups, the same Mollys you’ve seen as sisters are about to force themselves on you!  
And it makes you rock hard.  You start tongue wrestling calm Molly as you wrench a hand free to grasp Assertive Molly’s head.  She gives a surprised yelp and darts up when she feels your fingers also the back of her head, grasping her hair tightly.  She doesn't struggle as you guide her to your crotch.  
	Her resistance fades as she darts towards your throbbing erection, her rough tongue coating it in slobber. Competitive Molly whines as Assertive Molly swallows your member.  She pulls your hand down between her legs, grinding your fingers against her sopping wet cleft.  She lies onto your arm, panting directly into your ear.  
	“Come on Anon, we know you want it as bad as us” she whispers.  
	You have no words for her.  Assertive Molly’s blowjob robs you of any thought save how amazing she is.  The snout of a dog with the intelligence of a human combined into an Uplift makes tongues feel...otherworldly!  She lacks Xiao Yu’s experience but more than makes up for it in volume!  She works every inch of your shaft simultaneously, that tongue rubbing and squeezing your member in ways you didn't think were possible, threatening to blow your load already!  Not yet!  Not yet!
	“I-”is all you can say before Calm Molly silences you, pressing your face between her legs.  The smell of aroused Doberman overwhelms your senses as you get drenched in dog juice.
	“Ffffuck” Calm Molly hisses, breathing heavily as she smashes you crotch into you harder and harder “I’ve wanted this for so long…”
You need air!  You reach up and pull Calm Molly off your face.  She yips in surprise while you push Assertive Molly off your painfully hard cock, your stomach tightening in anticipation of piercing Molly’s snatch.  Calm Molly freezes up when she feels your head prodding her entrance.  She grasp your shoulders, looking you directly into your eyes, lust and need reflecting in hers.  Slowly, inch by inch you dip into her warm hole, Molly’s eyes rolling up, her mouth forming a widening ‘O' as you fill her out.  A light sound escapes her throat as she hilts, her walls pulling against you, trying in vain to draw you in deeper.  “Oh god Anon” she whines.  
	The other jealous Molly's crowd around her.  “Well how is he?” Assertive asks.
	“Exactly as I wanted.  A perfect fit” she practically sings.  “A perfect fit!”, she repeats over and over as she bounces in your lap.  Just her voice is making it hard to hold back a climax you feel welling up inside you.  You try and fail to hold back a shot of pre as it spasms out, coating your duck in an extra layer of arousal.  If Molly noticed, she show no sign of caring as she grasps you for stability as she gyrates her hips in a circle, twisting up and leftwards, peaking at the center with your crown just barely kissing her entrance, before rotating down and to the right a split second later, enveloping you in the warm, welcoming embrace of her inner walls.
She hugs her siblings close as you start pushing up into her, slamming into her pussy halfway through each drop, hammering into her with such intensity words fail her.  Just a babble of incomprehensible sounds as the animal part of her mind takes over, a part.that has no rational thought or reason, just a bottomless need for dick.  
	The other Molly's grab a hand respectively, guiding your fingers to their entrances, wet with arousal, the heat emanating off their sex and pelting your hand with warmth before you even make physical contact.  As your digits part their folds, it only gets hitters as your fingers dip into a pair of ovens, squeezing against you as you probe deeper into them.  Assertive Molly whines, Competitive Molly moans, both grasp the bed tightly as you swirl around searching for that sweet spot.  Their legs shake and spread out when you graze against it, attempting to draw your entire hand in. 
	In turn you piston your fingers in and out in time with your pelvic thrusts, slapping your wet palms into their vulvas in a chorus of wet slapping and horny dog moaning.  Something wells up within you, surging up your cock and-
Calm Molly had to choose that moment to jump to high, your dick popping out of her dripping puss.  Like a meat fountain, a geyser of clear and white fluids fly up into the air, catching the light for the briefest moment before splattering all over Calm Molly’s stomach.
	“This isn’t the bathroom.”
	“Grandma?!”
	Your grandmother is standing in the doorway, watching you cum all over her Pets, all three clinging to you like you were their lifeline.  No faster boner killer than getting caught by family, any lust you may have had evaporating in an instant.
	“So, you wanna fuck my dogs?”
	“Grandma” you stammer.  “Thi-this isn’t what you may-”
	“I always knew my son was a dog fucker.”
	“I’m your grandson…”
	“Oh you are?  Huh.  Like father like son I guess” your grandmother grunts as she turns around.  “Ah-ah-ah...Ich persönlich bevorzuge Pferde” she mutters to herself as she continues her search for a toilet.
	You flop back in the bed, the girls still clinging to you.  Finally you speak.  “Xiao Yu wants to be my pet.”
	“Wait for real?”
	Assertive Molly pokes up, straddling your chest.  “She wants to live here?  With you?”
	“With us?”, Competitive Molly chimes in.  “Does she even know about us?”
	“Yeah I told her all about you girls” you groan, your endorphin rush wearing off, and the burning sensation of over-exerted muscles creeping into your limbs. 
	“She knows about us?  And she still wants to be a Pet?”
	“I thought she want you to marry her or something the way she’s been all over you.”
	“Yeah but Pet?”
	“I know right?  You think she’s pretty?”
“I bet she knows just what makes Anon tick.”
“You think she likes pasta?” 
The Mollys surge up, huddling together as they talk and giggle at this news.  Then they turn to you, three pairs of brown furry breasts pressed against your chest.  “And what did you say?”
	You hesitate as the Molly's look at you expectantly.  “Uh...I said I’d think about it?”
    “What?!”
    Wrong answer.
    The three Molly's size you, hoisting you up.  Assertive Molly growls “What kind of bullshit answer is that?!” 
    “She pours out her soul like that and all you can say if you’ll think about it?!” Competitive Molly exclaims.
    As one, all three girls pull you towards the door.  Calm Molly shouts at you “You are going back tomorrow and giving her a proper goddman answer!”, moments before you are unceremoniously dumped into the hall, door slamming behind you. 
    Where the hell did that come from?

>during times of war tribal anthro females abstain from sex and paint fertility markings on their intimates
>the belief that their men, their blood raging with unreleased lust and testosterone, will fight that much harder so that they return and be rewarded with heavy sex for days
>wives will breed more children with returning husbands who have proven their strength again, daughters will be deflowered by their victorious boyfriends
>but there is a secret half of this ritual, one that is known by all females but is never revealed to any of their males to preserve their pride
>that the fertility ritual is as much for the enemy as it is for their males
>females who resist are more likely to be killed
>but the females who actively lust after their husbands and lover's killers are kept as prime breeders, their stolen pussies pumping out baby after baby of their conqueror's seed
>better to kneel and submit to their new masters

>There was little resistance as the humans marched into the tribal's village
>Many anthro females fell to their knees as they mourned their lost husbands and fathers
>Those who ran were easily caught
>But all anthro pussies, no matter if they had birthed many children or untouched by puberty, flowed with arousal
>Mature anthro women growled as human hands groped their fertile and experienced bodies, the same hands that had slaughtered their husbands now toyed with their stolen mates
>Young girls cry as they were easily overpowered, their first experience of sex being their faces shoved into the dirt as they were mounted and taken in public
>Pregnant females beg for mercy, knowing their pureberd children will be born in a very different world
>Mothers shamefully spread their legs open to ease the ravaging of their daughters
>But screams and cries soon turned to moans
>Loyal wives turned to into drooling whores, bouncing on the human cocks of her masters, memories of defeated, inferior anthro husbands disappearing with each thrust
>Girls mewl and gasp as their bodies learn to enjoy being ravaged
>A once pure anthro daughter falls into a peaceful and satisfied sleep next to her similarly ravaged mother, both of their wombs and stomachs flowing with the cum of at least a dozen humans each
>An anthro child is born, the very last vestige of the dead males, her mother reimpregnated within a week with a human baby
>The day arrives, the anthro females will be split up
>Some will become harem bitches
>Others will be sold off into slavery
>The lucky one will become wives for retiring soldiers
>And others will follow the human soldiers as relief whores, offering up their cunts to whoever needs to blow one out

>tfw no human bf
>tfw you will never tease him when he comes home
>tfw he will never scratch you behind your ears, shutting you up
>tfw he will never collar you on your wedding day
>tfw he will never embrace you, nuzzling into eachother on a cold night
>tfw he will never breed you like the horny mutt you are.
feels bad man

House dragon in training.
>dragoness butchered a warparty nearby
>A knight lord enjoyed the sight of the mighty dragon destroying some barbarous locals that were ransacking the mountain's edge
>He sends out an envoy to local dragon tamers
>The dragon tamer arrives he teaches the knight everything about dragons
>The studious knight prepared for the great confrontation
>His final stop before making his way to the mountains was the church to donate a large sum of gold to his god
>If he doesn't make it back, it would be better for his liquid assets go to the local communities and church than being picked apart by other local barons and thieves
>At the foot of the mountain the dragon tamer parted ways giving his final advice that he has to make the dragon submit to him in one combat
>The dragon's submission has to be utterly complete
>Then the knight stood at the mouth of her lair
>She puts on quite the opposition snarling breathing fire
>The knight almost lost if it weren't for the blessing of his god
>He cut her and smited her
>She was brought low but still fought and spit curses at him
>To bring the dragon lower he would make her an example of his might
>Many lengths of chain around her wings and forearms he left her on the edge of what was once her home
>He took her and defaced her as she looked over her perch
>she snarled and snapped as he penetrated her
>Fighting hard against her own instincts of being conquered by a powerful male she thrashed
>He erected a monument for her to sit and think about him
>in a cross he bound her legs spread wings spread wide in a mock gesture of her freedom
>He fucked her again, her instincts were giving in
>She was a dragoness being conquered by a better
>Her body was wrecked and as he came inside her traitorous body he grabbed a handful of their love making and smeared it on her snout, inserting it into her nostrils
>he would leave her there to smell her conqueror while he rested to continue her training.

>There's nothing left. The winter... the frost took it all.
>But the humans... they have food. They have shelter. They are warm in their fancy homes, with their special fires.
>Maybe, maybe they'll share some... maybe if I really beg.
>I need it. I need to try.

>Checking on your anthro son playing his videogames with his internet friends (he's crossdressing again and the human slurs can be heard to the living room).

Trying to make a streaming carreer as an anthros-supremacistt "ironic" femboy isn't as easy when your dad is a human who's supportive of your hobbies and lifestyle.

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1746/99/1746998581231.jpg)
>How anthros see their human rulers in a society that looks after them kindly.

Imagine getting kings rights to every anthro woman on her wedding night, but it's actually just humans rights, and the other only way girls get out of it is if they marry a human man.
>Most beautiful for woman in the village gets married
>But the human blacksmith had eyes on her
>She spends her wedding night at the blacksmiths cottage
>The wholevillage an Heather bleeting her lungs out
>She screams for every single orgasm her body is pushed through
>Her husband, a doeboi, can have her tomorrow
>If the human is done with her, that is

Reasons you should collar a Dobergirl:
>They're loyal and protective of their owners; they make for excellent bodyguards
>They're intelligent and easy to train
>They're very playful and will enjoy whatever sex or roleplay games you have planned for them
>Very cute and aesthetically pleasing

>Anthro wife keeps seeing her hubby mistaken as a female
>Slowly turns into a fujo and gets off to seeing her soft husband ogled and taken by human studs
>Becomes a raunchy trend among couples in the area

>Furbois become accessories for anthro women to show off to attract human males, becoming a sort of mating ritual to satisfy their animalistic brains
>They have their furbois dance, dressed in sexy clothing, and show off their bodies to entice human men
>The more feminine a furboi is, the higher the chance the female will be chosen to be bred, right in front of the furboi

>How pathetic, and you call yourself a doe?
>You had everything I've ever given you ever since we and the Dreemurr's became friends
>They had the prime human cock they call a son all for you to devour and submit to
>Why do you think we set up all those little playdates Noelle?
>And then suddenly you decide to go... gaga for some dragon skank that doesn't even respect humans or even realize their pure sexual energy
>Enough! I don't want to hear any more questions Noelle
>If you aren't going to take that young man's cock for yourself
>I will

>Defeat an anthro warrior/bandit in a duel /ambush and spare him afterwards
>As gratitude, he pledges a life debt to you, promising to serve you in any way he can
>He thinks you're gonna make him your bodyguard
>HFW you make him wear frilly maid dresses and just clean your house instead

>Anthrostate sends in a kill team when they hear of a human in the country
>They know how dangerous and destabilizing a single human can be to the status quo and so send in their version of seal team 6 to neutralize the threat
>But even with their gas masks to filter out pheromones and tight combat gear to make it hard to be undressed, the kill team fell one by one, turning what should've been a routine kill or capture into a horror movie as their team dwindles down to the last members
>In the end they all wind up pregnant with their loyalties changed to the human
